A 2
CHAPTER I.
Where
are Frank and Harry? asked Mr. Lennox, as
the family assembled at breakfast.
I heard them, last night, replied Mary, agree to go
over to Brooklyn early in the morning, and practise with
the pistol.
Ah! here they are, exclaimed Mr. Lennox. Come,
young gentlemen, you're just in time.
How many people have you shot with those horrid
things? said Mrs. Lennox.
Nobody but our mark, answered Frank, a young
lieutenant
just graduated from West Point, and I think we
rather touched that once or twicedidn't we, Harry?
Which is the best marksman? asked Mr. Lennox.
I am, said Harry, but Frank comes on famously.
What are you going to do on your birthday, Harry?
inquired his father. It's next Thursday, isn't it? and
you're one-and-twenty, I believe.
I haven't formed any projects, sir, replied Harry.
I hope you're going to give us some sort of a
celebration
on the occasion, father? said Mary, laughing.
I think birthdays ought to be kept in a quiet way, said
Mrs. Lennox, and young people should make their first
entrance into the world with reflection and gravity.
Nonsense! exclaimed Mr. Lennox: why gravity?
There are occasions enough for gravity when we can't
help it. On the contrary, let's have some friends to dinner,
and in the evening a ball.
I was going to propose a trip to Rose Hill, said Mary.
We might ask the Eltons, and one or two others, and
make a pleasant family partya sort of picnic.
What say you, Harry? asked his father. You are
the hero of the day.
Upon my word, sir, said Harry, I have not even
formed a wish on the subject.
If there is going to be a celebration, said Frank,
I
prefer Rose Hill.
So I thought, remarked Mary, laughing.
So should I, said Harry. At a ball, I suppose, I
should be metamorphosed into a sort of lion, and I fear I
should feel more like Bottom the weaver than the noble
animal himself.
That's right, Harry, observed his mother; be modest,
my son.
But, now I think of it, said Mr. Lennox, I can't very
well leave town Thursday: I have an engagement.
If you mean the affair of Brinsley, I can attend to that,
I think, said Harry.
And you, replied his mother, how can
you
then join
the party?
Oh,
I
don't mind. I shall rather prefer to stay in town.
Well, that
is one way
to celebrate one's birthday, to be
sure, said Frank, laughing.
Harry is so odd, exclaimed Mary. I believe he
really
dislikes to be with his own family. He's all day at his
business, and all the evening at political meetings, or clubs,
or the theatre, or heaven knows where! He don't dine at
home half the time, and when he does
Young men will be young men, said his father;
nothing
is gained by curbing and advising them; though, to
say truth, Harry, you
have
been rather erratic in your way
of life lately.
I'm sorry you think so, sir; but you often say men want
not only severe application, but a knowledge of life.
Certainly, my dear boy, certainly; you are quite your
own master. As to Rose Hill, we shall be obliged to give
that up for Thursday. I'm sorry, too, with this magnificent
weather. But I'll make another proposition, which I hope
won't shock your mother's sense of gravity. We'll have no
celebration at all, but a quiet family dinner, with your uncle
and aunt Henderson, and go in the evening to the theatre
and hear Horn.
I should like that better, said Mrs. Lennox.
And I, echoed all.
Good; it is so decreed, then, said Lennox.
And, father, said Mary, we'll ask the Eltons to dine,
and take them with us. What say you, Frank?
Who! I? exclaimed Frank. Oh, certainly.
Anything
for a quiet houseanybody. It's quite the same to
me.
Oh, you hypocrite! said Mary. You've no
preference
for Mrs. Elton! certainly not!
What do you mean by that, Mary? asked Frank.
And why not Mrs. Elton? said Mr. Lennox. She is
a very charming lady; a gay, amiable, excellent, and very
handsome woman; a little eloquent, perhaps; but I like her
because she has a heart. Mrs. Elton is one of my
beauties
,
although she is fifty.
Why, so are
you
fifty, father, said Mary, laughing,
for the matter of that.
Don't mention it, I beg, cried Mr. Lennox. I don't
believe it. It's too ridiculous! Why, I don't feel a bit
older than I did when your too susceptible mamma first fell
furiously in love with me.
Nonsense! Nor a bit wiser! said his wife.
Wisdom? A fig for wisdom! What is it but caution
and cunning, after all? What do we live for? Happiness.
Thank Heaven, I've enjoyed it, and I shall leave it within
the reach of my children. Let the unfortunate study
wisdom
;
but for me, true wisdom is to enjoy. And yet fifty!
I really can't believe it.
It is nevertheless so, said Mrs. Lennox. And there's
Frank, a man, with a pair of, I must say, very
impudent-looking
whiskers, and a commission in the army. Here's
Mary, a tall woman already; and as for Harry, he's
actually
growing old and serious. Ah, my children! you little
know how short life is to those who
look back
.
Very true! observed Lennox, intending to be grave,
but failing in such a droll way as to make every one smile.
It seems but yesterday when I used to think a man of
fifty a regular old codger, done with life, gouty, with a
cracked voice, gold-headed cane, and a brown wig; and
yet now, although arrived fairly at that awful age, I still
feel myself the same wild, good-for-nothing young dog as
ever.
And I don't see any particular difference in you either,
said his wife, looking at him half reproachfully, half
affectionately
,
only you've grown rather younger and wilder.
To be sure I have, replied he; and why? Because
I have not troubled myself with
wisdom!
I've never
fretted
and moped about what couldn't be helped. I never
thought
an hour in my life; never studied more than was
just necessary for the morrow. I've taken the world as it
came, and not striven for what it did not give me. Do you
suppose that, had I pleased, I could not have been as great
as any of them? Couldn't I have shone at the bar, and
shaken the Senate? To be sure I could. But I disdained
it. Fortune made me rich, and my own good sense kept
me happy; and, if that is not the true wisdom, I should like
to know what is.
To do you justice, said Mrs. Lennox, with a smile,
when you came to visit melet me see! five-and-twenty
years agoyou certainly were much graver and more
sensible
than you are now. I never saw such a gentle,
low-spoken
,
modest person. If I could have known what a
hair-brained young madeap you would turn out at fifty, I
shouldn't have had you!
This was received with renewed laughter by the happy
family circle.
And how they have gone, those five-and-twenty years!
added Mrs. Lennox. And I wonder where we shall all
be five-and-twenty years hence.
Be? why here, replied Mr. Lennox; a little changed
or so, but just here, Mary, looking very much what you are
now. Frank commander-in-chief, with his eyebrows and
whiskers a little more bushy (if possible), and Harry a
senator, or Secretary of State, perhaps, for he hasn't
unfolded
yet any actual designs on the presidential chair.
How can you speak so lightly of such solemn things?
said Mrs. Lennox. How can you close your eyes to the
possibility of a very different picture?
I tell you what, madam, said her husband, gayly, I'll
thank you to give us none of your
wisdom
. If you choose
to go, why that's your affair:
I don't;
on the contrary, I
mean to stay, and I don't think I need despair of providing
myself with another helpmate. I know twenty fine women
at this moment who would take me, and say `Thank you,
sir!'
I haven't the slightest doubt of it, replied his wife,
laughing at a reckless good-humour, to which she was too
well accustomed to misunderstand it, and looking at him
with an admiration which the five-and-twenty years
aforesaid
,
whatever other revolutions they might have effected,
had not changed.
Nor I, said he, elevating his chin a little, throwing
back his shoulders into something of an attitude, and with
a glance into a large mirror opposite, which was intended
to pass for affectation, but in which, nevertheless, was no
want of a little real vanity. I think I'm tolerably well
preserved! Haira touch of gray, perhaps; complexion
a little richer than falls to the lot of inexperienced youth;
a line or two in the face, here and there, only visible in the
daylight; and, in fact, altogether
Pray take a warm cake, sir, interrupted Harry,
laughing
.
To say the truth, Mr. Lennox
was
a very handsome man.
His once dark hair was not the less luxuriant or
becomingly
disposed, from the very general and decided change of
colour which he was pleased to denominate a touch of
gray. His complexion showed the natural effect of a long
course of good living, in a gentlemanly ruddiness which
scarcely detracted from his good looks. His person was
tall, well formed, and dignified; his voice manly and
pleasing
,
his eyes fine, and his manners particularly fascinating.
In short, he was one of those persons whose appearance
and address remind you of a duke or a prince, before you
have time to reflect that dukes and princes are, by nature,
no handsomer than other men. The benevolence, good
humour, and esprit of his character discovered themselves
in all he did and said, and the sort of thoughtlessness, which
might appear startling in any other man of his age, threw
around him only an air of originality.
To come back to Mrs. Elton, however, said he, while
he arranged upon his plate, and duly provided with pepper
and salt, a piece of fresh, boiled shad (an exquisite
delicacy
,
peculiar, we believe, to the United States, and some of
the rivers of Spain), if I
should
be under the necessity of
seeking a new helpmate, which, nevertheless, I hope won't
be the case, Katy my dear, it wouldn't be the
old
lady I
should make up to, by any manner of means. She has
rather too redundant a flow of conversation for my quiet
and retiring disposition. I should carry the war into
another
quarter.
And, pray, who would it be, father? inquired Mary.
Whom would you give me for a second mamma?
Why, that little witch Fanny, to be sure.
Mary and her mother here interchanged glances, and
laughed with a significance which appeared, as Othello
says, to mean something.
What are you laughing at, miss? demanded her father.
Oh, nothing, sir! answered Mary, laughing still more.
Come, now, I insist upon knowing.
Why, only, said Mrs. Lennox, if you have any
serious
intentions that way, your pride may have a fall.
What do you mean?
You stand some chance of being ratherrather
Rather what?
Rather
cut out
, father, said Mary.
What! Fanny Elton? exclaimed Mr. Lennox,
evidently
surprised. Is it possible? And who is the fellow,
pray?
A glance, full of good-natured mischief, which Mary cast
towards Frank, appeared to throw some light on the
mystery
.
Frank returned it with a look of great indiguation,
but, at the same time, coloured obviously.
What! the lieutenant? cried Mr. Lennox. What,
sir! you have had the audacity totohey, sir?
It's the most absurd thing possible, said Frank.
Mary is always full of nonsensical ideas.
You need not look so angry, said Mrs. Lennox.
There's nothing to be ashamed of.
Ashamed? repeated Frank, with a certain dignity,
rather thrown away, however, upon the company, I'm not
ashamed; but I think Mary might devise more profitable
occupation thanthan endeavouring to discover facts, and
circulating reports of things whichwhich do not exist.
Hoity toity! what a grand speech! rejoined his father.
Your indignation, said Mrs. Lennox, reminds me,
Frank, of the first time you ever put on a long-tailed coat.
Mary had been teazing him all day about it, for she
is
a
shameful teaze, and at last capped the climax by speaking
of it to some ladies who were paying me a visit. I shall
never forget how Frank drew himself up, in his grand way,
and said, `Mary's a mere child, and is always
endeavouring
to attract attention to every passing circumstance!'
Poor Frank!
Frank's famous for making memorable speeches, said
Mary, while all were laughing heartily except the object
of the merriment. Do you remember what he once told
me about reading history? I had asked him some question
concerning one of the personages in Hume, whom he could
not remember till I related several events of his life.
`Oh,' said he, `when I read history, I always
skip the
names and dates!
'
I hope you have not skipped Miss Elton's name, said
his father, and the date of your first meeting? Hey! you
young dog?
Upon my word, it's quite ridiculous, replied Frank,
amid the general smiles which these youthful anecdotes
had provoked; I'm sure I might skip Miss Elton herself
altogether, for all the truth there is in Mary's accusation.
She may be a very decent sort of girlI've no doubt she
is; but as forin respect toso far from there being any
danger of
Hold your tongue, sir! cried his father. How dare
you have the impertinence to speak in that way of the
loveliest
little being that ever grew off a rosebush? If that
young lady, sir, has deigned to honour you with an instant's
attentionif you've received so much as an accidental look
from her, and not gone crazy, you young scoundrel, you're
no son of mine.
You're rather hard upon Frank, said Harry. He
cannot publicly acknowledge a hope without also
intimating
that such a hope has some foundation. Frank is not
only not one of those who would not boast of favours
not received, but he would even not boast of favours
received
.
Well, really, Harry, said his mother, laughing heartily,
it seems to me you are almost as bad as Frank with your
speeches. You are not in love too, I hope?
Favours! received and not received! said Mr.
Lennox
.
Why, what's all this? Are you such a coxcomb,
addressing Frank, as to suppose that young lady fancies
you worthy of the least notice?
No; and that's what I've been trying to say. Nothing
whatever has passed between Miss Elton and myself
whichthat in the least
He coloured again.
Come, come! said Mrs. Lennox. I won't have you
all on Frank in this way. Hand you father the cakes, and
let us leave the things of to-morrow unto to-morrow.
The lucky young rascal! muttered his father; and
ashamed of it!
Really, sir, said Frank, with something more of
emphasis
than became the relation between him and the
person
to whom he spoke, as this is a discussion not
altogether
agreeable to me, and as I have quite finished my
breakfast, I must beg leave to withdraw.
He rose from the table and was leaving the room, when
his father called him back.
Here, sir! Master Frank! Lieutenant Lennox! one
thing let me say to you!
What is it?
If you think the attentions of this young lady
importunate
,
had I not better forbid her the house? Ha! ha! ha!
The door was closed with a decision which a good
observer
might have remarked above the merry laughter
occasioned
by the sally of Mr. Lennox.
Poor, dear Frank! remarked Mrs. Lennox. You
really press him too far.
I wish all my children, said Mr. Lennox, to be able
to stand jesting good naturedly, and to learn the art of
constantly
governing their temper. Frank is quick as
lightning
.
But it's soon over, replied his mother. Go after
him, Harry, and soothe him. This matter is, I fear, too true
for jesting.
Harry rose, and followed his brother out of the room.
The young dog! said Mr. Lennox, what an actor he
would make! Did you ever see such a splendid
countenance
!
such haughtiness! and
to me
, too! Our names will
live hereafter, Kate, in those two boys. I have frittered
away my life in peaceful pleasures. Instead of seeking
power and fame, I have confined myself to a narrow circle,
without influence, without a name. But if men want to
know me hereafter, let them
look at my sons
. Is Frank
really attached to Fanny Elton, though?
Certainly, said Mary; I have long seen it. They
love each other passionately.
I have sometimes half thought, said Mrs. Lennox,
that Harry
Oh no! mother, not at all! He never goes near her.
I think, on the contrary, they are perfectly indifferent to
each other.
I confess, said Mrs. Lennox, I should like no one
so well for a daughter-in-law as Fanny Elton.
Vol. I.B
CHAPTER II.
It
is not easy to say what sense there is in jesting at
young lovers. If they are entering into a union destined
to be favourable to their happiness, there is nothing
ridiculous
in it; if not, it is rather a serious affair. Miss Elton
had been like one of the family for years, and the Lennox
children had played with her, and quarrelled and romped in
happy freedom from the feverish malady which goes in the
world by the name of love. But Time, that
revolutionizing
old gentleman, always busy with everything, and
never leaving the smallest blade of grass one day what it
was the day before, had almost imperceptibly altered the
individuals in question. He had advanced the little, sturdy,
hoop-playing Harry into a promising young lawyer; and
Mary, with her short-cropped, boyish hair and pantalettes,
into a slender girl of a little over fifteen. Frank's round
jacket and smooth, rosy face were metamorphosed into an
officer's becoming coat, and a manly, whiskered
countenance
,
very much browned by the sun, where, however,
as yet lurked all the transparent beauty and
ingenuousness
of a boy; while Fanny Elton, from the sweetest
little rosy-cheeked, bright-eyed child that ever was seen,
who had a kiss for everybody that she loved, without
particular
reference to age or sex, had, somehow or other,
acquired
a new form and new ideas. And, in the intervals of
Frank's military education at West Point, when he came
home on a visit, or the family spent a day or two at that
enchanting
spot, he saw, year after year, the riotous little,
beautiful
tom-boy softened and subdued into gentle and lovely
girlhood
,
inches and feet added to her stature, new lines and
graces to her countenance, new charms and wonders to her
form, timidity, blushes, expression, thought, feeling, and
opinions
unfolding themselves like hues and leaves in a rosebud,
and with a fragrance which touched his senses as strangely.
The romping and kissing, the shouting and quarrelling, had
ceased. He was deep in the manly mysteries of mathematics,
engineering, and other accomplishments indispensable to a
soldier and a gentleman, and shewe might here attempt
to trace, in a magnificent poetic style, the nature of the
silent
and enchanting changes which had come over her;
but the indulgent reader will doubtless let us off with the
simple annunciation that she had shot up into a tall, sweet
girl, and that, to make a long story short, Frank was
desperately
in love with her. In his present condition, he was
not altogether, however, at his ease, as what lover ever is!
He had no reason to suppose himself disagreeable to her;
on the contrary, their long acquaintance, the intimacy of
their childhood, the tender and close attachment and
companionship
existing between her and his sister, placed him
on terms of perfect familiarity, and gave him not only the
constant access of a favourite cousin, but of a brother.
Lovers have been, who, for a moment's solitary interview
with the object of their affection, for one touch of the
peerless
hand, one lock of hair, one worn riband, would have
risked their lives. Frank's case was different. He was
with this young person as often, as much, and as
unobservedly
as he pleased. He shook hands with her
frequently
.
He occasionally walked with her from his father's
house quite alone. He had already made a tolerable
collection
of ribands, shoestrings, old roses, etc., in the
indefinite
augmentation of which he did not see any
particular
danger or difficulty; and, had he boldly and plumply
asked her for a lock of that rich auburn hair, on the
occasion
of his departure for
Prairie du Chien
, where he was
likely to remain six or seven years, it is probable that,
although
the request had been preferred at dinner, before the
whole family, the warm-hearted, sunshiny girl would have
clipped him off a good bouncing handful without a moment's
hesitation. Yet here he was, soon to start off for a place
so many miles distant, without any probability of seeing
her in seven long, changeful, horrible years, and yet he
had not dared to venture any actual statement of his case,
either to her or to any one else. The profound passion
which steeped his soulfor young lieutenants of twenty
can, if fairly put to it, love, when they meet such women,
as well as other and older menhad led him only to break
his repose by frequent moonlight promenades, to a
considerable
outlay of sixpences and shillings for real Havana
cigars, to much melancholy meditation, to many mournful
sighs, and to divers valorous resolutions of decisive action,
which melted into thin air at the presence of the laughing,
lovely girl, who had made all this havoc with him.
One thing, however, he had supposed, viz., that the state
of his heart was unobserved by others. He had fancied it
in his power to be with such a girl, in the presence of other
women, and those women his mother and sister, without
betraying himself to them, and perhaps he was not
unreasonable
in such a supposition. For how could he, in his
innocence, fear that, what he had endeavoured so long and
ineffectually to communicate to the object of it, had been
divined by two comparatively uninterested spectators.
The onset of his whole family at breakfast had cast a
new light over the affair. He had been detected, exposed,
and quizzed. At first he seriously thought of setting out
for
Prairie du Chien
that very morning, without bidding
good-by to anybody, and taking with him only his hat and
cane. Then he resolved to throw himself at the feet of
Miss Elton, and ask her, just in so many words, whether
she would have him or not. Then he conceived the idea
of crushing in its bud a passion which could not be
fortunate
,
and all these fiery impulses ended in his choosing,
with some care, a cigar from a silver box on the
mantelpiece
,
lighting the same by a pretty fire machine at its
side, sitting down in a comfortable fauteuil by an open
window
looking into a garden full of lilach and other flowers, and
smoking furiously. In this state Harry found him when, at
his mother's request, he left the breakfast-table on his
affectionate
commission.
You'll ruin your health, smoking as you do, Frank,
said he, by way of opening the conversation, and with
something of the paternal authority of an elder brother.
You smoke altogether too much. One or two cigars a day
are enough for any one. Beyond thatby-the-way, those
are very nice ones. Where did you get them?
I ordered a box home yesterday from Bininger'stry
onethey are superb. Look there! Did you ever see
anything
richer than that?
And he held out the cigar he was smoking, which, although
nearly finished, retained its original forma phantom of
snowy ashes nearly two inches long.
I don't care, for this once, if I do smoke one with you,
though I generally postpone it till after dinner.
The luxury of the cigar is not confined to the mere
physical solace. Its management aids conversation, and
the attention to be paid to it fills up the pauses. If the
smoker be an awkward person, it furnishes employment for
his hands; if there is any embarrassment in the interview, it
covers it. Could the thing have been, barring the
impoliteness
of it, and could Frank have had Miss Elton at his side
while he smoked his cigar, he would have dared and known
his fate long ago.
Some consciousness of this peculiarity of the cigar
appeared
to pass through the mind of Harry. Perhaps he did
not fully know himself why he smoked on the present
occasion
,
and contrary to his advice and habit. He turned
his cigar over several times in his mouth, as if trying to get
the smoke out of it, although there was no occasion for such
endeavours, it being a perfectly good one. He then puffed
away rapidly, almost as much so as Frank had done, with
a nervous uneasiness, and scarcely had the ashes begun to
appear, when he knocked them off with a smart blow of his
little finger.
At length he said, after emitting one or two clouds, not
with the measured self-enjoyment of a smoker who feels
the charm of what he is doing, but with an abrupt air,
Frank! what's all this fun about you and Fanny Elton?
Nothing, said Frank, but Mary's nonsense.
Do you tell me, on your honour, that you have no
attachment
for her?
On my honour? Who said anything about honour?
I ask you in earnest.
Then, in earnest, said Frank, with another blush, such
as is sometimes seen in a lieutenant, but is rarely known to
exist in any higher rank, yes, I do love her.
And you mean to marry her?
Certainlyif she'll have me.
Does she love you?
Ah! my dear fellow, that's cutting rather close!
No matter: answer me.
I thinkI hope she does.
Has she said so?
No, not exactly said so.
Have you ever spoken to her on the subject?
Never.
Have you good reasons for your hopes?
Yesnocertainly.
Harry paused, but went on smoking at rather a rapid rate.
Very well; that's enough. I thought it but fair to ask
B 2
you this. The whole family seemed to think so, and you
ought not to deceive them or the young lady herself. I
congratulate you, my dear fellow. She's noble girl, and
I hope you may win her well and wear her long.
Where are you going? asked Frank.
I've business in the office.
Stop one moment. I have answered all your
questions
,
Harry, have I not?
Certainly.
Well, now then, if you please, you must answer one of
mine.
What do you mean?
Confidence, Harry, begets confidence, and no one puts
such broad questions as you have asked me, without laying
himself open to be cross-examined in his turn.
Well, there is truth in that, said Harry. I have no
objection to answer you anything, I'm sure, but you would
nevertheless oblige me greatly by not asking.
That is a favour I can't grant. You must tell me, now,
do
you
love Miss Elton?
No. I cannot love a woman who loves another.
Have you ever loved her?
There was a pause.
Yes. I once fancied so.
And have you had reason to suppose she loved you?
continued Frank; and the blush had now given place to a
very unmilitary white.
Never; on the contrarya year ago, for a short time,
I nourished a sort of foolish idea, but it has entirely
vanished
of itself, and I have always found her cold and shy.
Do you think she knows you loved her?
No, I don't think she has the remotest idea of it. On
the contrary, she thinks I despise her, and so, he added,
bitterly, I almost do.
Despise Fanny Elton? And why?
I think her capriciousa coquette.
There is only one excuse for such a sentiment, said
Frank.
And what is that?
Love! disappointed, perhaps, or imagining itself
disappointed
,
imbittering your criticism, and blinding your
judgment
.
I see how it is. You too love her.
No, by Heaven, no. If she were kneeling at my feet,
I would not marry her. I avoid her presence, and shut my
heart against her beauty. If she marry you and make you
a good wife, that may reconcile me to respect her in time:
nothing else can.
Softly, my good Harry. What cause have you to hate
and despise her, unless a cause growing out, not only of
love, but of an idea that you had made some progress in
her affection. No, it is clear to me you love her, and
doubtless she loves you. I am glad you have disclosed
this to me before I made a fool of myself by going any
farther. I wonder I never thought of it before. She has
been in the constant habit of seeing you since I have been
at West Point. It would be strange if she did not love
you. But better late than never. Now go, Harry, I have
no more questions. I shall take my course.
And what do you propose to do?
Leave here at once and forever. Set out to-morrow
morning for
Prairie du Chien
, and bury the rest of my life
in the West.
You can do as you like, said Harry; but you must
understand me better than to suppose me capable of taking
advantage of your departure to seek the affections of Miss
Elton. It was not my intention, when I entered the room,
to say anything of my own feelings. On the contrary, I
thought, and I still think, your union with her would give me
pleasure. You have become possessed of my secret by
accident
;
but, since you have discovered it, let me prevent
your supposing it other than it is. I will therefore tell you,
in perfect frankness, the whole of it, that you may see how
the land lies. I really did think Miss Elton liked me, till
one day, about a year ago, I commenced telling her so, and
she did not appear to be offended. We were interrupted, I
don't remember howa door opened or shut, or something
of that sort, in the next room, and she ran off. I hoped for
an opportunity to finish the matter; but no, I've never been
able to find one. From that time till now, my young lady
has kept from being alone with me an instant, and when
with me in company, she's altogether a different person
from what she used to bepolite, gay, but no more
confidence
,
no moreyou understand me. Of course, when I saw
how matters were going, I withdrew. Ha! ha! ha! I
abdicated
.
I'm not a man to be extinguished by a tender
passion
,
nor have I time to waste in studying Miss Elton's
character and caprices; so for the last six months I've
had nothing to say to her more than simple politeness
required
.
On the whole, I've come to the conclusion that
she never did really like me, or if she did, she's changed,
that's all, as she certainly had full right to do, and devilish
lucky it is for me that it happened before matters went any
farther. Therenow you know all.
I'm glad you've told me this, said Frank: I also
shall abdicate.
No, you will not make that resolution.
Why not?
Because I don't see the necessity of it. I have already
made a similar one, which I certainly sha'n't break.
Besides
,
I have more cause than you to suppose her affection
either never existed or has ceased to exist. It is possible,
in her girlish inexperience, she might have fancied she
liked me, and afterward discovered her mistake. She may
have been inspired with that sentiment by anotherby you,
perhaps. Go forwardwin her hand; it will relieve me
from all farther unhappiness. Marry her, Frank, for
Heaven's
sake, and make all three of us happy.
And do you think, said Frank, that I will be excelled
in generosity?
What's to be done then? said Harry.
Why, I see only one way to settle the difficulty, said
Frank, ingenuously, and that is to try our fortune,
both of
us
. There can, after all, be no real conflict of interest
here. Fanny Elton wouldn't marry either of us unless she
loved. She must know her own mind, and, if she ever
mean to do so, she must already have felt a preference for
one. In fact, after all, I don't see how we can interfere
with each other.
Truequite true, said Harry, in spite of himself
showing
the relief he felt at the turn the conversation was now
taking.
We have, then, continued Frank, only to try; we must
each take our chance. The decision of the question does
not depend upon us, and we have it not in our power, after
all our professed readiness for self-sacrifice, to make her
accept any one not agreeable to her. The present state of
her heart is probably unalterable, as far as regards us. I
have thought myself certain, but, when I look back, I see I
might easily have mistaken the familiarity of indifference
for that of affection, while you may have thought the
shyness
of love the coldness of dislike. You are, and always
were, as delicate and doubting in such matters, as I have
been, I fear, rash and sanguine. Let us enter the arena,
then, fairly and kindly. I confess I could never see the
sense of quarrels between lovers of the same mistress,
unless
by supposing the woman a fool.
I agree, said Harry, because I believe that my
failure
will lead to your success.
And he who succeeds will be the sufferer, said Frank,
because his happiness will be dashed with the thought that
it is reached over the heart of the other.
No, not so, said Harry. My heart is not so easily
shaken, or, at least, broken.
Well, I will not argue. Who shall make the first trial?
You. But no, I think the advantage will be with the
second. Should the first be rejected, the other has his own
time, and perhaps what is now simple friendship, time may
ripen into love.
Let chance decide, said Frank. A game of whist
a throw of the dice.
No, said Harry, we will not gamble for such a
prize. Nothing so common shall interpose between us, but
something as frail as my hopes, as idle, and as bright. Look
yonder!
A large butterfly had just lighted upon the rosebush in
the window, and stood stirring his broad, powdered wings,
spotted with black velvet and gold, as if drinking in at
every
pore the sweetness of the balmy June air.
If he fly, continued Harry, before the expiration of a
minute, by the second-hand of my watch,
I
will take the
first chance; if not, you.
Agreed.
Agreed, murmured both; and the two brothers drew
cautiously near to watch the soft, golden creature, on the
caprice of whose airy mind they supposed they had staked
their earthly happiness; for beneath their restrained and
sometimes apparently gay demeanour, each felt an agitation
which amounted to pain. Their mutual affection was
sincere
,
and, in their ordinary moods, each would have been
willing to surrender for the other life and happiness. But
the struggle for, what almost seemed to them, in this
moment
,
the love of Fanny Elton, filled them with mixed
emotions
of hope and fear, selfishness and magnanimity; for
selfishness, at some time or other, enters every human heart.
In one it comes and goes, partially banished by better
impulses
;
some hug it through their entire lives, till they are
powerless in its embrace as in the coils of a serpent; few
succeed in rising above it completely: yet there are such.
Harry held his watch. The bright sunshine fell full
upon it, and upon the superb hues and gently moving wings
of the little brilliant air wanderer, which, reposing on its
crimson couch, seemed in no haste to depart. There was
a profound silence. The brothers stood breathless, their
eyes fixed, now upon the watch, now upon the gorgeous
arbiter of their fate. Suddenly a crow floated low over the
housetops, and uttered his hoarse, repeated cry. The
insect
changed its position, but did not fly. Several
swallows
next darted almost into the window with their sharp
scream of joy, but as instantly rose again. Each of these
interruptions sadly startled the hearts of the two observers.
The minute was more than half gone, when a flock of
pigeons
,
from the lower roof of an adjoining building, rose
together
with their whirring wings, and, rapidly wheeling in
a close circle, swept off overhead, darkening for a moment
the sunshine in which they stood. The fragile visiter stirs
it flies. No! no! Those sweet sounds of Nature were too
gentle and familiar to disturb even Nature's lightest creation.
All relapsed into silence, broken only by the distant roar of
the town, the barking of the far-off dog, or the exulting crow
of a neighbouring cock, proclaiming to earth and heaven his
joy, valour, and defiance. The hand wanted only ten
seconds
of completing the minute, when the insect, which had
stood all the interruptions unmoved, from, who can say, what
impulse of its tiny mind, and little dreaming what important
consequences hung on its motions, bent backward, forward
its spotted wings, rose lightly in the air, and floated,
fluttering
and glittering, down the sunshine.
Go, said Frank, Fanny Elton is yours.
This night, Frank, replied Harry, you shall sleep
without fear of me.
CHAPTER III.
It
happened, as Harry descended the stairs, that Miss
Elton was going into the drawing-room on an early visit to
Mary. A courteous, but not very lover-like salutation
passed
between them, Miss Elton entering the room, and Harry
continuing his way down towards the office. Suddenly he
stopped, crossed by a determination peculiar to his
character
.
Why should I delay? why waver? thought he. No
choice is left me. What I must do, why not do instantly?
That she scorns me is plain. Yet, were all the hatred and
contempt of the human heart concentrated in one word, and
I knew she would utter it, I would do what I have now
engaged
to dofor Frank's sake, not for mine. His heart
shall not beat one moment in unnecessary suspense.
He advanced towards the room and stopped.
But Mary! how to get rid of her?
The coincidences of life sometimes look so like the
contrivance
of malicious or ministering spirits, that it is difficult
to regard them as accidental. While he stood in perplexity
at the recollection that his sister was in the room, she came
suddenly out, and said,
Go in one moment and entertain Fanny, will you? I
want to get her my new cape.
And off she ran up stairs.
Now, then, said Harry.
He opened the door, entered, closed it after him, and
was alone with the object of his hopes and his fears. His
countenance and manner must have betrayed emotion, for
Miss Elton, who was standing by a table carelessly turning
over some new engravings, on looking up, exclaimed,
Why, Mr. Lennox, what's the matter?
Nothing, Miss Elton, only I have resolved to delay no
longer addressing you on a subject which seriously
interests
me.
She looked surprised and coloured, and there was a very
awkward pause.
Miss Elton, at length resumed the poor fellow, in a
low voice, I have resolved to throw myself upon your
generosity. I come frankly to make an offer of my hand,
trembling lest you reject, and scarcely hoping that you will
accept me.
Sir! said Miss Elton, preserving a cold, undisturbed
voice, I do not understand you.
Fanny, how have I offended you? Is it possible that
I have misunderstood or in any way annoyed you?
I do not wish any discussion, sir. And she was about
leaving the room.
I would not be importunate, but some mystery is
between
us, and a strange necessity hurries me along to know
at once
I trust, sir, said Miss Elton, with haughty
astonishment
,
while the colour which had gradually overspread her
face now left it entirely, there can be no serious
necessity
for you to hold, or for me to listen to such language. I
never supposed I could be subjected to an insult from you.
There did not exist a man prouder or haughtier than the
young person who, amazed and shocked, heard this
observation
.
But the love which had for so many years been
strengthening in his bosom, and for a long time past had
been acquiring the force of a strong stream accidentally
obstructed
,
mastered even his pride. It was now his turn to
grow pale, but it was more the pallor of anguish than
indignation
.
The immediate prospect of death could not
have shaken him more than these words from the lips from
which they fell.
Miss Elton, he stammered, you cruelly
misunderstand
.
There is certainly some inconceivable error.
She walked to the door, and would have left the room,
but he barred her passage.
If it is your determination, said he, to treat my
proffered love with scorn and insult, let me, at least, request
you to hear me explain before I leave the subject forever.
I cannot choose but do so. I am not free to go, said
she, coldly.
Go, go, Miss Elton; I no longer stop your way.
She advanced, but paused on seeing the expression of his
face.
What do you wish to say? I
will
hear you.
With that haughty frown on your brow, with that cold
scorn in your voice, I scarcely know, Miss Elton, what to
say, or how to begin a tale of love; but, nevertheless, I
will do it. My whole life, since first my early boyhood
felt what love was, has been filled with your image. I
loved you before you yourself were old enough to
understand
my deeper feelings. I once dared to hope you had
discovered, and did not disapprove my affection, till, in a
moment of boyish imprudence, I dared to betray my
feelings
,
the strange cause of your present resentment. From
that time to this you have chosen to alter the relations
which I supposed existed between us. I have felt myself
cast off, and have acted accordingly.
Oh, you must excuse me, said she, again going.
You will forgive my frankness, continued Harry: my
happiness, however indifferent you may be to it, I cannot
see wasted and wearing away without taking some measure
to preserve it. I will not so humbly bend beneath your
words as to say I must be dependent on you for it
always:
you can bestow it upon me now, but you cannot always
deprive me of it. There are other pathsother
Women! interrupted she.
Even so, Miss Elton. If you love me, say so, and I
am yours. If your words are a true indication of your
feelings
,
independent of any error, say so, that I may know
what to believe, what to feel, and what to do.
The strange mixture of love and rudeness in this speech
appeared only to confirm the displeasure of the young girl.
Mr. Lennox, said she, I have heard you, that I might
reply distinctly. You speak of a necessity, and of your
trembling lest I reject you. Let me equally free you from
your necessity and your fears: I cannot love you.
He appeared borne down by her decisive words and
scornful eyes.
Fanny, pause one moment before you separate us
forever
.
Pause one moment, till we are both cooler, and can
conduct more prudently a conversation which may be for
the happiness or misery of us both, and which I shall never
resume if you reject me now. My whole happiness, my
prospects in life, perhaps my life itself, hang on the breath
of your lips in this moment. Give me time to ascertain the
cause of your anger (for there
is
some hidden cause), and
to call back the feelings for me which once inspired you.
Do not reject me, or I solemnly swear I never will resume
the subject.
Vol. I.C
Miss Elton looked at him a moment, and then very
calmly replied,
Notwithstanding your formidable threat, Mr. Lennox,
permit me to say, I not only reject, I
despise you!
and she
left the room.
CHAPTER IV.
It
would be difficult to convey to the, we trust,
comparatively
happy reader, a just idea of the thoughts of the
young man. In his bosom raged the passions of youth
untempered
by reflection or experience. Perhaps, among the
subjects on which time and observation give us light, there
are none less understood by the young than themselves, and
the manner in which they would feel and act on yet untried
occasions. He had supposed a rejection by Miss Elton
would end his love by arousing his pride, and that the
certainty
of her indifference would speedily enable him to
resume
his own. Alas! he now perceived with
consternation
that she had acquired only more charms; that he had
never before been aware how beautiful, how noble she was.
She became infinitely dearer to him than ever. So far from
pride being able to overcome love, it was itself overmastered.
He could scarcely collect his senses to comprehend the full
force of those decisive words, that cold contempt which
amazed him from its total unexpectedness. She might
have declined his addresses, rectified his boyish mistake,
regretted her inability to reciprocate his affection, and
promised
him, in return, esteem and friendship. For this he
had been tremblingly prepared. This he could have
scarcely borne. But here were scorn, derision, insult,
inflicted
with a cruelty as insupportable as it was
inexplicable
.
He was pacing backward and forward through the room
when Mary and Miss Elton re-entered. His sister did not
seem to suspect that anything unusual had taken place,
but was laughing and talking, and pointing out the
peculiarities
of the cape, on which Miss Elton appeared to bestow
all the desired attention.
It's very pretty indeed, said she, in an indifferent
voice. I will get one like it.
Will you be good enough to call Frank down stairs,
Harry? said his sister, suddenly. He has made an
engagement
to ride with us. Tell him we're waiting for him,
will you? The horses have been at the door a quarter of
an hour.
He went out without at first venturing to look at Fanny,
but, as he closed the door, he turned to steal one glance.
There was an expression in her face, unexpected,
indescribable
,
which renewed all his grief and all his love.
Frank was sitting alone, lost in thought, when he
entered
,
but said immediately,
You have seen Miss Elton?
I have. I have offered myself to her. She has
refused
me. Go: she is yours. God bless you both!
But, Harry, you amaze me: so soon?
Not a wordnever a word more on this subject, I
entreat. It is done. I have fulfilled my partgo and do
yours. They are waiting for you in the drawing-room.
Go, I beg of you.
My dear Harry, you are agitated.
Frank, are you coming? said Mary, at the bottom of
the stairs; are you going to keep two ladies here and
three horses waiting for you all day? You're a fine beau,
to be sure!
Frank left him. He locked and double locked the door,
went to his drawer, took from it a pistol, examined the
charge, cocked it, and held the muzzle to his forehead.
At this moment a dim idea of God came over him. He
had never thought of his Creator before. About to rush
into His presence, it struck him that there might be a
reality
in future, invisible things.
He paused: the reflection of his face from a mirror on
the table startled him.
Suddenly there was a knock at the door. He felt like a
guilty wretch, and thrust, trembling, the deadly weapon into
the drawer.
Who's there?
Your father is waiting for you in the office, if you'll
please to come down.
Yes, in one moment.
It was the voice of little Seth Copely, one of the clerks,
who, having delivered the message, withdrew. He heard
his steps retreating down stairs till they died away.
My father! my mother! God! the future! What new
thoughts are these? Pause, madman. At least not yet,
not here, not so. What you do, do wisely, deliberately.
Do nothing rashly, nothing ignorantly.
As he spoke, a sudden debility came over him. His
violent excitement abating, the natural reaction followed.
He sank into a chair, overpowered by an irresistible
revulsion
of feeling, covered his face with his hands, and wept
in silent agony.
Suddenly, recollecting the summons of his father, he
exerted
all his strength of character, of which he had an
ample
share, though unregulated and misdirected, as well as a
certain power of concealing his emotions, which he had
mistaken for the power to govern them. Copiously
bathing
his head, therefore, in a large basin of water, washing
away the traces of his tears, and arranging his dress and
hair, he went down stairs, calmed by the outbreak of
emotion
to which he had just yielded. No one with whom he
came into contact suspected he had a few moments before
been prevented, only by a casual thought, from discharging
a pistol into his brain.
At dinner he expected to meet Miss Elton, but she had
excused herself on the plea of indisposition.
CHAPTER V.
A REJECTED lover generally fancies himself very
miserable
,
even if his fate have been communicated in the mildest
manner. But Harry's offer had been disposed of so very
unceremoniously, that the young gentleman had a good
excuse
for being rather out of spirits. There was something
inexplicable in it. He knew that he could not have been
mistaken in her former obvious affection, or in the certainty
that she had been alienated from him by some
extraordinary
error, to which his utmost conjectures could furnish
no clew.
From the dinner-table, whence he perceived his rashness
had banished his sister's friend, and a favourite and frequent
guest of the family, he started off on an excursion, he scarcely
knew whither; but he found his strong wish for a change
of scene had driven him over to Hoboken in one of the
ferry-boats, and that he was pressing his way through
woods, over fields, and up the steep acclivities of the
Weehawken
heights at a most prodigious rate; stopping
sometimes
,
however, in the midst of his peculiar meditations, to
admire the beauties of the various views which broke upon
him, of the river, bay, shores, and distant city, now all
bathed in the silent, mellow light of a summer sunset.
In the course of this love-sick ramble he had various very
serious reflections and sensations, which were more
interesting
to him than they would be to any one else. Among
them were mingled images of despair and resentment;
resolutions
of flight, of marriage with some one else, of suicide,
and of a stoical return to calm and sober reason, to all of
which, however, there were certain objections or
difficulties
,
and all of which were melted to air every time the
face of Miss Elton crossed his imagination, looking, as she
generally did, particularly pretty. One determination,
however
,
he did take. After such a rejection, he might
love
the
young lady or not, according to circumstances, but he
certainly
would not make her any more declarations. He
would meet her hereafter with a lofty insensibility, and if
his heart should break outright, he would never let her know
anything of it.
While engaged in these reflections, the hours rolled
rapidly away, and he heard the bell of the last ferry-boat
ringing violently. Hastening his steps, he crossed once
more the broad and noble river, and took his way along the
streets, now glittering with evening lights, and filled with
crowds of pleasure-seekers. Here he wandered till a late
hour, endeavouring to deaden, by rapid motion, his sense of
unhappiness, which he at length so far succeeded in doing
that he felt a consciousness of more than ordinary hunger
and thirst, induced by his long and fatiguing ramble, and
the exciting nature of his thoughts, after a dinner which, as
the young reader may suppose, had not been a very hearty
one. He had come to the conclusion that a world in which
such a person as he could be so cruelly and contemptuously
rejected by such a person as Miss Elton, must be a very
wretched onemust be given over to blind chance, if not to
C 2
the sport of an evil demon. He was not an infidel, but he
was by no means a Christian. He belonged to the large
class who, perpetually engaged in the cares, pursuits, and
pleasures of this life, have no time or inclination to think
about anything else. With a sort of buoyant recklessness,
he resolved to shake from his thoughts the circumstance
which had so much affected him, or, at least, to drown
present
recollection in a hearty supper and a bottle of wine.
He continued still to wander rapidly on, for he cared not
how long, scarcely knowing whither he went, when he
found himself before one of those elegantly-furnished
ordinaries
which, notwithstanding the lateness of the night, was
open, to catch such as roamed abroad in search of
pleasure
.
His mental anguish abated a moment at the prospect
of refreshment, which his exhausted body greatly demanded.
An ample and tempting meal called him from his gloomy
reflections to the keen pleasure of his repast, by which he
sought, and, for the moment, with success, to lose sight of
his wo. He ate heartily and drank freely, to drown the
saddening and tormenting thoughts which would obtrude
themselves upon him.
He looked around. The room where he sat was entirely
deserted, with the exception of the barkeeper, a young lad,
worn out with late hours, who sat, half asleep, retired at
some distance, betraying, had there been any one in a
situation
to observe him, by many an ill-suppressed yawn, his
longing for the departure of his ravenous customer, and
thinking, perhaps, as he beheld the amply-loaded table, with
the honest man in the farce,
If all this is to be devoured by Mr. Morgan,
He must have a deused good digestive organ!
But Harry was in no such haste. The fumes of his
supper
,
and the inspiration of his bottle of Champagne, gave
him a feeling of joyous relief, which kept sleep and the
desire
of sleep far enough from his eyelids. Here he sat,
and ate, and drank, and thought, till the various persons
who came in had satisfied their wants and gone out again;
till the wine mounted into his head rather more than he
intended
,
and till the idea of blowing his brains out for Miss
Fanny Elton, or any other young lady whatever, appeared
to him one of the most ridiculous and amusing things he
had ever heard of in the whole course of his life.
Finishing, at length, the meal, wine, and reflections
together
,
he called for the bill, with as steady an air of
gentlemanly
ease and dignity as he could assume, though with
a decidedly confused idea as to where he intended to go,
or what he proposed to do when he should have resumed
his walk. He was considerably struck, too, with a
symptom
by no means usual with him, viz., a strong inclination
to smile without being particular as to the occasion. Thus
making his way out of the eating-house, he issued into the
street, he scarcely knew how, with his hat thrust down
very much over his eyes. He was just sober enough to
know that he was intoxicated, and to feel that the cool, fresh
air was most grateful to his flushed cheeks. The pavement,
however, heaved so beneath his feet, that he could not very
well walk, and he caught hold of the balustrade of the Park
to prevent his falling. He looked around and up. The
moon had now risen, and was shedding a pale, golden
gleam upon each object, filling the air with her gentle
glory, as he stood holding on firmly to the iron railing, not
without an effort preserving himself from lying at full length
upon the stones, which seemed to rock like the deck of a
ship at sea. He commenced singing a song, but, overcome
by the deliciousness of his sensations, and fully aware of the
absurdity of his ridiculous position, he began to laugh aloud,
and remained thus giving full vent to the overflowing
merriment
of his soul.
At this moment a figure came towards him, but, on
seeing
his condition, crossed over as if to avoid an encounter.
Urged by some new impulse, however, the person came
back, and looked him directly in the face.
Hallo, my old cock! said Harry, what may be
your
business?
What! Harry Lennox? said the voice.
He turned to look at the speaker, and discovered
Emmerson
,
his father's partner.
The devil! How are you? cried Harry, assuming a
very grave and sober look.
Why, my dear sir, said Emmerson, smiling, what's
the matter with you?
Oh, I have been unwell this evening, and I have come
out to (hiccough) take a little walk.
You're now going home, I hope?
Oh, yyyes! my dear fellow. I was just going
when you came up. Delightful evening!
Delightful!
How are you? and how goes bububusiness?
Very well, I thank you. Good-night.
Ggoodnight, my dear boy. Won't you have a
cigar
?
But you don't smoke, I believe. Hallo! he's gone.
I think I'm a little drunkha, ha, ha!but he has not
the least suspicion. Mum's the word! I had no idea I
could have done it so well. I wouldn't have him see me
flustered
him
, of all mennot for a pipe of the best old
Tokay that everha, ha, ha! Hold on, my fine fellow!
A little sobered, however, but with his head still reeling,
laughing occasionally aloud, despite his efforts to keep
serious
,
he staggered on, and reached his home without
meeting
any farther interruption.
CHAPTER VI.
Harry
breakfasted with the family the next morning as
usual, and thence went to his ordinary duties in the office.
A certain awkward feeling came over him as he met
Emmerson
,
but, from the manner of that gentleman, he could
not gather any reason to suppose he had detected his state
at their last night's meeting, and he concluded, with a hearty
feeling of relief, that in the darkness of night, and from
what he presumed had been his own power of self-control,
his intoxication, which he firmly resolved should never be
repeated, had entirely escaped his attention.
You have a pamphlet in your room, I believe, from the
office library, which I wish very much to consult, said
Emmerson
to Harry in the afternoon.
Yes, I took it to look at the proposed  Bill.
Why, that's what I wished to look at, said Emmerson.
Perhaps we are occupied on the same subject, said
Harry. I'm going to address the meeting to-night.
You! you address the meeting? said Emmerson.
Certainly: why not?
Oh, I do not say `
not
' at all, said he, with a smile,
only I did not know it was your intention. Have you
prepared anything?
A few notes. I shall scarcely use them, however.
When I speak I very soon get beyond my notes.
Let me see them, will you? said Emmerson. It is
barely possible I may wish to say something, but not a
speech.
Harry handed the notes, and Emmerson looked them over
with an air of no great interest.
Oh! ah! that's the view you take, is it?
Yes; but the most important I don't put on paper, or
only a single word, to bring the point to my memory. I
am resolved not to accustom myself to dependance on
memoranda
,
but to begin young, and throw myself at once upon
all the uncertainty, or perhaps, he added, with a smile,
others may think it the certainty, of extemporaneous
speaking
;
that is
He was going to explain, but Emmerson interrupted him.
Well, I see your drift here. It is good, certainly; but
hadn't you better leave out thisfor instance, this
paragraph
?
Oh no: why so? that is a common opinion.
But your mode of proving it is not so common, nor do
I think it quite correct.
Well, if you think so, I'll leave it out in deference to
you.
You had better: though I really think you give
yourself
more trouble, in speaking at all, than the matter is
likely
to be worth. The subject has no real interest. I have
not made the least attempt to go into it by previous study.
At dinner Harry was a breathless listener to an
interesting
conversation. The family were speaking of Fanny
Elton
,
and Mary insisted that something had occurred to
displease
her.
She is not the same in her manner to me, said she;
she is cold and reserved. Her refusal to dine with us
yesterday, I am convinced, was not caused by indisposition,
although she really is not well. But how often has she
come to us when she was not well? What harm could it
have done her just to have dined here instead of at home?
And she refuses to come to-day, refuses to dine with us on
Thursday, and to go to the theatre with us in the evening.
Nonsense, said Mr. Lennox. Who wouldwhat
could offend Fanny, I should like to know? She could not
suspect any one in this family of an intention to offend her,
and I don't think she is the sort of person to be offended
when she knows there has been no intention.
How do you account, then, for these three refusalsthis
sudden withdrawal of her consent to go to the theatre on
Thursdayfor her curious manner?
I'll go round this evening, said Frank, and see if I
can persuade her, and you shall go with me.
No, said Mary, I will not. To say the truth, I am
a little hurt and offended, and she saw plainly that I was,
and yet did not in the least alter her decision.
So, thought Harry, Frank has either not made his
offer, or (and his heart sunk within him at the thought)
he has made it and been accepted.
I feel sure, said Frank, I can make her alter her
determination
.
Nonsense, said Mrs. Lennox; why, in such an
ingenuous
creature as Fanny, look for any other excuse than
the one she assigns? She is not very well, is out of
spirits
,
and therefore will not come.
Well, if you think so, resumed Mary, I'll go with
Frank; but I don't understand it.
So, thought Harry, she avoids me. That of course:
but in a way which must betray the insult I have received.
This I must prevent.
He therefore wrote the following note, and, after a brief
explanation, intrusted it to Frank:
Mr. Henry Lennox begs Miss Elton to forgive and
forget
the error into which he has fallen, upon his assurance
not to repeat it. He hopes she will not make it the cause
of interrupting her intercourse with the family, rather than
which he will himself withdraw, till time shall test the
sincerity
of his resolution never to offend again. If he have
reason to fear his presence prevents her usual visits and
engagements, he will carry into effect a desire he has long
had of spending a few years in Europe. Should she,
however
,
be disposed to accord this, the only favour he can ever
ask of her, he need scarcely add, he considers himself
bound, as a gentleman, to protect her from the annoyance
of his society, as far as can be done without exciting
attention
.
CHAPTER VII.
This
was the evening of the great public meeting, called
for the purpose of passing resolutions respecting a measure
pending in Congress. The subject was one which young
Lennox was acquainted with, as it had long engaged his
attention. Miserable as he was at this moment, a desire
to escape from himself led him to be thankful for such a
distraction, and while Frank and Mary were gone to
Eltons's
,
he repaired to deliver his address.
On arriving at the large room which had been designated
for the purpose, he found many distinguished citizens
assembled
.
His father and Mr. Emmerson were already
there. The hall rapidly filled to overflowing. An eminent
man was elected to the chair, and several secretaries
appointed
.
Many speakers were anxious to express their
views on the subject, and two or three did so, and were
received
with interest. At length Mr. Emmerson rose. He
was listened to with respectful attention. His remarks
showed the results of study; for, as Harry afterward
discovered
,
he had been long and laboriously preparing
himself
for the occasion. Distinction was his passion, and to
it he had resolved to devote himself. But he was regarded
as a cold, dry man, laborious in details and learned in facts,
without enlarged views, or original inferences or ideas. His
discourse, while it made a favourable impression, did not
produce any particular effect.
Harry was rather surprised to perceive that he had made
use of several arguments similar to those contained in his
own memoranda. He set it down, of course, as accident,
for there was scarcely a man whom he would not sooner
have suspected of anything wrong, so highly was he
esteemed
for purity and gentleness of mind and manners.
He was, however, fairly puzzled, on hearing him, as he
proceeded
,
deliver some remarks in support of a delay in the
passage of the offensive bill, an exact counterpart of those
which, at the intimation of Emmerson himself, he had
proposed
to omit in his own observations.
After Emmerson rose a Mr. Holford, a gentleman of
large stature and dignified personal appearance, with a
sonorous
voice and an apparent familiarity with public
speaking
.
He occupied the attention of the audience an hour
with fine words and high-sounding phrases, frequently
eliciting
applause by the artful recurrence of patriotic sentiments.
But Harry perceived that this person belonged to the class
of mere demagogues, who, by dint of impudence and
perseverance
,
not only thrust themselves into prominent places,
but maintain themselves there triumphantly, while men of
merit and modesty remain in obscurity. Notwithstanding
very general applause, his eloquence was made up of
superficial
commonplaces and phrases, borrowed, ready-made,
from the floating oratory of the day. A part of what he
said was good, but that was not his own, and, whenever he
ventured into anything like original argument or
declamation
,
he betrayed the poverty of his attainments and the
smallness of his understanding by flimsy sophistry or
swelling
bombast. It was all received, however, with the
unexamining
approbation characteristic of a public meeting,
and which evidently made the speaker (although he
repeated
the quotation that he was no orator as Brutus is)
believe
himself a much greater orator than that ancient or
most other modern gentlemen.
At length Harry rose, striving to fly from himself, and to
lose in any manner the keen sense of his late
disappointment
.
We have not ventured to describe him, but the
reader
must imagine a young man rather above the middle
stature
,
as noble in person as expressive and handsome in
countenance. His features had a manly gravity and even
sternness, which gave place to sweetness when he smiled.
His eyes were dark and full of expression, and a voice,
more soft, flexible, and, at the same time, powerful, was
rarely heard. He had not uttered ten sentences before
every one became aware he was no common man. Free
from embarrassment, he presented by far the clearest view
of the case which had been given, drew enlarged,
unexpected
,
and striking inferences with the logical precision
of a more matured orator, and in language the most
eloquent
,
enchained, delighted, and convinced everybody. With
all the knowledge of details and facts of Emmerson, and a
far more chaste and rich flow of language than Holford, he
added that kind of light and fire which only genius and
sincerity
know how to throw around what they touch.
Warmed
by the exertion and by the consciousness of his success,
he triumphantly completed the argumentative part of his
address
to an audience who gave neither the cold respect
awarded to Emmerson, nor the noisy applause elicited by
the clap-traps of the pompous Holford, but the attention of
men whose minds are really awakened. In conclusion,
when his points were clearly proved, and the objections
raised
by the opposite party had been undeniably silenced, he
ended by an appeal to the clear judgment and higher
feelings
of the nation, in a strain not often heard at public
meetings
,
and which showed a speaker as far above the petty
desire
of self-display as the mere interested influence of party
views.
A pause followed his concluding words, for his auditors
preserved a moment's silence, unwilling to lose a syllable,
till a simultaneous burst of applause, ended, resumed, hushed,
and prolonged again, told that the minds and hearts of all
present had been under the spell of
eloquence
.
He was acknowledged the speaker of the evening.
On descending from the stage, he was received in
triumph
by his friends, and heartily congratulated before he
could reach and accept the hand of his delighted father.
By the side of the latter stood Emmerson, silent and
motionless
,
and with a peculiar expression of discontent on his
dark features. Harry was struck with it, and felt it chill
the warm flow of his blood and the pleasure of his success;
and had he not
known
him, he would have thought he saw
on his countenance only the workings of mean selfishness
and pale envy.
What's the matter? asked he, as he perceived his
proffered hand was not accepted.
Oh, nothing, said Emmerson: the crowdthe heat.
Then, with a singular look, which afterward often rose in
Harry's memory, he added,
I did not expect to see you so soon in public, when I
met you
last night, you know!
Last night! repeated his father: where?
What do you mean by that? said Harry, sternly.
You knew I intended to address the meeting, Mr.
Emmerson
.
Yes, certainly; butha, ha, hayou have proved
yourself
a Demosthenes.
Harry did not understand the tone of voice in which this
was said. The meeting immediately passed the intended
Vol. I.D
resolutions, availing themselves of various suggestions made
by Harry, and the curious
last night, you know!
of
Emmerson
,
passed from his mind.
After the adjournment, Mr. Lennox, Harry, and
Emmerson
were standing together, with several others,
conversing
,
when the chairman, Mr. Lawrence, an influential
leader
of the politics of the state, came up, and shaking
Harry
warmly by the hand, acknowledged in strong terms the
pleasure he had received from his address.
You must sup with me, he added, you and your
father. I have something of importance to say to you.
To be sureto be sure, said Mr. Lennox; and as for
my Harry, I tell you what, that young gentleman is
destined
to be, one of these days, the ornament of whatever
office he chooses to desire. You don't know that boy.
I hope he knows you, sir, said Harry, modestly, or
else he will mistake the language of your heart for that of
your judgment.
Why, you impertinent young dog, what do you mean by
that?
It's all very well, sirit's all very well, sir, said the
pompous Holford, rubbing his hands, and assuming a look
of dignity, which did not hide his vexation and jealousy.
These boys just out of college are full of fine words, but
we want a knowledge of
things!
We do indeedat least
some of us
, said Lennox, with
an emphasis.
They've missed the most important resolution, sirthe
most important, sir, by far! said Holford. I rarely
address
promiscuous public meetings: I have other and more
important duties. But the resolution omitted spoils
everything
,
sirspoils everything! I'm sorry I spoke. The
meeting will do more harm than good. I'll be dd if I
don't regret I have appeared at it.
If that be an error, as perhaps it is, said Mr. Lennox,
coolly, you will have an opportunity to repair it on future
occasions.
I didn't address my remark to you, sir.
I addressed mine to you, Mr. Holford.
Come, gentlemen, my supper will be cold, said Mr.
Lawrence. Mr. Lennox, and you, sir (to Harry), you
must not give us the slip. I have something to propose to
you.
He added no other one to the party, and Emmerson
silently
withdrew.
They repaired to the house of their host, where the
supper-table
was already spread. The ladies of the family,
after a gay half hour, retired, and the gentlemen were left
to discuss subjects which exclusively interested them. It
was at once suggested by Mr. Lawrence that Harry should
accept an early seat in Congress.
Well, said his father, what say you? As you don't
appear wanting in the valuable gift of speech, you can
answer
for yourself, I suppose.
I think, said Harry, it requires time for reflection;
but I should, of course, be guided by your wishes, if I
remain
in America.
Remain in America! Why, where the devil do you
expect to remain?
I have had some desire lately to go abroad.
What! a short tour, eh? said Lawrence.
A tour, but not a short one.
May I ask what you mean? said his father. You
have the intention of going abroad for a long time?
Yes, sir; a plan which, with your approbation, would
be a very pleasant thing for me.
What! leave us, Harry? Spend half a dozen years
abroad, and come back at last to find some old sexton, who
sings while he works, coolly pointing out our respective
graves: `Mrs. Lennox's, sir!' `Miss Mary's, sir!' `The
old gentleman's, sirthat one with the flowers!' Is that
what you call `very pleasant,' with my approbation?
My dear father, I did not intend to discuss the point
with youat least not here; but, in respect to the seat in
Congress, I scarcely feel myself able
Nonsense! said Mr. Lawrence. You are only a boy.
If every one had your modesty, where should we find men
to make up our tickets? You'll meet there (for I never
flatter
, young gentleman) men infinitely above you in
learning
and mind, to equal whom you might with profit spend
all the years of your life, and be satisfied if you half
attained
your object.
I am fully aware of it, and that is why, or one reason
why, I hesitate.
But, continued Mr. Lawrence, you will find yet more
inferior to you in all these respectsmen who do not
hesitate
,
on that account, to take place among legislators and
statesmen.
Fill your neighbour's glass, said Mr. Lennox(I beg
your pardon, Lawrence; I make myself at home, you see),
and then your own, and let me, if you please, hear no more
of your going abroad at present. As for the seat in
Congress
,
I shall state at once my views. If I were as rich as
I ought to be, and could leave you, and your brother and
sister, a hundred or two thousand dollars each, after having
handsomely provided for your mother, I might, perhaps,
feel a pride in seeing you take your place, where your
talents
(Mr. Lennox always said what he thought) could not
fail to be of service to your country, and to reflect a lustre
on your and my name.
Bravo! said Lawrence.
But I am not such a Crsus as you appear to suppose.
Do you know how much I am worth?
No, sir.
Well, just enough to provide, in case of my sudden
death, a decent independence for your mother, and another
for your sister, who must be portioned like a sweet girl and
a gentleman's daughter as she is.
I hope so.
Then there's Frank. He has chosen a profession
where, even if he be not ingloriously scalped to begin with,
he will have no great opportunity to amass a fortune. His
expenses are great, his pay scandalously small, his danger
not inconsiderable, his chance of glory quite so. Yet
he
must live like a gentleman. He has the tastes, habits, and
feelings of one; and where is he going to get a fortune if I
don't leave him one?
Very true!
But, my good friend, said the benevolent Mr.
Lawrence
,
amused and interested by this glimpse of a family
scene, if you leave all your property to your other
children
,
what remains for Harry?
I have given him a first-rate education. He is fully
fitted to go forth into life. He is a scholar and a
gentleman
,
and, what is equally to our present purpose, a superior
lawyer. If he attend to business, the honourable profession
to which he belongs, and of which he can easily become a
most distinguished member, as you may see by his display
this evening, will be to him, in twenty years, an ample
fortune. Should he then wish it, and he will still be a
boy
Your ideas of boyhood, said Harry, are rather
comprehensive
.
Hold your tongue, sir! If he then desire to descend to
politics, why, he does it, at least, with the advantage, that
if he fail, he has a place to stand on and a hole to creep
into. Politics undertaken from the hope of pecuniary gain,
or the more selfish ambition after place and power, cannot
fail to deprave the moral character as much as it must injure
and pervert the mind and destroy the reputation.
True, very true, said Lawrence.
There's Holford now, continued Lennox, his fine face
beaming with the contempt he felt for everything mean,
a mere ass! an empty demagogue! as ready to do any
dirty work as a street scavenger. He was always a paltry
fellow, for I knew him at school; but had he adopted a
more noble scheme of life, he might have enlarged and
enriched
his mind with knowledge, and perhaps redeemed his
character. But watch the course of that man, and you shall
see that every year will make him less particular in his
actions and less honest in his opinions. Age will overtake
him in the exercise of all his lower faculties and meaner
passions, and while, perhaps, he may succeed in his exterior
designs, for such characters often do, he will do so, not
only at the sacrifice of his honour, but at last of his fame
and happiness. He will be obliged to resort to
discreditable
tricks for advancement, and to perform degrading tasks
without reference to the delicacy of a gentleman or the duty
of a man of honour. Having started an ass, he will never
have time to make anything more of himself, till at last the
conviction that pure and noble things are unattainable by
him will cause him to despise them, pecuniary dependance
will make him a slave, and an old age of neglected
insignificance
and contempt will end a life of empty assumption
and usurped honour.
Oh, I hope better of my old friend Holford! said
Lawrence
.
He is not very strong, perhaps, in the upper story,
but he has good points.
Doubtless! all men have; but I do not wish my son to
resemble him. Therefore, as he has to carve his own way
with his own good sword, it is time for him to know it, and
to perceive the necessity of applying himself to his
profession
D 2
steadily, resolutely, and severely. I myself am not a
business-man. I wish I were; but I hate business, and
I shall gradually endeavour to withdraw from the office,
leaving the whole toil and profit of it to you. You have
Emmerson, an inestimable, unassuming man, the most
honest
and excellent partner in the world, and, withal, a sharp
and able lawyer; one of the few who unite integrity of
character, gentleness of heart, and mental ability. You
and he must manage matters. In a year or so I shall
begin
to require a little repose, and think a tour abroad for
your mother and me would be more proper than for you.
Nevertheless, I am gratefully obliged to you, Lawrence, for
the honour you have done this youngster, and, in his name
and my own, I thank you.
I must say, said Mr. Lawrence, that, while I regret
your decision, I approve it.
They separated. Harry had not distinctly followed all
his father's long harangue. His reveries had wandered to
the stern, beautiful face of Fanny Elton, to her cold words
and flashing eyes; but he had heard enough to learn that
his plan of foreign travel and foreign adventure was likely
to be opposed by divers more serious objections than had
at first presented themselves to his mind; that,
notwithstanding
the wealth of his father, he was to start in life
without much benefit from it; and that, unless he were to
break forcibly away from many tender ties and some sober
duties, he was likely to be kept a prisoner in his native city.
CHAPTER VIII.
Would
she receive his note? such were the thoughts
which filled Harry's mind during another very love-sick
ramble. Would she answer it? (What meant the
throbbing
of his heart at the idea?) Would she comply with
its request? Would she dine at his father's table to-day?
Would she dine and go to the theatre the next dayhis
birthdayand thus acknowledge and sanction a kind of
communion with him, a yielding obedience to his dictation,
and a consideration for his wishes, his feelings, his
happiness
,
perhaps? More! Would she accept Frank? Had
she accepted him?
The peculiar relative position of the two brothers acted
as a check upon their usual confidence. He had requested
Frank not to touch upon that subject again. Had the latter
made his offer and been rejected, he would probably have
communicated his fate at oncehe was under a sort of
honourable
obligation to do sobut if accepted, delicacy, love
for his brother, embarrassment, would all combine to make
him shrink from such a confidence. He had been
accepted
,
then; or, last, faint hope! he had not yet made his offer.
Had there been no doubt to be solved, perhaps he might
have succeeded in diverting his thoughts from the subject;
but the dinner-hour was to decide the fate of his note, and
all the interest of his life now concentrated itself upon this
single point.
Do you know how I'm getting on with my boys,
Emmerson
?
asked Lennox, of his friend, the morning after
the meeting; for Lennox's communicative nature confided
everything to those about him.
What new plan? asked Emmerson, with a smile.
Time is dashing along, said Lennox. I feel it every
day more forcibly; but, when looking on these young
rascals
,
I can't believe my own eyes. They are scarcely out
of their round-jacketsat least, so it seems to meand yet
one is going to marry up to my warmest hopes, and the
other
To marry! echoed Emmerson, with such signs of
interest
as surprised even the sanguine father.
Yes, marry!
Bless my soul, said Emmerson, fixing his keen, dark
eyes upon the speaker.
Yes, continued Lennox: I trouble you with affairs
in which few men in your situation would take any interest.
Yes, he is going to marry, and I am truly glad of it.
Certainly, certainly; and I suppose the lady is Miss
Elton?
It is!
Indeed?
Yes; I hope she will accompany him, at least for a
time (although I don't know, after all, if the young dog will
ever be content, with his views, to remain in the army), I
hope she will accompany him to
Prairie du Chien
.
What? Is it not your son
Harry
, then, who is to marry
Miss Elton?
Harry? certainly not. What put that into your head?
Bless me! this is very unexpected, isn't it?
Why yes; these lieutenants have a military brevity of
conducting affairs which is rather edifying. I only heard
of it myself a morning or two ago.
I fear, said Emmerson, this unionbut are you
sure?
Sure? No, not absolutely sure. It is not actually
and formally settled yet between the young people, only I
understand so from my wife and daughter, and from the
demeanour
of Miss Elton and my son. Pray, do you know
anything in relation to it?
Noyes. I was under the impression that your son
Harry wasindeed, he continued, in a whisper, and
looking
cautiously behind and around himI
know
he is also
attached to Miss Elton.
You surprise me!
I think I may tell you all, continued Emmerson; but
you will give me your word not to reveal it.
I assure you it shall go no farther.
Then I have reason to know Harry is attached to Miss
Elton. She is also attached to him. Any difference
between
them must be but some lover's quarrel. Perhaps the
young lady is going to take a step from
pique
, which will
sacrifice the future happiness of both herself and Harry, as
well as that of Frank, who would not like to wake from his
dream of happiness to discover his wife in reality attached
to another.
You distress me beyond measure, said Mr. Lennox.
I am sure Frank loves her; but I am infinitely obliged to
you. This must be looked into. I am really infinitely
obliged to you.
I should not be willing to intrude my interference into
such a delicate matter, said Emmerson, but
I know, I know; nor shall you suffer by such
disinterestedness
.
I must repeat, however, that what I say is under the
seal of secrecy. You know what these young people are!
you know what friends and relations are in these cases!
You know what love affairs are!
My dear Emmerson, said Lennox, you may put your
mind quite at rest.
I have one other thing to say, which duty will not
permit
my concealing. You may have observed that Harry
has been of late rather irregular in his hours and habits.
Yes, yes, it has struck us all.
I met him the other night, continued Emmerson, in a
pale whisper, quite intoxicated in the street.
What, Harry?
Harry.
I would not believe any other human being but
yourself
.
His love for Miss Elton, interrupted, probably, by this
affair with his brother, is driving him into habits of
intemperance
.
I thought he was peculiarly attentive to business.
Before you, continued Emmerson, in an agitated
whisper
;
but
I see more
. His mind is shatteredhis spirits
gone.
But you heard him last night, how well he spoke.
Ah!
What do you mean?
Emmerson made no reply.
What! you don't mean to say that Harry has been
assisted
?
Ah!
Have
you
aided him?
Don't ask me, my dear sir; only believe me, I have no
motive in this disclosure but your and his good. I fear
his mind is, at least at present, unfit for business. As to the
young lady, I have scarcely seencannot say I really know
her. But if you value Harry's happiness and health, you
must stop this union with his brother, or delay it. I have
the most sincere interest in the happiness of Harry. Such
a fine young man!
Drunk in the street! said Lennox; yet that I could
forgive
.
Shakspeare says, `any man may be drunk some time
of his life;' but a mean use of another's talentsparading in
borrowed plumage like a peacock, and yet not like a
peacock
eitherfor he has, at least, his own gaudy feathers to
strut in.
He is but a boy, that will come right in time! I can't
say he borrowed from me. We only spoke together on the
subject! said Emmerson.
I don't recognise Harry in this at all.
You had better not say anything to him, however;
rather leave it to time.
And what do you advise?
To send Frank off for some yearshe is, in fact, too
young to marryand see what time will do. Perhaps a
voyage for Harry also would be of use. These young folks
very easily take new impressions.
I really supposed Harry very much above anything of
this sort. Do you know he has had the offer of a seat in
Congress?
Ah! said Emmerson. Mr. Lawrence, I suppose?
Yes.
You
know
this Mr. Lawrence?
Know him? Who? Lawrence?
Certainly.
A nice, benevolent man, but
Why, Lawrence is one of the noblest fellows!
Ah! that's as people think.
I
have nothing against
him personally; but I have heard curious things.
But Harry! This is a painful discovery. Why, he is
not fit to marry that sweet girl; he is not worthy of her.
Poor Frank!
We must not be too severe on him, said Emmerson.
Does he know you are aware of his attachment to Miss
Elton? asked Mr. Lennox.
Not a word, said Emmerson, in another whisper.
And how did you discover it, if not from him?
I overheard him telling her so one afternoon when they
thought themselves alone. The door was ajar; I was
passing
along the entry, and could not help hearing.
This was also said in a whisper, close to the ear of
Lennox
,
and with an expression of face so agitated that Lennox
could not but be struck with it.
Why, that's nothing so very terrible, my good friend,
replied the father, smiling. It's no more than most men
have done at some time of their lives or other.
Oh, certainly, said Emmerson; but I only want you
to see I am not mistaken in my opinion.
Mr. Lennox had the utmost confidence in his son, but
this intimation of plagiarism, thus reluctantly and
accidentally
drawn forth, made a very disagreeable impression on
his mind. In the irreproachable Emmerson he believed he
had found perfect disinterestedness united with unusual
penetration, while he saw that Harry was of a character
yet unformed, and exposed to all the dangerous influences
which beset youth and passion.
When the family assembled at dinner, Fanny was not
there. Her vacant place was next Harry's. His father
was silent and grave; Emmerson talkative and gay. In
Frank he could not detect anything unusual, except a
disposition
to sink into revery. His mother was thoughtful.
It was but a trifle, the absence of a young girl, who could
never be anything to him; yet his faculty of
self-government
was so uncultivated, that he suffered during this repast
a kind of pain like that of the nightmare. He dared not
ask, and no one made any remark from which his curiosity
could be gratified. Every time the door opened to admit a
servant, the violent beating of his heart taught him how
deep-seated his fever was, and he could scarcely refrain
from starting up under his insupportable emotion. Her
absence
he could not rationally be surprised at, yet it had not
been expected by him. He imagined all eyes were fixed
on him, and could scarcely keep from giving vent, by some
word or act, to the feelings which swelled his breast, yet he
went on eating like one in a dream.
The door opened, and a servant presented a note to Mr.
Lennox, who read it and handed it to Mrs. Lennox.
Miss Elton, feeling herself still indisposed, begs Mrs.
Lennox to excuse her from dinner to-day.
I hope Fanny is not going to be ill, was all his
mother
remarked, and they separated without any other
recurrence
to the subject.
So! she is, after all, cold and selfish. She will not
come. She will betray her power and my unrequited love.
She wishes to do so. She feels a pride in it. She is,
after all, a commonplace girl, a coquette, trifling with me,
laughing at me, ten chances to one. They will ask her, at
length, respecting the change in her conduct. She will
answer, with seeming reluctance, `To save myself from the
importunate addresses of your son.' And this is a woman!
How true the poet:
`Most women have no character at all.'
Her beauty makes her vain. Her very sensibility makes
her go too far. Her ambition on earth is to subdue man,
her master. I swear the libertine, who revenges himself
on her sex, is not so bad, after all.
I must go, then. I must leave my father's house. Not
a messagenot a wordnot a line! Then farewell,
country
and friends; farewell, prospects, ambition, study,
perhaps
life. And what difference does it make? Since
happiness
is a dream, life must be a curse.
A very equivocal piece of reasoning. But men of twenty
and men at forty take different views of things.
CHAPTER IX.
The
next day was Harry's birthday. He did not spend
the morning in the office, as usual, but absented himself in
the indulgence of his love of solitude. His father, when he
saw him, looked grave, but said nothing. For the first time
a cloud had come between them, and both were conscious
of it.
The dinner-hour at length arrived, and with it the
company
.
He was early in the drawing-room, and felt calmer
than usual, for his resolution was taken to go abroad, if not
with, then without his father's approbation. But few guests
were expected, and they punctually came. Mr. Emmerson
was among the first, who blandly made his congratulation.
He was speedily followed by Henderson, the brother of
Mrs. Lennox, and his wife. At length came Mr. and Mrs.
Elton, and with them, to the extreme astonishment of
Harry
for
such an event had not once entered his thoughts
Fanny!
Every one expressed surprise. She was received with
such a burst of affectionate welcome by all the family that
both her confusion, if she felt any, and that of Harry were
safe from observation.
My dearest Fanny! this is so unexpected after your
severe illness yesterday.
She
would
come, said her mother; we did all we
could to keep her at home; but those young girls are such
unaccountable beings. The other day she would not come
when all persuaded her to do so; now, for my part, it reminds
me of
Mrs. Elton was a talker, and she went on with a much
longer series of observations, which, however, were only
collateral to the conversation of the rest of the company.
Mr. Elton and she, however, both came up to Harry to
shake hands with him, and to congratulate him upon the
occurrence of this happy festival, and to wish him a
thousand
returns.
A thousand would be rather more than my share! said
he, with all the gayety he could assume.
And then Fanny came forward to the old friend of her
childhood, and frankly gave him her hand. He took it,
poor fellow, and held it a moment in his, while he listened
to the few words she said, all the rest being engaged
talking
together.
I also congratulate you, Mr. Lennox, said she, and
hope you may pass many and yet more happy birthdays,
surrounded by all who love you and whom you love.
She was pale, and her face and voice betrayed debility
and illness; but her manner was full of its usual gentleness
and calmness.
You have been ill, I fear, Miss Elton?
Yesterday and the day before, very.
And how could you venture out to-day?
Their eyes met. That look was full of reproach,
mingled
with the least possible scorn.
But of course you do not go to the theatre this
evening
?
Oh yes. The party is made up. I feel much better,
and think it will do me good. You know I am as great an
admirer of Horn as you are.
I
shall not be able, I fear, to hear him to-night, said
Harry, in a low voice.
Fanny! my dear Fanny! said Mary, looking her
tenderly
full in the face, and passing her arm around her waist
to press her to her bosom. And did I dare to believe you
were not really ill? I shall never forgive myself.
The dinner was announced. Frank led in Fanny. There
was a vacant seat next hers when Harry passed round; but
he went on, and took a place at the other end of the table,
between Mr. Henderson and Emmerson, more in love than
Vol. I.E
ever, hating and despising himself, yearning to pursue at
leisure the new thoughts which thronged on him, and yet
resolved to tear her from his heart, cost what it might, or
else to tear himself away; for this vicinity to her, these
exposures to interviews with her, this necessity of feigned
familiarity, so dangerous and enervating to his resolution,
he saw plainly were beyond his power to resist.
So you're going to take Fanny to the theatre with you
this evening? said Elton. I don't half like it.
When your consent is asked, my good friend, said
Mr. Lennox, it will be time enough to express an
objection
.
I rather think it the present intention of the party
to take her, whether you like it or not.
My dear Mr. Lennox, said Mrs. Elton, I really
admire
your address. I have been trying all kinds of ways
to persuade Mr. Elton to allow of her going, and I do not
think he had made up his mind; but you put the question
at rest. I had already
Fanny is not looking well just now. I don't know
what's the matter with her, said Mr. Elton; the day
before
yesterday she fainted: she never did such a silly thing
before in her life. I don't know what to make of it.
Harry stole a glance at herher eyes were drooped
thoughtfully downhe felt like a scoundrel.
I shall take care she sha'n't faint again! said Lennox.
I should like to know how you'll do that; besides, you
know, I am no friend to theatres at all.
My husband is too strict on that and a great many other
points, said Mrs. Elton. I am not of his opinion,
however
.
I think the mind that is pure is pure everywhere,
and certainly, were I to
So thought your amiable ancestor Eve, said Elton;
yet it would have been quite as well for her, and us too,
if she had stayed by her husband's side, and not gone off
where she had no business to be.
As for me, said Mrs. Elton, who always interrupted
everybody, and never stopped till she was interrupted
herself
,
and generally not even then, talking over her
competitors
with the greatest good-humour in the world, and not
the least idea of what she was doing, I think much may
be learned at the theatre, and there can be no reason to
fear anything. I know, when I was a girl
Much may be learned everywhere, said her husband,
gravely; but sometimes the lessons cost too much.
And I know, continued Mrs. Elton, without stopping,
that when I was a girl, my father used to take me often
and often, and really, my dear Mrs. Lennox, I cannot
discover
that I am any the worse for it. For why should
and she went on with her argument.
She shall go to-night, as she and you wish it, said her
father; for she is a good girl, and I don't mean to
disappoint
her; but, as a general thing, I think theatres
objectionable
.
Did any man ever hear such nonsense! said Mr.
Lennox
.
Theatres are a delightful recreation. The language
is improved, the mind restored to its good-humoured elasticity
after labour and chagrin, and home is never more delightful
than after returning from such pleasures abroad. I have
always brought up my children to
And as for me, interrupted Mrs. Elton, I could never
be of the opinion that young people were better for being
kept in ignorance of life. If I had sons, I should send them
everywhere all alone, never mind, be as wild as they might.
Better let off their wildness in youth than have it when
they're old. Now, do you know, there's Mr. Franklin, our
excellent friend, you know, my dear Mrs. Lennox, they say,
when he was a young gentleman
For to-day, said Mr. Elton, I yield; but, miss,
hereafter
we shall be a little more strict.
I have got excellent seats, said Harry, anxious to say
something; you will have the Wilmingtons in the next
box.
Ha! ha! ha! said his father, that is an odd piece of
logic. You have got excellent seats, we shall have the
Wilmingtons in the next box; as if the vicinity of the
Wilmingtons
made the seats any better, particularly the old
fellow, a sneaking, sly, creeping scoundrel, who would
desert
his best friend in the hour of need, if he could save
sixpence by it.
My dear husband! said Mrs. Lennox, in a
deprecatory
tone of voice.
Mr. Wilmington is a good man! said Henderson.
Good? Oh, excellent! in old Shylock's sense of the
word, said Lennox, but in that only. Why, sir?
My dear husband, said Mrs. Lennox, I won't have
you going on in this way about people whom you dislike
merely because they don't exactly act up to your idea of what
is right, and for the sake of his wife I always like him.
Yes, certainly, she's well enough; a nice little body
Nice little body! She's a very sweet woman.
I'm sure, said Mrs. Henderson, who seemed to be
rather
a dry lady, with an expression of face as if she felt a sort
of malicious envy for every one and everything she saw,
I'm sure
I
ought not to speak against her, for she's been
uncommonly polite and kind to
me
, but she is a very odd
person! I don't know what to make of her; she pleases
at first sight, but when you come to
know her more
Frank is saying the most extraordinary things to Miss
Elton, interrupted Mary.
What's the matter now? said Lennox.
We, like you, have been conversing on the merits of
Mrs. Wilmington, and on my saying, among various other
causes why I admired her, that I liked her because she was
so fond of Fanny, Mr. Frank takes it upon himself to
exclaim
,
in the most rude way, he thinks
that
must be
allowed
to be among the
least of her merits!
How, sir? said his father; I will thank you to explain
what you mean by that!
Really, Frank, said his mother, laughing, I don't
know how Miss Elton may take such a speech, but
I
should
demand a written apology.
Mary knows, and I hope Miss Elton also, perfectly
what I mean:
I
mean that it's no
merit
to
admire Miss
Elton
,
said Frank.
This lucid explanation produced a general laugh, and
even Miss Elton turned her eyes on him with a look of
amusement, not quite unmingled with surprise, which added
to the dilemma of the poor fellow.
I hope you also do not pretend to misunderstand me,
said he to Miss Elton.
Upon my word, said Fanny, the only meaning I can
find is, you don't think better of any one
for liking me
.
Well, that
is
exactly what I meant, said Frank.
But the expression of politeness in his face so much
contradicted
the apparent meaning of his words, that Miss
Elton
could not herself help joining in the renewed mirth of
the table.
Ah, Frank, my boy, said Mr. Elton, you are a bad
beau, but I don't think the worse of you for that.
If that's the way you pay compliments! said his mother.
You never heard a gentleman, or a person pretending
to be a gentleman, speak his mind so plainly to you before,
Fanny, said Mary.
Frank in name and frank in nature, said Emmerson.
You are all very dull if you really do not understand the
idea I meant to express, said Frank.
Nonsense, said Harry, they understand you very
well, Frank; they are only laughing at you for being so
unsophisticated.
No, upon my soul, said his father, I don't understand
at all, and I beg you to explain yourself at full. Come,
we're all attention.
They were praising Mrs. Wilmington, said Frank,
for a variety of virtues. She speaks the truth. Well!
that
is
a virtue. She is of a gentle disposition. Well! that
also is a virtue. She is charitable, graceful, handsome.
Well! it may be said we like her the better for all that sort
of thing. But her friendship for, her attachment to, her
admiration of, Miss Elton, is a thing whichsince
everybody
whoas
The burst of laughter which greeted this regular
breakdown
appeared to distress Frank as much as it offended
him. He coloured, pushed back the chair, and was
apparently
about to leave the table.
Frank! said his father.
Sir.
Stop!
To that voice he had ever been taught implicit obedience.
Sit still. Where are you going?
You can scarcely be surprised, said Frank, forcing
himself into a sort of gayety, if I withdraw from a circle
where I have not the power of making myself understood.
Hold your tongue. Sit still. You are not a boy.
I don't know, said Fanny, archly, looking at him with
an expression of almost affection, which at least
compensated
for her share in bringing down on him this reproof;
I'm afraid
How will you get through life, said his father, with
such a quick temper as that? Learn that it is the first duty
E 2
and the highest accomplishment of a gentleman always to
keep his temper, particularly in the presence of ladies.
Frank did not appear altogether to relish this lecture, and
before Miss Elton, too; but there was something in his
father's manner at once playful and firm, which took off the
asperity of command without lessening its power.
I tell you what, Frank, said his mother, we must lay
a penalty on you for this outrageous attack on Miss Elton.
Fifty years ago, said Elton, you would have been
obliged to drink a gallon of wine, or brandy perhaps; but
we are past that, I hope.
Let him explain his meaning to Miss Elton herself in
a poem, said Harry, generously coming to the aid of his
successful rival, as he now considered him, for he had seen
the look cast on him by her.
Excellent! said Mary. You are condemned to write
an
impromptu
.
Yes, said Mr. Lennox; an
extempore-metaphysico-tragico
Comico interrupted Miss Elton, with another look.
Explanatory poem, continued Mr. Lennox, before we
leave this house for the theatre. The company shall
assemble
ten minutes earlier, to hear the document publicly
read.
By me, said Mary; for I suppose the repentant
author
will be too much overcome to read it himself. There,
Frank, you can go into the next room; you will find my
desk, and pen, ink, and paper.
Decreed! said Lennox.
The punishment is severe, said Frank, if, indeed,
the terms are not impossible; but I have no alternative, and
if Miss Elton will accept such an expiation of my
unfortunate
attempt at a compliment, I will do my best; only she
must pity and forgive me.
Do so, said Miss Elton; you have my forgiveness,
but not my compassion. I can never
pity
a gentleman in
any dilemma caused by attempting a compliment.
Why, what a horrible little tyrant you are! said Mr.
Lennox, as the company rose, pinching her cheek, till one,
at least, wore its usual healthy colour.
Oh! you hurt me, said she. You're worse than
Frank, a great deal.
And they have even had the impudence, said Mrs.
Elton
,
who had been all this while talking away upon various
subjects not in the least connected with that which
occupied
the rest of the companythey have even had the
impudence, do you know, my dear Mrs. Lennox, to say that
he did not know how to spell.
He! Who? said Mrs. Lennox.
Why, General Washington, notwithstanding
manuscripts
of his own, which certainly ought to put the
question
They all retired, and the door closed upon the company,
till Mrs. Elton's voice was lost to Frank's ear, like the
unceasing
gurgling of some persevering little mountain stream
which forever fills the wood with its music.
For to him it was music, not only because she was one
of the kindest-hearted, most excellent, and noble women in
the world, full of sunshine and love to every human
creature
,
and every other creature, too; and not only because
she talked well and always generously of every one, and
particularly of the absent, but because, still handsome and
stately in her person, and really beautiful in countenance,
there could be traced in her face some resemblance to the
young lady who just at this moment had nearly driven him
crazy.
As soon as his tormentors had fairly left him, and his gay,
audacious father had dared to touch that cheekwhich, had
any one else done it, might have induced the enamoured
boy to throw him out of the window at leastand as soon
as he found himself in quiet and solitary possession of the
apartment, and had spent some moments envying the carpet
which had been pressed by her foot, wishing himself the
air she breathed, and other various matters, which all that
part of our readers who have actually felt true love in early
youth will understand without farther description, and all
that part who have not will set down as the most absurd
nonsense possible, and the mere idle invention of fancy
he began to reflect that the sooner the poetry was
commenced
the sooner it would be finished, and the sooner it was
finished, the sooner he would stand a chance of feeling to
his trembling heart one more of those looks which made it
ache with happiness so. Seizing, therefore, pen and ink,
and a sheet of paper, which happened to be at hand,
without
waiting to go into the next room, which his sister had
designated, he began to rack his imagination to comply with
the conditions of his punishment. Harry knew he wrote
poetry with ease and sweetness, and had made the proposal
in the hope of at once extricating him from the rebuke of
his father and the merriment of the company, and of
affording
him an occasion, if, indeed, he had not yet found one,
to declare to the object of his love something of the state of
his mind.
An impromptu would have been no difficult matter under
any other circumstances, or even now, perhaps, if it were
to be read by Fanny alone. But the desire to do something
particularly fine was a heavy drawback upon his inspiration,
and the wish to say something significant to her, and yet in
which the uninitiated should be able to find only a
commonplace
piece of politenessthese were sad labours, before
which Hercules, Sisyphus, and other ancient gentlemen
might have paused.
He pressed his forehead between the thumb and finger
of his left hand, contracted his brow, threw himself back in
his chair with his eyes fixed, sometimes on the ceiling and
sometimes on the floor, and impatiently dipped his pen full
of ink, and shook it as impatiently out again, to the
occasional
damage of his facetious papa's splendid mahogany
dining-table, and after the universal fashion of poets in the
composition of the flowing impromptu. It was, however,
for a long time in vain. He wroteerasedwrote again
tore offchewed up and filliped out of the window, in the
shape of ingeniously-formed little balls, several invocations
of uncommon elegance and deep pathos, but whose merit
was impaired by the peculiarity of their not going farther
than the first two lines. Rather red in the face (for, if
anything
can add to the sensations of a man publicly forced
upon an impromptu, it is being obliged to execute the same
immediately after a hearty dinner; an event so unusual in
the life of most true poets, that the muse seems to fly at the
very idea), he murmured over what he had written in a low,
declamatory tone.
Oh thou! whose dark eyes, half life and half fire, commandest
(erasure)compellest (erasure)conferrest
Ah, bah!
He turned the sheet upside down, and commenced on the
top of the other page in a new metre.
When Beauty speaks the sweet command
To pour the glowing line;
When mischief and when malice, and,
Sweet maidthe look divinethe heavenly wineimmortal
wineshinerefineminewhose soul once mine.
Ah, bah! was ever anything so stupid?
When mischief, and when malice, and
Ah, ha!
When innocence combine
To force the feeble poet's hand
Feeble poet indeed!
Upon the trembling lyre
That'll never doheighho! Let us try it again.
And, as if caught by a new idea, he went on writing for a
few moments very fluently.
There, said he, after having finished something which
he liked better, that'll do; but, bless me, the theatre
commences
at seven: it's now six o'clock, andhallo! what
the devil's that?
The last exclamation was called forth by the discovery
of something on the floor. It was a glove. He rose and
approached it. He recognised it in a moment. It was
Miss Elton's, and it still wore the shape of her hand and
breathed the incense of her presence. With a not
unnatural
impulse, he raised it to his lips and printed upon it an
impassioned kiss.
This at least, murmured he, sweet girl! I will bear
away in spite of fate.
A slight rustling behind him caused him to turn suddenly,
and Miss Elton herself stood before him, fully betraying, by
her look of embarrassment and surprise, that she had been
the witness of this tender folly. She would have withdrawn
hastily, but the bold and ardent boy placed himself between
her and the door, and seized her hand with the gentleness
of a lover, but the firm determination of a man.
Stay! dear Fanny, stay!
I beg you, Frankwhat nonsense is this? Give me my
glove and let me go. They are waiting for me.
No, Miss Elton; why should you avoid what I wish to
tell you? and why should I conceal what you have already
discovered?
My dearest Frank, what a child you are! Give me the
glove and let me go. You don't wish to make me angry, I
hope?
Fanny, I love you. I am seriousI am sincere. Be
so yourself. I love you to distraction, and can never be
happy without you.
What folly! what a freak is this? Frank! Mr.
Lennox
!
indeed, let me go
One moment, Fanny, hear me; and, as you value my
happiness, answer me, can you love me? will you be
mine?
My dear Frank! love you? Let me go! to be sure I
do, most sincerely. No friend, no brother, could ever be
dearer.
No brother! you cruel girl! can you trifle with me at
a moment when
You astonish and distress me, Frank. Consider, if any
one should come; what do you mean by detaining me so?
I mean that I love you, seriously, passionatelythat I
am about leaving New-York for many years, and that I
will not go without learning from your lips whether the
long and ardent attachment I entertain for you is, or can
ever be, requited.
Frank, this is foolishridiculousimpossible. I
request
you to release me.
The blush faded from her cheek, and she lifted her eyes
gravely, almost coldly upon his. Startled by her tone, the
reserve, the dignity of her manner, and the expression of
her face, the young man released her hand, and bent his
eyes inquiringly and reproachfully upon her.
Let me leave you, Mr. Lennox, and forget this moment,
as I shall.
No, Miss Elton, said Frank, firmly, I shall neither
forget this moment nor suffer you to leave me willingly
without at least once earnestly repeating the declaration I
have made and the question I have asked.
You are a foolish boy, said Miss Elton, and have
been taking too much wine, I believe!
I have told you I love you, said Frank, very seriously.
I am not trifling, and I request a reply. It is important
I should know. I have no right to coerce your affections,
but I have a right to ask if they are mine. As for your
accusation
of having taken too much wine, I presume you
are jesting.
I
am not.
I feel for you so much friendship, such a sister's love,
my dear Frank, said Fanny, that I cannot, without both
pain and embarrassment, answer you seriously, or believe
at all that a demand so unexpected is intended to be
seriously
answered.
And then she added in a different tone, and extending her
hand, while moisture glistened in her eyes,
You foolishfoolish boy! how came you ever to have
such a thought in your head? You are too young, ardent,
and susceptible to know what will ultimately be your choice.
Leave this subject forever. Your friend I hope always to
remain; your
wife
I can
never be
.
Miss Elton, said Frank, haughtily, but tears gushed to
his eyes and grief choked his words, and he murmured in
accents of deepest tenderness,
Dearest Fanny, do not inflict upon me the agony you
are now doing, without an unalterable cause. If you have
never felt towards me any return for the enduring and
tender
love I shall never cease to entertain for you, wait and
see whether time and my devotion may not inspire you with
it. Answer me, but pause before you do so. I am young,
I know, but who, capable of loving, will count a few months?
You have several times called me a boy. I am not one,
believe
me. If years can ever bestow upon me strength to
love or passion to suffer, believe mebelieve me, I possess
them now.
Mr. Lennox, replied Fanny, after a pause, you take
this too seriously. Hear me calmly.
I will, I will; but whatever you have to say of the
present, oh leave the
future
to decide for itself. Give me
one beam of hope that you may hereafter become my wife,
when, at least, I shall have made myself worthy of you.
You are worthy of me now, more than worthy, said
Fanny, greatly affected; but I never can be your wife,
and I have listened so long, dear Frank, only to end
forever
all such thoughts. I sincerely value your friendship.
Do not withdraw it because I reply firmly, and without
appeal
,
to your love. Hope
nothing
from the
future
. I never
can love you. I never will
I never can become your wife
.
Much affected by her gentleness, her beauty, her grace,
and her tearssubdued, overmasteredhe lifted his pale
face to hers, and presented her his hand.
I bow to your decision, Miss Elton. I will never
address
you as a lover again. Simple friendship I cannot
certainly render you; but, while I shall always love you
devotedly, you shall find me as careful of the feelings which
you have now made me acquainted with, as if you were
and his voice trembled as he spokealready the wife
of another.
Noble, generous Frank! said she, giving her hand,
you merit a better and a happier heart.
Go, then, Miss Elton! for I check the terms of
endearment
which rise to my lips; go! may God bless you! I
shall never cease to love and respect you; and should you
ever stand in need of a friend to shed his life's blood in your
cause
I should not hesitate a moment, dear Frank, to call on
you. And be sure, on my part, no recollection of this scene
shall remain but the admiration of your noble magnanimity
and manly self-government. Good-by, dear Frank.
She left the room; but the moment she was gone,
relieved
from the sense of her beauty and the enchantment of
her manner, Frank began to feel indignation and wounded
vanity come to his aid.
She's a little, impertinent, unfeeling coquette, who has
gained all and given nothing in return. A capricious,
insufferable
jilt!that's what she is. I have not the
slightest
doubt she's laughing at me heartily at this very moment.
What a simple shepherd I am, to be sure. By Heaven! I
wonder I did not see through her. But if she thinks she's
going to break my heart, she shall find herself finely
mistaken
.
She shall never see the shadow, no, not the shadow
of a shadow on my brow.
He sat down, lighted a cigar, and lost himself in
reflections
which, notwithstanding his stoical resolution, brought
a very black shadow to his brow. At length, puffing away,
his eyes occasionally full of tears, which glittered through
heavy clouds of smoke, he brought his cigar to a premature
conclusion just as Harry came in.
Hallo! said Frank.
Well, what's the matter?
The deed is done.
What deed?
My deed! I have offered myself to Miss Fanny Elton.
like an ass.
Well?
And am rejected, as if I had, indeed, been that elegant
and long-enduring animal.
You don't mean to say, cried Harry, with a singular
feeling, not joy, but certainly not grief, that Miss Elton
has
refused you?
No! I don't mean to say it, if I can help it, at least to
any one but yourself; but I mean to say it to you, and I
hereby make the satisfactory disclosure, in return for the
little, polite confidence you have been so obliging as to
make me, somewhat in the same line. It seems Miss
Elton
is difficult. By heavens! she not only rejected me, but
she wound me round her finger as if I had been a child of
six, scolded me for my folly and impertinence, and
explained
the impropriety of my conduct in the clearest manner. I
think we've been rather jilted, Harry. Why! where the devil
is
the fellow? He's off too! agreeable family I've got into!
No matter: I'm young, as she very correctly observed.
But there's an old adage she did
not
repeat, though I swear
I thought once she was going to do so, viz., `There's as
good fish in the sea as ever came out of it!' andah, Fanny!
said he, as the affectation of this flippancy became too much
for him, I'm a villain to wrong you with one light thought.
While the poor fellow, who had sat down in an attitude
of deep reflection, was thus agitated with a (to be sure,
somewhat miniature) tempest of love and despair, the door
of the adjoining drawing-room was suddenly burst open, and
in came Mrs. Elton, talking as hard as she could possibly
talk, followed by Mr. Lennox and Mrs. Lennox, laughing
heartily at something which appeared to have been already
said by somebody, and Elton, exclaiming with a benevolent
harshness, Now, sir, we've come to arrest you for your
debt, and Emmerson, gliding in softly behind the rest, with
an uneasy expression on his brow, and the only silent one
in the company, and Mary, actually dragging in the
blushing
and yet (if any one had taken the trouble to observe her,
they might have seen) obviously distressed Fanny, and Mr.
Henderson, saying something to his wife, who, without
listening
to him in the least, was saying something to him.
Such a noise, to be sure! and so sudden was the irruption,
and they all made so quickly for Frank, as he sat leaning
his elbows on the table and his face on his hands, with the
inkstand and pen significantly beside him, and two or three
sheets of paper, all scribbled over with broken lines and
great black erasures, scattered about, and one sheet lying
before him, which he had quite forgotten, with a small
poem fairly written out, headed, in large, flowing letters,
Vol. I.F
To Miss Elton
. As this clamorous apparition broke
upon his solitary meditations, Frank started up with such
a look of serious amazement, that those who had not
laughed
before laughed now, and those who had, laughed yet
louder.
There he is! There's the lieutenant! said his father.
Ha! ha! ha! reposing after his toils.
Now then! exclaimed his mother, for the `warrior
bard!'
Come, Frank, produce! bring forth! which is it? cried
Mary, laughing.
Which is it? echoed Elton. Here are a dozen at
least.
This is the one, cried Mrs. Elton. See! look!
To
Miss Fanny Elton
.
He really has done sixteen lines, remarked
Henderson
.
I'll read it, said Mrs. Elton.
No, INo, let me, cried several voices.
But Frank had snatched up the paper when he
recollected
himself.
I beg your pardon, said he, with dignity, which
seemed
to amuse every one wonderfully; it is not finished. I
begI request another time.
Read it, then, yourself, said his mother.
No.
Frank, cried his father, give it up this moment. Do
you dare to back outto trifle with the feelings of the
public
in this way?
It is not fit to read.
Give it me, sir.
Frank obeyed.
We'll forgive your blushes; in a young lieutenant,
with such a furious pair of whiskers as yours, they're
rather
interesting than otherwise. But the penalty must be
paid; it's a debt of honour to a lady. Odds hearts and
darts, as Bob Acres would say, the thing's inevitable.
Well, let me go out, then, said Frank, blushing deeply.
Not a step. Elton, mind the door. I declare military
law. See that Miss Elton does not escape, some of you.
She seems also disposed to desert. Attention! now, in the
court. Officer, keep silence.
To Miss Fanny Elton.
When Beauty speaks the sweet command,
To pour the glowing
That's the wrong one, said Frank, with something very
like drops of perspiration on his forehead.
What! are there two?
I've no doubt the poor fellow has written twenty, said
Mary.
Well! let us see. He shall have only justice and his
bond
.
Please to let me off, said Frank, earnestly.
No, sir. Officer, keep silence there, cried Mr. Lennex.
To pour the glowing line
Pour a line? Why, what sort of a process is that,
Frank? You might as well say `write a glass of punch!'
Read the other one, said Mrs. Lennox, observing
Frank's embarrassment.
Well, here it is. Hear ye! hear ye! hear ye! A
flowing impromptu, composed by a young lieutenant of the
great North American standing army, of five thousand men,
to the eyebrow of the most beautiful, young, blushing,
blue-eyed
lady that ever was seen. Done, after a hearty dinner,
in the mansion of his distinguished parent, and read, by the
delighted latter gentleman, to a select circle of the
New-York
nobility and gentry, in the year of our Lord one
thousand
eight hundred and
Do, for Heaven's sake, read! said Mrs. Lennox.
In order to explain what he meant, continued Mr.
Lennox
,
by declaring that it was no merit to like the
blue-eyed
,
bewitching young lady, as aforesaid
The
peal of laughter with which this
w
Frank to get the better
of
si
which he did with a very
looks and gestures
reducing
the noisy merriment of the
to a delighted but complete silence, passed his hand
twice
over his own good-humoured countenance, as if to bring
it
down to the tone of dignified gravity required in a public
reader, and proceeded as follows:
To Miss Fanny Elton.
1.
So charming her figure, her features so fair,
Her manners so gentle the while;
You say all the graces reside in her air,
While love lies concealed in her smile.
Whatever the charms of her form, they're excelled
By the virtues that shine in the breast;
And then
she loves roses!
but, surely, I find
Of her
merits
, the
last
is the
least
.
2.
With the best of intentions her soul is inspired;
Her feelings with charity glow.
For a saint, could perfections more rare be desired?
And thenshe
loves roses also!
You may praise, if you will, both her mind and her heart,
If, indeed, they're so tender and true;
But I ask,
can
they claim, as a
merit
, her love
Of music, or roses
or you?
Now, what are you to do with such a young villain as
that? said Mr. Lennox.
Really, he has made it out admirably, said Mary.
Admirably? exclaimed his father. Why, Moore's
nothing to him!
I never heard of virtues
shining
in anybody's breast,
whispered Mrs. Henderson to her husband. Besides, the
word
charm
occurs
twice
in the first stanza.
Poor Frank! said his mother. The lines are really
beautiful.
The whole company broke out into exclamations of
admiration
and delight very complimentary to the poet; but,
on looking around to find where he had hidden himself, it
was perceived that, taking advantage of Mr. Elton's
attention
to the reader, he had quietly made his escape.
No matter, said his father; I shall insist upon
criticising
them before him to-morrow!
And he pinned them up in full sight against a curtain.
CHAPTER X.
Frank's
character was lighter than his brother's. What
the latter to madness almost, drove him at first
of suicide, and afterward to lose the sense of his
boyish
, but, nevertheless, keen despair in intoxication, only
touched Frank's heart with grief, and then awakened new
hopes. He had received a dismissal, too, of a very
different
kind from Harry's. It was gentle, affectionate almost,
confidential, and good-humoured. He was completely
convinced
that Fanny had never thought of such a thing as his
being in love with her. Her surprise, her pain, her earnest
desire to save his feelings by throwing over the whole affair
the character of a boyish frolic, and, at last, her unequivocal,
explicit manner of putting the extinguisher upon his little,
unexpected flame, left him no room to doubt that the young
girl had acted in good faith, and that at present there was
an end to his fine dreams.
But what then? thought he. Now she knows I love
her, it will be another thing. She has supposed me a
boy
,
it seems! I don't know what there is about me so very
young
, I'm sure, and he arranged his whiskers and brought
them forward into a more prominent position. I have five
or six months before me. If I can't in that time succeed in
changing her opinion, why, then, it will be time enough to
despair.
These reveries were enjoyed in the pit of the Park
Theatre
,
whither Frank had gone to sit a while and behold the
countenance of Miss Elton before he took his place by her
side. The pit of the theatre has been the resort of many a
mournful lover to gaze and gaze on the bright star of his
worship, without boldness or the fear either of observation
or interruption.
He was aroused from his reveries by a touch on the
shoulder. On turning he recognised Mr. Earnest, a young
lawyer with whom he had a slight acquaintance. As the
act curtain fell, though Frank was scarcely conscious it had
been up, this gentleman addressed him to beguile the
interval
.
He was a little fellow, with large black whiskers,
piercing eyes, over-dressed, over-perfumed, with a variety
of rings on his fingers, and a rather startling brooch in his
cravat, which was spread voluminously out over his breast.
Although Frank had met him once or twice at his father's
house, where he occasionally presented himself, he scarcely
considered him among his friends, and he was rather
surprised
at his perfect familiarity of manner.
Hallo, Frank! that you? How are you? How do you
come on? What a devilish stupid thing this opera is? How
disgustingly Horn sings! Isn't it very odd that the public
allow themselves to be gouged in this way?
Frank did not think the opera stupid, and he admired
Horn; but, not disposed for a dispute, replied only in
general
terms.
F 2
If I couldn't sing better than that, I would not sing at
all, resumed Earnest.
And do you sing?
Why yes, a little! at least, I know enough of music to
see the difference between what is bad and what is good.
Since I have returned from abroad, I can't put up with the
same fare as others. I'm not to be fobbed off with such
trash as this.
Were you long abroad?
Six months. I made the whole tour: I saw everything
and everybody.
Really?
Oh yes. I went to see, and I did see. I found the
character of a stranger, a traveller, and an American, a
passport everywhere.
Indeed?
There is scarcely a thing worth seeing that I haven't
seen a great man I haven't spoken with, or a sovereign I
have not been presented to.
Well, as for me, said Frank, I confess that, although
I am interested in seeing great men, I have no desire to
know them.
Ah! bah! they like it; it is incense to them. Besides,
they are as much interested in us as we are in them, and are
always glad of an opportunity of procuring living information.
A conversation with an intelligent man just from the spot
is worth to them a pile of musty folios or pert books of
travels
.
Why the kings of France and of England talked with
me a good half hour. Metternich kept me chatting till I
was tired to death. I dined with Scott; and as for Moore,
Byron, Rogers, and those fellows, by Jove! we're hand and
glove together.
You must have some delightful recollections? said
Frank.
Yes, rather. But it has spoiled me for home.
Everything
here seems little, mean, and vulgar. I really think
there is no excellence of any kind. Our great men all
strike me like provincial actors to one accustomed to a
metropolitan
theatre. Our statesmen make long-winded,
declamatory
,
schoolboy speeches, and take two days to say
what a clever member, what, indeed, any member of the
House of Commons would say in ten minutes.
Why, it seems to me, said Frank, that such men as
Webster and Clay are as good as others. I would not do
our distinguished men such injustice as to attempt to
enumerate
them in a short conversation.
We have had one or two clever fellows; but I think
our greatest men of the present day would be only fifth
rate in England.
Well, I won't debate with you, said Frank, not
sympathizing
with the blind admiration of foreign things, which
rendered his companion unable to see excellence abroad
without denying its existence at homethe sure indication
of a small mind.
Then look at our society, continued Earnest. What
a mere trumpery collection of heterogeneous material, a
mere
mlange
, without a standard of manners or any
systematic
principle of exclusion or organization.
As to exclusion, said Frank, if report and books
speak truth, the highest society of Europe is not, with all
its exclusiveness, free from vulgar people.
But then I feel here, as the saying is, like a cat in a
strange garret, said Earnest. I see nothing of the
splendour
and gorgeousness that I've been in the habit of being
surrounded with. Where are our public walks? our
magnificent
,
shady parks? our picture and sculpture galleries?
Where our stately equipages? our chasseurs? our footmen
with powdered hair and gold-headed canes? our men of
science? our beautiful women? Going abroad has ruined
me forever as an American.
Then I think, said Frank, gravely, for his love of
country
was not only a principle, but a feeling, it is a great
pity you did not remain at home. As for our comparative
inferiority in some things, it is undeniable. In others our
superiority is equally apparent. Royal parks! there are
none, because there are no kings, expensive governments,
and wealthy aristocracy! I cannot feel less happiness
because
I don't see chasseurs and footmen with powdered
heads and gold canes! I believe Providence means the
English should love their country and we ours, and if travel
only impairs our patriotism, then travel is an evil.
I don't agree with you at all, said Earnest.
I
go for
truth, and I embrace the
truth
wherever I find it. Society
exists as it is, and man, if a philosopher, wishes to see it
as
it is
, and not under any delusion or prejudice, amiable or
unamiable. There are people who talk in the same way of
religion. They believe because they
wish
to believe. If
Christianity be not true, I don't wish to believe it. Do you
suppose the great characters of antiquity believed in their
gods, and miracles, and all that? certainly not. Give me
truth! I
set up for a man of sense, and I don't care who
knows it. I also set up for a man of courage, moral as well
as physical. I wish to see things as they
are
, whether the
discovery be pleasing or not. I seek truth even before
happiness
;
truth, if it mean death or annihilation after death.
Certainly, said Frank, who, during this harangue, had
been leaning his face back and away as much as possible,
but who was followed up close by the youthful philosopher,
and greatly annoyed at finding himself entrapped into a
metaphysical dispute with a person whom travelling and
his own self-sufficient mind had rendered rather disgusting,
certainly, truth is the object of life, but one cannot be too
guarded against illusion.
Oh yes, but I am
sure I
have
found
truth.
You're a lucky fellow.
Yes, I am, and it is
travel
which has opened my mind.
Before I went abroad I don't think there was a greater fool
to be found anywhere than I. Perhaps you remember me?
No! I do not.
I was badly dressed, bad-mannered, and backward,
without
any confidence in myself, and blushing like a red
cabbage
when any oneparticularly a ladyspoke to me.
Now, egad! I have seen the worldbut I am wrong. It is
not travel
alone
which has opened my mind.
And what else is it?
Love!
Love? said Frank, almost with a start.
Love, repeated Earnest. You've no idea how you
get on in that way abroad. I was in love with three
married
women. You know no one falls in love with any one
but married women on the Continent.
No, I did not know that. I fear I am as backward as
you were before you left America.
One was a countess at Vienna, one a baroness at Paris,
and the third the wife of a generala very good creature
in Milan.
And did all these ladies return your passion? asked
Frank.
Why, that is scarcely for me to say, replied Earnest,
modestly, at least of all of them. They were very kind
particularly so. If I had had timeat least I may say there
were some little `
passages
' between usha! ha! ha! Hey?
and I assure you this sort of thing has rather steeled my
heart against home attacks.
Home attacks?
Yes, the Yankee young ladies.
Really?
Yes. Dark eyes, bright eyes, tall or short, fair or brown,
tender or haughty, it's pretty much the same to me.
Thank God! I have seen
men
, and women too, my lord,
hey? and, moreover, I have seen the world. I am rich
that is to say, I have
de quoi vivre
. I don't mean to marry,
unless I get something very superior. Now your cousin
yonderisn't she your cousin?
She? who?
That devilish pretty Fanny Elton.
Miss Elton is not my cousin.
No? I thought she was. She's a devilish nice little
piece, though; I say, you've no intentions that way, have
youhey?
I? no, certainly not.
So I thought, otherwise you wouldn't be here in the pit
while she was sitting in the boxes with a vacant seat beside
her. Well, then, I wouldn't say anything to hurt your
feelings
,
but since you're not carrying on operations in that
quarter, I will candidly confess that I myself, at one time
Frank turned his glance so sternly on the speaker that
most men would have observed it, but Mr. Earnest was too
much occupied with himself to pay much attention to others.
You see, my friends wanted me to marry. The old
gentleman is getting rather rickety, and the mamma wants
to see the hopeful son settled before she shoots the pit.
So I did allow myself to be persuaded to look about me,
and she, on the whole, appeared to be about the best thing
in the market. Wherever I went it was always
Fan Elton
.
I called to see her several timesbut he twisted up his
mouth to express the total failure of Miss Elton in her
desires
to please himit was
no go!
I did not exactly think
she bore a close view. She's prettyat a little distance
but her
manners
are not preciselybesidesmatrimony
when one is brought to the point, you see, hey?so I rather
shied. In short, I withdrew without committing myself,
though I fear she, poor girl! must think my abrupt clearing
out very odd.
Much disgusted, Frank turned away, scarcely preserving
his temper sufficiently to avoid openly insulting the little
puppy, whose perfect satisfaction with himself was so
provoking
.
The curtain rose just at the moment, and the occupants of
the pit, with their usual dogmatical commands of hats off,
and down in front, arranged themselves to enjoy the drama
on the stagefew dreaming what a drama was going on
their side of the orchestra.
For one moment the awkward possibility had flashed
across Frank's mind, that there might be some truth in the
representation of Earnest. Miss Elton
might
have refused
himself and Harry in consequence of a passion for another,
and that other Mr.
Earnest
. He wasat least some
people
thought himgood-looking. His features, though
irregular
,
were rather spirituelle (or Frank fancied them so at
this moment), his complexion was clear and fine, and his
eyes unquestionably good. He had travelled, was rich,
and reputed a young man of talent. He certainly was a
clever lawyer, a ready speaker, a spouter at public
meetings
,
and a great ladies' man, though an inherent pertness
and self-conceit could scarcely fail to repel persons of
discrimination
.
Was it within the range of possibility that
Miss Elton hadfor love does sometimes play such curious
pranksfancied this youth worthy her attention? He
watched with renewed interest, vexation, and delight, her
face as it changed in its mobile features with the incidents
on the stagenow shading over with the sadness of a
tender
scenenow lighted up in the enjoyment of a sweet
song, and now, alas! forgetting all around her once more in
her own apparently not happy reveries.
The act was finished before he was well aware that it
had been begun, and as the curtain fell, said Earnest,
leaning
over,
I say, my boy, do you know those gentlemen that have
just come into your folk's box, and are sitting exactly
behind
Fanny?
No.
They are English officersstationed in Canadahere
on leave of absence. I knew them in London, and have
renewed
the acquaintance here. The younger is Captain
Glendenning, the other Captain Whitefirst-rate fellows
high bredthe very tip-top.
Indeed?
They're here almost
incog
., on a sort of frolic; go
nowhere
,
though, if they chose only to present themselves,
they would be honoured to death by our toad-eating
fashionables
.
That Glendenning is the greatest devil that ever
breathed. In London he is always getting into the most
astounding scrapes. It is his passion. I should not be in
the least surprised to see him walk up the aisle of a
crowded
church on a Sunday, take the clergyman by the nose, and
walk out again. It would be just like himexactly. And
his friends have bought him into the army, and got him over
to Canada, to keep him out of the way of temptation, or, at
least, of disgrace in England.
I beg your pardon, said Frank; I believe I'll go and
join my party.
Just stop a moment, can't you, said Earnest, till this
big chap next you gets out? One day he rode a spirited
horse directly into a crockery shop, slap! dash! crack!
and nearly killed an old woman who was sitting behind the
counter; and when the owner came out to remonstrate, he
knocked him down senseless with the butt-end of his whip,
and left him for dead, for he's as brave as Csara
magnificent
fellow!
Really, said Frank, he has not the appearance of
being
such a desperate rascal. What were the consequences
of all this to him?
Oh! by Jove, said Earnest, don't apply quite such
plump expressions to him, or he'll knock you through some
third story window one of these days. The consequences
to him were nothing. He was fined five pounds, I believe,
by the magistrate. He paid it, of course (he's a thousand
a year), winked to his worship, and left the room. I heard,
however, he made, of his own accord, a very handsome
present to the poor crockery chap; for he is an
excellent-hearted
fellow, and just as generous as he is wild.
I should doubt the excellence of his heart as much as
I do that of his head, said Frank, coolly.
Oh, it's nothing at allonly a frolic; boys must sow
their wild oats. `We young men must live,' as Jack
Falstaff says. One day he was at the races in England,
when he saw a man walking with a pretty girl. He went
up to him in the politest way and said, `I say, sir, that's a
dn pretty girl! where did you pick her up?' The
stranger, who was a merchant's clerk, replied, `She's my
wife, sir, and you're a puppy, or you would not address me
in such a way;' upon which Glendenning knocked him
down as flat as a flounder, for he's a capital boxer. When
the clerk, a Mr. Heckson, or Hickson, or some such name,
got up, he refused to box with Glendenning, because he
saw he was a bruiser; but he calmly offered to fight him
with pistols. `Your rank?' said Glendenning's friend
(for he was, of course, some low fellow!). `Your rank,
Mr.
Tapeyard
, does not permit you to invite a gentleman to
meet you.' `If the gentleman, as you call him,' said the
stranger, `has the baseness to insult a man beneath him in
rank, he ought, at least, to have the courage to meet him.'
`You're perfectly right,' said Glendenning. `I'll meet
you whenever you please.' They did meet, and
Glendenning
,
had he chosen, could have killed him just as easily as
kiss his hand, for he's a first-rate shot; but he only winged
himbroke his arm, I believe, or something of that sort.
Now, I want to know, who could behave more handsomely
than that? I like him amazingly. He's just after my taste.
Don't you agree with me?
No; on the contrary, I think your friend must be a
desperate
blackguard! said Frank, without trying to soften by
his manner the bluntness of his remark.
Earnest appeared to feel that this was intended as an
offence
,
but, not liking the idea of quarrelling, changed the
conversation.
Well, I swear, Fanny is looking sweet to-night! I've
a great mind to go up into the box with you.
When
I
speak of that young lady, said Frank, I
always
call her
Miss Elton;
and if you were a
gentleman
,
you would do the same.
Hallo! said Earnest.
But Frank had already risen, and was making his way
out of the theatre without deigning him any farther attention.
CHAPTER XI.
Earnest
was now insulted, yet he dared not resent it.
Although he professed to have found truth, he had not been
so fortunate in respect to courage. He was a coward. But
in proportion to his fear of the flashing eye and manly arm
of the indignant young soldier, was his vanity, and his
hatred
of him who had wounded it. When men are in that
state of passion, the father of evil is generally ready with
opportunity to gratify it. The young man saw the
departure
of his enemy, and presently perceived him seated almost
immediately behind Miss Elton, and occasionally
interchanging
a remark with her. Jealousy added force to his
revenge
;
for the reader need scarcely be informed, that his
withdrawal from addressing Miss Elton was in consequence
of the cool dislike discovered by the young lady, in a way,
gentle and polite indeed, but by far too unequivocal to leave
him the slightest hope of success. He had, therefore, in
fact, not much more friendly sentiments towards her than
towards Frank.
The opera was at length concluded, and Earnest left the
theatre in no enviable mood. As he was passing into the
street, he felt a friendly, though rather emphatic slap on his
shoulder, and a
Hallo, my little fellow! where do
you
come from?
showed him Glendenning.
Their greetings were warmly interchanged, and, with
Captain White, they agreed to go in next door to Windust's
and take supper together before the farce.
And how goes the world with you? said White, as
each one began to discuss his delicious steak.
How can it go other than well? said Earnest, secretly
congratulating himself that his companions had not been
witnesses of his late humiliation. With such a steak as
that, and a bottle of Champagne by me, the world always
goes well. How long do you mean to stay in New-York?
How do you like our Yankee metropolis? Where are you
going next?
Did any one ever hear such a rattle-pated madeap!
Vol. I.G
said Glendenning. How many mouths do you think I
have, to answer such a discharge of questions as that and
eat such a supper as this at the same moment? Have you
been into the theatre?
Yes. I saw you there. How do you like Horn?
What! another question? said Glendenning. Cut
that cork, will you? I really don't know. I didn't hear
him.
No? Why I saw you there!
Don't talk to Glendenning; he's crazy, as usual, said
White. I always wanted his old man to put him into a
madhouse. Do you know he has fallen monstrously in love
to-night, poor swain! with a girl he never saw before, and
never will again. Here, hold your glass, young Romeo.
We jest at scars that never felt a wound! This is devilish
nice wine.
I'll bet a dozen of it I see her again, and speak with
her too, said Glendenning.
Who are you raving about? asked Earnest.
I don't know.
Ha, ha, ha! capital!
She's a very beautiful Yankee girl, that sat before us
this evening.
You
ought to know your own town's people.
There were two, said Earnest; both pretty enough,
and both old friends of mine.
The one with a
rose
in her bosom, said Glendenning.
Waiter! another bottle of Champagne. Tell me who she
is, for I have never felt the keen arrow of the little boy go
so deep before.
The one with a rose on her breast is a Miss Elton.
A
Miss Elton? Thou speakest like a withered
lawyer
.
Miss
Elton!
the
Miss Elton! The only
woman
I
ever saw in my life.
Ha, ha, ha! Here's a man to have under one's care,
said White. His old gentleman committed him to my
prudence, and I'd rather drive an unbroken colt before a
park of artillery. Ha, ha, ha!
Who is she? What is she? Will you make me
acquainted
with her? said Glendenning.
No, not I. She's a demure coquette. She's jilted
me
,
and I've no more to do with her. I rather think she's
consuming
the youth behind herthe one next you. He's one
of her flames, too, I suspect.
A coquette, is she? said Glendenning. I should
like her to try
me
.
Oh, you'd have to fight your way through two or three
fellows. This chap has a brother, both would-be
cocks-of-the-walk
.
The one with her to-night is a lieutenant in the
army.
What, a militia lieutenant? A `Jefferson Guards' or a
`Tompkins's Blues' man? said Glendenning.
No, a regular lieutenant; a proud, conceited,
free-spoken
,
upstart sort of a fellow; very rich, very saucy, and,
by-the-way
,
no great admirer of yours.
How's that? said Glendenning, in whose cheek and
eyes the effect of the wine was already visible. What
does any Yankee lieutenant have the audacity to say of
me?
Nothing, but that you're a
desperate blackguard
, said
Earnest.
What! said Glendenning, laying down his knife and
fork.
Just nowin the theatreto me. I heard him. I
would have knocked him over if it had not been in the
theatre.
Waiter! said Glendenning.
Now you're for a row! said White. Don't go back.
What do you mean, Earnest, by such a statement as that
of a man who does not know either of us, and can know
nothing but what you must have told him?
I?
I told him only some of your frolics, said
Earnest
,
sturdily, and that was his reply. I'll take my oath
of it.
Waiter! the bill! said Glendenning, mildly.
Here, let
me
pay! said Earnest, putting his hand
violently
into his pocket, and rattling his money and keys as
soon as he saw the bill was paid.
No matter! said Glendenning, the next time! I'm
very much obliged to you, my dear fellow. Let's finish the
bottle!
And where are you going then? said White.
Back to the theatre to see the
farce
.
Yes, to
act
in it, perhaps! Glendenning, you shall not
go, said White.
Nonsense.
I know you perfectly well, and you've taken too much
wine.
Look at me, said the young
rou;
am I
drunk?
I don't say you're drunk, but I say you're quarrelsome.
If you wish to notice the, I must say, ridiculous statement
of Earnest, do it, at least, in a proper way; send a
message
.
Earnest may take it, if he likes.
Oh no! not for the world. You must not betray
me
. I
told it you in the strictest confidence, said Earnest.
Well, I won't send him a message.
Then you shall not go back to the theatre! said White,
grasping his arm.
White, said Glendenning, I give you the honour of
a gentleman, I won't disturb this Lieutenant Hancock.
Lieutenant Lennox, said Earnest. His name is
Lennox
.
Well, Lennox, then. I don't want a row any more than
you.
Your word of honour?
My word of honour. I want only to see this girl,
because
she's so pretty.
Well, then, for half an hour let us go back.
I have my seat in the
pit
, said Earnest, and he
sneaked
off to resume it.
CHAPTER XII.
Frank
sat with his party between the play and farce.
When White and Glendenning left the box he felt relieved,
for their admiration of Fanny had been so apparent as to
inspire the susceptible young lover with some not very
placid
sensations. His gratification, however, was of short
duration, for, after the lapse of fifteen or twenty minutes,
which he had spent talking to his mother, the two officers
both returned. Thinking, perhaps, that the sight of a
gentleman
conversing with the object of their rude attention
might either abash or intimidate them, he moved nearer and
addressed her.
I've been looking at you, Miss Elton, from the pit, said
he, and considering what a fool you must think me.
To be sure I do! said she, smiling, and extending her
hand; but we are friends for all that.
I really don't quite know! said Frank.
You're a spoiled child, said she, and I shall tell your
mamma of you.
A child? my mamma? I am no child, Miss Elton.
Do you know I'm twenty in less than a month?
No! What a venerable old fellow you are. Is that
your own hair? Why, my poor child, I'm old enough to
be your grandmother! How do you like the opera?
Not much. It's very good. I haven't heard a note of it.
Lucid being! your ideas are so
clear!
And you have the cruelty to laugh at me?
You!
I must answer you in your father's style. `Hold your
tongue, sir!' How dare you have the impertinence to
address
me in that way?
He was going to reply, when the younger English officer
leaned deliberately forward, and took the rose from Miss
Elton's bosom.
For a single moment amazement and incredulity kept
Frank motionless, till he saw the two strangers rise as if
about to leave the box, when, with a deep exclamation of
fury, and his large eyes flashing sparkles of fire, he leaped
upon the aggressor, and struck him a fearful blow in his
face. There was a shriek of horror, a shout of wrath, and
Frank and his foe were linked together in a deadly hug.
The audience rose
en masse
, supposing the house on fire,
or that some part of the building had given way. The
truth, however, became immediately apparent, when a
vociferous
burst of voices rose from all quarters, with
Hustle
'em out! Turn 'em out!
But the combatants were already in the lobby, which was
close thronged to suffocation. The terrified family of Frank
shrieked after him in vain. They could not even get a
sight of him.
CHAPTER XIII.
Harry
had also stolen into the pit of the theatre to look
at Miss Elton. He had beheld the incident above related,
and the effect upon his high-wrought temper may not be
easily imagined. Exerting all his strength, he forced his
G 2
way, not out of the theatre, but through the crowd towards
the box, and, leaping over the balustrade, he hastened into
the lobby. It was, however, too late. The combatants
were already gone, he knew not whither. The family had
also disappeared.
Where are they? demanded Harry of a by-stander.
A lady fainted, and they have taken her home.
But the combatants?
Oh! gone off in one coach, four of them; but
where
is
more than they mentioned. The police are after them, but
I wish they may catch them, ha! ha! ha! One of those
young chaps has got to be made cold meat of before sunrise.
Where
, indeed, thought Harry. Which way to go was
now the question. To the police? to Hoboken? at length
he sprang into a hackney-coach, and directed home. On
arriving, he rushed into the house. He could not
rationally
expect to meet Frank there, but he felt a shadow of
horror
on finding he had not yet been heard of. The family
were in a delirium of grief; his mother walking up and
down the room, wringing her hands in despair, and his
father
very pale, but calm. The supper-table was set, but,
as may be imagined, was untouched. The servants were
running to and fro, peeping into the room and slamming the
doors in haste and confusion, and there was poor Frank's
poetry pinned up against the curtain.
My son! my son! where is he? cried Mr. Lennox.
Then he has gone, said Harry.
To the police. Oh, go to the police, cried the women.
No! said Lennox, he must
go through
with the
affair
:
no police!
I will go to the police, said Elton.
I beg, I command, said Lennox, that no one interfere.
Pardon me, said Elton, hastening out, I must not
desist from my duty.
He went.
God have mercy on him, murmured Fanny.
Policeno. They must meet, and they will meet. An
English officer and an American officer cannot go so far as
that without going farther. I trust he will lay the scoundrel
low, and teach a bully and a blackguard a manly lesson. I
hope to meet him presently, safe and successful from his
stern duty, and to clasp a hero and a gentleman to my arms,
said Lennox.
And I too, father, said Mary, firmly, but with
streaming
eyes. I would have loaded his pistols for him rather
than he should have failed to doact as he has done.
And hear me too, Almighty God! cried Mrs. Lennox,
falling solemnly on her knees, rather than a
murderer
, let
me see him brought back a
dead corpse!
Catharine, cried her husband.
I could better bear, oh Eternal Father! continued she,
without paying any attention to the interruption, I could
better bear to see him taken by thee. Take himhis
mother
asks it
let him die
in his youth, in his beauty, rather
than
Dear Mr. Lennox, said Miss Elton, hadn't you
better
go out and see what can be done to stop this dreadful
affair?
No, never! said Lennox.
She then turned to Emmerson, but, on finding him taking
some refreshment very quietly in the back room, she
appealed
to Harry.
And will you see your brother murdered or become a
murderer, when, perhaps, you might prevent it?
I fear it must take its course, Miss Elton, said Harry,
gravely. The police are already informed. I could in no
way aid them.
Then go to the ground, said Miss Elton, where you
think they will repair. Make at least an effort to find them.
Were I on the spot, said Harry, what could I do?
They will not obey me. Nor, in fact, could I advise Frank
to do anything but go through with the affair.
You may reach the place in time to receive his dying
breath, perhaps some last request, said Miss Elton.
You are right, replied Harry, shocked and rebuked.
Go, then.
He hastened out and leaped once more into the carriage,
when a police-officer stepped up to him.
It is quite useless, said the officer: the gentleman's
name is Captain Glendenning. He lodges at the City
Hotel
.
We have sent there, and also over to Hoboken. It is
too late, however. The meeting can't be avoided. It is
now twoday breaks at three, and they will not probably
wait for much light, for they are in earnest. The mischief,
whatever it turn out to be, is done, and that's the end of it.
Harry felt this, and that all exertion on his part would
prove fruitless. The chance was very slender of his being
able to find the parties. But the idea suggested by Miss
Elton had given him a new impulse. His affection for his
brother was warm and tender. He might find him, perhaps,
wounded, gasping his last sigh, alone, abandoned, or
deserted
by all but strangers and hirelings. This new thought
seemed to wing his soul with lightning. He directed the
coachman to drive instantly and rapidly to the foot of
Courtland
,
or any of those streets leading to the Hudson, and
where small boats might be procured. The man obeyed,
and he presently reached the wharf. Boats were found,
but no oarsman and no oars. He leaped at length into one,
in which, probably by chance, a pair of old oars had been
left.
CHAPTER XIV.
The
night was clear and calm. The water stretched
itself peacefully out till its gently-heaving surface was lost
in the dusky shadows. The strongly marked, heavy shapes
of the receding town lay indistinct and black on the flood
a few dim forms of vessels at anchor, only half discernible;
but, without stopping to claim any more assistance, Harry
rowed with all his might out into the broad stream, and was
soon surrounded only by sky and waves. Unaccustomed,
however, to this violent exercise, he presently found
himself
breathless and exhausted. Dripping with sweat,
agitated
and impatient beyond endurance, he was obliged to
cease from his exertions, and suffer many long intervals to
pass away in passive despair. Then he seized the oars
with a new impulse of madness and rowed again, and so
more than half an hour elapsed, till, in the east, to him the
most dreadful sight, a pale, silver light began to steal upon
the long, sleeping clouds, and to touch with a deeper
transparency
the tender sky.
At daybreak they would doubtless meet. Perhaps, by
the aid of these soft and slowly strengthening beams, the
brother whom he loved with a passionate tenderness which
he could scarcely endure, was presenting his heart to the
deadly aim of his enraged and murderous enemy; and so
the day broadened, and the green, pellucid waves heaved
and broke with their gentle, soothing sound, and streaks of
rosy red shot in arrowy lines up to the mid-heaven, and the
now distant city began to be unveiled beneath its light
covering
of smoke, and mist, and shadow, and the green,
delicate
shores of New-Jersey grew more near, more distinct,
more vividly lovely; and he could hear the birds warbling
in the woods, and the plaintive cry of three or four snipe,
that occasionally rose and alighted again on the winding
beach, and the meadow lark shot upward with its joyous
scream; and thenthe report of a pistol, and then another.
He paused and listened till his blood grew cold and his
heart dead.
Nothing more could be heard but the ordinary sweet
sounds of nature, the dash of the waves, their rolling
murmur
as they broke on the pebbly beach, the carol of the
lark, and the melancholy cry of the snipe.
With the strength of a giant, he now resumed his rowing,
and for a few moments the little boat shot swiftly on towards
the land, when, in the eagerness of his efforts, one oar broke
short off and the other fell into the stream.
With a deep imprecation, he struck his clinched fist
against his forehead. We will not repeat his blasphemous
maledictions, his dark, unbridled rage, his oaths of
vengeance
on the murderer of his brother, even if he should
be obliged to stab him in the street. Nothing but fiendish
fury and black, relentless hate and despair held possession
of his mind; not a prayer, or a thought of Him who created
and sustained him.
He had not remained long in this state, endeavouring, in
a very inefficient and clumsy manner, to propel the boat,
with the aid of one of the board seats, by what boatmen
term sculling, when he perceived three figures come hastily
down, and disappearing behind a little cove, they presently
reappeared in a small boat, which began its rapid flight
across the stream towards the city. They came near
enough for him to see them. They were strangers. He
thought he could recognise the person who had taken the
rose from the bosom of Miss Elton. His brother was, then,
killed. He shouted to them to arrest their attention; but
the little boat held on its way, and was soon diminished to
a speck.
With great difficulty he neared the land, and, leaving the
boat to take care of itself, he leaped ashore and plunged
into the thickets and lanes, shouting his brother's name, and
looking to behold on every green sward, beneath every
flowery and odour-breathing hedge, his body extended and
weltering in its gore, or dragged along by some trembling,
blood-stained, and guilty-looking friend, to be huddled out
of sight, like something worthless and vile.
At last he left the search, with throbbing temples and
fevered veins. An early Hoboken ferry-boat was crossing
just in time for him, and he found himself at length once
more in town.
CHAPTER XV.
At
Mr. Lennox's all was yet despair and confusion. It
is needless to attempt to paint, what cannot be
comprehended
but by the unhappy sufferers, the horror, suspense, and
anguish of a family while waiting news of a duel, in which
some beloved son and brother is engaged. Lennox, although,
in the commencement, so obstinately determined to allow of
no interference if he could help it, had long since yielded to
his feelings,and had despatched several messengers in search
of news, and to prevent, if possible, the meeting. Mary was
unable to do anything but weep. Mrs. Elton, whose
loquacity
had been silenced by exhaustion, had gone home ill.
Mrs. Lennox and Fanny alone were calm. Both had the
support of a communion with their Maker, and in humble
prayer had found strength and resignation.
And now, in the broad morning, the whole city was
awake, and the roaring streets gave notice that the business
of the day had commenced. News of the result, whatever
it might be, could not be much longer delayed. Several
friends and neighbours came in to inquire and to console,
and knock after knock seemed to carry the trial of the poor
expectants to the highest supportable pitch. By-and-by
Mr. Earnest arrived, with a countenance highly expressive
of pleasure.
I come, said he, to bring good news. I have just
heard a report, from a person who came direct from the
City Hotel, that your son has met and killed his man.
Another knock. It was Mr. Elton. He was pale as
death.
You know then, said Mrs. Lennox, wildly.
Yes, yes, I heard it at the wharf.
God have mercy on us, said Mary.
God have mercy on him, said Mrs. Lennox, with ashy
cheeks and quivering lips. I could have borne anything
better.
He fell at the third fire, said Elton, and never breathed
again.
Who fell? said Earnest.
Frankpoor, poor Frank.
The wild shriek of utter horror which this intelligence
produced from Mrs. Lennox, and which showed how little
she knew the strength of her feelings, was scarcely attended
to in the general tumult of grief it occasioned. Mary threw
herself into the arms of her friend, and Mrs. Lennox upon
the bosom of her husband, as if for protection against the
awful scene which was to follow. The servants wept aloud
and wrung their hands. Cries of despair and half-uttered
prayers were heard.
He is gone! he's deadmy son! my son! said the
distracted mother, wildly.
But let us be cool in all cases, said Mr. Elton. If
this heavy grief have fallen on you, we must try to meet it
calmly; but we have yet only contradictory reports.
Here Harry entered, stained with dust, and sweat, and
water, and looking himself more like a corpse than a living
man.
Your news! asked Miss Elton, for the rest appeared
to have lost the power of speech.
Mother, you had better go up stairs, said Harry.
No, said Mr. Elton; if you have to tell the worst, tell
it: and may Almighty God strengthen your hearts to hear
it. Is your brother dead?
Don't answer, Harry, said Mr. Lennox, covering his
face with his hands. Give me a moment
At this instant there was another knock.
It is the body! half shrieked the servant-maid.
My wife, my poor wife! murmured Lennox, as she
sank, gasping, on his bosom.
Ah, Frank, my son! my son! said Mrs. Lennox.
My poor, dear brother! sobbed Mary.
A rapid, light step was heard on the stairs, a crowd of
servants rushed into the room with exclamations of Here
he is! Here he is! the door was flung forcibly open, and
Frank!
My son! My brother! Oh, God, I
thank thee! broke from every quivering lip; for Frankno
stiffening, marble, bloody body, no murdered, mute,
senseless
corpse, but Frank himself, the living, glowing,
triumphand
Frank, his cheeks like roses, his eyes beaming with
delight, in all the reality of youth, health, and, as it seemed
to them, most transcendent beautystood laughing before
them.
Mrs. Lennox was for a moment forgotten, but she was
engaged in fervent prayer.
Why, what's the matter with you all? said Frank, as
the rest pressed about him, embracing him, covering him
with caresses, kissing the very skirts of his coat, and almost
suffocating him with their joyful affection.
Frank, my boy, let me look at you. Get out of his
way! Come here, you noble-hearted hero. God bless
you, my son!
Why, anybody would think said Frank, in the most
careless manner, but the affectation of indifference was too
much for him. He burst into tears, and, as he clasped each
one in succession in a convulsive and
convulsively-rendered
embrace, as he pressed to his own the white and
trembling
lips, the cheeks from which terror had drained all the
blood, and grasped hands, he scarce knew whose, which
shook with the tumult of emotion, he could only, in broken
words, exclaim,
Thank God! I beg your pardon. I came as soon as
I could; but I was arrested on my way back by a rascally
police-officer, and I'm only this instant released. See, my
mother! and, after tearing himself away from their fond
arms, he knelt at the side of Mrs. Lennox, who, reaching
out her hands and laying them on his head, could only
murmur,
O God, I thank thee!
Welcome back, Frank, said Harry, after a moment's
pause, and with an effort struggling to preserve his
indifference
;
welcome back, my boy.
My dear Harry!
You are ill, said Miss Elton, her eyes swimming in
tears.
No, no, said Harry; I want only air. It will pass
in a moment.
Miss Elton, said Frank, he will never insult you
again.
Is my son, then, a murderer? demanded Mrs. Lennox,
shudderingly.
No, mother. But I did my best. I would have laid
him low enough if I could.
I hope you have at least winged the scoundrel? said
Lennox.
Oh no, sir; no scoundrel, but one of the noblest fellows
that ever breathed. I love him like a brother.
Frank forever! said Mary, smiling through her tears.
I shouldn't wonder if they become bosom friends.
Last night he did not know what he was about, said
Frank. He had just been supping and drinking.
Intoxicated! said Mrs. Lennox. A poor excuse for
a cowardly action.
No, he is no coward, said Frank, disentangling
himself
from the hands and arms which still grasped and were
wound around him, but a noble fellow. Five minutes
after he had dared to touch the rose in the dress of Miss
Elton, it was arranged we should cross immediately to
Hoboken
in two small boats, and meet at the earliest daylight.
I found Sussex by a lucky chance, who stood my friend
like a magnificent fellow. We fired, and missed, but I had
the pleasure of spoiling a very handsome new hat for him.
Glendenning had coolly discharged his pistol in the air.
Our friends here interfered, and said the affair had gone far
enough, particularly as Glendenning had wasted his shot.
While those gentlemen were disputing what sort of
apologies
ought to be made on either side, Glendenning stepped
forward, against all rule, and superior to all selfish
calculation
,
and said, `I require no apology. Lieutenant Lennox
has done nothing but what any one in his place would have
done; I have been exclusively in the wrong. I should
have apologized long ago, but that I could not do without a
meeting. Now, I trust,' he added, showing his hat with a
smile, `the reconciliation may take place. I therefore make
a full apology for an offence of which I am heartily
ashamed
.'
Vol. I.H
A noble fellow! said Lennox.
With that we shook hands; and then stepping to his
second, Captain White, he took from him
this rose
,
returned
it to me, and said he should be happy if the lady from
whom he had taken it in a moment of excitement could be
persuaded to pardon him. Tell her, said he, I throw
myself
on her magnanimity, as I do on that of your friends and
family! This rose, continued Frank, with something of a
proud air and pulling his whiskers forward a little, I
believe
belongs to
you
, Miss Elton!
Bravo! my boy! exclaimed Mr. Lennox.
Fanny accepted the rose with an enchanting grace, and
said: Frank, I can scarcely tell you how much I admire
your manly courage, how sincerely I feel that you would
never shrink where duty called, but you know, for we have
often spoken on the subject, that I cannot approve
Come! come! said Lennox. You are a little Puritan,
and I won't have any sermons on my boy. He has risked
his life for you, and if there is anything wrong in the
matter
,
it must be borne by the shoulders of society at large
(which are good broad ones, you know), not by any
individual
,
and, most of all, not by my Frank.
Breakfast ready, sar! said Simon, an old attached
black servant of the family, throwing open the doors, his
cheeks wet with tears.
Come on; take Miss Elton's hand. Lead her in,
exclaimed
Mr. Lennox. You have won the honour, and I
hope she will not refuse to bestow it. Herehallo! who
now? Mrs. Elton, recovered by the news, and Emmerson
again! Come along! we'll kill the fatted calf, for the
young prodigal has returned.
The well-ordered domestic arrangements of Mrs.
Lennox's
family moved, in their various operations, almost by
themselves, and an abundant and tempting breakfast had
risen up with the agreeable facility of Aladdin's palace. The
English books of travel have already informed the European
reader that, although the Americans are marvellously
good-for-nothing
creatures, with unfortunate institutions and a bad
government, they do know how to serve a good breakfast.
There were tea, coffee, and chocolate, hot rolls and Indian
cakes, toast, sausages, steaks, and broiled shad, with other
dainties to suit the demands and various tastes of the
somewhat
large company who sat down to enjoy them. To
crown the whole was the genuine spirit of hospitality, the
ever-delightful attendant at the table of Mrs. Lennox.
It would have made a good picture, the breakfast of this
family, on the present memorable morning. Joy had burst
upon them like the sunshine after a stormy night, and shed
upon all but a few hearts the sympathy of happiness. Mrs.
Elton had recovered her appetite, her health, and her
radiant
smiles, and was talking away for dear life's sake,
without any one having the least idea of what she was
saying
,
though each person to whom her pleasure-beaming
eyes were successively directed nodded understandingly,
with his mouth full, and said, to be sure! and certainly!
certainly! Fanny, relieved from the harrowing
apprehensions
of the night, had forgotten all her own annoyances.
Mr. Elton inclined to be a grave observer of the scene
which, however gay, had its origin in a principle shocking
to humanity and in violation of the laws of God and man,
was still unwilling to disturb the charm of the hour by
solemn
debates or animadversions which could have but little
chance of being listened to. Frank was in the seventh
heaven of triumph and hope. He had given to Miss Elton
a testimony that he was not quite a boy, a term for which
he began to have all the hatred of Coriolanus, and, besides,
he rejoiced in the
clat
with which he well knew the duel
must surround his name; for let moralists muse as they
may, the public opinion yet deals leniently with the offence,
and, under most circumstances, delights to honour the
offender
.
Harry was happy in the escape of his brother.
So far was his from being a selfish heart, that his own grief
was, for the time, merged in the happiness of once more
beholding Frank, not only alive and well, but covered with
glory, and in witnessing the vivid happiness of his
delighted
home. Perhaps no face showed more clearly the traces
of mental suffering, for he had been exhausted by the
emotions
and exertions of the past night; but he was even
contented
to be miserable himself while he saw others around
him, whom he loved, relieved from their misery. One
countenance alone had a strange, discontented look. It was
Emmerson's, whose naturally cold and selfish heart felt
little
real sympathy with either the anguish or the joy even of
his best friends. He seemed really to look a little darker
after Frank's return than before. Keenly and morbidly
alive to whatever related to himself, he regarded the affairs
of others with the calmness of a philosopher. Had Frank
been brought home a corpse, he would not have failed to
manifest, and perhaps to feel, all the decorous sentiments of
grief and horror, but it would not have broken his sleep, or
in any way impaired his enjoyments, and he would,
perhaps
,
have worn the dark face, which now struck like a
discord upon the general happiness, with something more
of an effort.
CHAPTER XVI.
Well
, my boy, said Lennox, as the appetite of all
began
to subside, this is better than a bullet through the
head.
What a frightful thing! said Mrs. Lennox. Only a
few mornings ago we were seated in this very room at
breakfast, counting on remaining here twenty years. A
few hours pass away, and yet what a change! But for the
mercy of God, Frank might have been either murdered, or
himself a murderer. Oh Frank! if Christianity is true, you
have this day committed a crime.
Pho! said his father, I doubt whether we can ascribe
every such event to Providence, or whether the Creator can
desire to know all that passes here.
Are not two sparrows sold for a farthing? said Mr.
Elton; and yet not one of these falls to the ground without
his will.
Ah, that's a figure of speech, sir, said Harry. One
is surely not expected to believe that so extremely accurate
an account is kept of such unimportant matters?
No, certainly not, said Lennox.
I don't see how it would be possible, said Harry;
and, if possible, I don't know what good it would do.
Even a father in this world, the most strongly interested in
the fate of his children, would not wish to keep an account
of the exact number of their hairs, or how many times they
breathed a day, and all that sort of thing. Imagine only a
big book in heaven, and an industrious angel, with a huge
quill behind his ear (at least it ought to be a steel pen),
putting
down, from age to age, to eternity, `
So many sparrows
in Jerusalem fell such a day,' `so many in Rome,' `so many
at New-York
.'
It is easier to ridicule holy subjects than to understand
them, said Mr. Elton, mildly.
But you cannot ridicule Shakspeare, or Newton, or
Euclid
so.
Supposing that to be the case, said Elton: do you
thence draw the inference that the Scriptures are untrue?
Oh no! Only that they are too strictly interpreted.
But you appear to consider the persons you have named
as rivals, and, apparently, successful ones, of our Saviour.
Harry felt it impossible to conceal the thoughts and
opinions
which had been lately stirring in his bosom. His
decisive
character loved to take a course at once, and to do
whatever he meant to do immediately and openly. The
whole table listened to the conversation.
You would not pardon meyou would consider me
guilty of a heinous crimeif I said yes, replied he.
Upon my word I should not, said Mr. Elton, with
sincerity
.
On the contrary, I think the scheme of
Christianity
must be doubtful to many who have not carefully
examined
it, which I perceive you have not done, and I like to
see a man
honest
in expressing his opinions on proper
occasions
;
only
have
opinions one way or the other. There
is hope for all but those who pass the subject over as not
worthy of attention. I have been a doubter, and some of
my friends, now very firm Christians, have totally
disbelieved
in all revelation.
Then, said Harry, without being flippant, or
meaning
to wound the feeling of persons who think differently, I
confess I believe all religions only indirectly revealed from
the Creator.
That is, not revealed at all, said Mr. Elton.
My son! my son! exclaimed Mrs. Lennox.
The claims of Christianity upon the credulity of a man
of sense are not, at least, without serious objections,
replied
Harry. It has been two thousand years in the
world, and it has not at all effected its purpose. Men are
no better, and some of the wisest and best don't believe it.
Of the billion inhabitants of the globe, not one fifth even
profess it. Of that small proportion, a very great one, and
among them men like Gibbon, Voltaire, Hume, and Byron,
reject it. Incredible things can't be credited by thinking
H 2
men. I don't believe Joshua made the sun stand still.
You see modern astronomy has thrown a new complexion
upon that story. I don't believe in the miracles of Moses
and Aaron, and the Egyptian magicians. I don't believe in
My son, said Mrs. Lennox, with an air of alarm and
grief, if you do not wish me to leave the table, have the
goodness to go no farther.
Why, I am only a rationalist. All I ask is, that
Christianity
be made intelligible, and that men be not called upon
to believe impossible things, or to be governed by
impracticable
precepts.
Let me give you, my young friend, one piece of advice,
said Elton. I do not mean to discuss the truth of
Christianity
in so light a way as this. I am a very poor debater,
nor have I much faith in debates. Belief will come to you
at the proper time, or it will never come. But I recommend
you not to lay aside frankness in your remarks and
meditations
on this subject. Rationalism, if I understand it, is
infidelity under a milder name. Christianity is either true
or not true. All ingenious theories of explanation are
unworthy
men of sense and piety. Whoever pays the least
attention to the Bible, will see that there can be no
half-way
point
between faith and skepticism. God revealed himself
in the Messiah. Christ was born of a virgin. He
performed
miracles, and rose from the dead, or he
did not;
one of
the two you must believe. You have chosen the latter
creed. Take it! hug it! carry it through the world with
you. Test its strength and truth, and see if you can go
through life with it.
Many wiser and greater than I have done so, said
Harry.
You cannot know what goes on in the bosom of another.
Have you ever examined
all
the arguments in favour of
Christianity?
Have you ever examined all the arguments against it?
Mr. Elton was silent, and Harry felt as if he had the best
of the debate.
Come, come, said his father, you are on too grave
subjects. In these matters, I have always left my children
to themselves. I don't think the topic a proper one for the
breakfast-table. In Frank's course this morning he has his
own approbation and mine. He will also have that of the
world.
A young boy in rather a country dress here entered
respectfully
and somewhat awakwardly. He held a newspaper
in his hand.
What do you want, sir? said Lennox.
I wish to ask you, said the boy, apparently
embarrassed
,
on finding himself speaking before so large an
assembly
,
if the declaration is to be filed in the case of Green
versus Thomson?
A fig for the declaration in the case of Green versus
Thomson, said Mr. Lennox.
My dear father, said Mary, remonstratingly.
Do you know what has taken place this morning, sir?
The boy, who had a good, intelligent face, but who
appeared
very bashful, looked extremely grave, then suddenly
smiled, and immediately looked grave again. This curious
habit, which had often occasioned the remarks of the family,
now set every one laughing.
Yes, sir, with a still deeper blush, which overspread
his whole face with crimson, but, at the same time, with a
look of pleasure, for he well knew Mr. Lennox's roughness
was but the eccentricity of a kind heart; and I thought
maybe you'd like to see the paper?
What! the declaration in the case of Green versus
Thomson?
The boy looked graver than ever, gave a short laugh,
and then put on the immovable seriousness of a judge
again.
No, sir, the newspaper.
Why so, sir?
To show you this here.
And what the devil is `this here?'
Indulging again in one of his transitory gleams of mirth,
Seth stepped up and handed the paper.
Well, upon my word, said Lennox, this is something
like.
Affair of Honour
.We stop the press to announce
that a meeting took place this morning at daybreak
between
Lieutenant Francis Lennox, son of the distinguished
lawyer of this city, and Captain Charles Glendenning, of
his majesty's, at the duelling ground, Hoboken
And do you, sir, said Mr. Lennox, suddenly stopping,
and putting on a magisterial air, with such a newspaper
in your hand, and the knowledge of such an event in your
pericraniumdo you dare to come to me, in the bosom of
my family, with the son that is thus saved setting
miraculously
at my very side, and talk to me about a paltry
declaration
in the case of
Green versus Thomson?
My dear father, you are so wild. The poor boy is half
frightened to death, said Mary.
But Seth only suffered to escape him one of his
overflowing
laughs, and then looked his master seriously in the eyes,
with very much the expression, however, as if he intended
to laugh again presently.
Come here, sir.
The boy obeyed. He was a plain-looking lad of sixteen,
badly dressed, without much expression in his face except
when he smiled. His complexion was good, his eyes
intelligent
,
and his manners indicative of a high degree of
anxiety what to do with his feet and in what part of the
world to stow away his hands.
You are a young villain, sir! Go round to Edgecomb
and Radley, No. 12 Maiden Lane, immediately, and get
yourself measured for a gentleman's suit of clothes, to be
charged to my account. Go out and find, moreover, a hat,
two pairs of boots, a dozen pairs of stockings, and a dozen
ready-made, respectable, dandified, linen shirts, with very
high collars. Add a pair of gloves, and, if you like, a cane,
and have the bills sent to me. Do you hear, you little
scaramouch?
The laugh of poor Seth was now heartily joined in by
all present.
And when you have got them, Seth, said Mary, come
to me, I want to speak to you.
Now trampmarchvanish into thin air.
The boy obeyed the spirit, though not the letter of this
mandate, and Mr. Lennox went on to read,
Affair of Honour
.We stop the press to announce that
a meeting took place this morning at daybreak between
Lieutenant
Francis Lennox, son of the distinguished lawyer of
this city, and Captain Charles Glendenning, of his majesty's
, at the duelling ground, Hoboken. The dispute arose
at the theatre, Captain Glendenning having offered a
rudeness
to a lady in the presence of Lieutenant Lennox, which
the latter punished by a
blow
. The parties repaired almost
instantly to the ground, and, after one fire, which, on the
part of Captain Glendenning, was discharged in the air, the
matter was terminated amicably by the mediation of the
seconds
.
The most ample apologies were offered by Captain
Glendenning, and the gallant gentlemen parted on the best
terms, and with mutual protestations of friendship. Captain
White, of the British army, acted as the friend of his
countryman
in this rather
peculiar
affair, and Mr. Sussex, of this
city, for Lieutenant Lennox. Nothing could exceed the
coolness
and courage manifested on the occasion by both the
gentlemen
;
and a ball, it is said, took effect in the hat of Captain
Glendenning, who received the awkward indication of skill
with immovable composure.
We must be permitted to remark, however, that, if we
have heard the matter correctly represented, it has been
reserved
for our chivalric townsman to teach to his opponent
a
valuable lesson
, which, we trust, will not be wholly thrown
away upon him, or upon the country to which he belongs.
Impertinent English travellers may write slanderous books
with impunity, but there
are
insults which can never fail to
meet their
just reward!!
Expressive
italics!
and a note of admiration! said
Lennox. Ho! ho! ho!ha! ha! ha! Frank, you'll be
a bit of a lion for six weeks to come.
I am very sorry for it, said Mrs. Lennox.
We have not attempted to give all the conversation which
took place, as, in the general agitation, three or four were
nearly always speaking at the same time, and as for Mrs.
Elton, she did not stop at all. At length, however, they
separated. Some went to bed. The visiters returned home
to spread through the town all the particulars of the
interesting
affair. Emmerson, having heartily shaken every one
by the hand, and reiterated his inexpressible joy at the
termination
of a calamity which had such a threatening
commencement
,
went down stairs into the office to his business
duties. Mr. Elton shook his head, in the pursuance of his
own grave thoughts. Harry and Frank retired together to
talk the matter over, and Mrs. Elton, who had been relating
a story to Mrs. Lennox, Mary, and Fanny, of a shipwreck,
of which she had read an account some time in her early
youth, where the poor sailors were obliged to remain out
seven days and nights in an open boat without food, was
obliged to break off just as the unfortunate people had
discovered
a sail in the horizon; but she treated her husband
and Fanny to the
denouement
on her way home.
And so the fierce hurricane, so sudden, unexpected, and
terrible, subsided into calm sunshine, and the mourned as
dead was restored. The awful night became but a thing
to be remembered and talked of over the winter fire, and all
breathed again in peace.
CHAPTER XVII.
A FEW days subsequent to this affair, Mr. Lennox gave a
dinner to a few friends. Although he humbly confessed
himself no Crsus, it may be asserted that the Lydian
king, whatever armies he might have raised, or splendid
gifts he might have presented, could not have inhabited a
more comfortable house, or given a better dinnerat least
according to the tastes of modern palates. His light and
generous heart, and unambitious character, cared little for
the world, save as it ministered to his pleasure, or gratified
his love of hospitable pomp and splendour. His home was
one of those sunshiny retreats which few are so fortunate
as to possess. Blessed, by a large inheritance and the
income
of his lucrative profession, with affluence without the
necessity of economy, he enjoyed the delights of
extravagance
unaccompanied by any of its usual cares or
apprehensions
;
for, while nothing can be less like happiness
than expensive pleasures to a man who suffers the
haunting
consciousness of living beyond his income, and of
revelling
,
in advance, on the portion of his widow and orphans,
to a person of Mr. Lennox's lively disposition there was a
hearty delight, long become habitual to him, in the generous
profuseness which prudence itself could not censure.
His home was therefore the scene of all kinds of
agreeable
pleasures, and his children were educated fully to
appreciate
them. A beautiful country-seat on the Hudson,
about sixty miles from the city, was the usual summer
retreat
of his family, when not engaged in excursions to some
of the numerous and interesting points of interest in which
the neighbourhood of New-York is so singularly rich, and
in the winter, music, dancing, the opera, the theatre, balls
and dinners, made them see even the glad, bright months
of summer roll away without regret.
From his youth Mr. Lennox had been favoured by
fortune
(as he expressed it) with an unbroken course of
prosperity
,
and an almost total exemption from the misfortunes
which so generally afflict others. Health smiled upon him
and upon his. No death had even interrupted the
affectionate
happiness of his family. His children were growing
up all that his efforts had striven to make them. He was
beloved and honoured by his friends, and had no enemies
but such as envy and malice, and his independent course
on all occasions where duty called him to act, had made
him, and at these he could afford to snap his fingers. His
life had resembled some of those fabled climates where
wind, rain, cold, and clouds never disturb the softness of the
air or stain the serenity of the sky.
How far such a long career of unshadowed prosperity is
favourable to the development of virtue, the formation of
superior
character, or the knowledge of real happiness, the
moralist may determine, but it had certainly not, thus far,
apparently diminished the excellence or the cheerfulness
of the Lennoxes. All acknowledged the warm virtues of
their hearts and the charm of their manners. They were
generous without pride, and affable without condescension.
There are not here, as in most other countries, a class of
poor who live avowedly on the bounty of the opulent, and
hold, from the magnificent charity of the rich, what, but
for the perhaps unavoidable errors of government and
society
,
they would owe only to their justice. But whenever
misfortune did come in contact with any of the Lennoxes,
it was sure of unaffected sympathy, and, if possible,
effectual
relief; and while his family were silently and
benevolently
accustomed, with the discrimination which marks
true charity, to relieve the distresses of the poor, many a
helpless client, without money, perhaps, to defend himself
against oppression, or to meet the accidental demands of
the law, had found in Lennox a bold advocate, a fearless
defender, and a generous friend. Many an innocent
accused
had seen himself saved from punishment by the
out-speaking
eloquence which asked no pay but its own
pleasure
in the act, and many a poor debtor, clutched by the
hand of some malignant creditor, and consigned to a
dungeon
in the midst of the gay, enlightened city of New-York,
which would have been more in harmony with the dark
council-chamber of Venice (for even such was once, and
not long ago, our laws), found not only present ease, but
subsequent success in life.
Under these bright auspices, the two brothers had grown
up as boys, and were about entering into life as men.
Frank, as we have seen, was already a distinguished
graduate
from West Point, and Harry had been admitted to the
bar, and become a partner in the lucrative office of his
father
,
with the intention, on the part of the latter, that he
should, as speedily as possible, take the whole
responsibility
of it on himself, with Mr. Emmerson as his assistant,
and, if things went well subsequently, as his partner. But
Harry's triumph at overstepping, at length, the obscure
retreats
of boyhood, however mingled with grand visions of
the future, with noble resolutions and an innate love of the
right, was crossed, as we have seen, with some influences
of an opposite nature. He loved virtue and hated vice, but
he had no distinct knowledge of the nature and requisites
of the one, nor the dangers, illusions, and insidious
character
of the other. The peaceful and splendid advantages in
the midst of which he had passed his life thus far, the
succession
of pleasures which he had enjoyed, his father's
wealth, his own attainments, which were remarkable, his
talents equally so, his very virtues, and, perhaps, the not
unthought-of advantages of his person, filled him with
self-confidence
,
and gave his reflections a leaning towards
infidelity
,
caught from the superficial view which youth takes
of life and nature, and confirmed by the study of Byron,
Gibbon, and similar authors of fascinating genius and
profound
attainments, who appear at the bar of history as the
representatives of irreligion and the bold scorners of the
Bible. Thus, his note-books scribbled over with
memoranda
of Voltaire and Volney, and his memory stored with
splendid passages from Cain and Childe Harold (while he
never read the lofty, noble, spiritual, and unanswerable
arguments
on the other side of the question), young Lennox was
about to launch forth on that mysterious sea, whose
glittering
,
treacherous bosom has ingulfed so many a tall ship.
Destitute of any belief in the future, of any reverence for,
or confidence in God, of any knowledge of his own soul,
more than as the vapoury tenant of a perishing form, his
hopes, wishes, and plans were all confined within this life's
bounds; bounds which, to youth, seem vast and endless,
but which, in a few fleet years, contract to a startling span
and vanish like a morning dream.
Mr. Lennox had educated his children with the utmost
care and expense in all the graceful accomplishments, as
well as the necessary branches of learning. They were
excellent musicians, and sweet glees, sweetly sung, were
among the attractions of their frequent soires. In all the
essentials of worldly honour they had been carefully
instructed
,
and perhaps no one could be more open to the
noble influences of virtue, more incapable of anything paltry
or mean. In short, all things but
one
had been done for
them. Like thousands in all parts of Christendom, their
lives had flowed quietly on, in peaceful satisfaction with the
things around them, happy and communicating happiness,
loving and beloved, contented with the practice of virtue and
a horror of vice, living in this world, with it, and
for
it,
without a thought beyond. And thus had fled (to Mrs.
Lennox
,
how short and dreamlike did they appear!) the
twenty-one
bright, unclouded years since the birth of her eldest son.
On the evening previous to the dinner to which we have
alluded, the family had taken tea, Miss Elton was passing
the evening with Mary, and Mr. Lennox was in one of his
silent moods, enjoying a cigar by the open window, when
Frank, who had several times opened his mouth and shut it
again without saying anything, at length delivered what he
appeared to have been labouring with.
I have a favour to ask of you all, said he, and,
moreover
,
I give you notice beforehand that it is full of poise
and danger, and fearful to be granted.
I don't think there can be any necessity for such a very
formal preface, said his mother.
Don't be too sure! said Frank, laughing.
I cannot be too sure of that, replied she, my dear,
wicked boy!
Now let us see, said Frank, how much ladies really
mean of what they say. So you positively promise to grant
my request before you know what it is?
Yes, I do.
And father?
Yes.
Upon my word I'm afraid to name it.
Why, what is it? said his father. You would not
ask, I am sure, anything which ought to be refused.
I suppose, said Mary, you want to go abroad, and
father is to give his permission, get you leave of absence,
Vol. I.I.
and allow you a couple of thousand dollars a year, or so,
till you see the world and fight some more duels.
Would you grant that? asked Frank.
I don't know. Noyes, said his father.
But said Mrs. Lennox.
I know, said Frank, the dangers I should have to
encountershipwreck, fire, water, lightning, plague,
pestilence
,
and famine. I know exactly what you are going to
say, my dear mother. Then I should probably die several
times during my long absence, or
you
would all die before
my return; and I should be robbed in Spain, and murdered
in Syria, corrupted in Paris, and killed in several duels, as
Mary says, and all that!
Nonsense, said Mr. Lennox. If you wish to go
abroad, you can go by the next packet, or as soon as I can
arrange with the War Department for your leave of
absence
.
I think it a capital idea.
My dear boy, said his mother, her eyes filling with
tears, two, three, four years, at my time of life! I should
never see you againI have a presentiment.
Of course you have, said Frank, laughing; of course
you wouldn't. Who ever
did
come back safe from a tour
in Europe? The idea is absurd on the face of it, of course!
Ah, yes, you can laugh! it's a fine thing to be young
and thoughtless, to be sure, said Mrs. Lennox. And how
would you gowithout any companion, too?
I suppose you're like Miss Elton, and think I ought to
have my mamma with me all my life, to keep me from
being
run over, from taking cold, &c., &c., &c.
Ha, ha, ha! said Mr. Lennox.
Well, come! I won't go abroad at present, said
Frank, taking his mother's hand, and pressing it tenderly to
his lips. I'll compromise with you for another favoura
very trifling one, which will be begun and ended in a day.
Do you agree to that? Come!
Yes.
Now, then, let us see this time what success!
Do, for Heaven's sake, let's know what it is? said
Mary.
Old age makes him garrulous, remarked Miss Elton.
We have a dinner to-morrow.
Well?
I wish to add two particular friends to the party.
Why, of coursecertainly. What a ridiculous request!
As if the dinner were not for you! said Mary.
Pray, what objection do you see to your asking whom
you please to my house? demanded Mr. Lennox. Who
are your friends? John shall go for them immediately.
The first isCaptain White, said Frank, making a
face aside to Mary, as of a man who touches a match and
stands expecting an explosion.
What! the second of Captain Glendenning?
Yes, my dear mother.
You're mad, Frank, said his mother, or else you're
jesting!
Really, sir, said his father, it seems to me you
choose your associates in rather an eccentric manner.
Oh, very well, said Frank. It would have gratified
me very much, that's all.
Well, well, said Mrs. Lennox; we have already
granted it: we cannot retract; though I must say, you
often really surprise me, Frank. Captain White is the
friend and boon-companion of that Glendenning. Men who
frequent profligate society must expect to be thought
themselves
profligates. Glendenning has insulted you and all
of us in the grossest manner; and I must say I do not
think the companion of such a person a proper associate
either for yourself or your family. Fanny, too, and her
mother and father, also, dine with us to-morrow, andI
really think you had better withdraw your request. I should
like to know what you will propose next, you unreasonable
creature you!
Why, as to what I could propose
next
, said Frank,
with a frown upon his brow, softened, however, by the
half-suppressed
smile which lurked around his lips, there is
only one thing which I
could
propose next consistently
under the circumstances.
And what the devil's that? demanded his father,
somewhat
sternly.
Why, said Frank, coolly, to bring
Glendenning
himself
!
You're trifling with your mother.
No; I assure you I never was more serious in my life.
That is the request you have granted in advance, and I
think, if you'll hear me speak a moment, I'll persuade you
convince you that I am quite right.
Well, Frank, said Mrs. Lennox, with obviously
serious
displeasure, if you bring Captain Glendenning here
to-morrow, I have nothing more to say, but
I
shall dine in
my room.
You do injustice to Glendenning, said Frank, warmly.
I have several times met him since our affair, and he has
rendered me all the satisfaction that a gentleman could
render
or a gentleman require. This offence was an act of
delirium
,
committed in a moment of intoxication, for which he
nearly atoned with his life. I can't forget, nor should you,
that he magnanimously refrained from killing me, even
while the blow I had given him was yet burning on his
forehead
.
Is that nothing? It was done, too, at the moment
when I was striving my utmost to kill him. I have always
been taught that it is the Christian's duty to forgive and
forget. On a nearer acquaintance with him, I find him a
noble, capital fellow, and I have reason to know that the
stories that fellow Earnest told me of him are gross
exaggerations
.
There is something really delightful, fascinating
about him. Free-hearted, generous, brave, totally without
malice, full of wit, fun, and intelligencethe most
agreeable
companion you ever saw. Plays sweetly on the piano,
sings an excellent song; and, as our affair is settled, I see
no reason, since
I
like him very much, why I should not
show him the hospitalities which a stranger ought to meet
with. Do, now, my dear mother, do oblige me.
Well! said Mr. Lennox, I'm sure I've no objection.
There is some truth in what Frank says. The fact that
they fought yesterday is no reason why they should not
embrace to-day. Come, wife, let's have him!
You are as bad as Frank himself, said Mrs. Lennox.
Here comes an Englishman to New-York, goes about day
and night seeking quarrels and raising riotssometimes, for
what we know
always
, in a state of intoxicationa duellist
in short, a professed
rou
. He insults a modest young girl
under our protection in a coarse and ungentlemanly way,
and, instead of meeting such a character and such conduct
as they deserve, and avoiding such an example for our own
sons, you propose to bring him into your family, because
Frank, whose liking is a mere caprice, finds that he sings a
good song and plays on the piano. I should like to see my
sons select their associates for their moral and intellectual
qualities. For my part, I cannot consent to anything of
this sort.
Keep cool! keep cool, Katy, my dear! said Mr.
Lennox
;
be assured Frank will not do anything contrary to
your wishes. A dinner, you know, Frank, my boy, in
order
to be agreeable, must contain no discordant materials.
As the Eltons are to be here, it seems to meand as your
mother is so serious in her views of your new friend, and,
thereforeheh! my son? let the matter rest. Yet, at the
same time, Kate, let me make a remark. As to the offence
which caused the meeting between these two madcaps, that
has been fairly and honourably settled. That subject ought
to be now dropped. As for Glendenning's wildness, many
a sober, correct youth turns out a paltry, selfish, sneaking
scoundrel in the end, and I believe there's just as much to
censure and to despise among irreproachable men, who
stand fair before the world, as among the frank and careless
fellows who take no pains to conceal their faults and follies.
Many a young rip, like this Glendenning, is all the better
for his wildness, in his after years. I myselfwhat are
you laughing at, miss? How dare you laugh when I'm
talking?
At the curious illustration of your last proposition, my
dear father. You are not going to cite yourself as an
example
,
I hope?
Yes, I am. I was as hot-headed, wild, and impudent a
young rascal as ever breathed. Yet look at me
now!
Young
men will be young men, and we must take care to distinguish
between the mere outbreaks of a merry soul like Harry the
Fifth and inherent vice. Now I've been told that this
Glendenning
is a noble fellow, and that his tricks are mere
wildness
and high spirits. The only way for a man is to go
into the world, and take it as it is. He didn't make it, and
can't reform it. If people treat him well, goodbe civil to
them. If a man is rude, call him out, kill him, and you'll
not be insulted again.
You make my blood run cold, Henry, said Mrs.
Lennox
,
to hear, from a father's lips, such wicked principles
to his son.
Bah! what do women know of these things? Frank
never did anything in his life which does him more honour
than going out with that fellow. Men, and women too, love
unflinching courage. I have no doubt this circumstance
will open to him a brilliant career in life. In the next
place, it has made him formidable to the scoundrels by
I 2
whom one is surrounded in all ranks and classes of life,
and who go on, some slandering and imposing upon you,
some bullying you just as far as you'll let them, and no
farther
.
Why, Frank himself, ever since the meeting, has
looked, walked, acted, thought, and felt more like a man
and a gentleman that I ever saw him before.
But not like a Christian, said Mrs. Lennox.
That means nothing, said Mr. Lennox.
You know what pain you cause me, my dear husband,
by expressing yourself in this way at all, and particularly
before our children. Oh, Henry, you have a fearful thing
to answer for. Mary is without religion, and Frank and
Harry turn it into ridicule.
Pooh! pooh! They are not monks, that's all. They're
well enough. They believe all they can.
As for Captain Glendenning, continued Mrs. Lennox,
gravely, I detest and abhor the character and the man. I
do not believe, with all my desire to oblige Frank, I
could
receive such a person in my house with ordinary courtesy.
Oh, very well! said Frank, haughtily.
You'll allow your mother to judge, I hope, what
companions
are proper for herself and her daughter, if you don't
deign to let her choose yours, said Mr. Lennox, a little
sharply.
Frank had a face which betrayed every emotion of his
soul, a large, full eye, generally very sweet in its
expression
,
and a mouth around which played a smile almost
invariably
when he spoke, but, in the silence which followed
the last remark, every trace of his gentleness had
disappeared
.
His brow darkened, the sternness of his
countenance
was heightened by a streak of red, which shot
burning
into his cheek, and his eyes fell upon his mother with
an expression which she, at least, had never seen in them
before. There
was
something new and different in his
demeanour
since the late duel. The first hot days of summer
scarcely work greater changes in the tender vegetation than
had taken place in this boy within the last few weeks
through the influence of passion and action. Love,
vengeance
,
danger, pride, had been busy in his nature; and if
strength and manly self-dependance had been added,
sweetness
,
modest humility, and the lowly spirit of true wisdom
had been proportionably withdrawn.
Come! said Mrs. Lennox, recovering herself, and
holding
out her hand, for she, too, had been touched with a
moment
of passion (perhaps a peculiarity in the family
disposition
),
leave the subject, my dear Frank, and don't be
ashamed to yield to your
mother
.
Oh, certainly! said Frank, almost rudely pushing
back the proffered hand, if I cannot be gratified in the
simple wish to invite a friend to my father's house, I shall
not press it. I can tell Captain Glendenning thatthat
indeed, I shall tell him nothing, but let him take it as he
likes.
Why, what necessity is there to speak to Captain
Glendenning
about it at all? said Mr. Lennox.
To this no one replied.
Only
this
I have learned, continued Frank, after a
pause, rising as if about to leave the room; I have learned
what respect to attach to the professions of ladies, and I
shall not ask another favour, I can tell you. I did not
expect
to be treated like a boy all my life.
Stop, sir! said his father.
There was something in Mr. Lennox's voice and frown,
to which, despite his careless lightness of character, every
one in the family had long been accustomed to yield
implicit
obedience. His son now, with ill-concealed anger,
but without hesitation, remained at his call.
What do you mean by that? In becoming a man, if
you
are
one, have you ceased to be a gentleman and a son?
Whatever may be your feelings or opinions, you will be
pleased to govern them in my presence, and remember, in
this debate, your opponent is your
mother
.
Very well, very well! replied Frank; that is a point
she is not likely to suffer me to overlook, as she proposes,
I perceive, to keep me to her apron-strings. I beg to yield
the thing. I withdraw my request.
Her
apron-strings
, sir! said Mr. Lennox, rising.
Upon my word, your expressions are as elegant as your
conduct is sensible. I am surprised at your forgetfulness
of the respect you owe her. Even if she were wrong, you
should instantly yield; but, upon reflection, it is my
opinion
she's right; and, therefore, if the wishes of so
insignificant
a person as your father have any influence with your
Royal Highness, you will, perhaps, condescend to dismiss
that thunder-cloud from your brow, and deign to remember
who and where you are.
A month ago Frank would have burst into tears at such
an address from one whom he loved with the deepest
sincerity
and tenderness. But he had now new views. How
can the duellist, who has triumphantly outraged society,
humanity, and God, preserve his respect for minor things?
How can he, who is taught recklessly to present his bosom
to the murderous weapon, without adequate motive or
regard
for consequences, hesitate to meet and to despise, in
the moment of proud passion, the tears of a mother or the
frowning reprobation of a father. He only replied,
therefore
,
without at all softening his lofty manner,
I obey you, sir. I perfectly agree with you. I should
be the last person in the world to lay myself under
obligations
to any one. I will write Glendenning a note this
moment. I will tell him that circumstances prevent my
renewing our acquaintance as I wished, till, at least, I have
a house of my own, whencertainlyI presume I shall
be at liberty toto
Heydey, sir! hoity-toity, hoity-toity! what's all this?
said his father. How dare you, you young dog! address
your mother or me in such a style as that? Why, I should
think you the Great Mogul, or the Sublime Porte, or a
pacha with two or three dozen tails at least!
Sir, this
jesting
is said Frank, with flashing eyes,
as if about to say something which might have made
matters
more serious, when an arm gently stole around his
waist and drew him affectionately to the sofa, and a voice
completed the daring sentence with,
Is
your father's
, Frank!
It was Mrs. Lennox, who had affectionately interfered,
her eyes full of tears, to prevent the conversation going
too far.
I beg said he.
My son, my son! interrupted she, placing her fingers
on his brow, and putting away from his flashing eyes the
thick, dark hair, what wild, bad passions have taken
possession
of you? Is this my sweet, gentle boy, his mother's
pride, his father's hope? Is this your new manhood?
Frank raised his hand suddenly to his eyes and hid his
face. Enough was visible of it, however, to show that he
was touched with softer feelings.
Yes, my son, continued she, it is. You have left
already youth and innocence. Dark, fierce passions and
bloody thoughts have taken possession of my boy;
world-worship
,
heathen pride, and the evil spirit himself,
unchecked
by one idea of your Bibleyour Saviouryour God.
Forgive me, my mother! said the young man, turning
away his face, which he still covered with one hand, while
with the other he grasped hers. I am a fool.
And see to what it leads. You don't know to what it
may lead hereafter. I cannot bear to see you enter the
state of manhood with such principles as you and Harry
possess. It will lead to something dreadful. So young,
and already so high and haughty, giving way to passion on
every occasion and against everybody; fearless of death
yourself, because you don't know what it is, and reckless
of shedding the life-blood of others, or of breaking hearts
that depend on you for their happiness; without prayer,
religion
,
or any fixed belief in God or a hereafter, and
frowning
on your own mother with a fierceness which actually
made me tremble. And how many times have I carried
you in these arms, and kissed your little soft mouth, and
watched by you the whole night through, and prayed to
God over your sleep, that your future course might be pure
and holy, and in the path of right and righteousness.
Little
did I think, when I used to press those laughing eyes
to my lips, that they could ever dart upon me such a look.
There was a pause.
Frank, you too are an infidel!
I do not wish to be, my dear mother.
But
are
you not?
I cannot control my opinion. I can only believe what
I can believe, said Frank, a little impatiently. I am
young. Perhaps hereafterbut nowI cannot be master
of my opinions.
But you can of your actions, and your opinions, I trust,
will change more slowly. You know my opinions on
duelling
.
Your death in a duel would break my heart, I
solemnly believe, and bring me to a premature grave.
Were you so unfortunate and guilty as to
kill another
, I
should find the blow still more intolerable. I am your
mother; my health, happiness, and life are interested. I
have a right to speak, and a right to be listened to. Hear
me, therefore. Bring your new friend Glendenning to
dinner
to-morrow. I accord the request, and was, perhaps,
wrong to refuse it. I grant it unconditionally, and I will
so far overcome, or at least command, my own feelings, as
to treat him as you would wish a friend of yours to be
treated
.
But I am going to make a request. You have now
established your character beyond cavil as a brave man.
Now then, my son, I make you a solemn prayer
I
, your
mother: as a test of your affection, a mark of your
gratitude
,
and a recompense to me for all a mothers' pain and a
mother's care, give me your
word
you will
never
, under any
circumstances, fight another duel.
What, even if
Even if
anything
, said she. It is, perhaps, a sacrifice
I ask; but it is your mother who asks itI implore. It is,
perhaps, her own life which a mother begs of her son, and
he hesitates.
My mother, said Frank, greatly affected, but smiling
through his tears, you make me feel like another
Coriolanus
.
Do not be, then, less human than he.
Well, you have succeeded. I do here, in the most
solemn manner
Hallo! said Mr. Lennox, who had stood very quietly
regarding this scene, sometimes himself affected, sometimes
shaking his head doubtingly, and who had just lighted a
new cigar, and was blowing out a long wreath of smoke as
he spokeHallo! Stop, my boy. What
is
all this, Katy,
my dear? Don't take advantage of his innoncence and
affection
for you to extort a promise, the nature of which you
do not understand, and which he will possibly hereafter
have many reasons to regret, perhaps some to violate. I
never knew any good yet come of
virtuous resolutions
. If
a man ain't good without them, he won't be with; and to
the sin, whatever it may be, which he commits, they only
add perjury, and a double sense of meanness and guilt.
How often have I sworn I would not smoke, and yet, here
I am, you see! What drawback do you suppose such a
resolution
would be to him if he received any galling, sudden,
scorching insult? By Jove! in such cases, men don't
think of resolutions. I don't wish him, or any son of mine,
to entangle himself with resolutions, and promises, and
oaths, on
any
subject. Then, as to duelling, I
approve
it.
I
wish
him to fight. I'll load his pistols for him, and go out
with
him, rather than he should show the white feather.
Society is what it is, and God made it as it is. The
Christian
doctrine of forgiveness of enemies is nonsense. A man
smites you on one cheek, you are to turn the other. He
takes your coat, you are to give him your cloak also. What
would society become under such circumstances? A wild
Indian breaks into your home and murders your wife; you
stand quietly by, when a manly defence might save her, and,
when she is finished, you politely show him the way to the
cradle of your infant child. Captain Glendenning offers an
insult to Miss Elton, and Frank stands aside, with a meek
smile, and points the drunken scoundrel to Mary and
you.
Oh, my husband, this is not the right interpretation of
the word of Christ.
Well, if we can interpret these things differently, good.
You interpret them your waywe, ours. You fancy
yourself
bound to make no distinction between friend and foe,
and when you see a servant stealing your diamonds, hand
her, if you choose, the key to your plate. We will forgive
our enemies also; but, by Jove! we'll teach them to behave
themselves first. But, by-the-way, my dear Kate, it seems
to me you and Frank are changing ground here. It is
Frank who
forgives
Glendenning, and
you
refuse pardon!
There was so much truth in this that it occasioned a
general laugh, in which the differences in this happy and
affectionate family generally ended.
Well, I'll tell you what, said Frank, I have not been
exactly honest with you, and that's one reason, perhaps,
why I have been more hurt by mother's refusal than she
thinks I ought to have been. To say the truth, I
have
already
asked Glendenning. I have committed myself thus
too far to retreat; otherwise, although I do think the
fellow
very agreeable and clever, I should have never put the
mere whim of having him here in comparison with your
displeasure or annoyance.
There! that's your father's own son! said Mrs.
Lennox
.
Go and do a thing first, and then ask permission.
But Miss Elton, said Mr. Lennox; don't you think
she has some right to be consulted?
Oh, I am sure, sir, said Miss Elton, who had
hitherto
been so distressed at the altercation in the family, that
she was pleased in almost any way to behold its amicable
termination, I could have no right, no wish to form an
opinion.
There's an angel for you, you young dog! said his
father
,
who little dreamed how far matters had gone between
them. Frank blushed, but Fanny remained undisturbed by
the observation.
Of course, I ought not to have invited him without
announcing
it to Miss Elton and begging her consent, but I
was so sure
Oh, let us have him, said Mary; perhaps it will be
of service to the poor fellow to see what a family he was
about depriving of its pride and ornament.
Frank bowed at the compliment.
Well done! Molly! said her father. You are more
forgiving than more pious folks!
I must not take too much credit, said Mary, or I
should be dishonest. The truth is, I am dying of curiosity
to see this young gentleman. Frank says he's agreeable,
clever, and handsome. Mr. Emmerson says he's vulgar,
coarse, and ugly. Mr. Earnest told me he was the greatest
genius that ever lived, and father thinks his conduct is only
the effervescence of such noble qualities as Henry the
Fifth's. What people talk so much about, and give such
contradictory opinions about, of course becomes an object
of interest, and, as I am of the fairer sex, and curiosity is
one of our allowed foibles, I move we let the youth come,
if it's only to have a good look at him.
I had one look at him, said Mrs. Lennox, with a
shudder
,
as his face turned on Frank after he had received the
blow. His countenance was that of the very evil spirit of
darkness and fury himself, and I thought to see Frank
struck dead at his feet by the very glance of his eye.
Pooh! pooh! said Mr. Lennox; when men are struck,
you must not expect them to look amiable. Eyes don't kill
quite so easily; at least (turning to Fanny) not those
of the male gender. Now, there
are
obs
Mine, I presume, said Fanny. If you think them so
dangerous, you had better get out of their way.
You're an impudent little witch, said Lennox, and
for all the trouble you have caused in this family, you must
make me some reparation.
What reparation, you horrid being? Do you think you
are going to scold me as you do poor Frank?
Mr. Lennox approached her, and she started off to the
corner of the room, for she had been subjected to these
reparations
before in the company of her audacious,
light-hearted
host!
You must come to it, Fanny, said he. The laws of
the Medes and Persians were mere weathercocks to my
determination
.
You might just as well yield.
Well, I'll capitulate on honourable terms rather than
endure your impertinence, said Fanny, blushing, and
looking
so provokingly pretty that Frank began almost to think
it his duty to interfere.
Take care! said Lennox, I'm coming.
Well, then, stop, and I'll capitulate.
How can you be such a child, Henry? said Mrs.
Lennox
.
Silence! good mother hear the embassy, quoted
Lennox
.
Now say, Chatillon, what would France with us?
Well! said Fanny, laughing, I will come and kiss
you, and I'm not to suffer such an extortion again, at least
for a month.
Agreed!
Agreed!
She left the corner and fairly kissed him on his cheek,
upon which he smacked his lips in such a way that Frank's
dark eyes flashed and Mrs. Lennox said,
If I were Fanny, I'd box your ears for you.
But, unfortunately, you are
not
Fanny, my dear, said
Lennox.
You're so ready to order everybody else to be
horsewhipped
,
said Fanny, what do you think you yourself
deserve?
To hear you, Frank, and Mary sing a glee as a
punishment
,
said Lennox. Come, we have had no music since
Frank's scrape.
She sat down at the piano and ran her fingers rapidly
over the keys. Frank drew near with Mary, and they
commenced
a favourite glee, both Mr. and Mrs. Lennox joining,
for both sang well.
Harry came in, for it was late, while they were singing.
Had they attended to him, they would have marked the pale
thought and moody sadness of his countenance; but the
rest were too absorbed in their delightful occupation to
observe
anything else, and the young man entered unnoticed,
or at least unspoken to, and stood in the embrasure of a
deep window, half concealed behind a heavy curtain, with
Vol. I.K
folded arms and glowing brow, leaning against the wall,
gazing at the group as on a picture.
Miss Elton's servant! said a domestic, opening the
door.
Why, what does Miss Elton want of a servant? said
Mrs. Lennox. Is not Frank here?
Oh, I thought, perhaps, my dear Mrs. Lennox, I am so
troublesome to you; and, besides, it's cruel to take Frank
out this time of night.
Really, Miss Elton, said Frank, you and everybody
else seem to think me a very delicate child!
Certainly! said she, laughing. Poor little fellow!
He looks as if he ought to have been in bed an hour ago!
Contrary to his resolution, Harry tried to catch her
parting
glance, but she went off laughing, and without looking
at him.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The
hour for the dinner, which was to introduce
Glendenning
and his friend, at length arrived, and Mr. and Mrs.
Lennox, Frank, Harry, and Mary, repaired to the
drawing-room
to receive the guests.
First came the Eltons, the old gentleman looking rather
grave; Mrs. Elton, her face, as usual, radiant with pleasure,
talking the whole time from the moment she entered;
Fanny
,
arrayed in all the charm of youthful beauty which
exercised
such an influence over the two susceptible young
men, and which was destined unconsciously to mingle such
consequences in the subsequent lives of more than one of
the persons present. Then Mary went down stairs, and
led in, almost by force, little Seth Copeley, in a perfect
flame of blushes, partly called up by the idea of appearing,
for the first time in his life, in society, and partly by the
lively consciousness of having on a very new suit of
uncommonly
city-looking clothes.
Come in, Seth, come in, said Mary, whose good heart
took a great interest in this friendless boy, and who had
arranged, with somewhat more taste than he had been able
to do, various points of his toilet, brushed back his locks
from his forehead, and put a neat brooch, a present from
herself, into the folds of his stock. What are you afraid
ef? I do believe, if I had not gone down stairs and brought
him up, we should not have had the pleasure of his society
to-day.
Walk up here, you young Lothario! said Mr. Lennox,
and let us look at you. What are you twisting your
waistcoat button off in that style for? Have you any
conscientious
objections to buttons?
No, sir, said Seth, after one of his short laughs.
Very well, then. Take your hands out of your
pantaloons
pockets; throw back your shoulders; lift up your
head; stand strait. Look at me, sir! Can't you stand so,
sir?
He is really a very handsome, sweet little fellow,
whispered Mrs. Elton, loud enough for him and every one
else to hear her, and such delightful eyes! I'm sure one
of these days those eyes will do their affair, and
How do you expect to become a lawyer and a
gentleman
,
sir, continued Mr. Lennox, if you bury yourself in
an office, and do nothing but read and copy? The law is
the noblest profession in the world. It offers you a
brilliant
career, and demands knowledge not only of books, but
of men. That's the reason why I have asked you to dine
with me to-day. You must begin to accustom yourself to
society, to meet men and women without flinching or being
flustered. Stop that blushing, sir! How do you think
you'll ever be able to perform the high functions of
President
of the United Statesas I presume you will have to
do one of these daysif you can't come into a room
without
obviously wishing you could leave your hands and feet
at the bottom of the Red Sea?
Come here, Seth, said Mrs. Lennox; you'll learn all
these things by-and-by. You shall sit next me, my dear
little boy, and I'll take care of you at dinner.
The poor fellow went awkwardly where he was bid, glad
to escape the boisterous benevolence of his master. As he
did so, guests were announced in quick succession.
The usual salutations had scarcely passed, when the
conversation, by general consent, appeared to fall on the
two expected English guests. Various opinions were
expressed
as to the extraordinary character of Glendenning,
who was warmly defended by Mr. Lennox, Frank, and Mrs.
Elton, against the rest of the company. Frank praised him
enthusiastically. His father declared against the principle
of putting a man in coventry because he had exhibited the
follies of youth; and Mrs. Elton was sure he was a noble
fellow from his magnanimous conduct on the field, where he
had risked his own life by wasting his shot, and, at the
same time, saved that of Frank, and where he had made
all the reparation possible. Any one, she said, was liable
to do wrong, but only the good were ashamed of it
afterward
;
and we ought to recollect that there was more joy in
heaven at the recovery of one lost sinner than for the
ninety-nine
who had never gone astray. She was going on to
relate an occurrence which had come under her own
observation
only two years previous, when she was
interrupted
by the opening of the door, and the servants announcing
Captain White and Captain Glendenning. They were
received
by Frank with a countenance expressive of the
sincerest
pleasure, and led by him first to his mother, then to
his father, who shook them warmly by the hand. The
kind greeting of Mrs. Lennox was rendered much less
difficult
than she had supposed it would be, by the agreeable
surprise she felt at seeing a person so different from what
she had expected. The two strangers were presented to
all the company, including the Eltons and Fanny. At the
sight of the latter the embarrassment and shame of
Glendenning
were so obvious as to considerably soften the
sentiment
of indignation which had been generally felt at his
entrance. Fanny at first turned pale, but her colour came
presently back deeper than before. There was a moment's
extremely awkward pause, which Glendenning broke, with
equal grace and frankness, by touching boldly and
successfully
the dangerous chord vibrating in every breast.
I should think myself at this moment even more
censurable
than I am if I hesitated to express, my dear Mrs.
Lennox, my shame and regret at what has happened; and
my appearance before you would be a new insult if I did
not come most deeply repentant and to seek your pardon!
Nonsense, my dear fellow! said Frank. Don't give
yourself the trouble.
You are the first, sir, said Mrs. Lennox, to touch
upon a subject which I should not have alluded to, as it
cannot but awaken in a mother's breast emotions far from
agreeable. But your frankness merits equal frankness in
return, and I will confess I did not think, ten minutes ago,
that any circumstance could make me forgive you. I hope,
however, I am too much of a Christian to withhold from true
repentance the pardon which we all ourselves require.
Bravo! my dear mother! said Frank, in high glee at
the smooth manner in which affairs were going.
If Miss Elton, also, rejoined Glendenning, knew how
I detest myself for the incident which has distressed her,
she too would forgive me.
Miss Elton bowed her head without speaking.
I assure you, said White, my friend has changed
more since the little affair with your son than I could have
believed possible; and, upon my soul, I haven't the
slightest
doubt that he will get on hereafter famously.
Say no more! said Lennox; you will find me, boys,
always as ready to grant pardon, when asked, as to
Certainly, said Mrs. Lennox, who saw that her candid
husband was running upon breakers. If the affair have
had such a favourable effect upon what, I hope, is but the
thoughtlessness of youth, I shall regret it the less.
Since it has made us acquainted with Captain
Glendenning
and his friend, I don't think we can regret it at all,
said Lennox.
My dear father! cried Frank.
Dinner was announced, and the company were soon
seated
.
The manner and appearance of Glendenning, as well
as every word he said, gained him the good opinion of all
present, who, like Mrs. Lennox, had been prepared to meet
a very different sort of person. Instead of a coarse
rou
, he
was a slender, handsome young man of six-and-twenty, of
manners mild and modest, a prepossessing and even
beautiful
countenance, and betraying, in various ways,
embarrassment
,
ingenuousness, delicacy of feeling, and kindness
of heart. Mrs. Lennox felt singularly interested in him,
and resolved to inquire into his history. As she sat near
White she was enabled to do so, and privately learned from
that gentleman all she desired.
Glendenning, said White, has a constitutional
peculiarity
.
His temper is as quick and his blood as hot as
his judgment (although good when it makes itself heard)
is slow. With the best heart in the world, and the very
best intentions, he has always been in difficulty. He lost
K 2
his mother, whom he tenderly loved, at the age of thirteen,
and his father immediately married again, by which he
brought an accession of two thousand a year to his fortune,
a woman of a sharp, peculiarly disagreeable temper and
character into his house, and a world of trouble to poor
Charley. The step-mother hated him of course. The
father, also, of course played into the hands of the lady.
Charley inherited from his mother an independence of his
own, which, perhaps, made him less patient than he should
have been. There are half a dozen step-sisters and
step-brothers
,
who all hate him like the parents, and he hates
them as heartily. His hot temper, perhaps, did carry him
too far in his relations with them. Considering his own
mother's memory wronged by the sudden union, for, in truth,
`the funeral baked meats did coldly furnish forth the
marriage
tables,' he found the feeble affection which his father
bore him not enough to protect him from certain
annoyances
at home, and he was therefore driven into a course
of dissipation. He then shunned society, and sought only
companions of an improper description, till they bought him
a commission, more to get rid of him than anything else,
and his papa, after recommending me to keep an eye on
him, and see that he did not get himself hanged, or in any
other way disgrace his family (I really don't think the old
gentleman cares one iota about Charley himself), shipped
him off, and I have been his best friend ever since. I
assure
you, a more affectionate, generous, warm-hearted, noble
fellow never breathed. Since the little affair with your son
he has apparently devoted some time to sober reflection, and
I have no doubt he will become as fine a fellow as heart
can wish. In short, I think his interval of thoughtless
desperation
is over. He has gone through his transition state,
and I should judge him to be a reformed man.
You have greatly interested me in him, said Mrs.
Lennox
.
Do you remain long at New-York?
Some weeks, I think.
If your friend and yourself can be induced to visit us
sometimes, I should like to see more of him.
Oh! he will, I doubt not, be happy; and I must assure
you the magnanimity you display in forgiving him will not
fail to make a deep and salutary impression on him.
I hope so; he appears to possess a fine mind.
And a very grateful and warm heart, I assure you.
The hope of being able to exert a beneficial influence on
such a character inspired Mrs. Lennox with the resolution
to make the attempt, and there was something in the face
of her proposed pupil which caused her to think the
undertaking
not an extravagant one.
While this conversation was going on, in a low voice,
between
Mrs. Lennox and Captain White, Mrs. Elton was
talking so busily to Glendenning as to preclude the
possibility
of his attending to anything else, and Mrs. Henderson
was stating the very disagreeable impression both the
strangers
made on her to Mr. Brigham, and her astonishment at
finding such improper persons at table with her.
Mr. Lennox is,
I
, of all persons, should allow, said
that lady, carefully lowering her voice, so that Harry, who
sat near, could catch nothing of her communications, a
most excellent man. To
me
he has been the most devoted
friend, but it is curious what ideas he has on some subjects,
and how his wife yields to him on all occasions.
And should not a wife yield to her husband? mildly
asked Mr. Brigham.
Well! I don't know, said she, fixing her envious black
eyes on the persons of whom she spoke, while a shade of
sharp discontent passed over her forbidding, yellow
countenance
.
Mrs. Lennox is an amiable, nice woman, and
I
ought to be the last person in the world to say anything
against her, since she is my husband's only sister, and both
I and Mr. Henderson have received nothing but one
continued
series of hospitalities from them, and they have, with
their princely fortune, as you know, been the means of
putting
my husband into his prosperous business. I am sure
they love us with all their hearts, and never lose an
opportunity
of showing it. One can't help using one's eyes and
ears, you know. But
I
ought to be the last person
Your kind heart, said Mr. Brigham, with a gentle irony,
instructs you wisely to be silent respecting the
weaknesses
of your friends.
Certainly. If there is one thing in this world which I
hate more than another, it is
backbiting
. I'm like a child
in that respect. My heart always gets the better of my
head. What a lovely girl Fanny has grown?
Yes.
I think her character has improved as much as her
person.
I always fancied Miss Elton the gentlest of beings.
Yes, she
has
that look.
The whole family are perfect, said Mrs. Elton to
Glendenning. There isn't a fault in one of them. Two
such noble young men were never seen. Mary is an angel
out of heaven, and Mr. Lennox the most delightful of men,
while my dear Mrs. Lennoxah! and tears actually came
into her eyes, if you knew her as I do, Captain
Glendenning
,
you would love her with all the devotion of a son.
It is all very well, said Harry to Elton (who had
designedly
led his young friend to the subject of religion
again), but duelling is, and ought to be sanctioned by public
opinion, and society could not hold together without it.
You will allow, I think, said Elton, that Christianity
forbids it?
Yes.
That it regards it as a
crime?
Yes.
Then you cannot fight a duel without violating the spirit
and precept of Christianity?
Yes.
Then the question narrows itself to a single one: will
you admit the institution of duelling and dismiss Christianity,
or will you embrace Christianity and denounce duelling?
It does!
And yet you advocate duelling?
I do.
Then you are willing to see Christianity rejected by
mankind?
A grave question, said Harry, after a pause. But
no man shall make me a hypocrite. Christianity is a
useful
institution. I do not wish to see it destroyed. But it
is not true; it is not divine. Its precepts are beautiful, but
not possible. They cannot be applied to practice, nor am
I singular in thinking so, however I may be in confessing
my thoughts. Other people think the same; but they do
not say so. Only a few enthusiasts, or men not fairly
brought into the currents of active life, pretend to make the
precepts of Christ really the shapers of thought and the rules
of action. I would not express these opinions to the world,
not even to my own friends generally. But to you, who
are not a bigot, I speak freely.
I honour your frankness, said Mr. Elton, as much as I
regret your opinions. Most men, particularly the ardent and
self-confident, if possessed of thinking and cultivated minds,
are liable, not only to doubt, but to
disbelieve
, at some period of
their lives. If it had been the intention of Providence that
the subject should be placed to the world at large beyond a
doubt, then no one could have doubted. It is the most
solemn
one which can engage the attention of a human being,
and, in proportion as life glides away, its solemnity and
importance
increase. But it requires, to the generality of
mankind, attention and study like any other of the various
advantages which are placed within the reach of industry.
If it pleased you flippantly to deny the truths of astronomy,
you might do so, and only study could place you in
possession
of them. The earth does not
seem
to us
round
or in
motion. You are not conscious of being whirled through
space at the rate of so many thousand miles an hour. To
the ignorant you may even successfully deny these facts,
and appeal to reason, sight, and common sense with
success
;
only study and examination can make you properly
acquainted with the subject, which turns out to be, upon
examination
,
very different from what it appears to mere
human
sight and mere human reason. So with the still more
vast spiritual truths of Christianity. From your love of
right, from the clearness of your understanding and the
virtues
of your heart, I hope, when you have tested by trial the
insufficiency of infidelity to bear a human soul even to the
verge
of eternity; when you have had time fairly to discover
the empty errors which now wear in your eyes the aspect
of truth, I hope you will
reconsider
the subject and change
your opinion. My object in eliciting from you the present
distinct avowal of your complete unbelief is to let you
yourself
see clearly what your own opinions
are
. Don't slip
through life without being
anything;
without either belief
or unbelief. Irrational animals may do this, but a rational
being is formed to acquire opinions by reason, used in study
or reflection. Excuse me for sliding into a sermon at
dinner
;
this is not the proper place and you are not in the
proper
mood. I should be glad to speak with you oftener alone,
coolly and with only truth for our object. Now, however,
all I wish is to establish one point.
You are an infidel;
that is, you do not believe the
Bible
. It is certain, as you
say, that Christendom is full of professing Christians who
do not believe more than yourself. You are young: life
is before you. You will have time to observe, if God please
to prolong your days. All I ask of you is,
do
observe.
Don't avoid or forget the subject.
I appreciate the interest you show in me, said Harry.
But to him who has not yet chosen any religion, it is
necessary, if resolved on adopting one, that he should study
them all. I should spend my days and nights in
comparing
Fetichism with Sabeism, the claims of Mohammed,
Brahma, and Confucius. My professional studies must not
be neglected while engaged in these misty researches, and
I fear I should waste my life before I had succeeded in
ascertaining what it is, whence it came, and to what it
tends.
You are young and happy, said Elton, gravely. You
will not always continue so. There are years when the
mortal stands, or seems to stand, in no need of religion. But
years pass away. If you will allow, we will resume this
subject at some future time.
I fear it will be of no avail; but I can never refuse the
advice which comes from a friend.
This debate was conducted between the two speakers,
and was not, probably, overheard by any one else. Elton
was surprised to find the steady determination with which
his young companion adhered to opinions so dangerous,
while Harry secretly congratulated himself on having
always
the best of the argument (although, in truth, Mr. Elton
had not commenced to argue at all), and regarded the latter
as a very worthy, Puritanical gentleman, who believed the
nonsense he had been taught from his cradle, and he envied
him his self-satisfied freedom from doubt.
What a delightful painting I could make of this circle,
said Brigham to Harry, in this light. Upon my soul, I
have a mind to do it, as a sort of continuation to your family
history.
You have painted us all so many times before, said
Harry, alluding to several productions on the wall, that I
should think you would be nearly tired of us.
The pieces to which Harry referred were various
paintings
and drawings of the children in as many attitudes and
costumes. There was Frank, a two-years' old child, with
his papa's hat and coat on. Harry, a boy of thirteen,
looking
you directly in the face with an expression of sunshiny,
careless happiness, which formed a striking contrast to his
present countenance. Mary, as a shepherdess of ten,
tending
a lamb; and Frank, again, still earlier, with a rattle and
coral.
I have heard your father speak lately of a tour in
Europe
,
said Brigham, and Frank is going off to
Prairie du
Chien;
your sister will be getting married next, and what
say you to a small painting, but sufficiently large to
preserve
portraits, and to produce all the effect of reality, of
this company just as it now is.
If it could be done soon, said Harry, thinking of his
own plans of travel, I should like it of all things, and very
seriously I engage you to do it. You can take portraits from
every person. I'll have even little Seth in.
I'll do it, said Brigham. I'll set about it
immediately
.
I should scarcely need to alter an attitude. Miss
Elton in the foreground, and those two English officers,
your father and Emmerson, your mother and Frank. We
must talk of this hereafter. Your father especially will
make an admirable head.
We'll talk of this more particularly to-morrow, said
Harry.
Emmerson's is a singular-looking countenance. He's a
clever man, I believe? asked Brigham.
Oh, very; the apple of my father's eye. His history
is interesting.
I think I have heard of a service your father rendered
him.
Ten years ago, said Harry, my father had occasion
to visit, several times, one of the prisoners in the old jail.
While there he observed a man of three or four-and-thirty,
of quiet manners and not unpleasing exterior, shabbily
dressed
,
pale, thin, and evidently unhappy. He was informed that
the person was an attorney, who was imprisoned for a small
debt, and seemed to suffer in health as well as spirits,
particularly
from want of good food and bedclothing. The old
Roman law which gave to creditors the dead body of their
debtor was less barbarous than that of our enlightened land,
which then plunged the living into a cheerless dungeon,
deprived
them of the means to exercise their industry, and yet,
while the felon was fed, made no provision to supply them
with the necessaries of life.
Yes, it is really startling to observe, said Brigham,
what abhorrent forms of error sometimes stand in the
midst of us, with the daylight shining full upon them, and
yet exciting no notice because we are used to them.
Well, said Harry, my father sought the acquaintance
of this personoffered his servicessent him the best of
food from his own tablesupplied him with books,
newspapers
,
etc., till at length, learning his history, and also that
he had been practising law for a year in New-York, or,
rather, endeavouring to practise it, without the least chance
of obtaining any business, requested to pay his debt, which
was only $300, and to take him into his own office as an
attorney, to assist him in business. He found him
well-informed
,
keen, and intelligent, a perfectly cool and steady
business mind, and a careful, indefatigable student. I
believe
he often sits up the whole night to study, and he has
now got to be such an able lawyer that, although he has
not the talent of oratory, he really takes the lead in the
business of the office, and is a most invaluable assistance.
He is a silent man, very quiet, very modest, very amiable.
He never speaks of the circumstances under which he
made our acquaintance, but I presume he feels them not
the less deeply; and he devotes himself to the business of
the office with such indefatigable zeal and fidelity, that we
all see in it the evidence of a mind not the less grateful
because
somewhat reserved and silent.
You spoke of his history. What is it?
He is the son of an honest farmer, who, although
himself
poor and uneducated, discovered the intelligence of his
son, and sent him to school and then to college, where his
severe application acquired for him a respectable standing.
He afterward taught Latin and Greek as an usher in a
day school while he was studying law; and when
admitted
to the bar and obliged to abandon this means of support,
his cold and silent manners not being of a kind likely to
procure him friends and clients, he languished for some
time in obscurity and indigence, necessarily running in
debt, till at last, although one of the very cleverest men at
the bar, he found himself in jail.
Poor fellow!
Ah! now the scene is changed. My father loves and
trusts him like a brother. Everything is committed to his
hands. I, so much his junior in age, and so much his
inferior
in instruction and in habits of study, am very glad of
an opportunity to learn under such an able master. We all
love him as a superior being. Everything is Mr.
Emmerson
with us. If my father is at a loss for an opinion, he
goes to Mr. Emmerson. If he thinks of purchasing a house
or a horse, he consults Mr. Emmerson. If Frank wants
anything, he applies to Mr. Emmerson. If I am at a loss,
and my father is not at hand, Emmerson is my man. And
I vow, I believe my mother, who esteems him entire
perfection
,
if she were hesitating whether to have mince-pie
or plum-pudding for desert, would go down and ask the
advice
of Mr. Emmerson.
Ha, ha, ha! I suppose his fortune is made, then?
I believe my father considers it to be, at least, secure.
He received at first a salary, which was subsequently
raised
.
When I entered the office as a partner, it was agreed
that we should, after the third year, make a new
arrangement
,
putting him upon an equal footing. My father, you
know, has scarcely need of his professional income, either
for himself or any of his family except me, and is too
happy
in being able to bring forward so clever a man as
Emmerson
;
we are, in fact, going to arrange the matter this
very summer.
He must be a great pleasure to you all.
He is, as my mother often says, `perfection,' and, at
the same time, in business I never saw a keener, more
watchful, far-seeing eye. In fact, there is something rather
remarkable about him.
And the young, country-looking boy, farther down, who
is he?
What, Seth? Ah, poor little Seth! ha, ha, ha!
Another
of my father's
protgs
. A little country fellow from
Vermont, well-descended from the Green Mountain Boys,
who resisted every attempt,
vi et armis
, to make a cobbler
of him, and declared he would be nothing but a scholar and
a great lawyer. He was whipped at the plough, they say,
worse than the oxen which drew it, and sent into the barn
to thresh corn, only to be much more thoroughly threshed
himself, till at last his father kicked him neck and heels
out of doors, and told him to go and be a gentleman and be
closing with a very naughty word. His mother,
however
,
sent after him a small, yearly supply of cash, which
he made go a great ways. My father met him by chance
Vol. I.L
during an excursion into Vermont, and you know his
enthusiasm
for anything striking and out of the common routine.
He ordered the young lad into his room, examined him a
little, found he had picked up a good deal of learning in the
raw material, and offered him a place as clerk in his office
with a pittance sufficient to live on. We've had him now
several years. I like him much; so do the rest of us; but
Emmerson finds him rather intractable. Nevertheless, my
father does his best to bring him out; my father never does
anything by halves, you know. It is his happiness to do
goodto help along young people in the worldto find
merit anywherethe more unsuspected the place, the better,
and to call it forth. He fancies he sees in little Seth a
certain excellence of nature, and a certain moral and
intellectual
capacity, which circumstances and time are to ripen
into something very remarkable. I don't know how it is.
I like him; but Emmerson, whose opinion has great weight,
says he's a stupid, obstinate little mule, and that nothing
can be made of him worth the trouble we have bestowed
on him. This judgment of Emmerson has put poor Seth
lately rather under a cloud, and nobody but my father, whose
heart shines on all alike, continues to have any high hopes
of him. He invites him to his own table as one of his sons,
as he says, to form his manners and make a gentleman of
him. Poor Seth!
The eyes of both the gentlemen here turned on Seth,
who, attired in his elegant suit of new clothes, presented
rather a ludicrous figure. He had a long shirt-collar,
which, while it appeared in danger of cutting his ears off,
at the same time interfered with the ingress of food into his
mouth, and the aspiring propensities of which Mary had in
vain endeavoured to bring under. He said nothing, and
when spoken to, only blushed deeply, and stammered an
answer that made him appear all that Emmerson had
declared
him. He formed a striking contrast to Emmerson
himself, who, although his manners were peculiarly quiet
and unassuming, was drawn into the general conversation
several times, and discovered an extensive information,
displaying
a mind stored with facts, the result of long study;
and the respect with which he was listened to by all the
members of the Lennox family communicated itself
imperceptibly
to the rest of the company.
CHAPTER XIX.
About
a week after the foregoing scene, on a morning
which seemed to have assumed its brightest looks for the
occasion, the bell of the steamboat Chancellor Livingston,
advertised to start at eight for Albany, rang the notice to
dilatory passengers that the moment of departure was at
hand. It wanted but two minutes of the appointed time,
the captain had just shouted, All aboard! in that
vociferous
voice peculiar to persons of his profession, and a couple
of men had stooped to draw in the plank, when two
carriages
were seen rapidly approaching, and the already
revolving
paddles were checked. The party consisted of
Mr. and Mrs. Lennox, Mrs. Elton and Fanny, with Frank,
Mary, and little Seth, all in high glee, and in a very great
hurry. They were speedily shown on board by the polite
captain, who waited a moment to see that the luggage
followed
in safety. Under his superintendence, and to the
silent amusement of the crowd of passengers and of various
miscellaneous groups upon the bales, barrels, and piles of
pine wood on the wharf, three or four stout fellows soon
transferred to the deck the large hair trunk and the little
leathern one, the three portmanteaus and the five
bandboxes
,
besides an indefinite number of valises, hat-cases, canes,
fowling-pieces, fishing-rods, and umbrellas. This effected,
the captain breathed again. He once more shouted All
aboard! and the wheels again commenced their violent
vocation, when another carriage was observed thundering
down Courtlandt-street, with a directness of purpose
sufficiently
indicating, on the part of the occupants, a
determination
to transfer their persons from it to the boat, if
possible
.
The several hundred passengers drew to one side of
the decks to watch the
denouement
of this little drama,
which they appeared unfeelingly to regard as a comic
performance
;
while the driver of the approaching vehicle, the
horses thereof, the people within, and the desperate and
indignant
captain, all seemed affected with emotions more or
less approaching to the tragic. The latter gentleman, in a
tone of voice rather animated than otherwise, ordered the
plank to be hauled in, muttering, at the same time,
something
which might possibly have resulted from a ruffled
temper, and which appeared to have a reference either to
his own eyes or those of the rapidly-arriving strangers.
Despite these inauspicious circumstances, the said
travellers
reached the scene, and, without pausing to reply to
various propositions respecting
very
fine, sweet oranges,
and newspapers containing the last arrivals from Europe,
proceeded forthwith to leap on board. Their luggage,
happily
light in weight and not numerous in articles, was
pitched
after them, in an unceremonious style, by a man, who
first stopped, however, to decipher the inscription, Captain
Glendenning, on the plate of a valise. It is generally
understood
,
by those conversant with the character of the
captain
(of the steamboat), that if his glances could have killed
outright, the said man, at that same instant, would have
descended
at an uncommonly rapid rate, and probably head
first, into the shades below.
All aboard!
Will
you haul in that plank? shouted
the captain, now full three quarters of a minute after his
time. All aboard! echoed half a dozen voices. The bell
gave one more deafening toll, which made many ladies
place their hands against their ears and draw up their faces
into the prettiest and drollest expressions imaginable,
laughing
all the time, while those with whom the reader is
acquainted
were heartily shaking White and Glendenning by
the hand. The plank (at length!) was drawn in with a force
bordering on ferocity, to the imminent danger of the feet
and legs of some forty or fifty individuals. The broad
wheels gave plunge after plunge as the huge engine began
to heave and pant with its great labour, the cables were
cast loose, happily (though miraculously!) without injury to
any one's neck or limbs, the surrounding green water grew
white and distracted with foam, the shore, with its crowded
and admiring audience, receded from the eyes of the throng
of smiling travellers, who began to inhale more freely the
cool air of the open bay instead of the hot dust of the town,
and as the immense boat put fairly off into the river, and
turned her prow up the Hudson, the band stationed beneath
the broad awning on the upper deck began to play such a
soul-stirring air, that everybody looked as bright and happy
as if there had not been such a thing as care in the whole
world.
The meeting of the Lennoxes with their two English
friends was altogether unexpected, and so much the more
agreeable on that very account. It was nothing but, My
dear Captain Glendenning, and My dear Mrs. Lennox,
and Who expected to see you? and Where in the
world did
you
come from? I thought your engagements
prevented your leaving, and Now we've got you, we shall
carry you off to Rose Hill! Glendenning explained to
Mr. Lennox, while White explained the same to Mrs.
Lennox
,
how they had been unable to resist the pleasure of
taking
the trip with them, and how they had successfully
pleaded to be let off from their engagement, and how happy
and delighted they were, etc., etc., etc., while Mrs. Elton
was launching off, to nobody in particular, into a glowing
description of Rose Hill and its resources, in which the
words boating, shooting, fishing, riding, flowers, moonlight,
bread and butter, poetry, and many others, followed each
other with such earnest rapidity that her eyes were half full
of tears, and glittered through her continual smiles like an
April sun-shower. Lennox insisted upon keeping them at
least a month, and, when something was intimated of leave
of absence being expired, and a very severe
lieutenant-colonel
,
he said he didn't care a fig for all the
lieutenant-colonels
in Christendom, and they might lay all the blame
on his shoulders; and if he could catch the lieutenant-colonel
at Rose Hill, he would serve him the same way, and, if
they chose, they might tell him he said so!
Never was there such a merry party, such superb weather,
such bright things said, and such a wonderful growth of
familiarity and friendship. One of the most spirited things
possible is this way of starting off from New-York up the
Hudson. There was more seen of each other's minds and
hearts in a day than would have been the case in a year
anywhere else. What with the crowd, and the movement,
and the noise, and the voices, and the shaking of hands,
and the hailing of friends to bid good-by from deck to
shore, and the bracing, sweet air, and the beautiful women,
and the jokes and the laughter at everybody and everything,
and the sharp, first-rate appetite occasioned by all this, and
the smell of the very nice breakfast you are going to get
presently, and the flying by of the great, red, smoking,
dusty, magnificent, brawling, bristling, crowded city, with
the black wharves and old meal-stores vanishing in
double-quick
L 2
time, and the sloops, and ferryboats, and barges, and
ships, and the green woods, and shores, and rocks, and
sand-beaches, and farm-houses, and villages, and villas, and
leaning hills, and broken, perpendicular precipices, all
floating
behind you like a perfect vision of enchantment, all as
fresh and new in the tender morning light as if just finished
on the painter's easel, all steeped in radiant colours, and
perfumes
,
and grateful silencein short, to a person, like most
of our present party, healthy and happy, with plenty of
money in his pockets and hope in his bosom, entirely free
from business and care, such a trip, under such
circumstances
,
is almost enough to make him forget the extremely
bad character human life has received from most who have
favoured us with their opinions on the subject.
The next memorable incident of the day was another
deafening peal from a large hand-bell mercilessly rung by
an honest negro, his face shining with delight at the noise
he made and the important duty he was performing, who
announced
,
in a magisterial voice, Them gentleman as hasn't
paid his passages, will please walk to the captain's office
and settle it!a piece of rhetoric which brought the gayety
of our little party to its highest possible point, made even
Fanny, who was inclined to be pensive, give one of her old
girlish laughs, and threw Seth into such convulsions of
delight
that the merriment of his companions was, if possible,
enhanced thereby.
Then came a black lady, very ingeniously, and, as she
probably thought, tastefully dressed, with a variety of
ornaments
and elegances peculiarly patronised by our sable
belles; and after she had quietly and mysteriously selected
the ladies by a freemason sort of nod and gesture, and
thus caused most of them to vanish before the three or four
hundred single gentlemen knew anything of what was
going
on, it was announced to the lady-less, male remnant of
the ravenous assemblage, that the hour of breakfast had
arrived
,
and that, by transferring their persons below, they
might partake of the same. If any of them declined the
invitation, we can only state, the fact has not come to our
knowledge.
There are various sights in this world calculated to
awaken
intense emotion, but few more so than that which burst
upon the individuals who brought up the rear of the
procession
into the cabin, as they beheld the splendidly furnished
saloons, and the long, endless tables smoking with every
delicacy
,
which would provoke the appetite more than it was
already provoked, had such process been desirable, or,
indeed
,
possible. The Lennox party had been obligingly
placed in possession of one end of the principal table, where,
Lennox at the head and leading the attack, such an onset
was made upon the enemy as never was seen. The effect
of the motion, the excitement, the sharp morning air had
been irresistible. A most extraordinay disappearance of
the various surrounding edibles took place, the four
gentlemen
,
like gallant knights, hovering around their ladies fair,
and anticipating their wants, and thereby drawing closer the
bands of friendship than could have been believed possible.
Mrs. Lennox took good care of Seth, who, when Mr.
Lennox
ironically asked him why he did not eat something,
at a moment when he was just depositing into his mouth a
prodigious piece of toast and butter, and half a sausage,
came near meeting his death by reason of his sudden laugh
and its abrupt termination, which set everybody else
laughing
again, so that, in fact, it was quite a miracle that
everybody
got safe through with it all.
Once more on deck, the spirits tranquillized, and the
scenery growing every instant more beautiful, the crowd of
passengers began to yield to those affinities which attract
like to like. A large number were, of course, acquaintances.
Such as were strangers were duly presented, and the
enjoyment
of society could scarcely be anywhere greater than
thus, under the broad awning of the upper deck of the
immense
steamboat, and floating through scenes which recalled
the valley of Rasselas or the still brighter abodes of the, alas!
once innocent and happy parents of mankind.
In this circle, the presence of the two young duellists
occasioned
a considerable sensation. The affair had by this
time become universally known, and the part Frank had
borne in it rendered him an object of universal admiration
and interest. Not only is the unthinking multitude dazzled
by every display of prompt and manly courage, but there is
in it something fascinating, also, to the soberest and wisest.
It seems to redeem even a bad cause, but how much more
brilliant is it when manifested to punish aggression and
protect
women? Even they who were opposed to the custom
of duelling, and who would have pronounced it inexcusable
under any circumstances, had life-blood once flowed on their
own floors, were silenced by the general approbation
bestowed
upon Frank. Had a British officer been permitted
to leave the United States unpunished after such an act
to have worn, perhaps, on his own bosom the rose thus
snatched from that of an American lady, with an American
officer at her side, what would England, what would the
whole world have said? There was so much force in this
argument that they who had nothing to oppose but the Word
of God were but slightly listened to; so difficult is it for
pure Christian principle to contend successfully against the
passions and illusions of life.
On the present occasion it was soon perceptible that
Frank was the lion of the day. When it was whispered
about who he was, he could not have been insensible to the
eyes which were fastened on him (and some of them, as
Mr. Mantelini says,
demned
handsome ones too!). He
had entitled himself to the applause of his native city. The
newspapers had been full of compliments; judges, lawyers,
statesmen, and public magistrates shook him heartily by the
hand; and among the ladies, a young hero who had just
saved
his country in some brilliant battle could scarcely have
been more openly admired. Mary and Lennox enjoyed all
this, and Mrs. Elton, who, from her whole time being
occupied
in talking, did not
think
much one way or the other,
shared in the triumphs of her favourite young friend. But
Mrs. Lennox looked on with regret and apprehension, lest a
serious injury might be thus inflicted on her son's character.
Glendenning, too, against whom, at first, the general
indignation
had run high, began to be regarded, not as a
libertine
who spent
His rich opinion
For the name of a night-brawler,
but as a mere frolicksome young madcap, who had firmly and
magnanimously atoned in his sober senses for a boyish
spree. White, too, who, it was understood, had done all in
his power to prevent the occurrence at all, was praised for
the officer-like firmness with which he had pressed it
through to just the point where his thoughtless friend
might withdraw in a chivalric way from an affair of which
he had become justly ashamed.
In the mean while everybody was introduced to
everybody
,
and everybody talked to everybody about all sorts of
things, and each individual of our party would have thought
him or her self as happy as possible, if he and she had not
felt they were growing happier every moment.
We wish we could put down the light and continual
conversation
which beguiled the swift hours of this delightful
day, and also the thoughts which passed through their
various
minds. Mrs. Lennox, as she led on White to new
communications respecting his friend, felt it more than ever
her duty to avail herself of his present visit, which seemed
a providential opportunity, to awaken in his volatile mind
some serious religious impressions. She thought she saw in
him an ingenuousness of character which did not contradict
his engaging manners and prepossessing countenance. The
enterprise of redeeming such a person from infidelity, and
the dangers and misery consequent upon it, appeared one
justly worthy of a Christian. Facility of disposition, which
allowed him to be led away by bad example, and impetuous
impulses and passions which he had never yet learned to
govern, were obviously his principal faults. As for the
scheme of Christianity, its history, and the evidences on
which it stands, he was totally and singularly ignorant of
them, and she promised herself the pious pleasure of lifting
the curtain from those sacred truths, and of displaying to his
candid mind, in all its sublime and unutterable glory, the
ancient and eternal fabric of Christianity.
Glendenning was pleased with the prospect of a week at
Rose Hill, and White was too agreeably impressed with
his new acquaintances to interpose objections. Miss Elton
was glad to have any one to occupy Frank's thoughts and
time. She saw that his duel had given him new hopes,
although the delicacy of his heart caused him to betray
them only in an indirect way. She did, indeed, begin to
regard him as no longer a boy, and the admiration and
friendship which she really felt for him she was too artless
to conceal, and he too inexperienced to understand. He
evidently hoped that time might effect a favourable change
in her sentiments towards him, and trusted everything to
the future, which looked so bright and cloudless.
But of the whole party, perhaps none were so completely
rapt in enchantment (though of a very different kind) as
Mrs. Elton and Seth. The former, who, in the darkest
hour, had around her an atmosphere of sunshine, when that
orb did really pour his splendours on the spot where she
stood, beheld in the earth only a scene of uninterrupted
bliss. All nature and every individual wore in her
happy
eyes a colour of brightness. To her everything was
beautiful, everybody was charming; the ugliest
physiognomy
was handsome; a cross temper was honest
roughness
,
and a pug-nose
spirituel
. She never saw a fault in
any human being. She gave White and Glendenning such
astounding accounts of the excellence of everything and
everybody, that they began to fancy themselves stumbled
into one of the volumes of the Arabian Nights.
As for little Seth, he was, for the first time in his life,
going up the Hudson, and arrayed in all the splendours of
his new suit. He said nothing except when spoken to, and
then generally answered only with a huge blush and an
abrupt laugh, which opened and closed with an evanescence
quite remarkable even in a world where all is so extremely
transitory. Mr. Lennox, who saw how offensive he had
become to Emmerson, and who could not understand why,
had resolved to take him with the family to spend a month
in the country, as much for the gratification of Emmerson
as of the boy himself. He noticed him a great deal, made
it a point to introduce him to everybody, as if he had been
his own son, never failing, on such occasions, to pronounce,
in a most flourishing manner, his three names, Seth Jacob
Copely, and to add that he possessed talents and
attainments
which would inevitably one day place him at the
head of his profession, if not in the presidential chair.
Poor Seth had heard these astounding eulogies so
repeatedly
that he began to be used to themfor he felt they
were full of kindnessand to love more and more the
person
who showered them on him. All treated him with a
gentleness and consideration which sank into a heart not
without warmth, although rarely displayed, and into a mind,
though slow, both thoughtful and observing. His old,
uncomfortable
bashfulness had begun to give place to a
feeling
of greater ease and satisfaction. He saw that, where
Mrs. Lennox's mild, sweet face was, he had always a
friend to help him out of the embarrassing dilemmas into
which he was frequently plunged by the thoughtless
good-nature
of Mr. Lennox; and as Mary took as much care of
him as if he had been her brother (or her grandson), he got
along tolerably well. Frank quizzed him, and Glendenning
mystified him sometimes, in a mere spirit of fun; but Mary
was an excellent champion, and Frank met in her an
ancient
and formidable foe. In short, Seth, somehow or other,
found himself strangely happy. Of all men on earth, he
most disliked and feared Emmerson; now he had escaped
from the dark face of that gentleman for a time. He saw
his representations had not injured him in the opinion of his
benefactors, and, with the facility of youth, regardless of the
future, he gave himself up to the pleasing impressions of
the moment, watched the easy and elegant manners of the
three gentlemen, and delighted to bestow such attentions as he
knew how upon the ladies, each one of whom he loved with
all the unbounded fervour of boyish gratitude and admiration.
Strange and sweet impressions, too, began to descend upon
his mind, from the varying and resplendent scenes of nature
which were so rapidly flying behind him. He listened, too,
with mute wonder to the conversation of the rest, of other
shores and other rivers, of the scenes of Europe (that
great dim vision of imagination to him), and to the thousand
interesting remarks upon life which he heard now for the
first time. The scenery, which struck every one else, and
brought forth various exclamations of noisy rapture, sank
into his soul silently, but not with a less deep effect, and
this little, stupid country boy, thus introduced, almost by
accident
,
into a sphere of life so much above his own, began
to feel within him the development of new thoughts and the
stirrings of new emotions. The beautiful countenance of
Mary Lennox (who seemed to consider herself quite a
woman and him only a little boy of no account whatever;
and if she thought so, of course it must be so, for very far
from him was the boldness to have an opinion of his own)
had a sort of unaccountable attraction in his eyes. He
could have sat gazing on it for hours, and so he did quite
uninterrupted, for no one looked at him. If the young girl
herself sometimes caught his eyes with her own in these
encounters, she only smiled so kindly and good-naturedly,
that, as we before observed, somehow or other, this passage
up to Rose Hill was the most enchanting, delicious day he
had ever known.
Fanny Elton, who appeared only recovering from her
late indisposition, required no other explanation for a
certain
reserve which seemed lately to have shed itself over
her mind. She presented with Mary the rare spectacle of
a young lady decidedly prettier than her friend, yet without
believing so herself; while Mary, equal in character, if not
quite so in countenance, knew it well and unfeignedly
rejoiced
in it. Far, indeed, were both their pure souls above
the mean passions of vanity and envy.
The bright, breathless noon brought the boat into the
Highlands, whose bold, gigantic forms frowned darkly on
the winding flood, and printed their sharp angles against
the stainless azure sky. This spot, the region of a
thousand
romantic as well as historical associations, and
invested
by nature with such a startling beauty, and rendered still
more charming by the chaste and tender genius of Irving,
never appeared so bright, so still, so enchanting as on the
present occasion. The sharp beak of the boat went
bursting
through the sleeping water, now close upon one shore,
now upon the other. Sloops, their sails fully spread to catch
every breath of air, stole silently along. The sturgeon
leaped and fell heavily back into his watery home, and the
eagle floated low over the rocky heights, balancing himself
in idle enjoyment upon his immense, motionless wings (who
could help wishing he possessed such a glorious power?).
At last the bell, which a few hours ago had pealed through
the hot and dusty streets of the city, now sent its deafening
voice to die away among the echoes of the mountains, and
the passengers to be landed at B Point, upon whose
beautiful and verdant acclivity Rose Hill stood, were obliged
to get down a very unsafe sort of ladder, into a still more
unsafe-looking small boat, most perilously attached by a
rope to the always rapidly advancing steamer, all of which
looked like a reasonable chance of favouring the merry
party with a ducking. But the descent into their rather
ticklish seats was most boldly and successfully made
boxes, portmanteaus, umbrellas, valises came tumbling in
one after the other, and sometimes two at once, and off
dashed the boat, in a style which there is not time here to
describe at all, only there were various wavings of white
pocket-handkerchiefs from the steamer to those in the little
boat, and they in the little boat waved back again theirs to
those in the steamer, and Miss Elton sat quietly thoughtful
in the stern, while Frank wished, with all his heart, she
might fall overboard, that he might jump in after her, only
he would not have had her wet the sole of her shoe for
twenty worlds, lest she might take cold, andbut stop:
here we are already ashore. Out go people and
portmanteaus
(the captain of the Chancellor Livingston made things
fly); the little boat was already far off; the steamer began
to puff, and blow, and pant, and thunder at a greater
distance
;
and the first thing Seth and Glendenning knew, they
found themselves winding up a most sweet and odoriferous
road, shaded with cedar, and oak, and sycamore, and locust,
and wild roses, and all sorts of trees and flowers that make
the air smell delicious; and then they were all standing on
the portico of one of the most perfectly beautiful
country-houses
that (at least so thought Seth) ever was or could
possibly be seen, or even conceived. It
was
a sweet
place (Rose Hill), but we are not going to describe it.
CHAPTER XX.
Perhaps
there never were any people, altogether, quite
so happy as the party now assembled at Rose Hill. There
never was such glorious weather, such capital eatables,
such delicious butter, and honey, and marmalade, and
preserves
,
and cherry-wine, and ice-cream, and home-made
bread, and fruit-pie, and, in short, all sorts of the very nicest
things imaginable. White and Glendenning were fairly
fascinated
;
and even Fanny, although she had some reason
not to be as gay as she had been in other years, even she
could not resist the effect of the bright scenes, hilarious
and inspiriting incidents, and very agreeable people around
her. As for little Seth, he had got to be quite a different
person; as his true character developed itself, he was found,
besides being not at all wanting in intelligence, so
warm-hearted
,
grateful, and amiable, that he became a favourite.
His stiff awkwardness gave place to more freedom of
manner
,
and the changes going on in his heart began to show
themselves on his countenance.
But if Seth appeared to have undergone a favourable
alteration, in Glendenning there was perceptible a much
greater one. He soon captivated his hospitable
entertainers
,
and their obvious partiality for and complete forgiveness
of him had a serious effect upon him. Frank and he were
really become attached friends. Their prompt and daring
courage and impetuosity of disposition were not unlike, only
Vol. I.M
Frank's had been better regulated by education. Both were
possessed of many of the faults as well as the virtues of
youthhot-headed, thoughtless, passionate, and
inexperienced
,
but generous, affectionate, noble, and impressionable.
They soon learned to love each other sincerely.
Glendenning
,
sensible of his culpable folly and heartily ashamed of
his past life, evinced in various ways his sincere
repentance
and desire to reform; and it was not in the power of
the amiable family to see any one so truly inspired with
good resolutions, without conceiving for him both sympathy
and friendship.
There are periods when all that the earth affords of
happiness
seems gathered around us, and all its evils and cares
disappear, just as some rare days break without a chill, a
cloud, or a breath of wind. The brightness and repose of
outward nature descend into our hearts. Our capacity for
happiness is full. Not only do the trees, sky, rivers, and
fields wear an unwonted charm, but the people around us
appear invested only with grace and love, and arouse in us
all our better feelings, as if they were so many radiant
angels
.
Who has not come suddenly upon some such a
happy
valley in life's pilgrimage, where he would fain have
lingered
forever, but that the dusky phantoms of fate beckoned
him onward, and the resistless and invisible current of
circumstances
,
flowing with its turbid tide on and on, bears
him away to other scenes, leaving only an enchanting
recollection
of these little holydays of the heart? And who
has not felt, at such moments, the mysterious nearness
the viewless and noiseless presence of supernatural things?
who has not observed that these intervals of peace and joy
(not the legitimate inheritance of the fallen race which is
doomed to eat of the ground in sorrow all the days of its
life) come often just before some terrible crisis?
The week at Rose Hill was one of those periods of
unusual
enjoyment, and the only drawback upon all the fun at
present was the necessity which called Mr. Lennox back
to town early Monday morning, with the promise, however,
to call and see them again Friday or Saturday. Music,
drives, sketching and riding, gay and instructive
conversation
,
poetry and literature, and, on all sides, the unreserved
confidences of the heart. Glendenning wondered he had
ever sought happiness in such different circles.
They had arrived at Rose Hill on Tuesday, and it was
arranged that they should remain at least one week. The
first afternoon and evening were devoted to an examination
of the house and grounds. There were an excellent farm,
a delightful garden; conservatories, promenades, etc., etc.,
etc.; a drive along a road following the river, and
presenting
a series of views remarkable for beauty: and then the
family assembled in the drawing-rooms, which opened upon
a balcony extending entirely around the house, and which
was situated in so commanding a site, that the gorgeous
and picturesque Highland river-scenery was spread out
beneath
and above like a superb panorama. Here the
tea-table
gathered together not only the members of the party,
but half a dozen distinguished strangers, either visiters at
West Point, distant a short sail on the opposite side, or
from some of the neighbouring seats. The expensive and
elegant style in which Mr. Lennox lived, the luxurious
furniture
and very well-kept grounds; the opulence which
made itself seen in all the details of the domestic
arrangement
opulence,
showing itself, however, rather in matters
of comfort and genuine hospitality than displaysurprised
the two young officers, who had both been impressed with
the idea that English comfort was not to be found in quite
such perfection out of the sea-girt isle.
Little Seth saw in all this only a dream of perfect
enchantment
.
He roamed about the grounds with his mouth
open, peered into the garden, sat, half stupified with delight,
looking at the magnificent landscape which lay beneath and
above him, mingling silently with the persons who made
up the evening party, bearing their jokes with immovable
good-humour, hearing them talk, wondering at the easy flow
of their words, and the bold and sportive way in which they
spoke to each other, and in which they did the most serious
as the most trifling things, and, in short, enjoying a great
many new thoughts and feelings. Mary was his
ever-faithful
friend. She explained everything to him which he did
not understand, told him where to go, and what to do and
say, laughed him out of his bad grammar and country
phrases, arranged his cravat and collar in a way so
becoming
that he was quite surprised himself at his genteel
appearance
,
and was not likely to forget her manner of tying
the knot in front. When she ordered him up to let her
examine
him sometimeswhen she fixed her eyes on him
with a scrutinizing look, gave him various instructions, put
aside the hair from his forehead with her own soft, white
hand, and arranged it around his temples, he said nothing,
but he thought and felt a great deal. He felt as if he had
entered into a new world, and as if a new soul had entered
into his body.
Several days thus passed away delightfully. It seemed
that none of them had ever before been so happy. Every
morning saw our merry party early up and abroad upon
some expedition of pleasure: a visit to some picturesque
part of the shore in Harry's boat, or a drive and walk to the
summit of some neighbouring mountain which commanded
a celebrated view. From breakfast till dinner, riding,
boating
shooting sometimes, driving, newspapers, reviews, and
calls every day. The whole party dined out or received at
home, or made pic-nic parties to interesting spots. In the
afternoons and evenings, when the sun, descending into a
sea of glory, increased in splendour as the fierceness of his
beams abated, and the cool, refreshing night air, full of
perfumes
,
braced the nerves and soothed the spirits,
Glendenning
thought he had never seen a spot of the earth where
he should so like to spend his life, nor people with whom
his days would glide more pleasantly away. He had no
family or home. His father, his only living relative, had
discovered so little consideration for or interest in him that,
however a sense of duty might modify his sentiments, he
could not look forward to a return to the paternal roof as an
event either possible or desirable. Here, at once, all the
best qualities of his mind, all the noblest impulses of his
heart, were called into being; and, as he became more
acquainted
with Mary, a dream of happiness rose up in his
imagination, which, however immature, gave a great weight
to the maternal counsels of Mrs. Lennox, and a new impulse
to his schemes of reformation and self-improvement. In
short, if Mary had given him the least encouragement, he
would have fallen in love in the same off-handed way in
which he did everything else. Whatever was the
adventure
which presented itself to hima noble or a foolish
action
,
a love-scrape or a duelin he went headlong at ten
minutes' notice.
During these fine times Mrs. Lennox by no means
neglected
her serious plan of turning Glendenning's attention to
the subject of religion. The hope of convincing a young
officer of such a disposition, and with whom her
acquaintance
had originated in such a singular manner, would have
been thought, by most persons, rather Quixotic. But her
genuine piety did not suffer itself to be discouraged by any
ordinary objection, and she was delighted to find her task
infinitely easier than she had dared to hope. Glendenning's
facile nature was now softened by happiness and the
novelty
of pure and rational attachments. Mrs. Lennox's
sweetness
of manner, which only reflected that of her countenance
and soul, had a pleasing effect upon him. He was, as we
have before observed, so completely ignorant of the nature
of our divine religion, and of the evidence by the aid of
which it has resisted the stormy shocks and wearing
influences
of so many centuries, and she was so well acquainted
with the subject, and was able so clearly to explain that
which she so clearly understood, that she soon succeeded
in raising in him both astonishment and curiosity. She
artfully
availed herself of many an interval to appeal frankly to
his good sense and calm reason, and she had the
gratification
to see that he was sufficiently ingenuous to confess
when her facts were new to him and her arguments
unanswerable
.
He listened at first with respect, and afterward
with unfeigned attention and increasing interest, laid
candidly
before her all his ignorance and all his objections, and
saw that the ground he stood on was taken by her earnest
and pious eloquence and superior knowledge, inch by inch,
from beneath his feet. He promised her, at last, that he
would make a full study of the subject the first duty of his
future life; that if doubts continued in his way, he would
apply
to her before he yielded to them, and that he would
correspond
with her after his departure, and let her know the
progress of his opinions. There was in this no affectation.
He
had
been very much impressed by new views of what,
he saw, he had never understood, or even taken the trouble
to examine. His nature was not wanting in the purity
requisite in a believer, but only in the stability, strength,
and seriousness. But what he would never have sought
himself, this best of friends presented to him with
disinterested
anxiety for his welfare. She began to love him with
almost the force of a mother, and her gentle, affectionate,
and intelligent character had not failed to awaken in his
breast reciprocal sentiments.
After one of these long conversations, during a ramble
through a neighbouring wood, when she had separated him
M 2
from the rest of the company to pursue, without interruption,
her plan of awakening his attention to the subject of religion,
the whole party returned to the house, where, after a slight
repast, Mrs. Lennox reminded them they might expect her
husband and Harry by the noon boat. It was therefore
proposed to go down to the landing at the proper hour, and
receive the new visiters with all the honours of war.
Accordingly
,
at about one o'clock, the whole party repaired to
the spot, laughing and talking as friends who have spent a
week in the country are very apt to talk, for nothing brings
mind and heart closer together than such an interval of
uninterrupted
intimacy. A few moments after their arrival
they discovered a light cloud of ascending smoke and steam
peering over the summit of a green hill, then the plunging
strokes of the wheels and panting of the engine, and
immediately
the large and stately vessel, more like a floating
palace
than a boat, darted from behind a projecting angle of
black, broken rock, with the well-known barge cleaving the
foamy flood at its side, and containing the three figures of
Mr. Lennox, Harry, and Mr. Emmerson.
Hallo! hurrah, boys! how are you? here we are!
shouted Lennox, waving his hat. Now then, my fine
fellows
,
out with ye. Hand up the valise. That's it; all
right! How d'ye do? How de do?
And then the various embraces and shaking hands
natural
to the occasion. As Lennox and Mrs. Elton did not find
it convenient to stop talking, the exclamations of the rest
were edged in as well as they could; and as nobody waited
for any answers, it was pretty much all the same in the end.
Emmerson's face was all smiles and blandness, though his
gratulations, like everything else he did, were performed in
a quiet way.
But what's the matter with you, Harry? said his
mother
;
you don't look well.
Oh yes, perfectly. Never so well and so gay in my
life, said Harry, rousing himself from a revery.
Where's Fanny? demanded Lennox.
Here she is, at least here she
was
, or I thought she was
here.
Didn't she come down? asked Mary.
No, I don't think she did, said Frank. I observed she
was not with us.
Up the steep, fragrant foot-path they wound, and met
Fanny just coming down, looking quiet, but Mrs. Lennox
thought it was not altogether a natural tranquillity. She had
observed, when she spoke of the arrival of the party by the
boat, a certain change in her expression and manner, which
revived a thought not altogether a stranger to her mind.
CHAPTER XXI.
Mr. Lennox
had brought up with him newspapers,
magazines
,
caricatures, and letters. He was, besides, full of
town news, and rattled away faster than ever. He met
White and Glendenning with the hearty, hilarious
hospitality
which belonged to his character, kissed Fanny
whenever
he could catch her, and seemed in high glee. The
dinner hour arrived before they had time to ask and answer
all their mutual questions, and Champagne and cigars upon
the beautiful flower-wreathed piazza succeeded.
The piazza extended entirely around the house, so as to
form a most agreeable promenade. It was at this time that
Fanny, who had withdrawn herself again from the family
when the cold, melancholy manners of Harry, only relieved
at times by a forced gayety, oppressed her with a feeling
of painful uneasiness, was surprised by the sudden and
silent appearance of Emmerson close at her sideso close
and unexpected, indeed, that the sigh which happened at
the moment to escape her was perceived by him.
Does Miss Elton sigh? said Emmerson, with more
than his usual gentleness.
Did I? said Fanny, blushing. I really was not
aware.
Miss Elton, I am going to ask your advice.
Advice? mine! Oh, Mr. Emmerson, she replied,
laughing, on what subject could I pretend to advise
you?
And why not
me?
said he, smiling blandly.
Oh, because
you
, of all men, know best how to act on
every occasion. I might ask advice from you, but to give
it I wish I were worthy.
My dear Miss Elton, do your words really express your
sincere sentiments?
Why, certainly.
Your good opinion makes me happy. To say the truth,
I do not exactly so much propose to seek your
advice
as to
offer you mymy confidence.
If I can serve you by receiving it, replied the young
girl, both pleased and flattered by the respectful attention
of one so generally esteemed.
Listen to me, then. Mr. Lennox, you know, has long
desired to retire in some degree from his profession. He
yesterday made me an offer of one half the income of the
office, which cannot amount to less than $5000, and may go
considerably beyond it.
I congratulate you with all my heart, said Miss Elton.
But I have an objection to receiving this obligation.
What! from Mr. Lennox? What objection can you
have? You accept only what you are entitled to. I have
frequently heard him say you have been of the greatest
service
to him. He is rich enough himself, and, in retiring,
has certainly the full right to choose his successor.
But this son of histhis Harry.
Miss Elton was silent.
I have already told you, Miss Elton, my secret opinion
of this young man. He can never himself make a good
lawyer or a good man. He is too light and fickle; too
tooyet, nevertheless,
ought
I to accept a share of what, it
may possibly be considered, should of right fall to him alone?
If his father found your assistance necessary, it is not
likely he could dispense with it.
It is not exactly that. I am under a great
embarrassment
in communicating to you what I have now to say;
but, as your old friend and your father's, you will allow me,
won't you, to speak frankly?
You cannot offend me, said she, although a colour
overspread her face as she spoke, because I know
whatever
you say will be the
truth
, and because you have
already
,
with the disinterestedness of real friendship, rescued
me from a great danger.
Then, this is it: while the slightest possibility
remained
of your yielding to what will probably be the serious wish
of his family, in receiving the addresses of Mr. Henry
Lennox
Mr. Emmerson, said Fanny, let me assure you, there
is as little danger of his preferring as of my accepting any
such proposition.
I breathe again, said Emmerson, extending his hand
to hers, which she did not refuse. I should, in fact, be
doubly distressed at the possibility of your union with him;
first, because he is unworthy of you, as I have already told
you, and, secondly, because, my dearest Miss Elton, I
have, after much painful resolution to the contrary on my
part and a deep sense of my own presumption, determined
to throw myself upon your generosity, your good sense,
your excellent understandingtoin shortto ask your
advice respecting my
own
future prospects.
In what way, Mr. Emmerson?
I am now in possession of an independent income, and
I have, moreover, an opportunity, by a fortunate
speculation
,
of turning it into a large fortune.
You really delight me, said Fanny, while such lively
pleasure beamed from her face that Emmerson could not
doubt either its strength or sincerity.
May I then venture to hope that the sentiments of
unalterable
regard with which you have inspired me, and
which, you say, I have had the happiness to inspire on
your sidedare I venture to hope that the clear
intelligence
of Miss Elton, superior to the illusions of youth or
the impulses of any mere girlish passion, may condescend
to allow me to reveal to her the earnest and profound
esteem
which I have
myself
entertained for her? may I hope
to find in her not only advice on temporary occasions, but an
adviser to cheer and guide my future steps through life? In
offering you my hand, I need scarcely say, my heart has
been yours from the moment I first beheld you.
Miss Elton fixed her eyes upon her companion, as he
closed this speech, with an astonishment and consternation
which prevented her uttering a single word in reply.
Consider the
advantages
a union with me would ensure
to you. A friend, soberly and unchangeably attached, who
has passed the danger of youth, with me your days will not
be clouded with doubt or your feelings harrowed by
dissipation
.
No bloody duels or midnight brawls! but our lives
will glide peacefully on, without a doubt to shade or a care
to interrupt them. My dear Miss Elton, I have for years
looked forward to this moment as the most importantthe
most delightful of my life. Answer me: will you be mine?
Consider the advantages a union with me would secure to
us both. Do not hesitate.
I do not hesitate, replied Miss Elton; but, as she
raised her eyes, she beheld Harry close behind
Emmerson
,
his form drawn back in stern surprise, mingled with
embarrassment. He had evidently, and by mere accident,
overheard the last words of Emmerson and her own.
Conscious
of the impression he must have derived from them,
she became so unusually agitated that Emmerson once more
took her hand. Harry had already disappeared.
I do not hesitate, repeated she, or, if I did, it was
only from amazement. Respect and esteem I shall always
feel towards you, Mr. Emmerson, but I can never entertain
any warmer sentiment.
Let me at least request, Miss Elton, said Emmerson,
after a pause, and with a look of deep mortification, that
you will consider my offer a
confidential secret
.
Certainly, sir.
Have I your promise?
You have.
Hallo here! where are these runaways? said Mr.
Lennox's voice. What, Emmerson, are you making love
to Fanny?
I should hardly presume, said Emmerson, laughing in
an easy way, which rather surprised Miss Elton in one she
had always considered so artless and sincere.
We're going out in the boat to see St. Anthony's Nose.
Bring along the young lady, and take good care of her,
mind!
CHAPTER XXII.
Glad
of an opportunity to run away, Fanny went in after
her bonnet, and in a few moments the whole party were
on their way down the steep, winding path, talking and
laughing, Mr. Lennox occasionally rallying Emmerson
upon having been detected in making love to Miss Elton,
as if the very idea were the most capital joke conceivable.
Emmerson received and replied to this badinage with a
skilful duplicity, which let Fanny still more into the
peculiarities
of his character, and awoke in her mind a train of
serious reflections. In the first place, she recollected a
thousand instances of kindness and delicate private
attention
bestowed upon her as long back as she could
remember
,
and which she had always ascribed to the
disinterested
partiality of a father. She recollected that it was
Emmerson
who had accidentally interrupted her interview
with Harry, when that young gentleman had commenced
to make to her the offer of his heart and hand. When she
next saw him, it was again Emmerson, who, on the grounds
of paternal disinterestedness, had addressed her on the
subject
of Harry, had warned her against him by repeated
hints and innuendoes, as one who, to oblige his parents,
might put on a show of attachment, but who had confessed
to him his hope that he might be rejected, and his sincere
passion for another. In looking back over her whole
acquaintance
with Emmerson from her present point of view,
she could perceive how greatly he had influenced her, and
how cautiously and
secretly
he had always done it. Every
dark hint had been breathed in a whisper; every secret
innuendo uttered in strict confidence. In short, from various
things, she began to suspect that he was sly. The affair
looked like an intrigue, however irreconcilable with his
irreproachable
character. These new thoughts at length
produced
another, which at once overwhelmed her with
pleasure
and pain. She had, then, without grounds, rejected
and insulted Harry, whom she had sincerely loved till
Emmerson
had shaken her confidence in him. She had, then,
been sincerely and honestly loved by Harry, and she had
thrown him away forever. The poor fellow little knew with
what a changed heart she walked silently down the hill by
his side.
The boat in question was a large and beautiful one, built
for Harry, who loved solitary excursions among the
mountains
,
as well as such merry parties as the present. It
accommodated
the whole company, and the two men who
aided
in managing the sail, or, when necessary, the oars. A
fine breeze carried them swiftly forward beneath West
Point, and within sight of the famous Nose, which
tradition
(or the genius of Irving) has immortalized as that of
the saint. A great many bright things were said, as all
were in high glee except Fanny, who had sunk into a
silent
revery, and Emmerson, who, what with the entire
failure
of his attack on Miss Elton, and his jealous displeasure
at seeing the happiness of little Seth, looked rather yellow
and bilious.
At length the breeze died entirely away, and the little
sail hung idly against the mast. The general merriment,
too, was rather checked by the sight of a deep, heavy
thunder-cloud
,
which began to project a ragged, ink-black,
island-looking
edge over the outline of the green hill above
their head and into the transparent azure of the sky. This
threatening visiter had been concealed by the mountain till
it was just ready to burst upon the breathless scene. The
ladies were alarmed, of course, for their bonnets, if not for
their lives. Some spoke of a squall, and others of
lightning
,
while the bravest acknowledged that a proper
drenching
was tolerably inevitable. The oars were put out, and,
manned each one by two, made the boat advance with
velocity
towards the shore, but scarcely so fast as the
prodigious
mass of pointed vapour above them, which, lowering
with the portentous opaqueness of granite, seemed pursuing
them with ominous fury. Although the gentlemen were
positive as to their security from the lightning, from which
the high hills afforded a sufficient protection, yet dreadful
squalls often forced their way down the high and narrow
ravines. The lowering cloud, however, still delayed to
pour down its contents or to launch the terrible bolt, and
the boat seemed happily destined to reach the shore before
the tempest commenced, when a violent wind swept over
the smooth water, and soon lashed it into such waves as a
good deal interfered with the skill of Harry, who had taken
the helm, and was guiding it directly to the shelter of a
steep, overhanging rock, projecting into the deep channel
of the river. At this moment a sudden shout sent terror
into every bosom. A sloop, with all sail set, suddenly
appeared
turning the point at a fearful velocity, making so
directly
for the boat as to render the destruction of all on
board apparently certain. The danger was sudden and
appalling
.
The helmsman of the sloop, startled by the fierce
command of Harry, appeared stunned into stupid inactivity,
and let her come steadily on without in the least altering
her course.
Save the ladies! shouted Harry.
Save
me!
cried Emmerson, save me!
Each gentleman seized one of his fair companions, ready
to leap overboard with her, except Emmerson, who, without
thinking of any one but himself, clung to the stout farm-lad
next him in such a convulsive way, that he actually pushed
Miss Elton into the stern, where her danger was imminent,
both of falling overboard and of being crushed to death by
the heavy and swiftly-advancing mass. Harry, who had
just perceived that, by the power of his own helm, he had
cleared the main body of the sloop, but that a piece of heavy
timber projecting from her low deck might come in contact
with Miss Elton, who was standing in mute terror, leaped
forward and bore her back, but at the peril of his own life;
for, while he succeeded in rescuing her from certain death,
he stumbled himself, and, receiving a severe blow, fell
headlong
into the river. The voices of the ladies, which thus
far actual fright had restrained, now vented their emotions
in a general shriek, among which that of Mrs. Lennox and
Fanny was not the least loud. The sloop swept fearfully
by; the little boat rocked violently in the billows of its
wake, and Harry appeared to have sunk beneath forever.
My son! save him! Harry! he's gone!
Nonsense, said Lennox; he swims like a duck.
A moment of intense anxiety passed, and There he is!
broke from every lip. But Frank had already plunged into
the stream; for, on reappearing, it was perceived that the
young man, instead of beating the waves with his athletic
arms, lay like a senseless corpse upon the flood, and then
sank slowly out of sight. The next moment he was borne
into the boat by Frank, but senseless, and his forehead
stained with blood from a wound. At this moment the
thunder burst from the cloud, the lightning seemed to set
earth and heaven in a blaze, and a deluge poured itself
down upon the unfortunate pleasure party.
He's dead! he's dead! cried Mrs. Lennox.
To save my life, which I would have sacrificed a
thousand
times for him! cried Fanny, beside herself with grief
and horror.
Even in that terrible moment, this remark, and the
manner
in which it was uttered, struck Frank, Emmerson, and
Mrs. Lennox, and was afterward remembered. Only love
the most passionate and sincere could have inspired it; and
the poor young girl, covering her face with her hands,
remained
in a state impossible to be described.
In a few moments they reached the shore, and the body
was conveyed into a farmer's house, where, in a very short
Vol. I.N
time, to the unutterable delight of everybody, it not only
came to, under the various appliances usual on such
occasions
,
but presently appeared in a standing position, and
arrayed in a suit of Farmer Smith's Sunday-go-to-meeting
clothes. In the mean while the carriage had been sent for,
and the ladies, with very mixed emotions of grief, joy,
horror
,
and being very wet, had attired themselves in various
articles of Mrs. Smith's and Mrs. Smith's daughter's
wardrobe
,
and, by the time the carriage arrived, they were all
ready to be put in, and (Harry first) entered accordingly
some on the box, and forming the most
extraordinary-looking
party of pleasure that ever was seen; they all reached
Rose Hill, went to bed, took warm egg-nog, and tea, punch,
etc., etc., etc., and, by the time the storm had passed away
and the sunshine had come out again, they had all
reassembled
in the drawing-rooms in unexceptionable toiletsthe
gentlemen in a high state of elegance and glee, the ladies
looking lovelier than ever; Harry somewhat pale and
interesting
,
and appearing very advantageously behind a large
bit of sticking-plaster (which the doctor had applied, with
the assurance that no possible bad effect could arise from
the accident, at least as far as concerned his bodily health),
and Miss Elton in a state of most becoming embarrassment,
endeavouring in vain to keep her usual cool composure of
manner, through her painful consciousness that she had
betrayed
a degree of interest for Harry, which, whatever
might be her real sentiments, she had had no intentions to
communicate confidentially to a whole boatful of people at
once. Never did she appear so beautiful, so timid, or with
so little definite idea what she should do with herself.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The
next day was the one fixed for the departure of the
guests, and, on this their last evening, the family assembled
on the broad piazza very much softened by the accident so
nearly fatal to one, if not to all. The idea of danger
escaped
is an agreeable one, and, while it renders more lively
the sense of existence, it excludes from the mind
commonplace
thoughts and prepares the heart for the tenderest
emotions
.
The sun went slowly down, as if he hated to leave
such a beautiful scene, and the western sky was all bathed
in hues of purple and gold. The moon rose broadly and
silently up over the hilltops, and every instant the sweet
summer night made some delightful change in the soft
landscape
.
The fire-flies flashed and floated in the black
shadows
of the woods and hillsides, and the softened cry of the
frog and katydid was blended from the distant shore with
the sturgeons plash, or music from the deck of a passing
steamboat, or the barking of some farmyard dog, or the
occasional
voice of a sailor from the sloops that stole around
the point beneath. Never had Glendenning felt before what
it was to possess a mind and a soul, what it was to love
poetry
and music, and that the rational being may enjoy
pleasures
,
tranquil and innocent, and far superior to those vulgar
amusements in which he had wasted so much of his youth.
A sadness by no means unpleasant, but very different
from the noisy mirth which had, till now, animated the
party
,
appeared to have fallen over them. In some bosoms
this sadness was not without a definite cause, while in the
rest it was but the vague shadow of half-felt presentiments
or tender memories. Each one had peculiar thoughts which
checked idle mirth. Mrs. Lennox had detected in Miss
Elton the secret of her soul, and regarded Frank with
sympathy
.
She was also but partly recovered from the shock
of her late alarm, for her maternal heart was absorbed in
her children, and she felt if she erred in loving the earth too
much, they were the cause: Where the treasure is, there
will the heart be also. She beheld in Glendenning, too,
a noble young man, who only wanted advisers to preserve
him in a path of virtue and piety, but who, with a most
impressionable
nature, was about re-entering into the dangerous
vortex of life.
Frank and Emmerson had both marked the expression of
Miss Elton on seeing what she supposed the dead body of
Harry, and both formed the same opinion as to its meaning,
although this opinion awoke in their separate breasts very
different emotions. In Frank, a melancholy, despairing
conviction that his attachment was hopeless, while it
strengthened his affection for both Miss Elton and his
brother: in Emmerson, mean rage against Miss Elton and
a malignant envy of his successful rival. The character of
this gentleman, however artfully he placed it before the
world, and however carefully he guarded it against all
manifestations
,
could not be examined closely and tested fairly
without betraying its selfish meanness and quiet perfidy.
He saw Miss Elton had detected him, and he trembled for
his profitable place in the family of his benefactor. These
thoughts made him wretched, and painted themselves on his
pale and silent countenance. No one, however, but Miss
Elton knew how to read there the workings of a bad heart,
disappointed in a treacherous attempt to undermine and
calumniate
the son of his patron. By a mutual instinct, she
appeared to have discovered him, and he to know that he
was exposed.
The conversation naturally dwelt long on the accident,
which Mr. Lennox attempted to turn into a capital joke, but
in which his wife found food for serious reflection. Fanny
was silent and subdued, and scarcely ventured to thank
Harry for the life he had preserved. When she did so, she
found, with a feeling not far from anguish, that to her
gentle
words and strangely altered demeanour he returned only
cold replies. Since the interview in which she had so
seriously
insulted him, and in which he had sworn never again
to resume the subject of his love, he had invariably met her
with the same distant but guarded courtesy, but as she
scarcely addressed him in a different manner, she could not
be surprised or disappointed. The suspicions she had now
conceived of Emmerson, and the tender emotion Harry had
betrayed in the moment of her danger, had entirely altered
her feelings, and she knew not whether gratitude or love
most actuated her in the words she addressed to her
preserver
,
and in her manner of uttering them. But the
unchanged
civility with which they were received, and with
which the advances towards reconciliation were thrown
back, filled her with an astonishment which certainly she
had no right to experience if she had known the delicacy,
the pride, and the high character of her lover, and the
various
impressions of her which had been communicated to
him. She perceived now for the first time, with
amazement
and consternation, that his attachment was really
chilled
,
perhaps destroyed forever, and grief for her loss was
mingled with indignation against Emmerson, whom, with
the unexamining ardour of a young girl, she concluded to
be the cause. It was not, therefore, without a certain
delightful
tremour that she heard Mr. Lennox say Harry should
not return with him to town, but that he should remain a
week at Rose Hill to recover from the effects of the
accident
and take care of the girls. Harry strenuously resisted,
until, overcome by the general voice, he declared he would
not consent unless Glendenning and White would also
remain
two or three days. This they both pronounced
seriously
impossible, on which Harry, who declared himself
perfectly recovered, persevered in his intention to return to
the city the next Sunday afternoon.
While the rest of the company were laughing and
talking
over their ice-cream at one end of the piazza, Mrs.
Lennox
walked to and fro on the other, leaning on
Glendenning's
arm, and engaged in earnest conversation.
I don't know what it is, my dear Captain Glendenning:
I am not generally, I hope, very superstitious, but I feel a
painful presentiment on seeing you return to Montreal.
Such a confession gives me pleasure rather than pain,
said Glendenning; for, while it convinces me of your
friendship, it does not alarm me for my safety. But what
is it you fear?
You will not be offended?
Can you ask such a question?
I fear, then, yourself. I fear lest new scenes and
influences
hereafter prevent your perseverance in your
present
mode of self-cultivation and self-government. I fear
your compliance, even against your own sense of right, with
the customs of the worldyour yielding to its passions,
temptations, and illusions.
Mrs. Lennox, you do me injustice. I can never forget
the time I have spent with you amid this beautiful scene of
nature, charmed and refined by such hearts and minds as
those of your family. My character has been neglected,
but I feel the stirrings of its better qualities.
You
have
awakened in me a sense of religion; at least, of the
possibility
that it may be true. It is no longer, in my eyes,
ridiculous or impossible; and with this sentiment will
always
remain recollections of my happy visit to Rose Hill.
Do you think I can ever forget these mountains, that river,
this happy domestic circle, and the hours we have spent
together
?
Shall I ever forget our rides and rambles, the
sloops stealing on their course beneath us, and the
steamboats
staining the woods and sky with smoke? Shall I
N 2
ever forget this delicious evening? and, more than all,
touched as I am with your magnanimous forgiveness of a
mad act, and with the generous attachments I have formed
in your family, can I forget that you have returned good for
evil, and endeavoured to rescue me from my worst enemy
myself?
I hope not; but you are young. A military life is not
favourable to the continuance of the impressions you now
entertain. If circumstances threw you into another duel,
should you have the firmness to resist?
I think I should.
Not unless supported by unwavering faith in
Christianity
.
Nothing else can sustain you. That alone makes a
man calm, lofty, and unselfish. There is no philosopher
like the Christian. Neither his principles nor his reward
depend upon this fluctuating world. You are not yet a
Christian, but you are destined to be one. Read the
volumes
I have given you. You are, I hope, destined to
undergo
an important change: I mean, you are to be
converted
.
Do not smile at a term which is not, I am aware,
quite free from very commonplace, perhaps ridiculous and
vulgar associations. But you must go on, despite those and
other influences, to a study of religion. I am older than
you. I have studied it. Believe me, no man (I speak not
only my own sentiments, but those of some of the greatest
men, the most learned, cool, practical, and sensible that have
ever lived, such, for instance, as Washington, Newton,
Butler
,
and a host of others),
no man
can examine all the
evidences
of Christianity without confessing them to be
unanswerable
.
There is no equivocation; there is no
possibility
of escape. Hume, Voltaire, and Volney never did
examine
them candidly. The works of the latter traveller,
called his Ruins, abound at every page with proofs that
he had not carefully read the Scriptures, that he did not
know their meaning; and as for Voltaire, he somewhere
speaks of the `
Pentateuch
and the
rest of the books of
Moses
.'
The whole purpose of this life is to place man in
possession of truth by means of his own free search, and the
doubtful features of the Christian scheme are meant, as
Grotius (another great believer) asserts, to
try
us. He says
that the proof given of Christianity is less than it might have
been, so that it may be a `touchstone for trying the docility
and soundness of a man's mind.' You must read, and you
will then see that Christ was once offered to bear the sins
of many, and unto them that look for him shall he appear
the second time, without sin unto salvation.
I am, in truth, very ignorant, said Glendenning.
Will you study the subject? asked Mrs. Lennox.
Will you examinewill you hear what the believers in
Christianity, such men as Grotius, have to say in support
of their faith?
I will, I give you my word.
Study it, if it is only to find out evidence of its
falsehood
.
Indeed, I will.
And if I can be the means of awakening your mind to
these truthsif, under Him who disposes of all things, I
can be an humble instrument, I shall think Providence has
conducted you in mercy under our roof.
Glendenning was touched with the interest she showed
in him. He had no distinct idea that the religion she so
warmly pressed upon his attention was true; but he was
grateful for the mother's love she manifested, and the
memory
of his own mother was the softening and purifying idea
of his character.
Shall I trust you? said Mrs. Lennox.
As I am a gentleman.
I had rather you had said, as you are a Christian.
Perhaps, when I see you again, I shall say so!
CHAPTER XXIV.
Glendenning
retired to bed at a late hour, for the night
was so deliciously bright and tranquil he could scarcely tear
himself away, and the little happy circle, remembering they
might, perhaps, never spend another evening together, were
but too ready to postpone the hour of separation. The
conversation
took a confidential and almost a romantic and
tender
tone, sometimes interrupted by a remark of Mr.
Lennox
,
which set every one laughing, or by a glee, which the
young ladies were very fond of joining in with Frank.
Harry coldly abstained from taking a part, but listened to
the sweet voice of Fanny as it sometimes trembled on
words which might seem to bear a reference to her own
position and feelings. Emmerson, whose presence,
somehow
or other, threw a chill over the group, had withdrawn
early to a book, and then to bed. This last evening of
Glendenning
with the Lennoxes often afterward recurred to his
memory.
The next evening he was to start at nine by the passing
Albany boat.
The regret felt by all at the breaking up of their
agreeable
party was concealed by none, and when they came out
upon the walk before the door to pay the parting
salutations
,
Mrs. Elton talking the whole time to each individual
in his and her turn, her eyes swimming in tearsMr.
Lennox
laughing and joking to hide his softened feelings
Frank embracing affectionately his departing friend, and
even Miss Elton and Mary protesting that they should read
no more poetry, have no more music, make no more
excursions
for a month, Glendenning began to feel that he had
formed attachments of a serious nature, and some, or at
least one, which, had time and tide allowed, might have
become more serious still. Mary had excited in him a
certain
odd, warm, cold, curious sentiment, which a more
philosophical
stranger would have identified as an embryo
passion
.
The gay young lady herselfwe must do her justice
on this extremely delicate pointhad not dreamed of any
other feelings towards the warm-hearted, generous traveller
than a sincere and friendly interest.
There, there comes the boat, said Miss Elton; I see
the sparks over the trees, on that broad part of the river
Don't you see?
Yes, too well, said Glendenning.
It will be here exactly in twenty minutes.
And have all my joys, then, shrunk to this little
measure
?
Now, you don't believe what a monstrous tender-hearted
being this travelling companion of mine is, said White.
He won't be worth anything for a month.
God bless you, God bless you, broke from every lip,
as the general shaking of hands was renewed and renewed
again, till everybody's heart was beating double quick time
in their bosom. Write us often, I'll always answer, and
Come down again next summer, and Don't forget to
read Halleck, and Irving, and Bryant, and We shall see
the boat as you come under this point, and I'll wave a
handkerchief to you, and I'll be on the upper deck, and
wave mine, and We shall drink your health to-morrow
precisely at four, and then think of us, and There's the
bell, don't forget us! These and various other phrases
from all present were interrupted by,
We shall be too late, sir, in the quiet voice of the
coachman, as the bell of the steamboat rose in impatient,
quick peals through the trees from the river below.
Good-by, and God bless you.
And then some very hearty shaking of hands again, and
White leaped into the carriage with Frank and Lennox.
And now really good-by, said Glendenning, once more
shaking each of the ladies by the hand. Kind, dear Mrs.
Elton, I shall never forget you. Miss Elton, you have
forgiven
me like an angel, and I shall always recollect you as
one. Mrs. Lennox, I could call you my mother, and he
pressed her hand warmly to his lips. Miss Lennox, I
should be even more unhappy than I am if I didn't think
we should one day
Come, dn it, said Lennox, if you don't want to be
left behind, young man
He sprang into the carriage.
Adieu. God bless you, and happiness be yours; and
mind, said Mrs. Lennoxremember! you have made a
promise!
The coachman cracked his whip, and the carriage
dashed
down the winding road, and was lost among the trees.
There goes as fine a fellow as ever lived, said Mrs.
Lennox.
And what does Mary think? said Mrs. Elton. He
will not carry away a whole heart, poor fellow. Such
expressive
eyes! such a sweet manner! Do you know,
really
,
my dear Mrs. Lennox
Let us go out on the point, where they will see us in
the moonlight.
The party repaired to the spot indicated by Mrs. Lennox,
where, after waiting some ten minutes, they heard once
again the loud bell, the voices of the captain and porters
below
,
then the heavy thunder of the revolving wheels, and
presently the black mass, glittering in the moonlight,
flashing
with lights, music bursting from her deck, the figures of
people passing to and fro, and, in the stern, a single form,
not recognisable in itself, but easily identified as
Glendenning
by the handkerchief which was slowly waved towards
them, till the moving city disappeared behind a sudden bend
among the mountains.
Thus they met, and thus they parted. How will they
meet again? But as none of the gay folks of Rose Hill
was gifted with the faculty of reading the future, the
question
,
which presented itself to more minds than one,
remained
as yet unanswered.
CHAPTER XXV.
The
charm of the Rose Hill circle was broken by the
departure of their two gay and pleasant guests. Other
thoughts and feelings now began to rise. Harry, who, true
lover as he was, despite his very unequivocal rejection, had
clung to a hope that the whole was the result of error,
and might one day be explained and arranged, imagined all
doubt terminated by the discovery he had accidentally made
of Miss Elton's partiality for a flirtation with Mr.
Emmerson
.
He had, therefore, in his own decisive way, changed
his mind entirely as to her character, and conceived an
opinion, in which he did not again intend to waver, that
this beautiful girl, with whom he had allowed himself to fall
so desperately in love; for whom he had come so near
blowing
his brains out; from whom he had tamely received an
insult as cruel as it was unnecessaryhe had come to the
conclusion that this lovely and engaging young person was
neither more nor less than a heartless coquette. His
opinion
,
however false, was not altogether without apparent
foundation. Both Frank and himself had been led to
declare
their passion, both, it seemed, drawn on by her arts,
and both, at the proper point, instantly and unmercifully
rejected
;
and now even Mr. Emmerson, a cold and obviously
unsocial man, old enough to be her father, was in his turn
ensnared, and was either really honoured with her
approbation
(for the air and attitude which had struck him appeared
to warrant such an idea), or was led on to think so by her
love of conquest. If she had accepted this last one of her
adorers, Harry felt, somehow or other, that he should equally
despise her heart and her understanding; but if he, too, had
been encouraged to form and confide his hopes only to be
in his turn rejected, the evidence of Miss Elton's proficiency
as a coquettea proficiency made perfect by so much
practice
would
scarcely require addition. In either case, Harry
awoke to a sense of his own weakness, and in his bosom
the idle anguish of disappointed love gave place to more
manly sentiments and resolutions. Like a dew-drop from
the lion's mane, he resolved to shake off the boyish folly,
and to meet Miss Elton with exactly the same polite regard
as he was accustomed to bestow on other indifferent young
ladies: a regard to be tempered, however, with
considerable
firmness, and a constant recollection of the character
and charms of his fair and dangerous enemy. These were
the reflections consequent upon his awkward interruption
of the
tte--tte
on the back balcony. Only the quiet
indignation
and contempt which it raised in his bosom could
have enabled him to sustain the pang with which he saw at
last dissolved into empty air all his hopes of all his
confidence
in Fanny Elton. It may be remarked, too, as among
the proverbial caprices to which the destiny of lovers is
exposed, that his passion seemed to be extinguished at the
very moment when, and by the very means by which, her
confidence in him was established, and all her doubting
tenderness was confirmed with more strength than ever.
Frank had read the young girl's heart more correctly;
he had seen the look of unutterable horror at the rising of
Harry's lifeless body. Even while he sprang to his
brother's
rescue, so inconceivably rapid are the operations of the
spirit, that blanched face, those clasped hands, that fervid
expression, crushed, as it were, by the shock of death from
a tender, breaking heart, were distinctly observed. From
that moment he abandoned all hope, all endeavour; and he
felt a double triumph in saving his brother's life, as he saw
the value she attached to it. He now longed for the orders
to repair to his post, once so dreaded. Seriously alarmed
for his peace of mind, he saw that, if he were destined ever
to master his unfortunate passion, it must be by tearing
himself away from her.
Emmerson's wily eye immediately perceived the course
things were taking. At first he had yielded himself only to
rage and mean envy, but now he began to think better of
his prospect. Without any particular regard for Miss
Elton, he had long fixed his eyes upon her large fortune,
which the profound vanity he cherished in secret, beneath
an exterior of striking modesty, induced him to suppose
might be brought within his reach, with proper
management
.
He saw Frank was forever out of his path, and that
Harry had fairly turned the tables on his mistress. Among
his peculiarities, although concealed from the world, was a
disposition to leave nothing unwon for want of striving to
obtain it, which he did, however, only with the utmost
slyness
;
for whatever he did was silent and mysterious. It
was by the aid, asked in a confidential way, of Harry, on
whom he had done his best to inflict a fatal injury, that he
had brought about the very arrangement with Mr. Lennox
by which he was to possess five thousand dollars a year.
His addresses to Miss Elton had been preferred much more
prematurely than he had intended, but the intoxicating
triumph
of his new arrangement had been rendered more
difficult
of resistance on that unlucky day by three or four
extra glasses of Champagne, forced upon him at dinner by
his generous patron. He had, however, been sufficiently
in possession of his usual diplomatic abilities to procu
from Miss Elton (and he knew she would never break
word) an unconditional promise of secrecy. If he c
not himself obtain the lovely heiress, he was resolved
Lennox should not. He disliked, because he envied
family. Their services to him were welcome enou
gratitude was not a blessed, but a cursed sensation
He was one of those men who hate in proportion
are obliged, and who, when it can be safely and
done,
like
to return an injury for a favour. Does
believe there are no such characters? May
undeceived by experience!
But poor Fanny was the most
of all. She loved
Harry, she always had loved him
with
the whole ardour of
her soul. Rashly yielding to the secret representations of
Emmerson, she had acted under impressions which she
could no longer entertain. The moment an interested
motive
appeared for that gentleman's insinuations, a new light,
broke over his whole character, and she saw that Harry was
so deeply offended, and so far
alienated
from her,
would require more boldness an ingenuity
than
she
sessed to explain her conduct. She soon perceived, also,
that he was not only acting on the impulse received from
her first interview with him, when, stung with the idea that
he was offering his hand in compliance with the wishes of
his family, while his heart and his vows were, in fact,
another's
,
she expressed the indignation such conduct naturally
inspired. From that time till recently there was in his
manner
,
stern and distant as it was, something which made her
conscious he was yet in her power, and something which
made her hope she had done him injustice, and that the pure
and disinterested Emmerson might find he had been in
error
.
But now Harry's demeanour was changed. A
careless
indifference, almost levity, succeeded to his grave and
obviously feigned composure, and his guarded determination
to avoid her. Now he neither sought her society nor
withdrew
from it. He seemed careless whether chance placed
her by his side, or even quite alone with him. His air was
that of a gentleman to a young lady with whom he was
not very familiarly acquainted, but to whom he extended
the courtesies, somewhat stiff and ceremonious, of a host
to a stranger guest. There was in it no affectation, no
display
of forced indifference. It was, she saw, and her heart
swelled as she did so, the unmistakeable absence of any
sentiments of regard. It was the coldness of indifference,
or, rather, of contempt. She saw she had lost him: not
only lost him, but his respect. The idea was so painful
that she resolved to fix upon some mode of explanation.
But how to do this? Her ingenuous and inexperienced
mind might naturally form such a resolution, but the
difficulty
of carrying it into effect became very soon apparent.
She thought, at first, of her mother, Mary, or Mrs. Lennox,
but gave up the idea instantly; such a confidence involved
a disclosure of her opinion of Emmerson, the grounds she
had for that opinion, his declaration to her, which she had
promised not to reveal, and Harry's also, which she felt
equally bound to conceal. Emmerson's charges and
insinnations
against Harry had also been communicated to her
in a strict confidence, which she did not feel herself at
liberty
to betray. No, whatever was to be done, must be done
by herself alone. Frank once rose to her mind. But the
impropriety and cruelty of making him a mediator between
her and Harry rendered the stop impossible; though such
justice
did she render him, she felt sure, had he been aware
Vol. I.O
of her position, he would have faithfully and nobly
performed
the task.
So many and various were the changes which had come
over the before perfectly happy party indeed, that the
country
had almost ceased to be beautiful and the fine weather
agreeable. The shore-walks and gardens were abandoned.
There were no more rides or long rambles through the
woods, or boatings, or pic-nics. Little Seth's bright dream
was already over. With Emmerson came the painful sense
of a secret enemy, whose true character he could never hope
to expose or escape from, and which broke upon the sweet
strains of his imagination like a discord. From his lowly
position, he had seen fully displayed Emmerson's cold,
selfish
arrogance and subtle perfidy. Yet he saw that his
opinion
,
if expressed, would only recoil upon himself, as
Emmerson
had the crafty skill to make what impression he pleased
upon his friends and the world. He would not have feared
him notwithstanding all this, for Seth had a bold, lion-heart
to meet open danger, but he found Emmerson so wily and
silent, so full of management and petty tricks, the very
pettiness
and baseness of which would have made an
accusation
appear ridiculous, that the poor, artless, indignant boy,
with all his honest courage, had learned to feel in his
presence
the irrepressible fear of a man walking in a garden
where he knows there is a snake.
At length Monday morning came, and Mr. Lennox,
Harry
,
and Emmerson were to leave. Mr. Lennox had been
duly informed by Mrs. Lennox as to certain ideas and
discoveries
of her own respecting Miss Elton, and he in his
turn, although he had expressly promised not to do so (but
men will tell their wives!), related to her the conversation
he had once had with Emmerson, when that gentleman, to
suit his own purpose and break off the match with Frank,
had stated his accidental, but certain knowledge of Harry's
attachment to Miss Elton. Mrs. Lennox having thus
testified
to the sentiments of the young lady, and Mr. Lennox
of the young gentleman, Euclid could not well have
demonstrated
a problem more clearly.
I'll tell you what, said Mr. Lennox to his wife, on the
morning of the day on which he was to return to town,
while, lathered from his throat to the tip of his nose, he was
drawing his glittering razor over the strop, occasionally (not
stealing, but) taking a look at himself in the glass, which
look appeared in no way to interrupt the satisfaction of
those two duplicates of a most capital fellow on meeting
each other, I'll tell you what, Kate, if so is so, Harry
shan't stir back to town this week. He's out of sorts that
anybody may see. Emmerson, who sees everything, and,
I believe, only lives to watch over our interests, has
sufficiently
established that fact and the cause. What do you
think? he caught my young master, the other night, in the
streetha! ha! ha! (damn it, I've cut my chin!)drunk as
a piper.
Harry? You astound me! you distress me.
Drunk as Dick Dashall, singing `Robin Adair'ha! ha!
ha!and holding on to the Park railing for fear of falling off
the ground! Ha! ha! ha!
And you laugh! What would you say if you were
yourself to meet your son in such a disgusting state? asked
Mrs. Lennox, with a look of sincere distress.
Say? Why, slap him on the back, and say, `Go it, my
boy! Call in and let us know how you feel in the
morning
!'
I've no objection to my son's knowing evil once.
He'll not do it again. It'll all come right at last.
Henry! how can you speak so lightly?
The fact is, Harry
is
in
love
, and these are the signs of
it. Emmerson told me another curious circumstance. But,
on reflection, I am convinced there he is mistaken. His
fidelity to me makes him over-anxious. But Harry is in
love, and so, you say, is Fanny. Now, I'll tell you what:
he shall remain here this week.
But if they have quarrelled?
Pho! nonsense! quarrelled indeed! Put two young
pouting lovers a week in a pretty country place, with
nothing
to do but look into each other's faces, or watch each
other go in and come out of the room, and all that sort of
thing, eating currant-pie and home-made bread and butter,
and a glass of cherry-bounce now and then, and if they
don't make up, whylet them separate. But in this I have
a serious object.
You a serious object! said Mrs. Lennox. I should
like to know what it is?
You musn't be alarmed, now; but Harry, about three
days ago, formally requested leave to go abroad for a few
years. Emmerson thinks he ought to go; I have no
objections
;
but I don't wish him to go off in a pet with sweet
little Fanny, if they like each other. I have not fully
consented
,
but he requested me to break it to you and get your
permission.
It seems destined that we can't have our boys at home.
Of course it does. Our boys are now men, my dear.
So we'll leave him here this week, to take care of the girls
and you, and steer you up against sloops and through
thunder-storms
,
and afterward it will be time enough to give
him an answer, if he wish one.
This plan was in due time communicated to Harry by
his father, in the Oriental style in which that gentleman
was accustomed to make his suggestions to his family.
Harry could not offer any farther resistance to the
proposition
without betraying some stronger motive than he desired
to assign, so he only remarked that, although he had rather
go downhe had some little things to attend to, etc., etc.,
etc.yet he would remain if his father wished.
Poor Fanny, not fathoming the motives of those around
her, not dreaming of the suspicions of Mrs. Lennox, and far
less supposing that Emmerson had ever carried his
double-dealing
so far as to make such representations of her to Mr.
Lennoxignorant, too, that Harry was meditating a voyage
to the opposite side of the globe, and that, perhaps, nay,
probably, the few days she was now passing with him
would be the last for years, perhaps literally the lastpoor
Fanny, as she heard the final decision that Harry should
spend the week at Rose Hill, felt her young heart bound
with delightful emotion, and a confidence that, however
impossible
she found it to fix upon any definite way of
explaining
her apparently inexcusable caprices, all would
come right before that day week. There did not breathe
on the earth a being more modest and pure, or one less
likely to contrive and manuvre in order to win the
affection
of any young man; but, while she was pure and
modest
,
her very innocence and ingenuousness prevented her
seeing any impropriety in attempting to undeceive Harry
under the present peculiar circumstances. In an instant
the perfect happiness which had been a stranger to her for
the last year returned. The gayety and charm of her past
days once more appeared in her manner and countenance.
Mrs. Lennox, an observer too affectionate and experienced
to suffer any sign to escape her, saw and correctly
interpreted
this happy change. She had before her a week's
duty, by no means uninteresting to such a mother, of
watching
the little drama which had commenced about her;
particularly
as upon its denouement depended, as she thought,
not only the question of Harry's proposed absence of several
years in Europe, but his future happiness and that of her
beloved and lovely young friend.
As to Frank, her skilful eye had already seen that the
attachment of Miss Elton to him was of a different nature
from his to her; and the thoughtful mother, accustomed to
consider all things for the best, and to observingly distil
out a spirit of good from things evil, found in his youth,
his elastic spirits, and his gay and impressionable character,
a hope that this early and tender disappointment would not
eventually interfere with his happiness, but might, on the
contrary, not only keep him in an atmosphere of purity now
that he was launching off into the world alone, but might
lead him to reflection and self-communing favourable to the
development in his mind of religious truth. So commenced
the second week in the pretty, charming, but now somewhat
less gay and noisy Rose Hill.
At length the hour of departure arrived, and as the boat
came in sight, they all accompanied Mr. Lennox down to
the landing-place, when the Chancellor Livingston came in
fine style, and this time stopped at the wharf, puffing out
immense volumes of white, hot steam, with a noise which
obliged the family thus separating to deliver their
affectionate
,
confidential parting phrases in a tone of voice as if they
had been shouting across the river, instead of into each
other's
ears through the hand, by way of a trumpet. There
was considerable shaking of hands, and a slight tumbling
in of valises, enlivened by divers hearty smacks between
Mrs. Lennox and her husband, Mary and Mr. Lennox, Mrs.
Elton and Mr. Lennox (Mr. Lennox usually went the
whole!
), and Mr. Lennox and Fanny. The latter generally
made somewhat more resistance to the tyrannical
extortions
in this way of her light and warm-hearted host, yet
now, what with the noise, and the running to and fro, and
the fury of the steam, and the little agitation of parting, and
her strange, deep delight at the presence of one who did
not depart, and Mr. Lennox's extremely sudden and
determined
manner of claiming his unprincipled, but, alas!
customary
right, and the well-known, ferocious cry of the
indomitably
punctual captain,
All aboard!
and
Haul in
O 2
the plank!
the poor girl had not only received, but actually
bestowed such a hearty smack as made Frank blow his
nose in order to hide his wet eyes, and caused even Harry,
for a single, unobserved moment, to utter something which
would have borne a very respectable resemblance to a sigh,
if it could have been heard in the deafening din around.
That's right, Fanny! said Lennox, through his hand,
and quite red in the face from the exertion of speaking so
loud. What's worth doing at all is worth doing well!
You're a despotic tyrant! replied she, but he could
not hear her words. He stopped a moment to look at her
lips, around which played an enchanting smile, and which
were working away so comically without producing any
sound audible through the general uproar, but the
indulgence
had wellnigh lost him his passage; for, at the
captain's
indignant second command, his old friend the plank
was hauled in with an intense promptitude, Emmerson
and Seth having barely time to reach the deck with their
lives. The boat was already a couple of yards on her way
to New-York, when, leaving Fanny in the midst of a
sentence
,
he leaped aboard, to the breathless anxiety of his
wife and the undisguised amusement of the passengers, and
in two minutes he had shaken hands with about a hundred
people, and had seized an influential member of the
Legislature
by the button, for the purpose of laying down some
startling doctrines on the subject of Mr. Van Buren and the
United States Bank.
Sethfor Emmerson, in a spiteful mood at the idea of
being left behind, had expressed an opinion that the boy
would be wanted in the officepoor little Seth, with a
heart as heavy as lead, and a certain indefinite shrinking
from Emmerson, had gone to the stern, as far as he could
get, and was gazing back on the receding point on which
Rose Hill stood, lessening to a white dot on the green
mountain-side, and at last fading away. The boy was not
generally thought over-susceptible, but he certainly was
enough so to feel the difference between the kind, rosy,
sweet, sunshiny face of his young, charming friend and
protector, Mary, and the bilious countenance of Mr.
Emmerson
.
If he hadn't loved the whole Lennox family to
adoration, and Mary several hundred million times more
than the rest, he would have very likely let fly an inkstand
or a ruler at Mr. Emmerson's head, and left the man to
enjoy
alone, in all his selfish greediness, the advantages of
the place. But the genuine kindness of his friends (to say
nothing of Mr. Lennox's frequent promises respecting the
presidential chair!) and Mary's good-natured, sisterly
interest
in his welfareno, he could not help himself.
Besides
,
he hadn't a home to go to, or any other prospect of
employment. No, he must bear all Emmerson could inflict
in the meanness of power, and the pettiness of spite and
jealousy, and, what was more, he must endeavour to bear
it patiently. That gentleman had once intimated to him
the possibility of his being turned adrift to beggary and
disgrace
.
Who would receive him with the odium of
Emmerson's
unfriendly opinion? Thus, before he was aware of it,
two passions (under however hopeless and ridiculous
circumstances
)
had entered into this obscure and friendless
boy's heart
love
and
hate!
They developed themselves
there unobserved, unsuspected by the whole world. He
did not strive to check them, but in his ardour and
inexperience
he abandoned himself fully to both. He felt within
him hope, firmness, and determination. Some of the
immortal
ornaments of his country had risen from an origin as
humble as his own. Absurd and undreamed of by others
as was his love for Mary, it refreshed and supported his
soul; and although Emmerson seemed his evil genius and
an insurmountable obstacle in his path, the hatred he
conceived
for him strengthened and concentrated his intellect
and character. Everything changes, and in nothing were
there going on changes more striking than in little, stupid,
awkward, bashful Seth Copely.
When the Chancellor Livingston at length ploughed her
way out of sight, and Mrs. Lennox, Mary, Fanny, and Mrs.
Elton (who, the reader mustn't suppose, has stopped talking
because we have stopped recording her talk), with Frank
and Harry, had stood watching her receding image till they
fully realized that the beloved husband and father had
indeed
disappeared for another week, they turned and walked
up the hill towards the house.
Mrs. Lennox had given Mrs. Elton an intimation of what
was going on, and that lady, who seized with avidity on
everything that came in her way, instantly pictured the dear,
happy lovers as dying to be alone. So, without making
any particular mystery of her ideas and intentions, but with
sundry mysterious nods and smiles, when she saw Mary
walking with her mother quite in advance, she put her arm
within Frank's and drew him (not much resisting) on, so as
to leave Fanny behind alone with Harry.
The poor girl, who had ardently longed for an occasion
to appeal to the good sense and magnanimity of her
companion
,
and regain at least the respect which she saw, with
insupportable anguish, she had lost, now found herself
favoured
with the best of all possible occasions. The party
had strolled on a long way ahead, up the winding and deeply
shadowed road. But, alas! so far from being able to carry
her design into execution, she found her heart beating so
quick and so violently as to deprive her of the power to
utter anything at all. She was so intimidated by the sense
of her awkward position, and by the indifferent, passive air
and expression of Harry, that the shrinking of her soul
might have been accompanied by a corresponding
movement
of her person. Harry saw it, and felt it as proceeding
from a fear, on her part, lest, time and place agreeing,
he might be tempted to resume his suit.
She may spare herself the anxiety, thought he; I
shall make no more mistakes of that kind.
Through the civility with which he offered his arm,
therefore, there was something almost of freezing coldness,
and she accepted it with an embarrassment and a timid
manner as little like love as his own. Thus these two
young people, who loved each other so sincerely, were
estrayed by the arts of one man.
For some moments they walked on at a pace which, to
accommodate itself to his rather firm and rapid stride, she
was obliged to quicken, and which showed, at least on his
side, a sincere desire to regain the company. The silence
was awkward for her, but did not seem so for him, for he
presently broke it, in the laughing tone of one perfectly at
his ease, and said,
How do you like this new universal favourite of ours,
Glendenning, Miss Elton? Do you, with the rest of us,
think him such a fine, warm-hearted fellow?
Yes, I do.
He amused me extremely. I like him better than I do
White; his mind may be less matured, but his heart is
fresher.
Do you think him really reformed? inquired Miss
Elton
,
timidly.
I think that must depend upon circumstances and upon
the sort of society he falls into. He is sincere now; there
can't be a doubt of it; but he's facile, I fear, and fickle.
If he were fickle without being sincere, remarked Miss
Elton, in the same sweet, low voice, I should fear much
for him; but sincerity is a virtue so rare and so redeeming,
that, where it exists, reformation can never be hopeless.
Yes, said Harry, in a light tone, I don't doubt he'll
turn out a fine fellow. We shall miss him as a companion,
this country week of ours, at all events. There is our
party; shall we join it?
Fanny felt she was thrown back, but she also felt she
had deserved it. The air of perfect carelessness, the firm,
advancing step, the deliberate change of the conversation at
the point where it might have become serious, the absence
of all his usual haughty distance of manner, and the haste
to join the rest, had in them something which struck her
painfully; but she remembered the cause he had to suppose
this precisely what she required of him, and his promise
never to resume the subject again, and she did not despair
of letting him see, in time, the true state of her feelings.
She, therefore, left his arm and joined Mary.
In the evening the delicious weather once more gathered
them together on the balcony to tea. Harry was gay, and
chatting more than usual. He was less distant than he had
been before for many months to Miss Elton, but it was that
sort of courtesy which a gentleman bestows upon a lady,
without any effort or any meaning more than meets the eye.
Fanny felt it with alarm, almost with anguish, but patiently
bore what she had so rashly brought upon herself.
The tea was nearly over, and some of the party had
already
risen from the table, when Mrs. Lennox said,
What is that elegant, very red volume in your pocket,
Harry?
A guide-book!
A European one?
Yes.
You'll not want it, my son. We shan't let you go.
I can't make up my mind to it. You and Frank both
`all my little chickens at one fell swoop!'
Too late, my dear mother;
my
mind's quite made up.
Before I left town, indeed, I had completed all the
necessary
arrangements. This day week at farthest I shall be
on the `deep blue sea!'
What, all these decisive arrangements before you had
consulted us?
I did not intend to set out, of course, without your full
permission.
Like father like son! You and Frank are famous for
doing a thing first, and asking permission afterward.
But, my dear mother, if it is ever to be done, better
now than later in life. There's Emmerson, now, ready to
take good care of the office till I get back. Besides, the
yearning I feel to see Europe has lately grown intolerable.
Europe! exclaimed Fanny, with a face much paler
than she had any idea of, and trying, with obvious
difficulty
,
to speak in a careless manner, and as if her breath did
not come and go considerably quicker than would be
requisite
for such an undertaking.
Yes. He persists in his determination!
What determination? inquired Fanny, fixing her eyes
on Mrs. Lennox.
He has told you of his plan, of coursehas he not?
To go off in six days, by the next packet for London.
You are jesting, said Fanny, laughing.
Why he has certainly told you, said Mrs. Elton.
Fanny was silent.
I did not think of troubling Miss Elton with affairs in
which she must feel so slight an interest.
Her artless eyes were lifted to his one moment, but fell
beneath his cold, grave expression.
And how long do you propose remaining away, if I
may venture to inquire? asked Mrs. Lennox.
Three, perhaps four years. I mean to attend one or
two courses of lectures on the Roman law in Germany,
under
Savigny, and to spend a winter in Italy, and I can't
give less than a year to England, Scotland, Ireland, and
Wales; and I must see Egypt, and Jerusalem, and
Constantinople
when once so nearand
Mercy on me! my dear son, cried Mrs. Lennox.
Why, you're laying out work for a lifetime. Can't I
persuade
you to give it up?
Oh, pooh! nonsense! The time will soon fly away.
There, there's your father's own son again.
I am dying to see a foreign shore, continued Harry.
Ah, I wish I could go with you, exclaimed Frank.
And I, added Mary.
And what changes may take place here before you get
back! and what changes maynay, must take place in
you!
Not changes for the worse!
You go a boy, you will come back a man.
I hope so, I'm sure! replied Harry, with some
emphasis
.
And what may you find here on your return?
Here Frank, and Mary, and Mrs. Elton, all exclaimed
against any gloomy predictions or apprehensions, and
united
in declaring that every young man ought to travel; that
it was a most delightful thing to see London, and Paris,
and Rome, and Greece, and Egypt, and all those
outlandish
places, and that it would doubtless do him a vast deal
of good.
Fanny said not a word; but Mrs. Lennox perceived she
was chilled and shocked, and she began to think it might
be the best thing, after all, for the young girl as well as for
her son to get him out of the way for a year or two. As
for any love of his for Fanny, she concluded, from what
she saw, that the attachment was altogether on one side,
and her sigh of tender sympathy for Fanny was not
unmingled
with surprise at the indifference of Harry to so
much sweetness, beauty, and affection. But thus it is,
thought she: the course of true love never did run smooth.
The party now all rose, and strolled out upon the lawn
with the exception of Harry, who, his mother said, had
gone with his maps and books to study out a
route
. He
did not present himself again till a late hour in the evening.
When Fanny laid her cheek that night upon her pillow,
it was wet with long-suppressed tears. The leaving her
uninformed of so important a resolution, while it had been
communicated to everybody else, she acknowledged was
what she might have expected, but it nevertheless seemed
a slight so marked, the evidence of a contempt so cold, that
she scarcely knew whether it affected her with more
anguish
or indignation.
If he really have ceased to love me, thought she, it
is my own fault, and I will bear the penalty.
She longed to confide to Mrs. Lennox or Mary the offer
of Emmerson, and her rejection of it, but that gentleman was
too old a head for her, and the promise given she never
dreamed of breaking, even if Harry should leave his
country
under the conviction that she had accepted him, or had
trifled with him. Time would set it all right. But time,
to such a young, tender, impassioned girl, was not the most
acceptable medicine for such suffering. At length all her
sad thoughts, by the force of habit, merged into one, as she
closed the long train of her reflections with an humble
prayer to Him who ordains all, that, wherever the object
of her affection might go, he might be protected and led the
right way; and that both he and she herself might receive
either aid to avert calamity, or strength to support it. She
had, at least intentionally, done no wrong, and she did not
mean to do any. She committed herself and her young
sorrows, therefore, to His care who had promised to give
rest to the weary, and with a lightened heart, though tears
were yet on her lashes, she fell into a sleep, the blessed
privilege of the pious and the innocent, disturbed by no
ungoverned passion or painful dream.
Several more days passed away in the same manner.
Harry's spirits seemed high, and everybody remarked how
elated he was with the idea of his approaching voyage.
Fanny had schooled herself into tranquillity; while Frank,
whose sadness equalled her own, took lonely walks, often
going out early with a gun, and returning late. Mary went
on rallying everybody else into a good humour, and Mrs.
Elton had pretty much all the rest of the talk to herself.
In fact, the spell of the party was broken.
Towards the end of the week there came a letter to
Frank and one to Mrs. Lennox from Captain Glendenning.
He described his arrival at Montreal. To Frank he gave
a humorous description of his journey and arrival. To Mrs.
Lennox he wrote in a more serious, and even in an eloquent
strain. Both were delighted at this mark of attachment.
Frank read his aloud, as it was obviously intended he should
do, and it clearly recalled the writer, whose playful
descriptions
occasioned much laughter. Mrs. Lennox folded her
letter carefully and put it away. She found its confidential
and serious tone too sacred for the hour and scene.
With each day the distance between the hearts of Fanny
and Harry had increased. He had now conceived such a
seriously unfavourable opinion of her, that he often showed
it unconsciously. It is by a thousand minute and nameless
details that our sentiments towards each other manifest
themselves. His manly and noble character could receive
from an artful coquette but one impression. Her dismissal
of himself and Frank, and the scene with Emmerson, were
constantly before him, and the passion which had raged in
his heart was calmed, if not destroyed. He jested with her
sometimes as if he had never seen her before the present
week. He exhibited not the slightest disinclination to be
alone with her, or to be interrupted when alone. He
complimented
her freely and flippantly when others did. In
short, she began to feel not only indignant at herself for
longer thinking of him, but to be convinced that their
relations
were in good earnest broken off completely and
permanently
.
Had she herself given him no reason to believe
she did not love him, his present demeanour would have
long ago cooled, and, perhaps, terminated her attachment to
him; but when she reached this point, the recollection of
the scornful words she had uttered, and of the attitude in
which he had seen her with Emmerson, took from her all
strength and resolution, and overwhelmed her with
fluctuations
of hope and grief, of love and pride.
Friday came, and with it Mr. Lennox. At dinner they
sat longer than usual, to hear the city news and chat of the
past and future.
So Harry is really off? said Mrs. Lennox.
He's his own master. I have no objection.
Give me but three or four years, said Harry, to see
the world, and study what can be better studied in Europe
than here, and I'll come back and turn
man of business
the
rest of my life.
It is but fair, said his father, to whom Mrs. Lennox
had already communicated the result of her observations.
Go, my boy, when you please. I will prepare letters of
introduction, and will procure such others as I think
necessary
.
You will have a letter of credit on Rothschild. Your
introductions will place you in the first society. Mr. B
has pressed upon me a letter to the Duke of G, and
another to the Earl of W; not ordinary letters, but
such as will throw open to you the most interesting, at least
the highest circles of English society. There you may
spend what you like, for, without attempting display, I wish
you to live like a gentleman, and to have every facility for
acquainting yourself with the world. For Paris, Vienna,
Berlin, Florence, Rome, and Naples, you will be amply
provided with introductions. Enjoy yourself, my son; but
Vol. I.P
you know that, without some serious, intellectual, daily
occupation
,
no enjoyment can last long. I expect you to be
back in three years, with your mind and manners much
improved
.
Don't forget us. Take good care of yourself.
Write often. Perfect yourself in the German and French.
Remember, we send you off with implicit confidence in your
good sense and discretion, that your letters will be a great
consolation, and your return the most joyful era the future
has in store for us. Let me hear your opinions on the
political
state of the various countries you pass through, and
sketches of whatever interests you. Don't lose your
temper
when cheated. Take things as they go, cheerfully
and quietly. Don't think yourself obliged to quarrel with a
man because you discover him to be a scoundrel, or to
swear eternal friendship to all who please you at first sight.
You go to learn, not to teach. Of all things, come back a
good American, a sensible, modest fellow, and without a
mustache!
The eyes of more than one person were a little moist as
Mr. Lennox proceeded, but, as usual, his close set the whole
party laughing. They were a little startled, however, by
his next words, which were,
And now, sir, all I have to add is, that, once resolved
on going, you can't be off too soon. The next packet sails
on Wednesday. I recommend you to go to town by this
afternoon's boat. Do all you have to do coolly, and we'll
be down to-morrow and see you off.
But, my dear, dear Harry, cried Mrs. Lennox, you'll
want a thousand things. I had no idea you really would
go so soon too. I cannot believe it.
Oh no, I shall want nothing but a single portmanteau.
All my things are ready. I can renew my wardrobe in
London
better than here.
But if you're going in to-day's boat, you'd better be
moving
,
sir, said his father; she'll be here in less than an
hour.
There was something so extremely sudden and
unexpected
in this whole arrangement, that more than one
countenance
was pale.
My beloved son! and My dear brother! and You
are a devilish lucky fellow, Harry! and I wish I were
going with you! and Don't go off till we come down!
and various other expressions from various lips
announced
the interest all took in the proceeding. Harry
withdrew
to his room, and hastily, and with a somewhat
trembling
hand, packed up the necessary things. By the time
he had finished the whole family were assembled on the
lawn, with hats and bonnets, to accompany him down to
the landing-place, already the scene of so many sad and
merry partings and meetings.
In the whole course of the preceding conversation Harry
had never once looked at Fanny nor she at him. She
behaved
admirably. A slight pallor might have been
perceptible
to a close observer, but there were, luckily, around her
no such impudent and detestable personages. All who
suspected
anything of her state of mind were delicately
careful
not to pay her the least attention. They strolled down
the well-remembered hill in no very regular order, laughing
and talking about the ridiculous absurdity of a man's starting
up so suddenly after dinner to go to Jerusalem. Mary said
it reminded her of a man who was asked How soon he
could be ready to set off for China, and who replied, As
soon as I can
get my hat!
Mary and Fanny were
walking
together. The former had not been initiated into the
real state of affairs between Harry and Fanny, her
acuteness
being diverted by the fixed idea she had of an
attachment
that was, or was to be, between Frank and Fanny.
All of a sudden she called back Harry, who happened to be
the nearest. Fanny had trodden on a sharp stone and hurt
her foot.
Come here, Harry, will you?
What for? inquired Harry.
Well,
you're
a gallant knight, to be sure! Here's a lady
actually wounded on the occasion of your departure, and
when I call you to assist her, you hang back and say `what
for?'
Wounded! Miss Elton! exclaimed Harry.
Oh, don't fall into any mistake, said Mary, laughing;
it's only her foot, not her heart. But she has really hurt
herself, and would have gone back if I had not called you
to lend your arm.
Indeed, it's nothing. I had better go back! It will be
over in a moment.
Admirable logic, said Mary; if it will be over in a
moment, why go back? Recollect, you may not see Mr.
Harry again these five years, if ever. So, your arm, sir.
Certainly, said Harry.
Miss Elton hesitated a moment.
Mary! cried her father; where's Mary?
Here, sir!
And she ran off.
Really, Miss Elton, said Harry, politely, you seem to
be quite lame.
Oh yesoh nodon't let me detain you, Mr. Lennox,
I beg; you will be too late.
I have twenty minutes, replied Harry, looking at his
watch. If you insist upon going on, I beg you to spare
your foot. I really hope the injury is not serious.
Let us, at least, try, said she, not to miss your boat.
But the steep descent of the hill had carried the rest of
the party long ago out of sight, through the divers bends of
the road, much more rapidly than Fanny could follow, do
all she could.
An artifice, thought Harry, but as he looked down in
her face, over which a slight expression of pain was
mingled
with one of emotion, he felt he did her injustice. His
error was made more certain by the appearance of a spot
of blood upon the white, thin shoe that clothed the
slenderest
,
most graceful foot in the world.
I had no idea of being called upon to walk so
suddenly
,
said she, or I should not have ventured out in these
slippers. I think a piece of glass has cut me.
You must return, indeed you must, said Harry,
alarmed
and ashamed of his suspicions.
Oh no, replied Fanny, also alarmed, not at the hurt,
but at the idea of returning alone with him in her present
state of mind; pray let us hasten on.
They did so; but a long walk and a lonely one was
before
them, and she was obliged to lean much more heavily
than she had ever done before upon his arm.
I shall be uneasy about your foot, said Harry; I wish
this had not happened. I am almost inclined to go back!
What can it be but a trifling wound? said Fanny.
You might lose your boat here, and your passage to
London
,
by such a delay. You've a delightful voyage before
you.
Yes, I anticipate four or five years of unalloyed
happiness
.
A pause.
You will find many changes on your return.
I presume so, of course. Five years can scarcely fail
to bring some; but I always look on the bright side of
things. These changes are as likely to be pleasing as sad
ones.
Another pause.
Yes, said Harry, it must indeed be a singular
sensation
to return to one's country after an absence of some
years.
Do you really go as far as Syria?
Yes, I mean to see Jerusalem, and Egypt too. Pray
use my arm, Miss Elton.
Such a journey must require much time.
I hope my father will prolong my leave of absence. I
think, perhaps, in five years, I shall be back.
Perhapsnever! said Fanny, with a voice which was
not
intended
to tremble in the least.
Perhaps is a word which covers a large space of
contingencies
,
Miss Elton.
Mr. Lennox, said Fanny, you will not misconstrue
me if I say I regret the rudeness with which I once
addressed
you.
It is entirely forgiven, said Harry, coldly. As he
spoke, he felt that the light, loved arm trembled in his.
He was affected, but he remembered Emmerson.
There was another pause, and the idea that he ought to
be too sensible to yield to the artifices of a coquette rose
in his mind. He looked once more on Miss Elton's face,
and her eyes were raised to his. They were full of tears,
and their expression thrilled him to the soul.
Fanny, said he, will you answer me one question?
What question?
What passed between you and Mr. Emmerson?
I cannot tell you.
Why
did
you address to me the language for which
you have just expressed regret?
I cannot explain.
There was another pause. Fanny had scarcely time to
collect herself and repress her tears, for they suddenly
came full in sight of the whole party on the landing-place,
and the steamboat lying off the wharf, with the barge
cutting
her way towards them, a sheet of green and sunny
foam half hiding her swiftly-advancing bows.
P 2
Good-by! God bless you! We shall be down
to-morrow. Take care of yourself.
Ere these and other similar expressions were uttered,
Harry was half way from the land to the steamboat.
Various
handkerchiefs were waved to him, which he answered
by wafting back again a kiss with his hand. But one kiss,
wafted from such a distance, so indefinitely divided among
so many people, did not produce the effect that sort of thing
sometimes does when differently managed. As the eyes
of all (we were positively going to say survivers) on the
landing-place were fairly full of tears (even Frank's and
Mr. Lennox's), the few trifling drops which happened to
steal noiselessly from Fanny's averted eyes were not
brought into any prominent notice.
And now Harry felt as if he were, indeed, launched upon
the world, already a free, independent man. He looked
around with a sort of inexpressible tenderness, mingled
with bewildering delight, from hill to hill, and from shore
to shore, each point of which was so familiar, so admired,
and so dear. He was gazing on them for the last time for
many years, perhaps he should never see them again. At
all events, in the ordinary course of things, some changes
would occur about him and within him before he should
again behold those soft and solemn mountain-shapes, which
seemed silently crowding around him, and looking down to
say farewell, ere he left his home and his native land to
go abroad into the mighty, brilliant, vast, dangerous world.
As for Fanny Elton, he was now yet more indignant at
her, and he despised himself for the momentary weakness
she had caused him to betray. Thank Heaven! I am
tearing
myself at last froman artful coquette!
CHAPTER XXVI.
When
Harry reached the city, he went directly home,
and when he got home, the first room he entered was the
office. There sat poor little Seth, among half a dozen
other clerks, copying away for dear life's sake, with a very
sad face. After such kind and familiar salutations as Harry
delighted to bestow on those beneath him, or in any way in
his power, he went into the next room and shut the door.
How are you, Emmerson?
How d'ye do? said Emmerson, taking his hand with
both his, and giving him a warm, bland welcome.
I want you to do me a favour.
What is it?
I am going to
unbosom
myself to you, as the young
ladies
say, frankly and freely. I never yet knew any good
cause of concealment.
You are quite right! said Emmerson, with a clear
smile; there's nothing I detest more than duplicity or
double-dealing. But what is it?
I am going to London in the packet of Wednesday next,
on a tour of three, four, perhaps five years. The office is
sufficiently taken care of by you, and my advantage in
having
at command a substitute so kind and able ought not to
be thrown away. I shall leave all my interests in your
hands, sure to find everything, on my return, ready for me
to set firmly and steadily forth again in my professional
career
.
But for your ability and fidelity I could not do this.
Well, you rate me too highly; but to the point.
One reason why I go is, of course, the natural desire of
a young man to see the world.
Well: and the other?
Listen to me. You are the best, the nearest friend, not
only of myself, but of my father's family. I need not blush
to make you a little confidence.
Go on; you know I would do anything to oblige you.
You will be surprised to hear, perhaps, that I have not
only been long a veryseriousadmirer of Miss Elton,
but that I have had the insane stupidity several times to
suppose she saw, approved, and so forth, and so forth, and
so forth. You understand?
Why, not clearly, said Emmerson.
In short, then, I offered myself to her; she rejected
me: not simply rejectedsheall butin fact, she
rejected
me. Now I can immediately get the better of this sort of
thing, and I am resolved to leaveto pull up stakes, as they
say, and quit till I get my disappointment under control.
Since my last visit to Rose Hill, I have been struck with a
particularly absurd idea that this young lady has been
labouring
under some strange mistake.
Emmerson raised his hand as if carelessly to his eyes
and forehead, so as to conceal, however, the change he felt
was taking place in his countenance.
But for one circumstance, I should give in and place
myself at her feet again.
And that circumstance?
I stumbled upon you and her the other day on the
balcony
,
and it-struck me you were speaking and standing in
the character of a lover. Is it so?
Your question is rather sudden, said Emmerson, again
rubbing his brow and eyes with his hands, and turning pallid
with an embarrassment disagreeable to see.
Understand me, said Harry. I have no right to
demand
your confidence, but as my going abroad depends
upon your reply, I hope you will let me know. Are you a
lover of Miss Elton?
Emmerson turned away his face, and busied himself a
moment arranging some papers on the table.
If Miss Elton have rejected you, I shall postpone my
departure, under the conviction that she loves me. If you
have any, the slightest reason to imagine she means to
receive
your
addressesnay, if she even wavered or seemed
to waver, she is either your wife or she is the most
accomplished
coquette that ever breathed, and I'm off till my heart
is as free as air.
My young friend! said Emmerson, in a pale whisper,
she more than wavered. If she mean to accept me or
not, I am not fully prepared to say; that she
hesitated
, I
assure
you, and the impression left on my mind is of a nature
which will not prevent my trying again. This I will say,
however, but in sacred confidence. You must give me your
word never to reveal it.
I do.
Then this I will say: I had some idea you were
attached
to her, and I am not capable of such a base act as
endeavouring to supplant you. I, therefore, particularly
asked her whether any attachment of hers to you ought to
prevent my continuing my addresses. She replied, `
No;
he is as far from offering, as I should be from accepting him
if he were to offer!
'
Miss Elton said that to you?
I swear it! said Emmerson again, in a whisper.
Enough. Your statement I cannot doubt in the least.
You even mean more than you say!
No answer, but a very significant look.
Good! give me your hand! I am infinitely obliged to
you for your friendly frankness. I see it has given you
pain to wound me thus, but no matter. I wish you joy. If
you win her, she will bring you happiness unutterable, for
I shall believe she married you from affection; if she jilt
you, why you may have the consolation of knowing you are
not the first, nor the second!
But I must lay you once more under a solemn
injunction
of secrecy, said Emmerson. I would not, even if
she be all you fear, injure the character of the young lady.
You must
promise me
what I have said shall never go
beyond
us two, and also that you will never say you saw me
you knowon the balcony with her. If I
am
to be
jilted
,
of course I wish to conceal my folly.
I promise solemnly.
Harry went out, humming an opera tune.
What I say is quite true, thought Emmerson. She
did
waver, and I
do
mean to pursue it farther, and she
did
make use of the remark to me as I stated. Besides, a
voyage
to Europe is the best thing this young gentleman can
undertake. Frank in
Prairie du Chien
, Master Harry in
Jerusalemthe old fellow will follow after him, doubtless,
before a year. I can manage that. And then, if Miss
Elton
won't marry me, I don't think
I
shall be obliged to go
to Europe to recover from the disappointment, although
$ 100,000 settled on herself
is
a comfortable affair. But,
as matters are going, I don't think I need despair of finding
some suitable alliance. I think my boat sails tolerably
well!
CHAPTER XXVII.
As Fanny left Rose Hill with the family next day, her
heart beat high with the hope ofshe scarcely knew what
Harry's last words had been more than kindthey were
confidential
and tender. She felt that his good opinion had
been partly regained, and she looked forward, if not to the
postponement of his voyage, at least to such a parting as
would not leave her in such a painful state of mind as she
had suffered the last two days. She saw the refusal to
answer
his two questions had surprised him; but she
depended
upon his perceiving (without being told) that she was
under some necessity in not doing so. She was thus the
gayest of the whole party, and Mrs. Lennox, who talked it
over with her husband, quite agreed with him in the
conclusion
that to attempt to understand
lovers
and their ways
was a hopeless task.
They reached town, at length, on a bright evening, and
preferred to walk home, looking (particularly Fanny) to see
Harry each moment coming to meet them. But Harry was
not to be seen, either on their way home or when they
arrived
there. At length he made his appearance, greeted
with more than his accustomed warmth each individual of
the family he was about to be so soon separated from,
including
in his heartiest welcome Mrs. Elton. To Miss
Elton he bowed stiffly, without offering his hand or
meeting
her inquiring look. Thus, in one moment, all the poor
girl's arial hopes vanished into nothing.
Fanny spent part of the evening there, but the same
coldness
was persevered in, till she felt that if she had
appeared
cruel and capricious, he was much more so.
Complaining
of a headache, by no means a feigned one, she withdrew
early with her mother and father, who had hastened to meet
them, and sought the longed-for solitude and darkness of
her own pillow: imploring aid from
Him
who always gives
to those who ask, she schooled herself to resignation and
peace.
The next day she did not go at all to Mr. Lennox's, and
Tuesday also passed without her yielding to the solicitation
of her mother to pay them a visit.
In the evening Frank and Mary came round, to say that
they were all going to accompany the packet-ship out to
sea as far as Sandy Hook in the steamboat, and to see
Harry fairly off. As strong objections as the poor girl
could or dared to make against this trial, she did urge, but
without success. She positively must go. She had never
seen a packet-ship at sea, or the sea itself at all; she had
never seen the Hook; and Harry would be so disappointed
if the whole of the Rose Hill party did not honour his
embarcation
;
and various other irresistible reasons were so
persevered in by Mary, that she was obliged to acquiesce,
though she felt she was destined to undergo a terrible ordeal.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
On
the last evening that Harry was to spend at home,
Mrs. Lennox took an occasion to seek him, when he was
alone in his room, arranging his things preparatory to his
embarcation. The tender and thoughtful mother had
resolved
to address him upon two points with the frankness
which is the privilege of maternal affection. She hoped to
find the heart of her son, whose keen susceptibilities and
noble qualities she well knew, so softened by the idea of
separation, as to give to the confidential communion she
desired a sacred character of truth and love.
Instead of being busied with his preparations, she found
him, evidently not anticipating such an interruption, sitting
motionless, his head leaning on his hand, and lost in thought.
On the table, and the object, apparently, of his reveries, for
his eyes rested full upon it, lay a lock of hair, which, from
its rich auburn hue, might easily be recognised as Miss
Elton's. He started as she entered, and, snatching up the
silent, but, doubtless, eloquent souvenir, thrust it into his
waistcoat pocket.
Harry, said she, seating herself by his side, and fixing
her gentle eyes full upon him, that is Miss Elton's hair.
He coloured, but she continued.
It offers me an appropriate opening for a question I
have to ask you before you leave us for so many long years
perhaps forever.
What question? asked Harry, recovering, not without
an effort, from his confusion.
You know, my son, I would ask none from idle
curiosity
,
and I am equally sure you will not withhold your
confidence
from me, now that we are going to part.
There is not a question on earth, my dearest mother,
that you can ask, which I will not answer you as truly as
if I were on my dying bed.
Thank you! I knew, I was sure you would.
Now, what is your question?
Fanny Elton, Harry, is, of all beings out of my family,
the one I most admire, for whom I have the sincerest
affection
.
Her happiness is as dear to me, almost, as yours.
I have sometimes thought you, too, were as much
interested
in it as I. The lock of hair you have endeavoured to
conceal confirms my opinion. The first question I have to
ask you is, do you
love
Fanny Elton?
No, mother, said Harry, firmly, almost sternly.
But have you ever loved her?
Years ago, I had a boyish passion for her, and procured
from her, without much persuasion, this ringlet.
He took it out and handed it to her.
You can see by the brighter colour that she was younger
when she gave it than she is now.
Tell me all, my son!
That is all, mother. As we both grew older, we both
grew wiserha! ha! ha! I have not seen this before for
a year, I do assure you. I was going to say I had almost
forgotten I had it, when it turned up accidentally among my
old things. I was thinking of my folly when you came in.
Take it: you may hand it to her, with my compliments, if
you like. It'll do for somebody else perhaps.
What do you mean? Have you changed, or is it the
change in her? Is it a lover's quarrel, or pique, or
jealousy
,
or what?
Upon my soul, I am on the best of terms with her.
But the change is in both of us. I do not admire her
character
,
upon a close study of it, quite as much as I expected,
and the fact is, sheshe
She what?
He was going to disclose what he had learned from
Emmerson
,
but that gentleman had exacted from him a distinct
promise of secrecy, so he stopped and said nothing.
Mrs. Lennox also ceased her inquiries. She had no
authority
,
of course, from Miss Elton to make any. She was
not disposed to reveal her own suspicions of Miss Elton's
attachment for him without the certainty of effecting a
union; and though she perceived a bitterness in his manner
which did not argue perfect indifference, yet his denial of
any affection for her was so positive that she feared
pressing
her mediation any farther, lest the cause of Miss Elton
might suffer. She knew, if there were any real affection,
absence would rather strengthen than weaken it. She,
therefore
,
concluded to pursue the subject no farther.
Well, then, leave her. If it is so, you will have one
tie the less to call you back to your native land.
But there are ties enough without her, my dear mother,
said Harry.
I have now another and much more serious remark to
make, resumed Mrs. Lennox. You are going off beyond
my care, out of my sight, for years, to be exposed to all the
dangers as well as the temptations and errors of life. You
have everything to make you happy but
one thing
, and,
that one thing wanting, all the rest, sooner or later, must
prove vain. Like your father, Mary, and Frank, you are
without religion. Answer me frankly and like a man, are
you not?
I am; since you ask me so seriously, I must tell you
the truth. I am without the least approach to religious
belief
;
nor do I find I am more likely to
sin
without it than
with it. Be assured, I shall love virtue and walk in the
path of honour as long as I live.
I thank you for your frankness, Harry. I myself once
doubted, and I know how plausible doubt can be. I see,
also, in others, like your father for instance, that a man may
possess every noble quality of mind and heart, and yet be
an infidel. I don't start from you; I ain't afraid of you.
You are my son. I admire, sympathize with, and love you
still.
The tears rolled down her cheek as she spoke, and she
took his hand and pressed it fervently to her lips.
But I have to request from you, she continued, the
same tolerationthe same respect I extend. Do not
despise
or shrink from
me
because I
believe;
for I am older
than you, and have thought of the subject more. I will
not now offer you any
argument
. We will suppose
Christianity
false, the most absurd, impossible series of fables that
folly ever heaped together or credulity ever received. But,
true or not true, I have to request that, during your absence,
and at as early a moment as possible, you will acquaint
yourself
with the subject thoroughly. Do not reject it without
understanding it. That is not the part of a well-informed,
sensible man. As Christianity is the religion of modern
civilization, you should comprehend it, if not as religion, as
a remarkable system of philosophy. If the history of its
divine origin be not true, you can scarcely mingle on equal
terms with gentlemen and scholars without, at least,
knowing
its history as an earthly influence; yet you do not know
anything of it. Can you tell me on what grounds other
sensible men believe it?
Vol. I.Q
No! I confess that it is to me the most unfathomable of
mysteries.
Are you exactly aware what are the
prophecies?
No, I am not.
Have you ever read the Bible through?
No, not continuously.
Have you ever read any commentator on it?
No. You cross-examine, mother, like a lawyer, he
replied
,
laughing, but at the same time blushing.
Now, then, I am going to make you a parting request.
First, you will not come back till you are well informed
upon the scheme, and the internal and external evidence of
Christianity. I do not ask you to study it for the sake of
believing in it, but that you may seek only to explain what
it is that falls like a spell upon the intellects of so many other
people, and makes them cling to it, notwithstanding its
absurdities
,
through life and through death. That you should
believe
I do not ask; but I ask you to ascertain
what it is
that makes other men believe. Will you do this?
At least, I will try; indeed, I have always been
intending
to study the theory, the philosophy of Christianity, and
to investigate the mystery of its influence on mankind. I
will come back
well acquainted
with the Bible; I will
examine
it as I would a
law question
coldly, firmly, without
passion, without respect. But I give you notice, he added,
laughing, I shall tell you, without concealment, the result
of my inquiry. I shall spend some time in Germany, where
these questions are dissected with merciless precision.
But if, after three years, I still find (as of course I shall)
that the myths of antiquity, and the ignorance of an age
without a press, had combined to palm upon the credulity
of mankind a religion now in its wane, I fear you will be
yourself shaken in your faith, and that I shall be the
instrument
of depriving you of what you value as the greatest
consolation.
My son, said Mrs. Lennox, I know you are candid,
generous, and pure. Sealed as your eyes now are, when a
beam of light reaches them you will acknowledge it. When
the physician heals you, you will believe on him. No man,
with your sincerity of nature, your clearness of
understanding
,
and your moral courage and devotion of soul, can
ascertain
what makes others believe without believing himself.
I know you will keep your promise, and, keeping it, I know
you will come back to me a Christian. You will learn what
I mean by telling you `seek ye out of the Book of the Lord
and read,' and you will find the `fear of the Lord is the
beginning
of wisdom.'
He shook his head and smiled.
Well, I am satisfied, said she, that you will neither
break your faith with me, nor continue blind to your relation
with Him who died to save you.
The term died to save you grated on Harry's ear as
the cant of a class. The idea of a God dying to save the
creatures of his own creation, held out but little prospect of
a realization of his mother's pious wishes. He answered,
however, only,
I have promised to study the subject conscientiously,
and I will.
I have brought you several works, continued she,
which you must also promise to read, and which will grow
more interesting to you as your mind becomes sufficiently
enlightened and enlarged to comprehend them. They are
all small editions, to take up as little room as possible. The
`Bible,' a `Prayer Book,' `Butler's Analogy,' and `Paley's
Evidences.' You will read them?
Why, if you wish it, yes.
I do wish it, and receive your promise seriously and
solemnly. If you have no desire for the labour, do it in
memory of me.
I will, you have my word of honour.
Now, then, good-night! your obedience deserves a
reward
,
and will receive one, I am sure.
She embraced him affectionately, and saying,
This is the last time I shall bid you good-night, Harry,
for many a year, left him with her eyes full of tears.
My poor, dear, kind mother, thought he, when he found
himself alone, and looking upon the, to him, somewhat
formidable
pile of books which he had promised to read. Who
can oppose such amiable and tender weakness? who can
refuse to gratify such affectionate whims? A nice, studious
time she intends I shall have of it; but no matter, I will keep
my word.
And for the last time for a long period, he sought the
repose
of sleep beneath his father's roof and in his native land.
CHAPTER XXIX.
The
morning broke still and bright, just the very sort of
weather one would like to go to sea in. The softest
possible
zephyr toyed with the tree-tops, and there was scarcely
a cloud in the whole heaven as large as a
pocket-handkerchief
.
The Eltons were to breakfast with Mr. Lennox at
eight, and the passengers to go out in the Montreal were
requested, by an advertisement in the newspapers, to be on
board the steamboat De Witt Clinton, Whitehall wharf,
precisely
at ten o'clock A.M.
The breakfast was attempted to be made very lively by
Harry and his father, but Mrs. Lennox and Mary were both
plainly affected, and Mrs. Elton did not think it even
necessary
to wipe away with her handkerchief the tears which
came trembling, one after another, down her cheeks, till she
was at last obliged to stop eating altogether, in order to
blow her nose. Fanny did not weep; she even smiled,
and sometimes ventured a timid remark to Harry on the
delightful weather; but she was so pale with strong,
suppressed
emotion, and so ten thousand times more lovely
and touching than ever she had been before, that Harry,
after one stolen look at her, when their eyes did not meet,
for hers were drooped in silent and most sad revery upon
the floor, formed an inward vow not to look at her again,
unless he were contented to make a regular fool of himself
by countermanding his passage, and remaining at home to
be duped and laughed at a third time by one who certainly,
at this present moment, looked like anything on earth but a
coquette. Nevertheless, he had scarcely formed the vow,
when he found his disobedient eyes fixed once more on
that charming figure, now so still and passive, on that
beautiful
,
once bright face, now more like death than life, and
yet where, unless art were fair as nature, firm and modest
pride held government over a breaking heart, and kept all
silent and resigned.
The carriage is ready, said the servant. It is half
past nine.
I cannot, cannot believe it, said Mrs. Lennox, folding
Harry to her bosom, that I am losing my beloved son,
perhaps forever.
Oh, pooh! nonsense! said Mr. Lennox; think of him
when he comes back, with a pair of mustaches as big as
your arm curled up under his nose, a Turkish turban on
his head, and a strange, foreign accent in his Englishhey!
Katy!
I
shall bid you good-by
here
, said Mary; I ain't
going
to have any tragedy scenes on board the boat for the
amusement of strangers.
Ah! this is only a rehearsal! said Mrs. Elton; you'll
do it in earnest when the time really arrives, and down
came another shower of tears on
her
cheeks.
Upon my word! said Lennox, it is a ticklish sort of
thing, this bidding good-by, isn't it? I do feel somehow as
if I were going to execution! But only think how much
worse it must be to be really hanged.
Please, sir! said the attentive servant.
Ah! very true. This is no time to be too late. This
is no `Chancellor Livingston' affair! Come along, come
along.
My dear mother, said Harry, offering his arm.
Fanny's
was already closely thrust into Mr. Lennox's. Down
they went to the carriages, crowded in anyhow, and
laughing
through their tears.
Come along, Harry, come along.
Ah, no; I shall walk! said Harry.
Fanny felt, oh who can describe how deeply, all these
little manifestations of complete indifference.
Walk! Well, you'll be too late, I'm sure you will,
said his father; and a sensible set we shall look like, to
be sure, driving down in such a crowd as this, and leaving
the only one who is really goingbehind.
That's Harry, all the world over, said Mary. You
know he was going to send us all out of town to celebrate
his birthday except himself, and he was going to stay at
home and work!
Harry now shook heartily the clerks by the hand (didn't
they envy him, too?), and the servants, also, now came up
to bid young master good-by, and poor black Simon
looking
as if his heart would break, and the foolish old fat cook
blubbering away till everybody else began to cry again, too,
though they could scarcely do so for laughing, and off went
Q 2
the carriage, thundering away, and off walked Harry just as
fast, and they all got there just in the very nick of time.
Two minutes more, said Lennox, and we should
have had our young mad-cap with us at least another
month.
I wish with all my heart, said Mrs. Lennox, it were
so.
Why not go back at once then? proposed Mary,
laughing
.
And now poor Fanny's true agony commenced. There
was everybody on board the boat; many ladies and
gentlemen
with whom she was well acquainted, and
Emmerson
among the rest. There they all were, laughing,
talking
,
and jesting, and Harry shaking every human being by
the hand, and speaking so warmly, and smiling so
gracefully
at all but herself; and she, of course, received her
share of jests, at which she was obliged to laugh, and of
attentions which she must return, and all the while the
steamboat was pushing her way rapidly towards the tall,
noble-looking ship, which, with sails gradually rising to the
air, and her prow already turned seaward, was beginning
to move, her anchor being already weighed.
During this little interval, Harry was, of course,
surrounded
(perhaps
eaten up
would be a more appropriate
expression
)
by his affectionate relatives, and some twenty or thirty
personal friends who happened to be on board. On Fanny
he never turned his eyes; but she could not help looking
often and with a swelling heart on his noble, manly form,
and really very handsome countenance, as he seemed
enjoying
himself just as if he were not leaving the warmest
heart in the world to pine and break in silence behind him
just, in fact, as if he were not conscious there was such
a person as she on earth.
And now they have reached the packet, and all hands
are assisted on board, and there is a cold collation, and
some excellent wine, and the company all stand round the
long table and drink each other's health, and happy voyage,
and pleasant weather, and short passage, and safe and
speedy return, and, before the now half-bewildered Fanny
quite expected it, the bell rang, and all were ordered off the
ship, and there were various groups formed of families and
friends embracing (long, deep, oft-repeated embraces they
were, too)and Harry stood, tall and quiet, and took, by
turns, mother and father in his arms and to his heart.
Perhaps
there was a moisture in his lashes while he received
and returned those last sweet tokens of love; then Mary,
who (no one dreamed
she
would have done so) fairly burst
into tears; then Frank, who smiled a bright, clear smile,
and said,
Did you ever see such a set of simpletons, Harry? and
yet, as he embraced his brother, came glittering out of his
own eyes also something which, if they were not tears, he
dashed away exactly as if they had been. The truth is, a
vast deal of business was done this memorable morning, as
Sam Weller would say, in the water-cart line, by
various
people.
Fanny was the only one whom Harry had not bade
farewell
to. She thought he was not going to at all, and she
wished he might not; and when he approached her, at
length, with a cold and formal bow, she would have given
worlds if he could have totally overlooked her. Somehow
or other, she was the very last one to leave the ship, for she
had stood trembling, and thrilling, and holding on to her
tears, till she really scarcely knew how to get away, or
where she was to go.
Harry, said she, not altogether suppressing a sob,
good-by! God bless you!
Good-by, Miss Elton! was his cold reply; should
we never meet again, you have my best wishes. Here,
steward, take that portmanteau below, will you?
Fanny was handed down into the steamboat, she scarcely
knew by whom. She stood there a moment among the
crowd, looking up to the beautiful, lofty ship, whose broad,
snowy sails were now nearly all unfurled to the wind, which
began to freshen. The songs of the sailors rose together
with the trampling sound of their many feet as they
hastened
across the deck; the vessel began to glide more rapidly
on, while the steamer turned her prow in the contrary
direction
;
and numbers of people looked down on them from the
quarter-deck, of whom she could not distinguish any
individual
.
Then some one shouted,
Three cheers!
They were given with enthusiasm, and then returned from
the ship.
Again!
And again the same process was gone through with.
Once more!
And once more three hearty huzzas were given and
reciprocated
.
Already the vessel was distant many hundred yards,
commencing
her long, perilous way across the ocean.
Fanny felt nothing could enable her longer to restrain her
feelings. She groped her way down into the cabin, too
blinded by tears to see; and throwing herself upon a sofa,
where she was fortunately quite alone, covered her face
with her handkerchief and wept in silence.
Poor Fanny! It is not every beautiful, proud,
high-spirited
girl who knows what an unpleasant thing it is to be
rejected
.
CHAPTER XXX.
Fanny's
paleness and indisposition passed off as a fit of
sea-sickness, in which she had the sympathy of all,
particularly
of Emmerson. By the time they reached town again,
all but herself were, or seemed, quite recovered from the
sadness of mere leave-taking; and when she remembered
the perfect indifference with which Harry had pronounced
his last farewell, she too began to be supported by pride,
shame, and indignation, and made a tolerably successful
attempt
to regain her spirits. This was more easy in
consequence
of the manner of Emmerson towards her. He
approached
and conversed with her some time, with a
gentleness
which it seemed could only proceed from an excellent
heart and a sincere character. There was something about
him so unassuming, so ingenuous and persuasive, that, while
he spoke with her, and when she heard his frank and
confidential
conversation with the Lennoxes, she could not
believe
he had ever been guilty of duplicity or meanness, and
she blushed at her ungenerous suspicions. Harry's cold
good-by confirmed her in the conviction that she was
not and had never been beloved by him; and that was
exactly
what Emmerson had told her. She had, then,
perhaps
,
done Mr. Emmerson wrong. The idea gave to her
manner towards him a gentleness equal to his, and in
proportion
as her own hopes died away, his were reawakened.
But she longed for the privacy of her own apartment, to
give vent to her anguish in unseen and unrestrained tears.
The sight of the beautiful city, which now no longer
contained
the object of her affection, the thought that he would
no more for years, and perhaps never again, behold the
surrounding shores, or mingle with the thousands among
whom her life was to pass, cast a gloom over all things and
over her own soul; but she was pious as well as tender,
and she had been taught to calm the violence of every
feeling
and passion by humble appeals to Heaven. And so
time passed on, and things seemed once more to fall into
their usual channel.
For a few weeks, however, the high spirits of the
Lennox
family were rather dashed. Fanny's heart was
continually
full almost to overflowing, and her eyes were wet
with tears, which she was ashamed or afraid to shed; for,
while reason taught her to be indifferent, feeling and
memory
often overcame her strength. The grief of Mrs.
Lennox
,
also, was too obvious not to be contagious, and the yet
undisturbed high spirits of Mr. Lennox only contrasted more
strangely with the sadness of the rest. Frank, by his
noble
,
delicate demeanour, humbled as well as affected her.
He plainly showed how well he saw he was not loved, and
never could be; yet in him appeared no anger, pique, or
coolness. His attentions were continued and his friendship
increased, but with a consideration for her which awoke
the sincerest gratitude. That he was unhappy was
evident
;
but it was the unhappiness of a manly and patient
mind, which is far from yielding to the oppressive
weakness
.
He neither attempted to excite her compassion, to
awaken her jealousy, nor to pique her vanity by resentful
coolness or affected indifference. In this respect he offered
a graceful contrast to his brother, not unremarked by Miss
Elton; but she did not understand the difference between
the two cases. Sometimes she almost imagined that now
Harry's want even of esteem for her had been so clearly
and so cruelly displayed, she might return some rays of
encouragement to the faithful attachment of Frank, whose
unhappiness she could not bear to see, and might in time
bring herself to alleviate. But she had been educated upon
the strictest moral and religious principles, and knew how
to distinguish between the impulses of amiable weakness
and the dictates of duty; and the image of Harry, careless,
forgetful, contemptuous as he was, reigned too strongly in
her heart to permit her to think of ever receiving the
addresses
of another.
After some weeks, during which none of the family had
spirits for another trip to Rose Hill, it was proposed by Mr.
Lennox that they should go again. Various
pros
and
cons
were discussed, and the tendency of the party was
decidedly
towards remaining in town. Frank was now
momentarily
expecting orders to repair to his post, from which his
leave of absence had been, at the request of his father,
prolonged
to an almost unhoped-for period. Under all the
circumstances
,
no one cared for another country excursion.
To inhabit even that delightful house, when thus deserted
by so many who had made it the happiest spot in the world,
to wander alone by the winding beach, and through the
solemn
,
silent wood, where the voices of Frank, Glendenning,
White, and Harry had been so often heard, did not seem an
attractive idea. But Mr. Lennox was anxious not to have
them spend the sultry month of August in town, and he
himself enjoyed the weekly holyday passed with them,
away from the dust and noise of the city, the bustle of
crowded courts, or the confinement of a close office.
May we take Seth with us, father? inquired Mary.
No, my dear, replied Mr. Lennox, without hesitation;
I don't believe he can be spared. His last trip has not
done him any good, but has, on the contrary, rather spoiled
him. Besides, the effect is unfavourable upon the other
clerks, of selecting one for a pet: it makes him insolent,
and them jealous.
Insolent, father? what, poor little Seth? Why, I never
saw such a timid, obliging, manageable boy in my life.
Mr. Emmerson will tell you a different story.
Mr. Emmerson?
He says he can't get along with him at all since his
last trip; and I think you'll allow that he who can't live
with
Emmerson
, can't live with any one.
It's very strange, said Mrs. Lennox; but, if Mr.
Emmerson
says so, there must be truth in it.
It was decided, therefore, that they should go without
Seth.
CHAPTER XXXI.
In
the afternoon of the day on which this conversation
occurred, Mr. Lennox, with Mary and Miss Elton on either
arm, and Frank with Mrs. Elton, were coming in from a
walk, when, as they entered the house, their attention was
arrested by the sound of voices in the office.
It is true.
It is not true.
Do you mean to say I am telling a falsehood? said the
gentle voice of Emmerson.
I mean to say you first gave it me to copy, and that you
then desired me
not
to copy it till you should correct it.
The door of the office now opened and discovered the
whole party, with Mr. Lennox at the head, but unobserved,
apparently, by either of the disputants.
I do not say you tell a
wilful
untruth, my young friend,
said Emmerson, gently, although the expression which
came over his dark and now pallid countenance betrayed
considerable emotion, but I deny your statement. You
are habitually negligent. You have forgotten, and propose
this as an excuse. I wish your faults ended there.
It is false! said Seth; I am not negligent. I appeal
to every clerk in the office. I do my best; I neglect
nothing
,
and
I
am incapable of an untruth. I remember most
distinctly your countermanding your order to copy the bill,
that you might correct it; and, moreover, I believe, sir, you
know what I say to be the truth.
What is all this? said Mr. Lennox, coming forward.
Oh, nothing. One of the daily occurrences of the
office
when you are absent, said Emmerson, with mild
indifference
.
What
is it you charge so boldly upon Mr.
Emmerson
?
inquired Mr. Lennox, gravely.
Seth was silent.
Will you be good enough to favour me with an answer?
reiterated Mr. Lennox, yet more mildly.
Seth turned very red, then very palecommenced to
speak, but had, for the moment, either not the presence of
mind or the bodily strength to do so.
Will
you
explain, Mr. Emmerson, if you please?
I really should be sorry to do so, said Emmerson,
smiling. I believe the boy speaks in a passion, and will
deny to-morrow what he has dared to insinuate to-day.
But what
does
he insinuate?
I gave him a bill in chancery to copyit should have
been done a week ago, and if not filed to-day, will be too
late. I should have reminded him of it, but he is so
susceptible
and irritable when I speak to him of anything, that
I abstained from doing so, supposing he had copied it,
perhaps
,
when I was not in the room. To-day I ask him for
it; he replies I requested him
not
to copy ita thing on the
face of itat leasta mistake.
And you
added
, Master Seth, remarked Mr. Lennox,
that Mr. Emmerson had not only countermanded this order
to you in this way, but
knew
he had done sothat is, was
not only making a mistake, but preferring against you
deliberately
a false accusation.
Seth turned still paler, but did not reply.
I should never have mentioned this, said Emmerson,
for I do not wish to injure the boy; but
this is what I
mean
when I say I cannot get along easily with him.
Seth, said Mr. Lennox.
Sir, said Seth, suddenly lifting his pale face, but
meeting
the stern glance of his benefactor with one, if not as
stern, at least not less firm.
Ask Mr. Emmerson's pardon, and confess you have
uttered
an unworthy falsehood, this moment.
Fire darted into the cheeks of Seth and flashed from his
eyes as he turned them upon Emmerson with a haughty
indignation, totally unlike anything ever seen in him before.
He answered in a low voice,
Never!
You persist in your charge, then?
It is true, said Seth.
You mean to say that Mr. Emmerson asked you to
defer
copying the bill till he had corrected it, and now, while
denying it, is conscious of having done so?
I do, sir!
Seth! do you know what you say? Do you mean to
charge
Mr. Emmerson
with dishonourwith duplicity?
Before man and God! replied Seth, firmly.
Look! said Emmerson, showing the bill to Mr.
Lennox
.
It is drawn by yourself: is it likely I should
propose
to correct it?
How do you explain this fact, sir? demanded Mr.
Lennox, still suppressing beneath the calmest exterior an
obviously rising storm of indignation.
I cannot explain itI can't explain anything connected
with Mr. Emmerson, but I have asserted the truth. I repeat
it, and Mr. Emmerson
knows it
.
Oh, if you believe me capable of laying a snare for
you! said Emmerson, with a smile.
I would not have voluntarily advanced such a charge,
said Seth, his face extremely pale, but his voice steady and
his eye unshrinking; but since the point is raised, I
scorn
to conceal my opinion. I do believe Mr. Emmerson
capable
of any act of selfish meanness or malignant slander, of
any art to provoke, and any
lie
to ruin me.
The boy stood erect, with a deep emotion, which
appeared
to have given tallness to his stature as well as grace
and dignity to his gestures; his brow and cheeks grew
absolutely
swarthy with indignation, and his eyes flashed with
the fire of a noble soul fully aroused. There was a moment
a dead silence. Mr. Lennox, thunderstruck, appeared for
an instant to hesitate what course to pursue, while
Emmerson
was so speechless with surprise and rage, that
impartial
observers would have certainly supposed him the
culprit
of the two. His cheek was yellow with emotion, his
dark eyes were sunken and bent beneath Seth's keen glance,
and the paper shook with an audible noise in his trembling
hand. He looked, in short, more like a fiend than a man.
But everybody found, in these marks of agitation, only
the shame and natural anger which any irreproachable
person
might feel on being publicly charged with a
dishonourable
act, and, after a single glance of sympathy at him, Mr.
Lennox stepped up to Seth and took him by the shoulder.
Listen to me, sir, said he, with a serious tranquillity,
which boded no good. You are a little, homeless,
friendless
boy, with a temper too rebellious and brutal to hope
for employment elsewhere, or I would this instant turn you
out of my house. If you were my son, I would horsewhip
you within an inch of your life; as it is, believing you to
be
insane
with rage, and not responsible for what you say,
if you go
down upon your knees
and ask that gentleman's
pardon for the atrocious insult you have offered him, and
if he grant it
Vol. I.R
Oh! I pardon him unasked, said Emmerson. Pray
let us drop the subject. I am far from wishing to destroy
the prospects of the poor little fellow.
I may, for the present, continued Mr. Lennox,
abstain
from turning you out of the house, at least until I can
get you some other mode of support. But
obey
me at once,
or I shall teach you on the spot how a character so
deceitful
and worthless must be dealt with.
If I am so worthless, said Seth, respectfully, but firmly.
Silence, sir! said Mr. Lennox, too much accustomed
to implicit obedience from his own grown-up sons to hear
without amazement these bold words. One breath more,
and you shall learn I can punish as well as reprove.
Punish! echoed Seth.
My dear father! murmured Mary.
I have not been used to suffer such a threat in my
boyhood
,
said Seth, and I don't know why
Pray go on, said Lennox.
You are the only man living to whom I would not go
on; but punishment, if you mean chastisement, I did not
permit when a child, and I would not permit now, even if
I merited it!
Leave the room! leave the house! never cross my
threshold again! cried Lennox.
My dear husband, said Mrs. Lennox.
I obey you, sir, said Seth, and, passing through the
group of ladies at the door quite firm, but his face very
white, he walked with a proud step down the street.
As he turned the corner, however, he remembered he had
no place to go tono homenot a cent of moneyno
resources
but what he held from Mr. Lennox, who even paid
his board in a house in which he had now no right to
remain
.
He remembered, too, the kind friends he might now
never see again, Mrs. Lennox, and Miss Elton, and Mrs.
Elton, and, most of all, Mary, and what they must now
think of him, and how clearly all Emmerson's hints and
calumnies would now appear well founded, and what a cruel
advantage his hated foe would take to slander him, now
that he had really committed such a shocking outrage.
No matter, he murmured, I will saw wood, dig,
sweep the streets, or starve, but I won't have anything
more to do with Emmerson. If there were anything of
the
man
in him, I'd make him eat his words. But one
might as well threaten and insult a woman! He `pardons
me unasked!' He pardons me! Ah, the scoundrel!
Thus yielding to the ungovernable passions of
inexperienced
youth, and despising, as youth so often does, the
dictates
of prudence and propriety, the boy had not only
insulted
the person whom he imagined his enemy, but also Mr.
Lennox and his whole family. As this last recollection
forced itself upon him, the tears, which the thought of his
destitute state could not make him indulge in, began to
overcome his power of resistance, and turning down a side
street where no one happened to be walking, he wept and
sobbed as if his heart would
break
.
But, luckily, the hearts of fine, honest, bold fellows like
him don't break quite so easily.
CHAPTER XXXII.
The
next morning the ladies, particularly Fanny, who,
somehow or other, spent nearly her whole time there,
importuned
Mr. Lennox to recall his sentence of banishment
against poor Seth; but that gentleman afforded no
encouragement
to their petitions.
He can never again come into my office. The young
scoundrel! I am indignant as well as amazed at the
change which has taken place in him, or, rather, at my
discovery of his real character. Who ever saw such a
modest, bashful, blushing little fellow three months ago?
He could not find courage to speak, and now, yesterday,
when he had a point to carry, I never saw more nerve,
determination
,
and strength of character: burning cheek,
flashing eye, and words flowing from his lips that sounded
more like Junius or Sheridan than a little, impertinent,
country ploughboy.
But these, said Mrs. Lennox, are indications of
talent
,
which, you know, you always predicted he would one
day reveal from under his unpromising exterior.
Talent? yes, but talent accompanied by a want of
principle
,
which promises no very brilliant close to his career.
I really hate the boy, not so much for what he has himself
done, as for one or two doubts which he half caused in me
of the strict integrity of Emmerson's representations. But
I see Emmerson was, as he always is, perfectly, strictly
honest and right. He said the boy was bold, insolent,
unprincipled
,
and would make mischief in the family; and you
see he has done his best to verify the prediction.
But Mr. Emmerson never spoke to us in this way of
Seth, said Mary.
No, of course not! He did not wish to interfere with
the boy; but, as the superintendent of my business, it was
his duty to state to me exactly his opinion of all the
subordinate
agents of the office.
Upon my word! said Mary, I don't believe Seth has
had the least intention to do wrong in this circumstance.
What! do you imagine Emmerson really
countermanded
his order to copy the bill, that he might first correct it?
Why, Seth looked to me like a person who meant to
tell the
truth
at all hazards, simply because it
was
the
truth.
But Emmerson denies this. Besides, the bill is mine.
Mr. Emmerson never corrects my draughts.
He might have mistaken; he might have forgotten. It
is certainly very strange, but
You pay Mr. Emmerson's memory a poor compliment.
And, my dear father, this poor little Seth! what could
possess him, but his unflinching honesty, to throw himself
into such a dilemma? He knows he is entirely dependant
on you; he knows the confidence you have in Emmerson.
If he had, from negligence, omitted to copy the bill, he
might have better acknowledged it at once, than told a lie
which must bring him thus openly in conflict with his
superior
and master; or even had he been inclined to a
falsehood
,
why add the grave charge against Emmerson that he
knew
the truth of his excuse?
Mary, said Mr. Lennox, after a pause, you seem to
take a great interest in this boy, but I beg you will conduct
his defence with a little more forbearance towards others.
You have
almost
inferred, not only that Seth is innocent, but
that Mr. Emmerson is guilty. Of course, you are not aware
of what your words might be made to infer, but hereafter I
beg you will be more careful. What Mr. Emmerson says
is not only
honest
, but
true
. He is not only the purest,
most frank, and disinterested of men, but he is the most
acute judge of character, and the best informed upon every
subject on which he ventures to speak. I trust not only his
integrity, but his memory. He
never
forgets. The
precision
and coolness of his mind are actually astonishing. It is
to him I look as the guardian of Harry and the inheritor of
half my business, whenever I may choose to retire myself
from the toils of the office. A breath against his character,
and I am sure he would withdraw himself from me forever.
You will oblige me by never mentioning Seth's name again,
either to him or to me. But here he comes.
Good-morning! said Emmerson, with a smile and
manner
of such quiet self-possession that, while he spoke, every
one present acknowledged the truth of Mr. Lennox's
representation
of him, and gave up Seth as a good-for-nothing,
indomitable, quarrelsome little rascal. Even Mary, for the
moment, ceased to justify him in her thoughts. Fanny alone
began to see a little into the peculiar character of
Emmerson
.
We are discussing the merits and demerits of that young
scamp Seth, said Mr. Lennox, and I am doing justice to
your superior discrimination of character.
Oh, replied Emmerson, modestly, my opportunities
were better. I was with him more, and he was less on his
guard with me. But I am sorry you were so severe with
him.
His conduct was certainly very extraordinary, said
Mrs. Lennox, and seems, indeed, inexplicable.
Why, the fact is, the poor little fellow has a morbid,
diseased imagination! said Emmerson, as if speaking upon
a subject in no way interesting to him. I have always
found him so suspicious and susceptible, that I was neither
surprised nor displeased at the explosion of yesterday. He
is always fancying people are trying to injure hima most
unfortunate disposition. Do you know that this little
gentleman
is ambitious, too? he continued, as if relating an
excellent joke. (Emmerson rarely joked, unless the
subject
had, as in the present case, some bearing upon
himself
.)
Ha! ha! ha! he has ideas and plans of all sorts.
Do you know he expects to be a very great man one of
these days? Ha! ha! ha!
Well, said Mary, quietly, it depends only on himself.
Many a great man has risen from the plough.
He's much more likely to come to the gallows, I fear,
R 2
said Emmerson, in a whisper. I dont speak
all
I
could
of this wicked little fellow. He is a bad, worthless,
dangerous
person.
They were going to ask what he meant by this
insinuation
,
when a servant entered with a letter for Frank, and
Emmerson took his leave.
At last! said Frank. By your leave, ladies and
gentlemen
!
So! I am to start for my post in three days.
This news threw the family into a commotion, although
it was no more than they had long expected. Perhaps,
strange as it may appear, no one was pleased at it except
Fanny and Frank himself.
He had no sooner been convinced that her love was
bestowed
on his brother, than he conscientiously resolved to
master his own passion without the least diminution of his
esteem for her qualities or interest in her happiness. While
daily exposed to her presence, he found this a difficult task,
and he prepared, therefore, to leave her with a tender
satisfaction
,
shared by her, because she knew that, when absent,
he would speedily succeed in diverting his thoughts by new
scenes and adventures. But the sweet, pretty girl
unconsciously
added to his passion by her desire to show towards
him the utmost warmth of a friendship which only stopped
short at love.
The preparations for sending Frank off, however, did not
prevent Mrs. Lennox from following her wish and that of
the rest of the family, fully sanctioned by Mr. Lennox, in
seeking out Seth, with the purpose of offering him such aid
as he might require. With considerable difficulty, they
succeeded
in tracing him to the office of a lawyer, where he
had procured some copying at a price sufficient to provide
him with a sustenance. Mrs. Lennox enclosed a note to
him for twenty dollars, begging to hear from him whenever
he might require similar assistance. Her husband would
allow her to say no more, either in the way of
encouragement
or advice, as he said it would look like an intimation
against Emmerson.
The next day was the last of Frank's stay, and at dinner
the family sat longer than usual, and the young officer
received
much excellent advice from everybody present.
Mrs. Lennox was going on to beg he wouldn't smoke so
much, would wear flannel next his skin, etc., etc., etc., when
two notes came in, one for Frank and one for Mrs. Lennox.
The latter was from Seth. The twenty dollar bank-note
was enclosed, with the following words:
To Mrs. Lennox
.
Madam
,
I haven't done anything wrong that I know of; but while
I labour under the imputation I will not accept assistance,
except it is offered because they think me incapable of a
dishonourable action. I seize this occasion to apologize for
my rudeness to Mr. Lennox, once my noble friend and
benefactor
;
you and all your family have my thanks and best
wishes. I respectfully thank you for your interest in me;
but don't fear, I shall get along somehow, and don't intend
to knock under yet.
Your respectfully obedient,
Humble, and grateful servant,
Seth J. Copely
.
There's a young, haughty, ungrateful dog for you, said
Lennox.
Now,
I like that!
said Mary; that's noblethat's the
way a man ought to act. Seth is as innocent as
Emmerson
himself.
Mary! said Lennox, with a frown of displeasure.
Where's Frank? said Mrs. Lennox.
He was gone.
He also had a letter, remarked Mary.
Did you see him read it?
No, I paid him no attention.
Did you observe Mr. Frank? inquired Mr. Lennox of
the servant.
Yes, sir. He opened the letter, read it, rose, and
immediately
went down stairs.
Is he gone out?
He took his hat, sir, and went out.
Did he seem surprised or alarmed on reading this
letter? inquired Mrs. Lennox, anxiously.
He looked, ma'am, answered the servant, very much
as he usually does, and got right up and went out.
I hope, exclaimed Mrs. Lennox, rising suddenly, he
has received no bad news.
I hope, cried Mr. Lennox, good-naturedly, imitating
her manner, I
hope
he has not jumped out of the window!
But, said Mrs. Lennox, half laughing and half
alarmed
,
should anything have happened!
Pooh, pooh, Katy! what a superfine Spartan mother
you would have made! I fancy
your
presenting Frank his
shield, and telling him `
with
it or
upon
it!'
Mother would say, interrupted Mary, laughing,  `
with
it or
without
it! but, at
all events
, do you mind and come
home!'
CHAPTER XXXIII.
We
must now request the reader to go back to
Glendenning
.
When he reached Montreal, he began to feel the
stirrings of different thoughts. Two or three recollections
came coldly in among his warm reveries of Rose Hill, and
the higher aspirations which his residence there had
awakened
.
In the first place, he had not been very particular
in his society in that town, and, truth to say, although his
wildness and love of frolic had not prevented his forming
intimate relations with the most worthy among his
brother-officers
,
he had also admitted to a perfect familiarity one or
two whose principles and character were not by any means
what they should be. Among these was a Lieutenant
Breckenbridge, who had been his companion in various
nameless orgies, and whose reputation did not stand high,
Glendenning determined to gently and imperceptibly
disentangle
himself from this intimacy, in obedience to his
laudable
resolution of reform. It was a delicate, perhaps a
difficult
thing to do, for Breckenbridge was hot-headed, daring,
quick to suspect a slight, and prompt in his resentment.
But, as Glendenning knew him to be licentious,
unprincipled
,
and a habitual sneerer at everything pure and holy, he
determined to avoid future contact with him.
There was another circumstance, much more grave, which
checked the pleasure of his virtuous dreams as he entered
the town of Montreal. It was the terms on which he stood
with his commanding officer, Lieutenant-colonel Nicholson.
This gentleman was the second son of Lord Middleton, and
a specimen of the sort of man into which a bad-hearted,
spoiled child may be transformed. Full of the idea of his
high family, great expectations, and personal rank and
appearance
(for he was a very handsome man of fifty), his
character was cold, pompous, and arrogant. While his
understanding
was small, his opinion of it was immense, and
nothing could exceed his vanity, unless, perhaps, the
vindictiveness
with which he revenged any offence that
wounded
it.
A coward in secret, his cowardice was overmastered by
his self-importance; but while even in his overbearing
manners
he studied his own safety, he was indifferent to the
danger of others. A toad-eater where his fears or his
interests
required, he was a relentless tyrant to those beneath
him. Although invested by his rank, connexions, and
wealth, with a certain consideration in the eyes of the
world (for how few are not worshippers of these things?),
his real character was cruel and despicable. His stature
was tall and commanding, and an erect and military air
added
to the impression of a countenance which announced
not only the habit, but the determination of command. In
birth and education he was a gentleman, but fashion,
unfortunately
,
considers compatible with that character qualities
which are in themselves not desirable. His own passions
were his only law, the world his only thought, and himself
his only god. His manner was usually cold and haughty,
but when among persons he considered his equals, it
became
free and agreeable, and he possessed the power, in
the society of his immediate associates, of veiling his darker
peculiarities beneath an appearance of military frankness,
and a certain air of
bonhomie
which enabled him to make
plenty of friends when he desired to do so. If nature had
bestowed upon him any good quality, it was, perhaps, a
spirit of hospitality, of which the marked magnificence was
visible in the splendour of his balls, the elegant taste which
presided at his dinners, and the hearty welcome with which,
at his own table and in his own house, he received all whom
he had deemed worthy the honour of an invitation. But even
this originated in his love of ostentation and the vulgar
ambition
of self-display; for, while giving a ball, for the
perfect
brilliancy of which no expense was spared, he would
stint a deserving servant even of his just dues, and turn with
the coldest indifference from the most touching case of
homely
distress. To these sharp, but not uncommon features, let
it be added, that Colonel Nicholson's supreme delight was
to thwart everybody, to make all around him
uncomfortable
,
to wound the feelings of his wife, and friends, and
servants, to touch sore points, to entangle everything, to
distress and insult everybody, and to keep people at a
distance
,
and the reader has as much of his portrait as is
necessary
to the development of our story.
Yet, such are men, such is the world, and such is public
opinion, it was not easy for any, except those immediately
in contact with him in a subordinate station, to say
whether
Lieutenant-colonel Nicholson was an extremely good or
a very bad man. There is no despicable quality which may
not be called by a graceful name, and there is no despicable
man, either, who may not find a clique to praise and
whitewash
him. The choice few among whom this great
personage
thought it not beneath him to unbend, meanly
flattered
by his selection, and deriving various advantages from
the intimacy, feeling all the little good of his character, and,
of course, not brought in contact with any of his bad points,
sturdily defended him against the just indignation of those
who had smarted beneath his arrogant insults, and seen the
malignity of his heart and the smallness of his mind. From
these the world at large learned that his despotism was a
mere necessary habit of command, his vain hospitality was
generous kindness, his cunning sagacity, his cowardice
prudence, and his stinginess wise economy. Thus, by
dwelling upon and exaggerating his better peculiarities, by
denying or explaining away the worse ones, he was made
out by them to be a meritorious person; and the world, who
heard him execrated by one set and adulated by another,
decided, when they took the trouble of deciding at all, that
he was probably a severe disciplinarian, and therefore an
excellent commander, and that the accusations against him
arose from the unbending haughtiness of his disposition,
which, although it made him unpopular, was but the
repelling
cover of a magnanimous heart. As he had executed
his sometimes unpleasant duties with unscrupulous fidelity
and impartiality, too noble and careless to consider
consequences
,
or to descend to arts of conciliation, he must be a
superior officer and a worthy man. Thus, in this strange
world, the purest person is often weighed down by
misfortune
and blackened by calumny, while a scoundrel in the
perpetration of unprincipled actions, not only often escapes
free from public reprobation, but receives the public
applause
,
particularly if Providence have placed him in an
exalted
position.
But, though the world at large would not take the trouble
to decide respecting Lieutenant-colonel Nicholson, the
officers
who served under him had too often felt his
ungenerous
arrogance and paltry insults not to hate him with all
their hearts. His complete power to worry those under
his command was practised without restraint from mercy or
generosity. They had long smarted under a thousand
vague and unnameable pieces of oppression, each one of
which, to a gentleman, is more galling than broader insults.
If there are few who know how to obey, there are still
fewer
who do not betray the innate depravity of human nature
when called upon to command. In the history of absolute
sovereigns, and particularly of the Roman emperors, the
human character is sculptured in colossal forms, and we
there see man intrusted with power. Rome is fallen
through the infinite mercy of Providence, and the world is
cut up into small states; but the human heart, only
narrowed
in its sphere, remains essentially the same, when
religious
influences have not rescued it from itself; and how
many an inglorious Roman emperor is there on the deck of
a ship, at the head of a regiment, in a schoolroom or a
workship, who, if he dared, or if he could, would place his
statue in the temple of God.
Of all the officers of the  regiment, Glendenning had
been the least likely to bear with patience the irritating
slights of his commander, and on his first entrance into the
army, our young madcap had not been many months under
his treatment, when, stung by one of those insults which
Colonel Nicholson knew so well how to inflict without
compromising himself, he resolved, with characteristic
impetuosity
,
to make him answer it in the field. He had
possessed
sufficient prudence, however, to cause a mutual
friend to sound his enemy in an informal way, as to
whether
,
in case of a cartel, he would accept it, waving his rank,
or whether he would proceed, as, under the circumstances,
he possessed the right to do, to bring the officer sending
such a challenge to court-martial. The worst feelings were
awakened in the breast of Colonel Nicholson at this
intimation
,
which had been made in so indirect and
confidential
a way as to render any notice of it impossible.
Wounded
vanity, therefore, at finding his mighty dignity thus set
at naught by a subordinate officer, and a thirst for revenge,
prompted him to reply, Let him only try me! with a
wish to have the intimation supposed an affirmative.
Not thinking this answer could be intended to have the
double meaning of an ancient oracle, Glendenning directed
a friend, accordingly, to invite him to a meeting, but, by an
accident, discovered, just in time to save himself, that it
was Colonel Nicholson's determination to decline the
meeting
and bring upon the challenger the severest
consequences
of a military prosecution. Glendenning was known to
be a dead shot; and there were not wanting persons who
gave this fact weight in accounting for the course of the
commanding officer. The affair was, however, arrested
just in time, but not without an important change in the
feelings of both the gentlemen towards each other. In
addition
to the opinion entertained by Glendenning of his
commander as a cold-hearted, malignant person, he now
felt that he was a coward; while Colonel Nicholson had,
with an inexpressible but concealed rage, beheld in
Glendenning
an open and insolent rebel against his authority,
who barely hid beneath the necessary mask of official
prudence
the fact, that he despised his pretensions, suspected
his courage, and read his character aright.
Perhaps the most vindictive feeling that can be aroused
in the breast of such a man is that with which he perceives
his claims to importance ridiculed by an inferior. All else
that he had availed him nothing, so long as he saw
Mordecai
the Jew sitting at the king's gate.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
There
are, or, at least, at the time of which we are
writing
,
there
were
, no barracks for officers in Montreal. It
was customary for two or three to take a house together.
For some time White and Glendenning had lived in this
way, but latterly Glendenning had found rooms in the house
of a young portrait painter, who, with his wife and child,
occupied
only the lower part of the building.
The life of an officer in a garrison town is not varied by
many pleasures. Both at the parades and the daily
messtable
dinner, he had the not very agreeable certainty of
meeting Lieutenant-colonel Nicholson, and of being
subjected
to the offensive superciliousness of that high and
mighty personage. The evenings were enlivened by a
certain
routine of society, and sometimes by a rout, in giving
which species of entertainment, the reader has been
informed
,
it was Colonel Nicholson's peculiar ambition to excel.
Till now, Glendenning, unaccustomed to read, study, or
reflect, without any particular respect for himself or
purpose
in life, had been driven by
ennui
, and the example of
his chosen companions, into billiard-rooms and whist-clubs,
where he spent a large portion both of his time and money.
But since his return he had adopted different habits; he was
more reserved among his old comrades, and much less seen
abroad than formerly. He attended, with punctilious care,
to his professional duties, and came under the hand of
Colonel
Nicholson several times, with a tranquil and even
gentle
forbearance which astonished, while it did not at all
conciliate
,
that gentleman. Various invitations to take part in
certain old larks were courteously but firmly declined.
Breckenbridge at first rallied him, but, after having made
several ineffectual attempts to bring him into his old ways,
coolly ceased his endeavours, and for some time they
scarcely
met, except in a general way. Breckenbridge felt as if
he were
cut
, a process to which his style of life had not
rendered him entirely a stranger, but which became the
subject of serious reflection when experienced from
Glendenning
.
The latter, however, pursued his way quietly,
laid out a course of reading, which he followed assiduously,
and continued in earnest to look into the evidences of
Christianity
,
in which he even began to feel a singular interest.
He had been but imperfectly educated, and now, for the first
time in his life, he began to study and to think. He read
the Analogy of Religion, by Butler, a book in everybody's
hands, but which he had never heard of but through the
recommendation of one who, he felt, was perhaps his truest
friend on earthMrs. Lennox. This remarkable piece of
reasoning deeply riveted his attention, and overwhelmed
his light and trivial mind with astonishment. He thus
gathered a conviction that, notwithstanding the silent and
inactive indifference with which many intelligent,
cultivated
,
and fashionable people choose to regard the subject,
the scheme of Christianity
may
be true. The thought was
new, vast, and sublime. He felt its quickening power
penetrate
his mind, throw a new aspect over life and nature, and
Vol. I.S
startle him to the deepest recesses of his soul. He
meditated
on it continually. He studied with severest
perseverance
.
He doubted, he feared, he rejoiced and trembled.
Then some old instinct, ludicrous association, or unlucky
word would rise in his heart or his recollection, and all the
sublime but half-formed vision would melt away.
Still, however, he studied, and many a day and many a
night he spenthimself greatly surprised at the power
which had led him to such an occupationreading the
Bible
and works illustrative of it. The more he read, the
more he was struckthe more he was convinced. But
when he closed the volume and went to a drill or parade,
or when he came under the eye of Colonel Nicholson, and
felt the blood in his veins moving quicker at the cold tone
of his voice, or the decisive, magisterial wave of his hand,
he wondered at his folly in yielding credit to nursery fables.
At this interesting epoch of his life, a kind Providence
seems to have in some degree separated him from White,
by leading him to a lodging with Mr. Southard and his
family
,
the young painter before mentioned. White was a
gentleman
in more than one sense, but he was one of those
gentlemen whose opinions are most perfectly decided
against the claims of any religion to divine origin.
Southard
and his family, on the contrary, were devout and
cheerful
believers, and perhaps the sweet little group gathered
at his table, could the artist have painted it, would have
been the most graceful and pleasing of all his subjects.
He was one of those pure and simple beings whom nature
sometimes forms and religion perfects on the earth, an
humble
,
contented, and not altogether unsuccessful imitator of
his divine master. He was poor, without being either
dazzled
with riches or ashamed of poverty, lowly in rank, and
yet lowlier in spirit. Even his talent in his profession was
not above mediocrity, but he knew it and smiled at it, and
was contented with what his Creator had given him. He
had the enthusiasm without the jealous susceptibilities of
an artist. He was almost unknown, and scarcely desired
to become less so. His modest wants were supplied by his
industry, and in a heart tenderly alive to the charm of
nature
,
the sweetness of truth, and the beauty and meaning of
all things, he had a source of constant and extreme
enjoyment
.
In compensation for the want of professional talent,
and of the distinctions and luxuries which it produces,
besides
a warm, true heart, an upright character, and a
sensible
mind, he had been blessed with a lovely wife, in whom
he found at once the most useful and delightful companion
and the tenderest, most affectionate friend. A single child
was the fruit of their union, a little girl three years old.
Careless of the stern toil and gorgeous spectacles and
sorrows
of the world, he livedrare fatehappy in himself
doubly happy in his wife; and all the happiness he
desired
seemed trebled to himbeyond his hopes and merits
while he watched the growth and improvement of the little
Catharine.
For these people Glendenning had long conceived a
warm regard. There was something in the picture of their
humble and contented happiness, so rich with so little, in
their pure and sincere characters, which had touched his
soul. Now particularly, that he was beginning to
experience
a change of opinion on the most important of subjects,
he found a new charm in their society, and he spoke to
them frequently on the great topics which were engaging
his attention. Nothing but such a happy home of his own
could have been so soothing and delightful to his feelings
as this circle, where he every day became more and more
familiarly welcomed, and more and more regarded as a
valuable
acquisition and a necessary part of the circle. These
companions, in some measure, filled the chasm which had
been left by his separation from the Lennoxes, and they
were interested in the same subject, and continued with him
the same course of reasoning. Here he began to feel at
homea sweet word, the meaning of which he had never
known before. Thus passed away several weeks in
elevating
studies and deeply interesting conversations, until
he said one day to his hosts, Almost you persuade me to
become a Christian!
He had already received one affectionate maternal letter
from Mrs. Lennox, full of minuti respecting the family,
and closing with an earnest and impressive hope that he
would continue his study of the religion of Jesus, assuring
him that it was good tidings to the meek, and a light
shining
in a dark place; that it revealed the method of
reconciliation
for iniquity, and presented the oil of joy for
mourning
,
and the garments of praise for the spirit of heaviness.
He smiled at this characteristic language, which so
vividly
recalled his affectionate friend, but the smile was not
one of ridicule. He even thought he began to comprehend
the meaning of those phrases, as he had already done of
the sweet word
home
. They conveyed ideas and feelings
which had never before found entrance into his mind or heart.
Poor fellow! said Mrs. Southard, one evening, as he
went out to go to bed, after a long and ingenuous debate on
the theme, in which he now found singular interestPoor
fellow! the scales are balanced.
Yes, said Southard, a hair will turn them.
CHAPTER XXXV.
One
morning, as Glendenning was returning from a drill,
he met an officer with whom he had long been well
acquainted
.
He had come to Montreal from Quebec on some
business, and this was their first meeting.
Hallo! Clinton! said Glendenning, as he approached.
How are you?
The young man walked directly on, without turning to
the right or left, and as stiffly as if he had been going
through a drill. Glendenning thought it was a boyish jest,
and stopped, expecting to see him presently turn and burst
into a laugh, to exchange their accustomed salutations.
But he passed, and continued on his way with the same
rigid and rather quickened pace, till he disappeared round
a corner.
Glendenning rubbed his eyes, astonished and also
bewildered
.
Could he have been mistaken in the man?
Impossible
!
And yet the total unconsciousness of his
presence
shown by the stranger, whoever he was, implied that
he had been. He laughed at the incident, and thought no
more about it, concluding that the friend he had supposed
himself addressing was probably, in reality, at Quebec.
The next day invitations for a grand
fte
were issued to
all the officers by an old military friend who had served in
India, and was now spending a few months at Montreal.
Glendenning himself was not among the guests invited.
He thought it very oddbut, of course, a mistake. He soon
lost all recollection of it in his absorbing studies.
A day or two afterward he was met in the street by
Breckenbridge, who, as the reader has been already told,
had in former times been long one of his companions. He
felt that his example had been most pernicious to him.
Breckenbridge was warm-hearted, handsome, and witty, a
dare-devil, thoughtless, good-for-nothing fellow, whom one
could not be much with without liking till the discovery was
made that a naturally good heart had been so completely
depraved
by debauchery and gambling, that every spark of
real honour was extinguished in it, and that he was likely
to retain even the exterior qualities of an amiable, amusing
companion, only as long as he found any interest in
assuming
them. By slow but sure degress, he was degenerating
into buffoonery, and his libertinism had been latterly
deepened
by ruinous extravagance. The more he indulged in
sensual
enjoyments, the more unappeasable became his
appetite
,
and the less fastidious his taste, till at length his best
friends asked for him but the questionable praise of being
a
bon enfant
. He was not malignant, but he was violently
passionate, and the bold recklessness of his temper made
him one dangerous to offend. Glendenning had not been
able to effect his awkward task of withdrawing from this
intimacy without awakening the suspicion of the object of
his distrust, but, whether he did so or not, he was quite
resolved
to be seen no more than was actually necessary with
a man whose habits he had already learned to abhor, and for
whose character he felt anything but esteem. He found it,
however, rather difficult to disentangle himself from an
acquaintance
with no other cause than a conviction that it was
morally derogatory to him, as he desired to avoid a quarrel
with the associate thus abandoned. He was no hypocrite,
yet he did not exactly wish to say to one whose friendship
he had encouraged, you are unworthy of me as a
companion
,
either directly or indirectly, and Breckenbridge, who
had at last caught an idea of the truth, felt a malicious
delight
in pressing himself importunately upon his reformed
friend whenever they accidentally met in public.
How d'ye do, Glendenning? how are you? said
Breckenbridge
,
holding out his hand.
Glendenning politely, rather gravely, returned the
salutation
.
What the devil is the matter with you? said
Breckenbridge
.
With me? Nothing!
S 2
You're so dd grave and stiff, I don't know you.
Let me introduce you, then, said White, laughing, as
he joined them: This is my reformed friend
Glendenning
the
virtuous and scientific companion whom we used
to know.
White had, not maliciously, but unfortunately, struck on
the very chord. He himself had felt vexed at the stupid
gravity of his friend, but thought of noticing it by nothing
more than a jest.
So! said Breckenbridge, you are a dd fine chap for
a small party! What's come over you? I don't
understand
it. We used to be `hale fellows well met.' Now, I
swear! you act as if you wanted to cut me.
Pooh! nonsense, said White, who now perceived, by
the expression of Breckenbridge's face, that he was in
earnest
;
let us go in here, and you shall have a game of
billiards
.
Certainly, said Breckenbridge. Then turning to
Glendenning
:
You won't come, I suppose?
Oh yes, I will, said Glendenning, with his habitual
facility of character.
Will? that's something like. Do you know there's a
report going round that you're going to resign and turn
parson
?
Will you play, White? said Glendenning.
No; I've a nasty rheumatism in my shoulder; I can't
hold a cue.
I'll
play, said Breckenbridge.
This was exactly what Glendenning did not want. He
was obliged to yield, however, though with reluctance; and
the worst of it was, his reluctance was clearly detected by
his antagonist.
Several other officers came in. Glendenning, who had
scarcely been in a billiard-room since his arrival, now
embarrassed
and vexed, nodded to them slightly, and received
as slight a return.
I'm glad to have a crack with you, said Breckenbridge.
You used to be a hand worthy of me; but now, I suspect,
you're practising other games.
Glendenning went on playing, without making any reply
to that and various other exclamations on the part of
Breckenbridge
,
in which the words sanctified face and too
good to be worth much appeared directed ironically against
him. A year before, he would have been in a row with
less provocation, but now he had other ideas, and had
really
made progress, though but a slight one, in the manly
art of self-government.
While the game was thus going on, a gentleman whom
Glendenning had seen at Mr. Lennox's, in New-York, came
in, having recently arrived. The acquaintance was renewed
warmly on both sides.
I have a letter for you, said this person, from your
friend Mrs. Lennox. I was going to your lodgings, when
some one who had accidentally seen you directed me here.
He handed the letter, and, excusing himself, went out,
when Glendenning, with an apology, opened and
commenced
reading.
He had not proceeded more than a few lines, when he
felt a sharp blow upon his shoulder from Breckenbridge's
cue, and a
Now, then, old fellow! Dn your letters! Push ahead,
will you?
I tell you what, Mr. Breckenbridge, said Glendenning,
haughtily, I wish you to understand that I don't allow any
man to take such a liberty as that with me, and
you
less
than another.
What do you mean by that? said Breckeabridge, with
a darkening brow.
What I say, sir.
Indeed? me
less
than another? you mean that as an
insult.
Glendenning's eye fell flashing on him, and he was about
to reply, He might consider it so if he chose, when he
checked himself.
No, Mr. Breckenbridge, I do not wish to insult you.
Then please to explain why you allow me to take such
a liberty with you less than another.
I have no explanation to make.
Then you have an insult to retract, and you shall eat
your words at this table.
I am not in the habit of speaking without a cause, said
Glendenning, quietly, neither am I in the habit of
retracting
without one.
Explain, then, explain. If you are grown so touchy as
not to allow any one the ordinary familiarity of a friend, I
have nothing to say. But why
me
less than
another?
Oh! if you drive me to an explanation, said
Glendenning
,
his hot blood mounting higher and higher, I will
give it you, certainly, but I did not desire to give it, at least
not in public.
Let us hear it, at all events, said Breckenbridge, with
a laugh which infuriated his opponent.
You less than another, said Glendenning, calmly and
haughtily, because, from your manners, character, and
occupations
,
I consider you less desirable as a friend, Mr.
Breckenbridge, and I avail myself of this occasion,
moreover
,
to say that our acquaintance must, hereafter, be upon
a less familiar footing.
Well, Captain Glendenning, said Breckenbridge,
quietly
,
and without showing the expected indignation at this
insult
,
I tell you what! I may not be what I ought to be
few of us areyet I trust I can be reproached only with
rashness which has injured myself.
Your
character and
actions do not admit of such a defence.
Sir! said Glendenning.
I suppose you heard my observation; if not, I'll repeat
it, said Breckenbridge, without any symptom of anger or
loss of composure.
Your remark is not worthy even of you, said
Glendenning
;
if I have insulted you, take the course of a
gentleman
;
I am ready to meet you as if you were one, but an
unmeaning calumny can be as little creditable to you as
injurious
to me.
Meet you, said Breckenbridge, meet
you!
ha! ha!
ha!
The laugh was echoed by several gentlemen and officers
among the by-standers.
What do you mean by that? said Glendenning, with
an air rather of astonishment than anger.
Ah! ha! said Breckenbridge. Now, then, it's
my
turn. Every dog has his day! I mean, sir, precisely what
I say.
There was another laugh, and Glendenning saw, with an
emotion difficult to be described, that the feeling of the room
was against him.
You shall retract your atrocious insinuation on the spot,
cried he.
Ah! bah! repeated Breckenbridge, laughing; I'm
not in the habit of speaking without a cause, neither am I
in the habit of retracting without one.
I will give you cause, then, said Glendenning.
You can't do it! replied Breckenbridge, firmly.
Captain
Glendenning, the high and the haughty, let me tell you
a secret: there isn't an officer in Montreal that would meet
you.
You're a fool! cried Glendenning.
Come, come away! said a Captain Drake, taking
Breckenbridge by the arm.
In a moment the room was empty. Glendenning,
astounded
,
stood alone with White.
Well, that's cool! said White. I don't quite
understand
it.
Will you take a message? cried Glendenning.
Certainly, replied White, rolling the balls against each
other on the table.
Then let us be acting immediately.
As they left the house, Glendenning came upon the officer
who had yesterday so singularly passed him in the street.
Clinton! cried he, bewildered; it
was
you, then?
The young man gently turned aside, and continued his
way without offering the least sign of recognition.
Glendenning uttered an exclamation of bewildered
astonishment
.
In the evening White took a message to Breckenbridge,
but did not return to give any account of its reception.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
Glendenning
did not sleep that night, neither did he
resume his studies. His old passions were fully aroused,
and he resorted to his old habits of deadening thema
bottle
of Madeira and a box of cigars. Hour after hour he
paced the floor, like a proud steed reined, champing his
iron bit. The mystery in which he was involved was
perfectly
inexplicable; so that, during long intervals of
reflection
,
shame and rage were almost lost in curiosity and
wonder. His past life had been rash and thoughtless;
that he knew and regretted. But that had been sufficiently
known before, and not visited with consequences like these.
Yet now that new and more rational plans had opened upon
him for the first time, with boiling veins and a heart
appalled
,
he saw himself scornfully, and, it seemed, generally
insulted and despised. What act of his had produced this,
or by what means the unanimity of public action had been
brought about, he racked his imagination and memory in
vain to conceive. He reviewed his past life, as far as
possible
,
in every minute detail; his wordshis very thoughts.
He saw with humiliation the course of a trivial, reckless,
till now worthless young man, employed in no respectable
purpose or occupationgoverned by unworthy impulses
and passionsguilty of wild and unwarrantable actions.
But nothing that he could fix his eyes on accounted, in the
remotest degree, for the present state of affairs.
He was
cut
. His fellow-officers had openly refused to associate
with him, and a blackguard, whom he himself considered
beneath him as a companion, had, with the unconcealed
approbation
,
and to the unconcealed amusement of a roomful
of his brother soldiers, jeeringly and tauntingly declined
noticing his insult, and, apparently, receiving his message;
for White, who had taken it in the early part of the
evening
,
had not even returned to inform him of the result.
White himself seemed to have abandoned him.
What pestilential slander had attached itself to his name?
Was he charged with robbery or murder? What crime
had he committed more than is committed (alas! that it
should be so! but it is) by other young men, who,
notwithstanding
,
keep their places in society, are courted and
caressed
,
are presented by fathers and mothers to their
modest
and innocent young daughters, and hailed by their
companions
with pride and delight? None. He had done
nothing. Could the odium against him have any relation
with the affair of Frank Lennox? His reason rejected the
possibility. True, he had there insulted a lady; but surely
that had been amply expiated; and, since the lady herself
and her friends forgave him, it could hardly be conceived
that strangers should take up the matter at this late date,
and even if they had taken it up, it could never have
produced
such startling effects.
Was it that he had almost become a Christian? He
knew that many gentlemen, worldly men and military
officers
,
distinguished statesmen, and the leading men of
modern
Christian society, smiled at the visionary idea of
adopting
Christian precepts in active life; and that able and
conscientious conductors of that free press which cannot
fail greatly to modify public opinion, did not hesitate to
state in their columns that Christian precepts had been
found incompatible with the operations of practical life.
But was he to be made a pariah for examining into them?
Was the Bible, as in the time of Nero, become a mark of
scorn and dishonour? and the Christianwas he, then, an
outcast? No; it was absurd. All his attempts at
explaining
the causes of his present galling position were lost in
wild and improbable conjectures.
The clock struck eleven, twelve, one, two, and no White
three, four, and day broke, first overflowing the star-paved
shore of heaven with a stream of pale light, which deepened
into radiant floods and gorgeous, fiery shapes, so that he
paused
in his disturbed walk of agony, to look into those abysses
of insupportable, ineffable glory, and as the sun lifted itself
calmly and slowly above the horizon, he forgot a moment
his own private griefs in thinking how much nature exceeds
imagination, and in remembering scenes of his visit to Rose
Hill, where he had often been thus abroad early on some
excursions of pleasure in the cool, oderous morning air.
But the clock struck five, and he started at the
recollection
of Breckenbridge, Clinton, and White. At the
recurrence
of their images, nature, morality, and the sense of
God, the new-born faith in the religion of Jesus, thoughts
of duty, the idea that this state on earth is one of trial and
probation, and all the associations of Rose Hill, and the
Lennoxes, and those delicious evenings, and those pure
and spiritual conversations, passed from his mind, to give
place to unbridled passion and visions of bloody revenge.
It was, he knew not how near morning, when his
reflections
were interrupted by a knock at the door, and
Southard entered in morning-gown and slippers.
I beg your pardon, said Southard, but I've come up
to see what's the matter with you. We've heard you
pacing all night backward and forward, and often speaking
aloud.
I hope I haven't disturbed you?
Only with the apprehension that you are either uneasy
or ill.
I'm both, said Glendenning, vexed and grieved, as
well as ill.
What is it? Can we do anything for you?
No, no, my dear fellow, no. You cannot aid me
cannot
,
at least yet, even share my troubles.
Then I must ask no more, said Southard; but,
without
knowing them, I can advise you not to yield too much
to merely temporary cares and sorrows. They pass away.
Leave them to Him who sends them.
It's easier to advise those things than to do them, my
friend, said Glendenning.
Of course it is; but it is nevertheless possible to do them.
No, no; it is not possible.
Yes, it is. All is possible with the aid of God.
And if you had lost your wife last night, said
Glendenning
,
perhaps you would feel how insufficient mere
precepts, either of morality or religion, are to meet the
blighting cares of life.
I should suffer, doubtless, replied Southard. I should
shrink, and mourn, and weep; but he who believes and trusts
in the one true and everlasting God, and comprehends with
faith the perfect system of consolation offered by the
Christian
religion, although he cannot avoid the storms and wrecks
of life, yet he has a star to guide him and a pilot to steer
him. Believe me, there is neither wisdom, philosophy, nor
religion in worrying one's self about things that can't be
helped
.
Do your best, and let things go. Satisfy your conscience
and sleep in peace. Read your Bible, and you will find
support
.
`Which of ye, by taking thought for himself, can add
one cubit unto his stature?'
Glendenning was at first disposed to think it intrusive
and rather ridiculous, a man's coming into his room to preach
religion at daybreak in morning-gown and slippers. But
the words of Southard, and the answering echoes which
thrilled in his own heart and his own reason, did once
more make him pause, and called up again a feeble sense
of his new-born hope and faith.
Trust in God, continued Southard. Man neither
made himself, nor can take care of himself without his
Creator
.
He placed you in the world; He will receive you
going out of it; and if you will let him, he will guide,
support
,
and console you during your progress through it.
Glendenning shook his head.
Come to me, ye that are weary and heavy laden, and
I will give you rest.
I wish I had your unwavering faith, said Glendenning,
and sometimes I have; but it is fluctuating and feeble.
The first storm whirls it away.
It will be given you if you truly and sincerely ask it;
that is all you want to be a happy man. Once convinced,
you walk the earth like a god, careless of its
inconveniences
,
its cold or its heat, its joy or its sorrow, its glory
or its shame, and only waiting your summons to go back to
a celestial abode, where moths do not corrupt and thieves
no more break in and steal. But come! I will have done
preaching, and leave you to better thoughts. You've been
awake all night, too. You must sleep, or you'll cut a poor
figure at the ball to-night.
Ball! said Glendenning. What ball?
Why, the ballColonel Nicholson's ball.
Does Colonel Nicholson give a ball? and to-night?
said Glendenning, a flush of painful emotion overspreading
his face.
You don't mean to say you're ignorant of it? said
Southard, with some surprise. Why all the town are
talking about it.
I was ignorant of it, said Glendenning.
But how is it that
you
where is your invitation? All
the officers are to be there. Have you not received your
invitation?
Has any one come for me?
Not to my knowledge.
A ray of light shot into Glendenning's mind.
It is very extraordinary, said Southard. It is quite
certain there must be some mistake.
But perceiving Glendenning, was not attending to him,
and appeared lost in thought, he bade him good-morning and
left him.
So! said Glendenning,
that's my man. He
has done
it by some infernal
slander;
but let him beware. If I can
catch
him
him
, of all men! But stop, be cool; I have
only to wait. The Horse Guards? I defy them. A court
martial? I inviteI court one. My commission? I'll
resign
it. Let me be cool and patient! I shall know all in
a day or two. No more questions! no more
challenges
yet!
Some one must be at the bottom of it, and who but
he!
If
I can trace it to himI throw away all considerations of
self. I care not for rank, power, laws, nor consequences.
Does he think again to shelter himself behind paltry
questions
of etiquette and articles of war?
Vol. I.T
He went out and bathed, came home and dressed as
usual, breakfasted, and still no White. His heart was
oppressed
with passion and his mind bewildered in mystery;
but he kept himself composed with the words, Wait, be
cool! The hour will come!
Shunning the society or even the eye of every human
being, he spent the whole day alone in the environs of this
magnificently situated town, wandering, now along the shores
of the broad and noble stream, now climbing some of the
heights, from which he beguiled the intervals of keener
reflection
by the dazzling and exquisite views which broke
upon him of the island, town, and river, and now
penetrating
into the green, untrodden solitudes of a forest, soothing
himself with the sweet sights and sounds of that nature
which God has directly given as a significant reflection of
the human soul, as an eternal type and a deep lesson to
those who study and read aright; but to others, a book of
pretty pictures for the amusement of children.
He took some refreshment in the course of the day at a
tavern, and when the evening was sufficiently advanced to
permit his walking home unrecognised by such of his
acquaintances
as might be abroad in the streets, he returned
to town.
No change had taken place in his mind. He had sought
neither in the advice of any wiser friend, nor in the perusal
of the Bible or any religious book, nor directly from his
Creator in humble prayer, light for his guidance or strength
for his support.
On his way home he found himself suddenly before the
elegant house of Colonel Nicholson. It was blazing with
lights, and within and around it were all the tokens of a
brilliant
fte
. Figures passing and repassing before the
windows, carriages dashing up, giving out their gay and
richly-dressed company, and hurrying away, the heads of
dancers, the sound of music, etc.
The stigma his commanding officer had cast upon him by
omitting to invite him seemed to burn like a brand of shame
on his forehead for all the world to see. The surrounding
darkness seemed scarcely black enough to hide it. He
stood a moment with folded arms and a pale countenance
to gaze and brood.
It was not only an intentional insultmeant as such,
received
as suchbut it was, in sober truth, an injury which
the reputation of a young officer could scarcely survive. It
was an undisguised declaration of enmity on the part of
Colonel Nicholson; a public proclamation of his contempt
and of Glendenning's shame, of his opinion that
Glendenning
was not a proper associate for gentlemen. And,
moreover
,
he knew that Nicholson's mean and cowardly soul,
however vindictive and merciless, would not have ventured
upon so bold and open a measure, unless protected from
the consequences, from the reproach of public opinion, and
the indignant resentment of his victim, by circumstances of
a very marked and extraordinary nature. Nicholson was a
man who launched the deadly blow only from a
place of
safety
.
With these fierce and burning thoughts, the young man
stood some time in the shadow, meditating on the best mode
of action, and feeding fat his thoughts of vengeance.
Once he approached a few steps, resolved to stalk into the
gay and crowded rooms, all dusty, sweat-stained, and
ghastly
as he was, reckless of the screams of affrighted women
and the frowns of furious beaux, and to take by the throat
the malignant villain who had cast this black shell upon
him; but he withheld himself from what a moment's
reflection
told him would be only an act of unmanly desperation,
perhaps most gladly hailed by his enemy, and most
triumphantly
used as a means of completing his ruin. The
very intensity of his passion taught him prudence; his very
agitation made him calm and wary.
Ah! uttered he, as he turned away, sick and suffocated
with his unaccustomed effort to restrain violent emotion,
one of the highest and most necessary arts of a moral being,
and one possessed only by the truly great and goodAh!
if the dog would but fight! if I could but plant him, face to
face, before me!
Poor Mrs. Lennox! where was her mild and gentle
image
,
her holy words? where the new ideas she had
awakened
,
the promise she had extorted, the angel voices she
had called up in his bosom, the light of heaven she had shed
over his path? Gone, lost! as hope, love, reason, truth,
common humanity, respect for God, and the moral sense,
and all that is pure and high, and spiritual and unworldly,
must ever be lost in the heart that gives itself to the brutal,
bloody, depraving duel, when, groping at noonday, the
infidel turns from heaven and voluntarily embraces earth
and hell!
CHAPTER XXXVII.
At
last he reached his home. A violent ring of the
bell brought Southard himself to the door.
You frighten us, said he; we did not know what
had happened.
How so?
By ringing so hard.
I was not aware of it, said he, coming in, and
putting
down his hat. Has White been here?
No.
Nor sent?
No.
He sunk into a chair with folded arms, in dark and
moody silence. He looked like a demon thus breaking
in from the lower world, gnawed by fierce thoughts of
murder and hate, upon a scene full of very different
influences
.
Mrs. Southard had been engaged in their neat,
humble
drawing-room washing and dressing her little girl
for bed. The carpet was strewed with flowers,
mutilated
dogs, sadly misused nine-pins, and the fragments of
a broken tin carriage, which, now thrown aside and
neglected, showed that the child had finished another
innocent and happy day. Bright, clean, as fresh as a
morning rose-bud, her lips and cheeks not at all unlike
one, and her large eyes of tender blue as full of light
and soul as they could be, she sat on her mother's knee,
her silken hair only half covered by the small, snowy
cap, but peeping out here and there in soft, rebellious
curls, half auburn, half gold. Southard, who had been
reading Milton, had laid down the volume, and was
looking
at the group with the delight of an artist mingled
with the tenderness of a father, and watching to see its
effects upon their friend.
Glendenning had a sould for such a picture, and was
arrested by it. It struck strangely on his thoughts.
He was one of those who feel the singular refreshment
of being with children, and with this one he had long
formed a tender intimacy.
There, said Southard, is the most beautiful
object
in creationa child just fresh from the hands of
God.
The most beautiful, said Mrs. Southard, at least
in the eyes of a father. But Kate
has
a remarkable
face.
She has, indeed, said Glendenning.
Do you know, said the mother, charmed to find
that he appeared enlivened by the sight, do you know
she can sing, and dance, and play horse, and run like a
robin-redbreast, and repeat twenty pieces of poetry?
Come, Katy, tell Captain Glendenning about `
Reason, and
Folly, and Beauty, they say
'come`
Went on a party of
pleasure one day
.'
No, no, said Kate, with a side-long, blushing look
at Glendenning.
Naughty girl, said the mother. Come!
But Katy only put her finger to her lip, and turned
bashfully towards her friend a fat little snowy shoulder,
so beautiful that the desire to touch and kiss it drove
even Nicholson out of his mind.
And do you believe how the little toad is learning
to talk? resumed Mrs. Southard. I can't do a thing
that she does not imitate. I told her to-day she must
not have something which she wanted, and she replied,
`She could
not possibly do without it!
' and this afternoon
she wanted to go out, saying `I had
no notion
how
extremely
delightful
it was.'
Mothers are the same all over the world, said
Southard, apologetically.
And what have you been doing to-day, my little
dear? asked Glendenning, taking her on his knee, for
a moment forgetting his troubles, and looking with
delight
at her beauty, thus set off beyond the power of
jewels, or the toilet of Pope's Belinda, by the little
nightgown
and snowy cap.
I watered my
ikle wose-bush
. said the child.
Your
ikle wose-bush!
Ah! did you ever hear the
story of the silver trout?
No.
Once there was a little silver trout, and her mamma
T 2
told her she might go off and swim about, but she
mustn't eat anything she should see, without first asking
her. So the little trout went off, and at length came to
a nice little worm, and, being very hungry, you know,
she forgot what her mamma had told her, ate up the
worm, and, oh dreadful, don't you think there was a
hook, like a naughty pin, in it, and a string to it, and a
naughty boy had hold of the string, and he drew the
poor little trout out of the water and killed him, and
had him fried for supper.
Tell more! said the child, fixing her blue eyes on
him with a kind of hushed and beautiful awe.
That's deep tragedy to her, remarked her father,
smiling at her profoundly serious countenance.
Once there was a little girl, continued
Glendenning
,
who was very naughty, and wouldn't mind her
mamma.
A shadow came over Kate's face.
And then her mamma died, and she had no home,
and then she had no dinner, and no coat, and no hat,
and no nice little shoes, and, don't you think, she had
to stand by the roadside alone in the cold winter, and
to beg for some bread, and the first man she asked said,
`No, go away, naughty, naughty little girl;' and then
But the quivering lip, and the two great tears forcing
themselves from the blue eyes of his little listener, and
rolling down her cheeks, warned the narrator not to
deal too largely in the pathetic.
Oh! said the mamma, delighted, and herself rather
touched by the idea of the little girl on the roadside
without any mamma, she's very tender-hearted, my
little
Kate.
And, I vow, I believe Julia's eyes were wet too!
said Southard, laughing.
Come, now, to bed! said Mrs. Southard; but first
say `Twinkle, twinkle, little star,' for Captain
Glendenning
.
No, said the child.
Yes.
No, no, mamma, not to
him
.
Then tell him about,
`Oh, ladies, beware of the gay young knight,
For he loves and he rides away!'
Oh, no! mamma, not to
him
.
And why not to
him?
Because he's a coward, replied the child, with her
b oken accent.
A
what?
said Glendenning.
Colonel Nicholson says so, you know, said the
child.
A what, my dear little girl? asked Glendenning,
gently, the expression of repose and pleasure which had
gradually come into his face, however, entirely
disappearing
.
Oh hush, Katy, naughty girl, said Mrs. Southard,
exchanging a look of such meaning with her husband,
and giving such other evidences of alarm, that
Glendenning
needed no farther explanation to convince him the
child had overheard and was repeating some real
conversation
.
He seized her gently by the hand, and said,
Do you mean a
coward
, my dear?
Yes! yes! a coward! said she, delighted to be
understood.
For Heaven's sake! exclaimed Southard.
Dear Captain Glendenning! interrupted Mrs.
Southard.
I understandI partly know, said Glendenning;
but you will, of course, explain this to me, Southard?
Certainly I will. It's a stupid and a painful thing.
But I intended to reveal to you what I heard this
afternoon
,
and the child has, perhaps, broached the subject
opportunely.
It's the greatest nonsense in the world, Captain
Glendenning, said Mrs. Southard, rising with the child.
Don't be angry or rash! It will pass over, if you are
prudent and patient. Good-night! good-night! I shall
not be able to leave Katy for at least half an hour. I
always sit by her till she falls asleep.
Now, then, said Glendenning, when they were
alone, if you are my friend, tell me frankly, fully, all
the calumny that has been hatched against me by that
man.
The circumstance to me, said Southard, would
not, could not wear such a serious aspect as I confess
others find in it. I hope you will treat it with the
contempt
it merits.
Let me hear it first.
You had an affair of honour in New-York this
summer
with Mr. Lennox?
I had.
A lieutenant of the United States army?
Yes.
You were insulted in the theatre, and received a
blow?
I did.
You went out with him, and settled the matter
amicably
?
I did.
Dined with the young man, and spent a week at his
country seat?
I did. All this I did; and now your story. The
rest, the rest!
You
have
it. It is
this
that I have told you. Colonel
Nicholson has, informally, unofficially, revived the
affair
,
and expressed an unfavourable opinion of it. He
does not seem a friend of yours, and, in his way, has
chosen to view the matter as an evidence of yournow
be calm
Go on! said Glendenning.
You have his words. My little Kate heard an
officer
,
who is sitting for his head to me, tell my wife
I'm a coward?
These were the words, as reported to us, of Colonel
Nicholson, who declares that he has some intention of
ordering an official investigation. He has, 'tis useless
to deny it, for the moment seriously injured your
reputation
.
Glendenning made no reply, but paced thoughtfully
backward and forward, with a tranquillity which
surprised
his informant. At length he said,
Thank you for explaining this to me. I see it all.
And, I trust, treat it with contempt.
Not exactly with contempt, but nothing can be done
with it. I can't undo the past; I can't fight the duel
over again. If my brother officers have the stupidity
to be led away by the opinion of a person they despise
as much as they do this Colonel Nicholson, let them.
I will resign my commission, and meet Colonel
Nicholson
himself. Should he refuse to meet me, I'll
horsewhip
him, if he were twenty Colonel Nicholsons.
Tut! tut! tut! cried Southard:
horsewhip
your
lieutenant-colonel?
There was a ring at the door, and the servant
announced
Captain White, who immediately entered with
his usual undisturbed and indifferent manner. He was
one of those natures which nothing lashes into phrensy.
Deep emotion only stilled him, and gave him more
perfect
mastery over his reason and passions.
How are you, Southard? How are you, ma'am?
said he to Mrs. Southard, as she entered hastily and
affrighted
,
for the voice of Glendenning had reached her
while watching her child to sleep.
How are you, Glendenning?
Where have you been? inquired Glendenning.
Why did you not return to me? Why are you not
at the ball?
I have been looking into matters a little, and, as for
my absence from the ball, if you mean Colonel
Nicholson's
ball, I have not been invited. I wish you'd give
me a cup of tea, Mrs. Southard, will you?
We are just going to have some, said she, as she
rang. Oh, what is all this to end in?
There was a pause, which no one seemed inclined to
break.
You take it coolly, Captain White, at length said
Glendenning.
Coolly! why not?
You are just in time with your coolness now, said
Southard; Captain Glendenning is likely to have use
for it.
It is at his service, and therefore I sought him. A
little sugar, if you please! your tea has positively the
flavour of Caravan, Mrs. Southard.
It is but common tea, said the lady.
Then, perhaps, I am thirsty. What a day we've had.
Rome and Naples have few more delightful.
If it would but last the year through, said Mrs.
Southard, who perceived he desired to change the
conversation
.
It wouldn't be so pleasant. answered White. I
remember once spending a winter at Rome, and I
positively
surfeited on the beauty of the climate. No wind,
no cloud; a sky of the most transparent clearness and
exquisite hues; week after week, month after month,
nothing but that everlasting bright heaven and still air.
I got monstrously sick of it, to be sure, and was as glad
to see a dull day as I am here to see a fine one.
What a climate for art, for architecture, statues,
temples, columns, and triumphal arches! said Southard.
Yes, famous place! interesting things! good
buildings
!
and devilish nice people they must have been!
Unchristian, bloody, and barbarous, though!
But immensely clever, said White, finishing his
second cup. Now, then, Glendenning, a word to you.
His friend silently rose and followed him into his
room, where the servant had placed lights.
END OF VOL. I.To Mrs. Lennox
.
Madam
,
I haven't done anything wrong that I know of; but while
I labour under the imputation I will not accept assistance,
except it is offered because they think me incapable of a
dishonourable action. I seize this occasion to apologize for
my rudeness to Mr. Lennox, once my noble friend and
benefactor
;
you and all your family have my thanks and best
wishes. I respectfully thank you for your interest in me;
but don't fear, I shall get along somehow, and don't intend
to knock under yet.
Your respectfully obedient,
Humble, and grateful servant,
Seth J. Copely
.CHAPTER I.
Glendenning
, said White, when they were alone,
you are in an extremely awkward position, and so am
I. I bore your message last evening to Lieutenant
Breckenbridge. He declined receiving it on the plea
that you are not a gentleman.
Go on, said Glendenning, who had gradually, since
the appearance of White, reassumed a manner
perfectly
composed, and who listened, without gesture and
without passion, to the startling commencement of his
friend's narration.
I asked an explanation. He referred me to Colonel
Nicholson. Of course, I immediately determined to
call him out on my own account. On seeking a friend,
I learned for the first time the whole affair, which I
presume
you know.
I have heard it indirectly.
The person to whom I applied was Captain Gresham;
and what do you suppose he told me? That, until I
had explained a charge against my own honour, which
had been some days current in society, he must
decline
bearing a message for me. Your affair with Lennox,
as you have already learned, is considered to have been
prematurely arranged. The originator and circulator
of this opinion is
Colonel Nicholson
. He has so
managed
it as to set the matter in the light in which he
desired
it to be seen, and certain of his intimates, tools
and toad-eaters, have worked for him with a success
undeniable and incredible. For two days I had felt, I
could not distinctly say what or why, a certain
coolness
and stiffness in the manner of everybody towards
me, ascribing it to my own imagination till it grew
too unequivocal to be mistaken. In short, we are both
cut
. We are fairly in Coventry; I think most
unjustly
,
and altogether in consequence of the bilious views
adopted by that great potentate, Colonel Nicholson.
Still that
is
his view, and it has produced this effect.
You have now my story.
He paused, but Glendenning made no reply.
What do you propose? said White.
There is but one thing I can propose
There is! and that is to
To give up my commission, and force Nicholson to
meet me.
Ah! said White, coolly, that's an alternative
which, I confess, had not struck me.
Nicholson, said Glendenning, is a malignant
coward
!
The course he has adopted in this affair is not
the result of candid conviction, but of secret vengeance.
I have not been able to conceal from him the contempt
in which I hold his character, and I have had the
temerity
to detect his meanness, without the imprudence to
put myself within his reach. I allude to the challenge
I proposed to send him, and his characteristic manner
of backing out of the scrape. Afraid (for I shall
hereafter
speak openly of him) to meet me himself, he has
hit upon this way to gratify his passion without
personal
danger, safely sheltered, as he has the folly to suppose,
behind his rank.
You have read his heart, I believe, said White, as
if you held it in your hand; but to what practical
purpose
I cannot pretend to discover. What particular
course do you propose to pursue? I do not quite
understand
you.
Immediately call him to account for the opinion he
has expressed. I will write him this night.
Give me one of those cigars, will you? said White.
Your suggestion is not practicable. Nicholson is what
you represent him; he has done what you accuse him
of. His motive, I doubt not, you have correctly
construed
;
but he is your commanding officer. You have
not the power to escape from his supervision in
anything
occurring while under his command; nor can you,
with propriety, address him but respectfully and as
your superior. Were you to do otherwise, you would
do exactly what he would like the most. He could
ruin you forever, and he
would
, too, I can tell you.
A 2
What do
you
advise? said Glendenning. I know
Nicholson is as base as he is cunning, and as
revengeful
as he is cowardly. Oh how my arm aches to
horsewhip
him!
Stop, stop. Take me with you, my young friend!
said White, knocking the ashes off his cigar with his
little finger nail. It is not at all certain that
Nicholson
is a coward. Perhaps he would meet you gladly if
he had no better way of compassing his ends. He will
destroy your prospects; he will blast your name; he
will break your heart, if you don't take the greatest
care. But he won't nowhe
never
will meet you.
And what, then, do you advise?
You have conceived accurately many features of
his character. But you are irritated; you hate him,
and I think you exaggerate his bad qualities. I suspect
he's a better fellow than you think him!
Oh! said Glendenning, I can bear anything but
hearing him defended. Pray go on.
I hope I have judged him more justly. He is, at
least, born and bred a gentleman; he must have some
gentlemanly feeling.
Well, perhaps I am heated, said Glendenning,
who began to be overmastered by an awful thought
which sometimes darkly crossed his mind, and which
he had thus far succeeded in avoiding any allusion to,
yet which cowed and silenced him as a fiery horse is
often stilled in the crisis of a storm or battle.
I will go to him to-morrow, said White, calmly
and courteously, like a gentleman and a brother officer,
request him, as your friend, to state his opinions and
wishes, rectify his misconceptions, represent the matter
right (for perhaps he don't really understand it), and
appeal to his reasonhis justice. He paused and
added
,
If you please, to his
mercy
.
Glendenning rose and paced impatiently across the
floor.
It is, I know, said White, not an agreeable duty;
it is, in fact, a humiliation. But we must all swallow
some nasty doses on our way through life. He is a
peculiar
fellow; but I fancy I can manage him. His
understanding
is weak, his heart cold, his idea of his
own self-importance exaggerated. These are
constitutional
defects. We must get over them as we can.
On the other hand, in proportion to his vindictiveness
where he fancies himself not sufficiently respected, will
be, perhaps, his magnanimity when we frankly place
ourselves
at his feet and in his power.
But to bend to
him
, said Glendenning.
You must not forget, my young friend, continued
White, in a still graver tone, that you owe your
present
dilemma partly to your own imprudence. You
came here in a subordinate station, and (excuse me)
with a reputation for wildness, quarrelsomeness, and
contempt of authority, which foreran you. Your
commanding
officer happened to be a gentleman peculiarly
susceptible upon such pointsvain, pompous,
arbitrary
,
and unforgivingequally powerful in his
connexions
,
his position, and his rank. You knew him and
you bearded him. You did not conceal your
consciousness
of his weakness, your contempt for his vices, and
your scornful indifference to his resentment. You even
took pains to wound his vanity, without pausing to
reflect
that, by such a heart,
that
offence is rarely
forgiven
.
A great and noble soul would have raised him
above your follies and led him to pardon your
opposition
,
and he would have conciliated your respect and
affections by showing that he deserved them. But, my
dear fellow, few men have great and noble souls. They
are generally inspired with mean and selfish motives;
he in a peculiar degree; and you have not only, in
some measure, impaired his standing with others, but
you have lowered him in his own eyes. Do you expect
him to forgive you? Do you expect him now to
refrain
from revenge, when he thinks you have placed
yourself in his power? and do you expect him to do
this
unasked?
There are truth and reason in what you say, said
Glendenning, singularly docile. I have been rash.
But what advice can he give? How can he unsay what
he has said? A fool like him may set a house on fire,
but he can't extinguish the flames. Besides, another
objection strikes me. If we ask this man's advice,
shall we not be obliged to follow it?
My friend Glendenning, there are difficulties in the
way of all things. You must let
me
manage this
matter
for you.
But said Glendenning.
The necessity is not a pleasant one, interrupted
White, in a low voice, but it is one of
two
alternatives.
If
Go! for God's sake! said Glendenning.
Then leave all to me. Say no more of it; think no
more of it. What, man! we've been in a gale of wind
before! Smoke a cigar; drink a bottle of wine; go
to bed, and to-morrow morning be here to learn the
result.
Glendenning was at length alone! What spell had
fallen on him? He shunned all company, even that of
Southard, and throwing himself on his bed, endeavoured
to sleep. For some hours he succeeded; but at two he
woke from a frightful dreamcold, trembling,
oppressed
with horror. He endeavoured with deep draughts
of wine to steady his nerves, and partly succeeded.
Pacing
a thousand times across the floor, he lost himself
in thought. Oh, could he but bring back the past! That
was impossible. But the future was in his power. Yet
he had not the true courage to think so. He felt like
some one, bound and alone, on the deck of a ship,
which steadily and silently, with a slow but increasing
motion, is borne on and on along a resistless current,
to the black maelstrom, whose fatal roar is faintly heard
in the distance. Only one power could save him!
Kneel, man, and ask its aid.
CHAPTER II.
When
he left Glendenning, White's mind was at ease,
because his resolution was fixed.
He
was disturbed by
no moral views or conscientious scruples, no new-born
beams of dim religious light, and, truth to say, very
little keenness of sympathy or warmth of heart. He
was a man of the world and a gentleman, but nothing
more. The idea of troubling himself about a
hereafter
never entered his head. He was a good-natured,
well-meaning
,
and, in some respects, warm-hearted
sensualist
.
An infidel, of course. He had picked up some smart
arguments against Christianity, and they sufficed him.
Without literary tastes, love of art or of nature, he
squared his thoughts and actions upon the rules of the
highest classes of society, and perhaps the thing which
he considered of paramount importance in life was his
standing as a man of honour and of
ton
his name in
the most exclusive circlesthe influence he had at his
club among the leaders of fashion. His idea of vice
was anything odd. His character, manners, and rank
made him a welcome and rather a caressed guest at the
tables of the great, and he was a professed, and one
might almost say a professional diner out. If he ever
studied, it was to display his knowledge in this arena.
Horses, wine, the opera, the ballet, beauty, and women,
the last new novel, the passing event in the political
worldwithout any particularly solid information even
on these his favourite subjects, he was here
considered
an amusing and even a brilliant talker. This was
his aim and ambition. He did not think. He had long
frittered away his capacity to feel except when
seriously
aroused (which did not happen often). He admired
nothing but from a fashionable point of view. Quite
destitute of the moral sense, which an habitual
worshipper
of mere worldly things and an habitual liver among
mere worldly influences can scarcely fail to be, he
judged in all cases by his interest or by merely
adventitious
standards. Neither a coarse nor an ungenerous
man, he was, when tested, cold and selfish. His mind
was as much above mediocrity as his manners were;
and their effect was aided by a fine military person, a
certain cool, self-possessed energy; nerves which
nothing
disturbed, and the instinctive courage of a
gentleman
.
He piqued himself upon being a firm friend and
a bitter enemy. Although selfish, he noted down with
equal care both kindnesses and offences; and it was
one of his favourite boasts that he never forgot a favour
or forgave a wrong. Vengeance in him was not
malignant
and mean, as it was in the pompous Nicholson. It
could be aroused only by what he imagined a just cause:
and when it
was
aroused, it never slept, never flagged.
It was pursued as a duty through years with patient
determination, tempered on no moral principle and
checked by no religious fear. He was, in short, wholly
of the earth, earthy, without a disinterested impulse
which he would gratify at any self-sacrifice, or a tender
or holy susceptibility to truth, humanity, or nature.
A primrose by a river's brim,
A yellow primrose was to him,
And it was nothing more!
Such was the companion and friend whom
Glendenning
had allowed to manage the little matter for him
in which he now found himself engaged.
On his way to his lodgings, after his interview with
Glendenning, he also passed Nicholson's house, and
saw, at a late hour, the blazing windows, the dancing
crowd, and heard the gay music. The annoyance of
being cut by his commander was not lost upon him,
and he determined to bring the thing to a speedy
termination
one way or the other. To be excluded from
such circles did not at all suit his tastes.
On reaching home, he immediately wrote a note to
Colonel Nicholson, couched in the most respectful
terms, and begging the honour of half an hour's private
conversation on a subject of interest. After a short
delay
,
the servant came back with an answer.
Lieutenant-colonel Nicholson has to acknowledge
the note of Captain White, and begs the honour of
Captain
White's company to breakfast at nine o'clock
tomorrow
morning, etc., etc.
Nicholson
.
Breakfast at nine! yes, certainly! muttered White.
What could be more civil? Perhaps we haven't done
him justice. I rather fancy he's a pretty good fellow,
after all, if you take him right. If I can get poor
Glendenning
out of the scrape in any other way, so much
the better. But if not
He walked once or twice across the room.
Why
not
that's all!
Penning a hasty, but most ostentatiously respectful
acceptance, such as he thought suited the peculiar
calibre
of the grand personage he addressed, he smoked
another cigar, and with the fragrant blue wreaths, which
he quietly blew out of the open window, floated away all
fear of the result.
At nine the next morning he was in the anteroom of
his commanding officer, whose opulence and love of
display were sufficiently visible in the expensive and
luxurious style in which his house was furnished, the
suite of elegant rooms, and the number of richly-liveried
servants. After a few minutes' delay (the great man
loved those manifestations of power), he was ushered
into a small, rich, eastern boudoir, opening upon a
balcony
and lovely garden, and in which he found Colonel
Nicholson and his lady. The latter was a sweet,
girlish-looking
person, whose graceful form and beautiful,
gentle countenance and manners had often excited his
admiration, and who, despite the most guarded air of
general cheerfulness, sometimes betrayed, by a shade
across her face, or an unconscious sigh, that she was
(as she could scarcely fail of being) far from happy with
the personage with whom the pecuniary interests of her
family had recently united her.
Another man might have been somewhat abashed
under
the circumstances of his present visit, but White
felt nothing of the sort. Had he manifested anything
like embarrassment, he would have probably found his
host more haughty and forbidding. He was at first
received
with a certain dignity and grandeur, which it
was Colonel Nicholson's peculiar pleasure to put on
and put off at various times and to various persons,
and which the young officers under his command had
found so offensive. But White had seen the world, and,
highly born and connected himself, was not dazzled by
the splendour of the great. He made his salutations,
therefore, with that ease and self-possession which
Nicholson
found most difficult to contend against, and, in
consequence, presently felt quite at home, chatting
familiarly
with the amiable and pretty young creature,
with whom his previous acquaintance had been on a
favourable
footing, and placed, in regard to the great man
himself, on the perfect level which marks the
communion
of real gentlemen, without respect to difference of
rank. Even Nicholson was sometimes ashamed of the
pettiness of endeavouring to keep up his official
grandeur
in a private room, and suffered it to soften down
into a bland and courtly importance.
The conversation was gay and general. The
unfortunate
last night's ball was carefully unmentioned.
Various
things, persons, and events were canvassed, which
brought out the charming qualities of Mrs. Nicholson's
mind and heart. Nicholson, his stilts once laid aside,
appeared in a favourable light, with the exception of one
or two sharp insinuations and abrupt reproofs, which
seemed to have for their sole intention to distress his
wife, although her patient and good-natured manner of
receiving them was admirable. The conjugal despot
was satisfied with the, to him, gratifying consciousness
of having insulted a helpless and beautiful being wholly
in his power, and thus displayed his unresisted,
irresistible
authority; and White was elated and more
brilliant
than ever at the certainty of arranging, with a
few words, a matter of life and death to his friend, to
say nothing of the injury to his own reputation, which
he hoped, on the present occasion, to do away.
At length, resolved not to shy the subject, and not
perceiving that Nicholson made any move towards a
private interview, White boldly touched the chord by
asking Mrs. Nicholson how she enjoyed herself at the
ball last evening.
Why, but for the painful circumstance
My love! said her husband, cuttingly.
I meantvery muchonly
Perhaps, my dear, you had better confine your
remarks
to subjects which you understand.
Oh! said White, feeling that a certain hardihood
would be more effective with his amiable host than
any manifestation of embarrassment, as they say a mad
bull is more likely to attack you if you fly, the
circumstance
to which, I presume, you allude, will, I hope,
be found susceptible of a most favourable issue.
Thank Heaven! said Mrs. Nicholson: I shall be
relieved from a dreadful anxiety if your hopes prove
true.
Ladies who wish, they know not what, said
Nicholson
,
and express opinions without any knowledge
of the subject, are very likely to do their judgment
little
credit.
Well, my dear husband, said she, rising with
graceful
submission, I confess my ignorance, but I shall not
abandon my hopes. I will leave you and Captain White
to discuss the matter at your leisure.
Had she expressed a desire to stay, she would not
have been allowed to do so. But her lord and master
had a characteristic delight in arbitrary decisions.
Pray oblige us by remaining, said Nicholson,
determined
to punish her for her merciful tendencies by
conducting the conversation in her presence. As you
have delivered your ideas, perhaps it would not be
asking too much of you to hear mine.
Oh, I have heard them, said she, still going, and
evidently only with an effort restraining her tears.
Did you hear me request you to remain, my love?
said Nicholson, fixing his eyes on her and pointing his
hand to her seat.
She sat down without a word.
Nicholson was now in a position the most delightful
to him in the world. He had an opportunity of acting
the tyrant; of annoying and insulting a gentleman who
had placed himself in the attitude of a suppliant; of
distressing
the timid and tender feelings of his wife, and
of showing his full power (whether or not he chose to
exert it against him) over Glendenning, whose lofty
spirit and high-wrought temper had dared to place
themselves
in opposition to him.
I can scarcely, I presume, be expected to
apologize
,
said Nicholson, in his highest manner, with his
nose considerably in the air, for the circumstance
which my wife has deemed it proper to call a painful
one.
Oh, you mean my absence from your ball?
I do, sir.
It is probably occasioned by an error, which I shall
be able, I trust, to explain, said White.
I had already formed the conclusion that your
request
last evening referred to this point, said
Nicholson
,
still farther receding from familiarity.
There was a moment's pause. Even White felt the
awkwardness of his position, and fully shared
Glendenning's
yearning to horsewhip such a conceited ass.
It is from a high and imperative sense of duty that
I have deemed it proper to hear you, said Nicholson.
What have you to urge?
I will first ask you to state explicitly, said White,
why I am so unfortunate as to rest under the
disapprobation
Vol. II.B
of one whose good opinion it has been so
ardently
my wish to obtain.
As the commanding officer of this regiment, sir,
said Nicholson, it is, of course, my duty to watch over
the honour of the individuals composing it.
Certainly.
You were the friend of Captain Glendenning in an
affair with a Yankee officer, which, under your
directions
,
was suffered to terminate in an equivocal
manner
;
at least, so it has been related to me, and the
evidence
which has come under my notice confirms the
account. As you have taken the extraordinary
measure
of a personal interview with me, I presume, of
course, you have testimony of a contrary nature. I
need not say that, although the weak mind and light
and trivial character of Captain Glendenning have not
allowed him to be so fortunate as to obtain my respect,
the father wrote me, and took the precaution to claim
my forbearance in favour of his son. Having promised
it, I shall extend it as far as his own conduct will allow.
Don't let me interrupt you, sir; I shall be happy to hear
your account of the matter.
Why, the mere fact is, we were at the theatre
together
.
Captain Glendenning had been supping, and
had taken too much wine. On the bosom of a young
lady who sat before us, a
rose
had become nearly
displaced
.
Not knowing well what he did, he took it, and
was, of course, engaged in a sort of row with the young
lady's companion. Blows were interchanged. They
met at daybreak. Glendenning received a shot in his
hat and discharged his in the air, which, you must allow,
was a magnanimous sort of thing. He was, of course,
reluctant to take the life of a noble young fellow whom
he had originally and wantonly offended. I thought
the matter had gone far enough, and so thought all the
world. This is the simple story.
All the world, sir, is a very comprehensive phrase.
Will you have the goodness to touch the bell, my
dear?
Mrs. Nicholson obeyed, and a servant entered.
John! said Colonel Nicholson, open the third
drawer of my secretary on the right, and bring me the
first packet of papers.
The affair happily stopped where it did, said
White. The two boys, for they are nothing more,
became
subsequently the best friends in the world. We
spent a week or two in the country with them at the
villa of Mr. Lennox on the Hudson, and I assure you,
continued he, turning to Mrs. Nicholson, I could not
but feel sincere gratification at seeing so fine a youth
returned to so interesting a family.
Oh, I am sure Colonel Nicholson will see, from this
statement, that no reproach at all rests upon you, and
none on your friend, except in having originated such a
quarrel and proceeded too far in it.
My love! you know women always appear best
when they confine themselves to their proper sphere.
The name is Lennox, I believe? said Nicholson, coldly.
It is.
And the young fellow is in the army?
A lieutenant just graduated from West Point.
Captain Glendenning received a blow?
He was struck, I believe, in the scuffle.
You saw the blow?
Given and returned.
You are interested in Captain Glendenning, I
believe
?
Yes. His father also begged me to look to him, as
he was, although he is now greatly improved, rather
wild. He has recently entirely changed his character
in this respect, and is likely to become a different sort
of man altogether. The friendship between him and
Lieutenant Lennox is really remarkable. They are,
indeed
,
all extremely fond of him.
It seems to me, Captain White, said Nicholson,
when the servant placed in his hands the packet he
required
,
that your friendship for Captain Glendenning
has strangely blinded you in this matter. My view of it
is essentially different from yours, and is likely to remain
so. You have brought a very disgraceful affair to a
I wish to spare you, sirbut I must say, an
extraordinary
and most premature termination.
My opinion, sir said White, who now saw the
dark, deliberate intention of his host.
Your opinion was one which I should not have
expected
from a gentleman and a soldier, unless he had
been misled by private feeling.
You are severe.
I deem it a high duty to be so. Your explanation
throws a still darker shade over an affair too dark
before
,
and I cannot regret that I have, in common with
others, expressed my dissatisfaction in the most
marked
manner.
I am extremely sorry, Colonel Nicholson, said
White, coldly and firmly, that my opinions have not
the good fortune to coincide with yours. But, really, I
cannot change them.
Every man's opinions are his own, I know, said
Nicholson; but his actions are not, inasmuch as they
compromise the honour of those with whom he
associates
.
A blow, Captain White, a public blow, given
before
thousands of people, is anywhere, under any
circumstances
,
one of those insults which, if I have been
properly educated, a gentleman, to say nothing of an
officer, cannot submit to. But, in this casegood God!
only think of it! a British officer, in a foreign country,
struck
struck
in a theatre! and by whom? an officer
in the American army!
The blow was returned.
The American officer, sir, is the guardian of his
own honour, and of his country's. If he choose to bear
the brand on his forehead, let him. Perhaps the low
standard of honour which must reign in a mobocracy
may find in it nothing derogatory; but a British
officer
,
if my humble and insignificant opinion can be
supposed
to have any weight, if my feelings and character
render me a person competent to judge,
cannot
take a
blow.
I must confess my inability to see my way out of
the affair, then, said White.
You are fortunate in an opinion which your
superiors
have not the happiness either to share or to admire,
sir.
What can I do? the thing is already past and
forgotten
!
Past, not forgotten. What! an officer in his
majesty's
service walking about society with a blow on his
forehead! the offending party an American officer,
boasting to all the world of his feat? If your friend
and you choose to swallow such an insult, you may,
perhaps, have the right to do so, but the regiment to
which you have the honour to belong, his majesty's
whole army, his majestyII
myself
are greatly
insulted
.
The affair cannot drop here. I shall institute
a Court of Inquiry.
You will reflect, said White, his composure no
more ruffled than by a spot of red which had been
slowly
heightening in his cheek, that such a measure, or
even the suggestion of it, must lead to another meeting
between these two young men. They are very, very
young. The matter originated in an unpardonable act
of folly on the part of Glendenning; committed, to be
plain, while drunk, and met, as I must say, most
properly
,
by a high spirited youth, who did exactly what I
should have done on the occasion, or any other officer
in his majesty's service. The meeting was prompt,
fair, and in earnest. Both parties are excellent shots,
and their courage was tested beyond the faintest
shadow
of doubt. The world, the public press spoke
loudly
respecting it, and blame was universally and justly
attached to Glendenning for the original offence, but
none for his subsequent course, and the redeeming
feature
in the part he bore in it was his discharging his
fire in the air, and arranging the matter frankly and
magnanimously. You are the first, Colonel Nicholson,
the very first person, if I am correctly informed, who
has chosen to adopt a new, and, you will permit me to
add, a most unnecessarily severe view of the
circumstance
.
Notwithstanding the attachment now existing
between the parties, your perseverance in the views you
have been so obliging as to lay before me this morning,
must create the necessity for another meeting. Such
another meeting
can
only result in the death of one or
both. Their families and friends will be plunged in
grief, and they themselves (bear in mind that they are
friends) will be reluctantly forced into a contest
inevitably
fatal, actually horrible. I have come, sir,
respectfully
,
but earnestly to address your reason, and if I fail
in convincing that, to appeal to your mercy. I stand
here as the defender, the friend, the adviser of
Glendenning
,
whose tokens of reform promise him
hereafter
B 2
a distinguished and honourable career. I place
myself
at your disposal. I throw myself upon your
generosity
.
I am even authorized, on the part of
Glendenning
himself, to solicit from your
humanity
, from your
mercy
, a reconsideration of the opinions you have
expressed
in the matter, and which have materially
affected
both his and my reputation.
An expression of mean, selfish triumph lighted the
yellow face of Nicholson, but unsoftened by any gentle
beam of mercy.
I have heard you through, patiently and attentively,
sir, replied he, coldly and grandly, hoping to be able
to find something in support of your opinions, and
calculated
to diminish the just odium which rests on your
unfortunate friend. My consenting to receive you at
all will, I presume, be sufficiently indicative to the world
of my desire to yield to the impulses of my personal
feelings; but I find nothing in your representations to
alter my impressions. Your appeal to my sensibility is
painful, but the world, I trust, has known me as one
superior
to such influences; and a high regard to my own
character, and a proud consciousness that my station
demands I should listen only to the voice of duty,
induce
me to disregard all private considerations. I pity
your friend from the bottom of my soul. But affairs of
this nature must be settled like gentlemen and public
officers, not like school girls. The families of these
persons are nothing to me. The parties should have
considered the matter in that sentimental light before
they brought themselves into their present position.
The honour of the regiment I command is what I must
look to; and I presume my worst enemies will not deny
that I am the proper guardian of it, and that it is not
likely to suffer in my hands. There must be a Court
of Inquiry. God forbid that I should advise such a
second meeting as you have described; but my own
character requires that I should institute a Court of
Inquiry.
Good God! sir, said White, rising in disgust.
My dear, dear husband! consider that life and death
hang on your determination, interrupted Mrs.
Nicholson
,
her eyes full of tears.
And you will permit me to repeat, continued
Nicholson
,
haughtily, that
I
am the lieutenant-colonel of
this regiment; and it is not presumable I should have
the honour to be so if not competent to form opinions
and able to carry them into execution, and that without
offensive remarks from officers under my command.
Certainly, sir, said White. I have nothing more
to say. I shall advise my friend accordingly. Only let
me repeat
Repeat nothing
act
, sir, said Nicholson.
Poorpoor Captain Glendenning! said Mrs.
Nicholson
,
weeping.
I will, sirat your suggestion: good-morning.
Stop, sir. Do not understand me to have made any
suggestion. I will have none of the responsibility of
your friend's follies cast upon my shoulders. I suggest
nothing but the necessity of a Court of Inquiry. Have
the goodness to favour me with your company a little
longer.
White stood with his tall form proudly and sternly
drawn up; his almost passionless face darkened with no
longer concealed, though tranquil indignation.
Nicholson
,
still seated, with the air of a sovereign giving
audience to a subject, took up the package of papers
the servant had brought, slowly untied the tape, drew
forth a newspaper, and carefully unfolded it. It was the
very one which the triumphant Mr. Lennox had read to
the delighted family circle on the morning of the duel.
Nicholson ran it over once himself, leaving White still
standing. While in the act of doing so, his features,
at the first sight handsome and noble, grew contracted
and mean. His always colourless complexion assumed
a paler hue. To White, at the moment, perhaps, not a
very indulgent observer, he appeared absolutely ugly,
and he wondered he could have ever thought a
handsome
man, one whose countenance was so expressive
of cunning and malignity. The soul was at this moment
painted there; the workings of all his worst qualities
were visible while he fairly gloated on anticipations of
vengeance.
Having finished the article, Nicholson at length
looked
up, and met the eyes of White fixed full and sternly
upon him, and for a moment he quailed, conscious
that his hatred of Glendenning had been betrayed by
his countenance to his keen and fearless observer. He
felt the cold, undisguised displeasure, perhaps contempt,
with which White regarded him, and the sense of
inferiority
,
which he could not but be conscious of,
notwithstanding
his general pompous egotism, to one who,
however far himself from being a good man, was
destitute
of any inhuman tendencies, and was peculiarly
gifted with manly firmness and quiet, determined
independence
of opinion. He was thus suddenly checked
and awed in the full career of his malicious triumph,
and his manner visibly changed beneath the strong eye
and guarded, but deeply-marked manner of the person
he had so many times, in the course of the
conversation
,
shown his wish to insult, and yet who evidently
neither feared nor respected him.
God bless me! you are standing all this while, my
dear White, said he, in a mild and friendly manner,
entirely
putting off his grandeur. Pray be seated. There
isn't the slightest doubt that
you
have acted perfectly
like a gentleman, bating the unavoidable error of a too
kind and amiable heart. Sit down. I beg your pardon
for my warmth. I am most favourably inclined towards
you. But do me the favour to hear me read this
article
.
White bowed stiffly and sat down.
It is the principal reason why I deem it proper to
call a Court of Inquiry. You have appealed to my
generosity; I now appeal to yours. Hear this, and
say what
can
I do? It is an American newspaper,
remember
.
And what is in one American newspaper,
thanks to the licentious freedom of the press, both in
the United States and England, is everywhere as `
common
as the steps that mount the Capitol.' Nay, more;
it is certain this article has already appeared in every
English, French, German, and Russian journal. This
insult to the English army and to England is at this
moment flying over every sea and every land. It is
read by every sovereign; it is laughed at in every club
and reading-room, discussed in every
salon
, and sneered
at in every diplomatic circle of Europe. I fear your
too benevolent heart has overlooked these obvious
considerations
,
my dear White. Now listen.
`
Affair of Honour
.We stop the press to announce
that a meeting took place this morning at daybreak
between Lieutenant Francis Lennox, son of the
distinguished
lawyer of this city, and Captain Charles
Glendenning
,
of his majesty's, at the duelling-ground,
Hoboken. The dispute arose at the theatre, Captain
Glendenning having offered a rudeness to a lady in the
presence of Lieutenant Lennox, which the latter
punished
by
a blow
. The parties repaired almost instantly
to the ground, and, after one fire, which, on the part of
Captain Glendenning, was discharged in the air, the
matter was terminated amicably by the mediation of
the seconds. The most ample apologies were offered
by Captain Glendenning, and the gallant gentlemen
parted
on the best terms, and with mutual protestations of
friendship. Captain White, of the British army, acted
as the friend of his countryman in this rather
peculiar
affair, and Mr. Sussex, of this city, for Lieutenant
Lennox
.
Nothing could exceed the coolness and courage
manifested on the occasion by both the gentlemen, and
a ball, it is said, took effect in the hat of Captain
Glendenning
,
who received the awkward indication of skill
with immovable composure.
`We must be permitted to remark, however, that, if
we have heard the matter correctly represented, it has
been reserved for our chivalric young townsman to
teach to his opponent a
valuable lesson
, which, we trust,
will not be wholly thrown away upon him, or upon the
country to which he belongs. Impertinent English
travellers may write slanderous books with impunity,
but there
are
insults which can never fail to meet their
just reward!
'
Be good enough, Captain White, to remark that
the last words are in italics, and that, appended to them,
is a note of admiration.
Oh, I have seen the article before, said White,
coldly. But I should scarcely think of sacrificing the
life of one, or perhaps two men, in consequence of a
note of admiration.
Of the life of your friends I know nothing, said
Nicholson, stung by this sarcasm. Permit me to add,
I care less. Their future course they are at liberty to
choose. I shall not be denied, I presume, the right to
select mine. It is my opinion that Captain
Glendenning
has disgraced himself and his regiment. How far
the position in which he has placed himself is shared
by his advisers, the world may judge. My personal
feelings towards the unfortunate, weak-minded youth
are of the kindest nature; but I deem it proper to make
higher and loftier principles the guide of my conduct.
I have condescended to hear you somewhat more at
length than I originally intended, or than my various
avocations permitted without inconvenience. In regard
to the Court of Inquiry, my opinion is unchanged; I
may add that I never change my opinions. I have heard
your views; you have heard mine. Other important
duties call me. So, sir, I wish you good-morning.
I regret, said White, that I should have
trespassed
so far upon your patience.
As for your friendoh, do nothing rashly, said
Mrs. Nicholson, in terror and grief.
My love! said Nicholson, with a fixed regard and
an expressive wave of the hand, your presence was
requested to listen, not to advise!
White made his salutations with composure and
dignity
,
and left the presence, mortified, disgusted, and
inwardly resolved to write Nicholson's name down in
his books as a man to be remembered. If he cross
my path, or I cross his again, said he, no matter
whereno matter when
I'll teach that man a lesson!
CHAPTER III.
Well
! what's the matter with you? you look
grave! said White, gayly, as he entered the room of
Glendenning.
Do I? That's strange; but the result of your
embassy
will enliven me.
Ah! if you are grave before, you'll not be more
cheerful after hearing it.
Let us have it, however.
Glendenning, you must arouse yourself and act like
a man. If I feign gayety, it is to hide serious
reflections
.
Keep cool. Sit down: I can't talk to any one
walking backward and forward in that way.
Go on, said Glendenning, gloomily, folding his
arms.
I have breakfasted with Colonel Nicholson. He's
going to call a Court of Inquiry for the investigation of
our affair with Lennox.
Well, let him! said Glendenning; I'll stand it.
It cannot but be unfavourable to us.
The I'll resign my commission.
I would call him out, if I could, myself, said White,
but he has too much of what the world would call
right on his side to meet me, and I must not subject
myself to another refusal. The story I told him, but
he grew rather yellow than otherwise under it, and said
it deepened the shade of the affair. It certainly
deepened
his. He's an assbut, egad, he's got us in his
power, and very coldly assured me the affair should not
stop here.
Should not?
Should not!
I see the man's object, said Glendenning.
He wishes to drive you to another meeting with
Lennoxbut he does not, of course, say so. He held
over me, like a birch over a naughty schoolboy, his
`Court of Inquiry.' The `
Court of Inquiry
' is his
nominal object. He talked of nothing but `a blow,'
and the `disgrace of the regiment,' his own mighty self,
and a `
Court of Inquiry
.'
But were I to meet Frank Lennox again, it could
only be with the determination either to kill or be
killed.
Of course.
But the man must suppose me insanea ruffiana
dupea fool.
White was silent.
I had rather be broken on the wheelrather die on
the scaffoldrather feel the finger of every officer in
the regiment pointed at me, and hear nothing but yells
and hisses as I walk through the world, than hurt a
hair of Frank Lennox's head, or wound one heart in
that family. I would blow my brains out first.
White was silent.
I will go to Nicholson myself.
You shall not.
I will write him this moment.
No. Be coolyou are beside yourself. Trust all
to me.
I am not beside myself. I
am
cool, calm, and
master
of myself. I can speak to him truths that will scorch
his soul, and make his coward, malignant, shuffling heart
quail
in his breast. I can go to him as calm asas
As you are to me, said White, coldly, glancing at
the ashy, compressed lips, the white cheeks, the eyes
glistening with fury, and the drops of perspiration that
stood upon his forehead.
No, Glendenning, no more
speaking
, no more
interviews
,
no more
humiliation!
You cannot touch his
heart or convince his reason. He cringes to his
superiors
,
but repays himself by trampling on all beneath
him. You he hates beyond my worst apprehensions.
You have drawn it on yourself wilfullyrecklessly. He
is a curiousa remarkable character. He will never
forgetnever forgive. The luscious triumph now in
his handsoh, he would not forego it for his
commission
,
which, in my opinion, he stands a fair chance of
losing before we've done with him. Don't go to him.
Believe me, he will only insult you, as he has done
me.
I'll take him by the throat on the parade ground.
You will be cashiered.
Then I will throw up my commissionleave the
service and the country.
Pardon me, Captain Glendenning, said White,
firmly
and gravely; you will not do any such thing; you
must notyou shall not!
Shall not?
Shall not, because you cannot as a man, an officer,
a gentleman, a friend.
And why not?
Because you will not adopt any measure contrary
to the advice and demand of your friends, and which, in
staining your own honour, must compromise theirs.
The demand, Captain White?
The demand, Captain Glendenning. Be cool and
hear me. Your character as a gentleman, and your
whole prospects in life, depend upon your conduct now.
Had you resigned your commission before learning the
sentiments of your colonel, it would have been a
different
thing. This you did not do. Were you to do so
now, it would be received as a proof of your desire to
avoid another meeting with Lieutenant Lennox.
You take upon yourself the character of an
adviser
,
said Glendenning; yet you advise nothing.
I can advise nothing, said White, because there
is no choice. You have but one thing to do.
And that is to
Call out Lenox again instantly.
Glendenning fixed his eyes on him without saying
anything.
You are in the lion's denin the lion's jaws!
continued
White. Stir, and you are gone. Let
me
rescue
you from this dilemma. It is like performing a
surgical
operation; it's a horrid thing; the patient shrinks
under it. But it's necessary. A moment's pain, the
leg is off! and the patient is well and happy again.
I understand you, said Glendenning, but I will
never consent: nevernever! Perish my
commission
!
perish my name! perish the name of
regiment
and my country! perish this black world and all
the friends that walk on it, rather than take one step in
the bloody path you point to!
Well, well! said White, soothingly, as one would
speak to an affrighted horse. So! so! so! so! let it
be for the present. There is no immediate hurry
to-morrow
the
next day. I'll see you again before long.
In the mean time, when you're cooller, think it over like
a man.
He took his leave, really sorry for his friend, but
determined
to make all the necessary arrangements for a
sudden departure, including those requisite for leave of
absence. He sent the assistant surgeon of the regiment
to see him, that he might give a certificate and put him
on the sick list, as he really was not in a fit state to go
out. By the next day he had everything arranged, and
waited only the moment, which he was pretty sure
would speedily arrive, when Glendenning's light and
impressionable mind would change, and he might get
him off at once; for, whatever happened or might
happen
,
Captain White was determined not to suffer any
stain to rest on his own character as a gentleman, and
that, if the duel were considered prematurely
terminated
,
it should be repeated. To the cold-blooded
selfishness
of this determination he was entirely blind.
Looking on duelling as a necessary and proper
institution
,
he took it, of course, with all its consequences.
Poor fellow, thought he; it comes hard. It is like
having an old tooth out, but, once over, he won't mind
it.
Thus bent in bringing about an encounter, which
could scarcely fail to terminate in the death of one, if
not two human beings, he put not a whit less zest in
each petty enjoyment and studied luxury of his life.
CHAPTER IV.
We
must beg the reader to imagine, we cannot paint
the desperation and agony which harrowed the feelings
of Glendenning for the two or three days subsequent
to this interview. A certificate from the surgeon,
placing
him on the sick list, at least enabled him to keep his
room, and hide himself from every eye. He did not
go out; he saw no one. He scarcely slept at night.
His appetite, his spirits, his buoyant energy and strength
of mind deserted him. Even Southard absented
himself
from some unaccountable cause. His face had
grown pale and haggard. He was like a man haunted
with a horrible spectre.
In the nights he had lain for hours stretched
passively
on his back, writhing beneath images of shame, scorn,
and insult, and striving to form plans for his future life,
what he should do, and where he should hide his
dishonoured
head. From the society of gentlemen he felt he
was banished forever. Sleep and exhaustion would
sometimes come together after these dark and
oppressive
thoughts, but then the voice of Breckenbridge, and
his cold and contemptuous face, would flash upon him
with
You! meet you?
The scene with Breckenbridge had made a vivid
impression
on his brain. There was something in it
marked
,
striking, and dramatic. Himself, the lofty, the
proud, the scarcely condescending, haughtily
disentangling
himself from an offensive, derogatory, too
familiar
intimacy, throned, as it were king-like, on his own
character and the world's opinion, and then, with a
word, a look, hurled headlong down, a fallen angel, with
the object of his fastidious dislike pointing at him with
derision, spurning him with his foot, his derisive laugh,
the laugh of the by-standers, magnified, in his disturbed
imagination, into the hideous leers and yells of the
whole world to pursue him forever and forever.
From these insupportable dreams he would start up,
gasping, shrieking, or striving to shriek, and,
abandoning
his bed, would pace the room, or read, or smoke, or
drink till morning broke. He had become fond of
Shakspeare, and he found in him power to divert his
thoughts, but when he laid the volume down, the dark
waters of wretchedness closed over him again.
The third morning, he had started long before
daybreak
from his bed, and sat, gloomy and miserable,
smoking a cigar, with a half-emptied bottle of wine on
the table, and a volume of the Three Spaniards in
his hand, when a low knock at the door startled him.
He was surprised to find, by the effect it had on him,
how shattered his nerves were.
It was Southard, who gently opened the door.
What's the matter, my dear fellow? said
Glendenning
.
I heard you up. I know you are distressed, and I
determined to come to you.
Sit down.
You look ill.
Yes, I am. This Nicholson affair is annoying me
terribly. I cannot make up my mind.
It is the town talk, said Southard. I am not in a
mood to deny it. Your position demands all your
presence
of mind. But if you have read the Book of Life
aright, you will seek His approbation, and His alone.
I hope I shall, said Glendenning, though it is
easier to advise than to act.
In advising submission to His will, said Southard,
who, Glendenning now, for the first time, perceived, was
unusually agitated, I advise only what I am called upon
to set an example in.
What do you mean?
My little Catharine.
What's the matter with her?
You know she's been ill several days.
I remember I heard something of it; she's not worse,
I hope?
She's dead said Southard.
Dead!
She died last evening at nine.
Almighty Heaven! cried Glendenning.
She yielded up her little, pure spirit at nine last
night, repeated Southard.
My poor friend!
Southard threw himself into his arms, and wept for a
few moments on his bosom in uncontrolled agony.
I did not come to thrust my weakness on you, but
to speak to you of yourself. You are more unhappy
than I or her mother. You are debating with yourself
a second meeting with Lieutenant Lennox. If you
were a Christian, you would know how to act. But you
are not. Julia and I both fear your facility of
character
,
and the influence of the world and of White. You
may fancy her feelings over the yet warm body of her
child. But even now she has requested me to bring
you this volume. It is a Bible, with passages marked
for you. On the table, where lies our little Catharine,
she has written your name in it, and begs you to read
it, and make it the guide of your conduct in this
painful
affair. Her religion teaches her not to be selfish,
and even in the midst of her own distress she feels a
sincere anxiety for you.
Dear Southard, said Glendenning, much touched,
my heart bleeds for you and her. How can I ever be
sufficiently grateful for such true, such noble
friendship
?
By giving your serious attention to the advice of
my poor Julia. Since the last evening you were with
us, notwithstanding the illness of our little one, she has
frequently thought of you, and of the danger you are in
of fancying yourself obliged to rush upon self-murder,
or the butchery of a friend, in compliance with the ideas
of a portion of society. Be a manbe morebe a
Christian.
Dare to act right
. No one doubts your
courage
to meet personal danger. Show yourself, also,
morally
brave. Break away, at once and forever, from the
damning net they are throwing around you. Do your
duty; leave the rest to
Him
. He knowsHe watches
you. `
He who made the eye, doth he not see?
'
I wish I had your undoubting faith, said
Glendenning
.
Pray for it, and He will help your evil spirit of
unbelief
.
Seek here, in this book, light for your guidance.
We have tried it. We have found it sufficient to soothe
us, even in this sad extremity. What calamity can be
more insupportable than the loss of our little Catharine?
You cannot know the happiness she has been to us;
the dreams we have woven of her future character and
mind, and our own delight in beholding her grow up
from a child to woman, in preparing an humble
independence
for her, in becoming old and decrepit with her
to aid me, to smooth my white hair, support my
tottering
steps, and scatter the path to the grave with the
flowers of filial love. Now all this is over; all this
bright, universal sunshine is quenched. The earth is
dark to me, and life has lost its charm, and yet in this
book I find delight, consolation, hope, resignationnay,
more, peace and happiness. Take it, my friend; try it
read it; don't reject it without examination.
My dear Southard! said Glendenning, you are
unconsciously using the words of a beloved friend. I
really feel to my very heart the strength and
disinterestedness
of your friendship.
Come down, then, with me, and see my poor wife.
Tell her you will resist all endeavours to make you meet
Lieutenant Lennox; tell her you will seek advice, not of
White, or Colonel Nicholson, or of the world, but
here
,
in the volume she has given you, and I assure you, in
this way you will greatly alleviate her grief. Come!
she asked me to bring you down.
Southard led the way, and Glendenning followed him
down stairs into the very room where, a few evenings
before, he had seen the little Catharine in perfect health,
and been struck with her remarkable beauty. The very
C 2
roses she had been playing with, the broken nine-pins,
the noseless dog, and tin carriage, had been carefully
placed by the fond mother upon a stand. The little
body lay on a table. Mrs. Southard sat by its side, pale
almost as the being she mourned, but perfectly composed.
See! said she, with a smile that made
Glendenning's
heart ache, my poor little Kate! God has
taken
her. Oh, never more shall I hear that beloved
voice, that light, quick step! never behold the long,
golden
hair waving on her forehead as she runs, or see the
light dancing in those deep blue eyes. God has taken
her where she is happy. He will not let her forget
her mother. I shall meet her again, and He will teach
me to be patient.
My dearest Mrs. Southard! said Glendenning.
But at the sound of his voice, both she and her
husband
covered their faces, and wept in silence such tears
as only parents weep over the mute, sweet, cold bodies
of their children.
And tears, also, came freely into Glendenning's eyes,
partly for them, partly for himself, partly from the
heavy, crushing sense of the mockery of life, to all but
the high, philosophical, aspiring Christian.
Now! said Southard, with a bright smile, these
are things man was born to meet. Whom he loveth
he chasteneth. Has he not said, suffer little children to
come unto me, for of such is the kingdom of heaven?
Look at her, Glendenning.
The young man, awe-struck, approached, and gazed
on the angel face and form of his little radiant friend.
The mother stood on one side of him, the father on the
other, and as they gazed they murmured, Thy will be
done.
Amen! cried Glendenning, so fervently that
Southard
felt his friend was again and really touched with a
beam of faith. Kneeling down with his wife, a short
prayer broke from his lips, which the scene made
natural
,
and his profound grief strangely eloquent. Yet
there was in it less of grief than of hope, joy, and calm,
spiritual triumph, a peace above the world, and the
fervour
of a spirit blessed. He bade adieu to the soul of
his infant, which he seemed to see floating up to
heaven
.
He poured forth his grateful thanks for the
resignation
and strength which, in this trying moment, had
been vouchsafed, and prayed it might be continued when
mother and father should kiss, for the last time, the cold,
unanswering lips, whose music was stilled, and the icy
forehead, from whose sweet tenement the habitant had
fled. Then, with a sudden allusion to Glendenning, he
prayed that the scene might not be lost upon the young
and wavering heart which was called upon now, also,
to meet its trials. He implored that this wavering soul
might be led to see, might not grope at noonday, but
seek and find strength and light from above, to fling away
the world, to follow the Redeemer, and give up things
temporal for things eternal.
Glendenning, also, knelt for the first time in his life,
and each word of his friend's invocation went through
his heart like a ray of celestial light. He not only knelt;
he prayed, and, strange enchantment! (for thus it
seemed
to him), he
did
feel, as he raised his soul to God, new
light to judge, new courage to act.
You will no longer waver, dear Captain
Glendenning
?
said Mrs. Southard.
My resolution is taken, said Glendenning. Don't
fear for me. I here make a vow to bear any evil rather
than commit the crime they are trying to drive me to.
This pure angel may bear my oath to the throne of
Heaven
,
and if, from weakness or passion, I yield my sense
of right, may all the curse of vice fall on my head!
He once more approached to look on the body. It
lay there like a type of heaven. An almost unearthly
beauty rested on the facea smile, a light, as if it knew
and rejoiced in the holy mission he had confided to it.
The mother clasped her hands silently, and, as
Glendenning
withdrew, he heard a sob and a convulsive kiss,
and then all again was still.
CHAPTER V.
It
was yet night when he regained his room. He sat
down, however, unable to sleep, by his solitary lamp, and
opened the volume Mrs. Southard had given to him.
Several
leaves were turned down, and various passages were
marked with a pencil. The examplethe contagious piety
of his friendstheir grief, and their resignation under it
the sight of his little favourite, dead, had completely touched
his heart, weakened the grasp on him of mere worldly
feelings
,
and made him conscious, for the moment, of the vanity
and evanescence of life.
The silence was profound and unearthly, unbroken even
by the barking of the distant dog, or the step of a single
passenger, or any token of human beings, or of the city that
lay wrapped as in death around; only ever and anon the sound
of some warping panel, or, perhaps, a wall settling more
heavily into its foundationinto its decay. The shadows
of the furniture were thrown grotesquely on the floor and
ceiling, wearing a strange, impressive aspectunearthly
almost, as if unreal beings were looking from them. There
was something startling and preternatural in it.
He looked from the window. The broken moon was
palely emerging from a pile of silver clouds, gathered in
motionless fragments about her. Her ragged edge looked
strangely near and worldlike, and on its disk he thought he
could distinctly trace deserts, vales, and mountains. For
the first time, he felt the sight sink into his soul as a
stupendous
wondera present, visible miraclefor years
before
his eyes, unseen, uncomprehended.
Like this thrilling story, he murmured, as he sat down
and opened the Bible.
His eyes fell on the eighteenth chapter of St. John, and
he read it through. The emotion of a lover perusing a
letter
from his mistress was far less keen than that awakened
in him by the holy page, now that, for the first time, the
scales had fallen from his eyes, and he conceived it as it
was. His understanding was no more darkened. He had
eyes, and he saw; he had ears, and he heard. In that
sacred
hour, whatever was prejudiced, scornful, selfish, or
unbelieving
in his nature disappeared, and the found himself
as if ministered unto by angels.
It is at such moments, when all other books cease to
possess any power or attraction, that the Sacred Volume
manifests its inspired nature by performing its promises
even here on the earth, filling the soul with divine light,
speaking to it with spiritual voices, raising it above the
shock, delirium, and blinding smoke of mortal passions and
interests, and bestowing a foretaste of that calm bliss which
it is to enjoy in a future existence.
The word of God is quick, and powerful, and sharper
than any two-edged sword, and the young convert felt its
piercing influence. He read that part of the wonderful
story here related by the favourite apostle and friend. The
betrayal by Judas, the falling of the officers to the ground,
the smiting of Malchus's ear, the taking of Jesus, Peter's
denial
,
the arraignment of the Son of man before the cold,
worldly Roman, and the cry of the Jews (groping at
noonday
)
for Barabbas! Barabbas!
He read on to the end of the book. It was the first time
in his life he had read the chapters consecutively. He had
heard parts from the pulpit as a dull lessonassociated only
with weariness, restraint, long faces, and hypocrisy. The
eloquence, the deep meaning, the tender, immortal beauty
of the simple narration, startled and overwhelmed him. He
felt himself in the presence of the Holy Spirit of God. He
thrilled with sublime thoughts, tremendous hopes and
apprehensions
.
Sobered, subdued, his proud man's heart was
melted. The image of Mrs. Lennox and Frank rose
before
him, and, kneeling, he raised his hands to Heaven, about
to offer up a prayer to the throne of Mercy, for the light
which had been shed upon him to guide his steps, and hold
his rash arm from the damning deed he had so nearly
perpetrated
,
whenthe door burst open, and White entered
abruptly. He had not time to rise. He was caught on his
knees. A man, a gentleman, an officer
on his knees!
And now he stands in the crisis of his fate. If he have
moral courage to acknowledge his change of opinion, he
need care little for White or the world. If he blush to
confess that he has discovered his weakness as a mortal,
without the sustaining hand of his Creator, he will be
hurled once more adrift upon the dark waters of life, to
float where the storms and waves of chance and passion
may choose to blow him.
Well, Glendenning, said White, folding his arms in
an attitude of calm, incredulous, ludicrous astonishment,
you don't mean to say you're
praying?
And if I were, Captain White?
And the volume before you is'
The Bible.
White pressed his lips closely together, and walked two
or three times backward and forward through the room,
turning his face carefully away, so that Glendenning could
not catch a glimpse of it.
Well! this, said he, at length, I confess I did
not
expect. What in the name of the devil's got into you now?
Are you going to turn priest or monk?
Captain White, said Glendenning, spare me your
ridicule, while I give you the reply briefly which, I
presume
,
you have come to seek. I did not know how late it
was, or you should have found me more prepared to receive
you.
But, my dear fellow, I had no ideait's perfectly
inconceivable
.
Spare me, and hear, once for all, my irrevocable
decision
respecting the Nicholson affair: I am going to pass it
over, to treat it with silent contempt. I forgive Nicholson,
though I despise him. Meeting Lennox is an act so
diabolical
that I shall not think of it, be the consequences what
they may. I shall sell out of the army or resign. I am
older and wiser than I was last year. If my friends cut
me, let them.
During this harangue, which was uttered rapidly, White
stood, with folded arms, gazing steadily at the speaker, as
if curious to hear all he had to say, and resolved not to
interrupt
him till he had done.
Well! upon my word, said he, at length; do you
know, my dear Glendenning, you're aha! ha! ha!
you're a devilish odd fellow! Just let me feel your pulse!
Hallo! here's a gallop! Your hand is burning. Your pulse
goes like a horse run away. I tell you what, you're ill.
I know I am.
I could have sworn it. Your mind has disordered your
body, which, in return, has disturbed your mind. This is
the secret of your extraordinary ideas on the Nicholson
affair
.
Extraordinary they may be, said Glendenning, but
they are unchangeable.
I'm sorry to hear it, said White, and reluctant to
believe
it.
I see no cause for sorrow.
I do.
You are different; you are a man of the world.
And what are you?
I amI am beginning to beyou need not smile nor
lift your eyebrowwhy should I deny it?a Christiana
believer in Christianity. If I believe in it, I shall act up to
my belief.
By Gd! you're as mad as a March hare, said
White. But you don't mean to abandon the position,
and lay aside the character of a gentleman, I hope?
I don't know what exact meaning you and others may
attach to the word
gentleman
, but the name shall never
make me act contrary to my sense of right.
Why, Glendenning, I don't know you, said White.
Are
you
the same clear-headed, sensible fellow that was
`wont to keep the table in a roar?' Are you really going to
turn into a canting, whining, weak-minded dreamer? Well,
I am nonplused.
You
of all persons. Knock a man into
a crockery shop, kick up a row in the theatre that rings
through the whole world (if Nicholson speaks truth), and
then go home and talk of your `sense of right,' read the
Bible, and make it your code of honour.
If it is true, why not? said Glendenning.
But it is not true. Hand it to me.
He took it up, opened it, and read over the heads of
several
of the chapters.
`
Moses' rod is turned into a serpent. The sorcerers do
the like. The river is turned into blood, and the magicians
of Egypt did so with their enchantments
.' My dear fellow,
is this your religion? `
The wise men of the East are
directed
to Christ by a star. Stilleth the tempest on the sea!
Driveth the devils out of two men possessed, and suffereth
them to go into the swine. Feedeth five thousand men with five
loaves and two fishes. Walketh on the sea
,' and so forth, and
so forth, and so forth, and so forth! As a man of
sense
,
now, my dear fellow, I
put
it to you
He paused, and his listener blushed.
It's all very well, my good friend, for women and
children
and
weak-minded peoplewho must have a hobby
and require to be whipped or duped along the way of right
by fears of a hell and hopes of a heaven, but
men
of
educationgentlemenand soldiersI put it to you
is
this
credible?
Will youcan youseriously and
permanently
give in to this nonsense?
Glendenning was silent, chilled, ashamed.
Why, if it is true, did not
Pilate
believe it? He was
there. Egad! he could have seena Roman gentleman,
on the spot. Why didn't the Jews believe it? or, if they
did, why did they crucify him? Did you never read
Gibbon
?
I tell you what, you're ill and nervous. Religious
melancholy is one of the most obstinate of maladies, and as
much a physical disease as the gout. Take care what you
do. Don't let this get abroad, or you'll be a by-word before
you know it. What would Nicholson say? One of his
charges against you is that your understanding is weak.
Just fling that curious old book out of the windowtake
a dose of salts, and let me tell you, religious responsibilities
or not, all earthall heaven, can't keep you from calling
out Lennox.
Never! said Glendenning, rather faintly.
You mustyou shall. Hear what I've heard this
moment
,
and what brought me to you so early.
Breckenbridge
is going down to New-York to-morrow to challenge Lennox
on behalf of the regiment
, to vindicate its honour and
damn
yours forever
. This
I
cannot permit. If
you
don't
anticipate
him,
I must
. So the matter, in fact, lies between you
and me. Should I kill him, of course, Captain
Glendenning
,
the acquaintance between you and me is at an end
forever
.
Should I fall
Glendenning turned deadly pale, rose, took the Bible from
the table, and, with a mingled impulse of horror and despair,
threw it as far as he could out of the window.
Then away with heaven and heavenly things, and
come hell and all hell's fiends, and light me on my path!
Will you go down with me to New-York?
Certainly.
See to everything, then: what you do, do at once.
Spoken like yourself, said White. It's awkward, but
we have nothing to do with causes or consequences. Don't
look to the right or left, but strait before you.
Gogo, and get all ready.
We are agreed, then? Don't think! no wavering!
we
start to-day
.
You have my word of honour.
A la bonne heure!
Glendenning bent his forehead down upon the table as
his friend left him, and remained in the same attitude an
hour, with the coldness of death creeping more and more
into his heart as he strove to look steadfastly forward into
the dark and bloody path before him.
Not think, muttered he, at length; oh yes! let me
rather steep myself in burning thoughts; let me rather feel
in advance all the fangs of hell fastened, festering in my
soul.
A letter, sir, said the maid, coming in with his breakfast.
He tore it open. It was from Mrs. Lennox.
New-York
,
August
1
st
, 18.
My dear Captain Glendenning
:
Your last, most gratifying favour reached us in due
course of mail. Need I say how the spirit which inspired it
delighted me, and how much we are all charmed with the
friendship which has risen from such a strange cause? We
have left Rose Hill at last. Harry has gone to Europe, and
Mr. Lennox's business requires his presence in New-York.
We all thought and talked of you yesterday, and drank
health and happiness to you, at Mr. Lennox's suggestion, in
Champagne. I added water to mine, but it did not
diminish
the ardour of my wishes for your continued prosperity,
or of my prayers that you will receive strength from above
to follow to the end the noble path of reformation you have
adopted. You will have long since learned that all the
reasonings
and inferences which seem to militate against the
truth of religion are erroneous, and, though they may tend
to excite doubts, are not sufficient to create unbelief.
Frank expects every day to be ordered to his post at
Prairie du Chien
, whence, he says, he means to keep up a
brisk correspondence with you. My daughter is well, and
begs to be remembered. Your favourite saddle-horse, `
Fancy
,'
ran away the other day with Frank, and threw him into
a ditch, but without any serious consequences, which has
furnished Mary a new means of tormenting him, by
comparing
his riding with yours. The Eltons are well, and
often speak of you. Frank's departure affects me strangely.
Vol. II.D
But all my gay family laugh at me and my
foolish mother's
heart
. We hope to see you one day again; perhaps in
England. How deeply happy I am in the thought that I
have been the humble instrument of aiding in the change in
your opinions. There is no security or happiness in the
world like that of having every doubt of Christianity
removed
.
You are brought out of the land of Egypt. Do not
forsake the Lord, and serve Baal and Ashtaroth. Faith is
now yours. It will protect you from danger as well as from
sorrow. But you must cling to it, for the bad world will be
always striving to wrest it from you. `The Lord
will prove
Israel!
' When once you have examined, you will never
surrender it. `Search the Scriptures:' `prove all things,
and hold fast that which is good.' There is no knowledge
like that knowledge: it is, indeed, like unto a treasure which
a man found hid in a field, and sold all that he had and
bought it.
But I shall tire you with my preaching.
Truly your friend,
Catharine Lennox
.
One thing, at least, I can do, said Glendenning, as he
finished this letter. I can
fall:
I can sacrifice myself.
Nothing shall tempt me to fire at Frank Lennox. My doom
is
sealed
.
CHAPTER VI.
Is Captain White here? said Frank Lennox to the
barkeeper
of the City Hotel.
There he is, sir.
My dear White!
Good-day to you, said White, gravely laying down the
newspaper he had been reading, not accepting the proffered
hand, and not taking the cigar from his mouth.
ButI'm delighted to see youand
A word with you!
What's the matter?
Waiter! the room is ready?
Yes, sir!
Lead the way!
They followed in an awkward silence, which greatly
perplexed
Frank.
You need not wait, said White to the waiter.
Yes, sir!
When they were alone, Captain White walked forward,
and said,
Lieutenant Lennox!
Why, what is all this, Captain White?
Captain Glendenning
Has anything happened to him?
Yes.
What is it?
I have accompanied him from Montreal.
Glendenning in town?
In this hotelin the adjoining room!
He is illhe is dying, said Frank, hastening to the
door.
Pardon me. I have a painful commission. Let me
proceed to it at once. In short, Captain Glendenning is not
satisfied with the termination of the late affair with you.
His friends think it prematurely settled. He has returned
to repeat the meeting.
You are jesting, Captain White.
I never jest, sir; I am directed to hand you this note.
He went on smoking gravely and quietly, while Frank
read:
City Hotel
,
August
, 18.
Sir
!
Circumstances not necessary to be explained render me
apprehensive that the affair which took place between you
and myself has not been quite properly arranged. The
meeting must be renewed. When acquainted with my
opinion, I feel certain you will require no other inducement
to afford me the satisfaction I have not yet received, and to
name a friend who will immediately make the necessary
arrangements
.
Yours, etc.,
Charles Glendenning
.
The blood flowed from the cheeks and lips of Frank as
he read this note.
The meeting must be renewed? repeated he; why,
that can mean only
one thing
.
White was silent.
I must see Glendenning!
Impossible.
But it is infatuation. Twenty words would
We have come here, sir, not to talk, but to act, said
White, coldly. Lieutenant Lennox need not be twice
told that the meeting is unavoidable, and must be
immediate
.
Frank collected his stunned and scattered senses.
I'm sorry, said White, but
Oh, sir, sorrow is unnecessary. I will send a friend
to you in an hour. Good-day.
A la bonne heure
, said White.
He rang as soon as he was alone.
Waiter! wine, cigars, and the newspaper I was
reading
.
Frank left the steps of the City Hotel as one in a dream.
An unavoidable, immediate, and fatal meeting! His
mother
his
fatherMiss Elton. From the friend he loved, too
and White's cold, insulting manner, and the greatness of
his danger, which seemed to render the death of one, at
least, certain. What to do? whither to turn? whom to
choose for a friend?
While lost in these reflections the clock struck six. He
had promised to send a friend in an hour. He ran over in
his mind all the persons of his acquaintance who lived near
enough to allow him to call on them; but when he came to
select from among them one proper for such a duty, he
found it difficult, almost impossible. He was not willing to
trust himself to every one in this emergency, for he felt
that, shocked, stunned as he was, he wanted not only
assistance
,
but advice. He looked up, and perceived he was
passing
a fashionable boarding-house, which Mr. Earnest
honoured
by making it his residence. Urged by the necessity
of the moment, he was about to call upon him, but he
recoiled
from the flimsy, conceited character of this person, and,
remembering their conversation at the theatre, he passed
the door. As he did so, he met a Mr. Bayard, who
politely
saluted him. He was an old acquaintance, but he had
in him nothing to command respect, far less confidence and
attachment. He was a fop, devoting himself to dressa
mere ladies' manand as they passed each other a waft of
perfume filled the air. He strolled down the Battery to
think farther. At the gate stood a Mr. Carr; he was a
gentleman, but a man of the world, and only a man of the
worlda debauchee, who mingled with the sober duties of a
merchant ideas of European luxury and sensuality; for he
had travelled and seen the aristocratic society of England,
with a desire to imitate its costly peculiarities as far as his
means and the usages of his native city would permit. He
would, doubtless, have gladly accepted the office of second
in this affair, but it would only have been in order to carry
it through as a mode of brilliant notoriety for himself. He
had no heart, no high moral sense. They bowed and
passed
each other. Sussex lived a mile distant. Besides, he
could not forget (what he had never yet mentioned) that, in
his last meeting with Glendenning, Sussex had leaned
towards
the necessity of a second fire. He was a duellist,
as some one had remarked of him, dyed in the wool.
How are you? said a well-known voice.
It was a Mr. Woodbury, a man of the highest worth, a
solid mind richly cultivated, principles of the most
unbending
integrity, large and correct views of life. But he was
married, and had several children. Had he asked him, he
would have been sure of wise counsel, and, if necessary, he
thought, prompt aid; but his nobleness of nature would not
permit him to bring into a desperate duel, clearly
predestined
to a fatal termination one way or the other, a husband
and a father.
Brigham, the painter, lived just round the corner. He
was the very man. He instantly sought his house, rang,
and was admitted. The servant showed him into the
artist's
painting room, but no one was there.
I will call him immediately, said the man.
Left alone, Frank cast his eyes around upon the various
productions, finished and unfinished, with which the
apartment
was crowded. Among others, what was his
astonishment
to behold on the easel, and so far advanced as to be
most striking in its beauty and the resemblance of the
figures
,
an admirable view of his father's dining-room with the
company assembled at dinner as they had been on
Glendenning's
first visit. There were his father and his
mother
,
Mary, Harry, and himself, living, actually living before
D 2
him. There were Mrs. Elton and Mr. Elton, Emmerson,
Glendenning, and poor little Seth.
Admirable! admirable! he murmured.
There was brought prominently and exquisitely out,
Fanny
Elton, her lovely self, and all the rest who had formed a
part of the company. Mr. Henderson's dry, hard face, was
strangely real, and the envious, repelling countenance of
Mrs. Henderson, with an expression just as if she were in
the act of tearing to pieces the reputation of some dear,
absent
friend, who had always been excessively kind to
her
,
but whose odd peculiarities she pointed out with
compassionate
,
benevolent regret.
The tears gushed into his eyes. He could not but reflect
on the probability that he might never, in reality, behold one
of those beloved faces again. He was gazing only on a
dream of the irrevocable past, and, overmastered by a
singular
emotion, he covered his face with his hands, and felt the
blood almost freezing in his veins.
And they were impatiently waiting for him this moment
at home.
And White was waiting at the City Hotel.
And he had yet done nothing, and time was flying.
The servant again entered.
Mr. Brigham has gone out; but he will doubtless
return
presently. Will Lieutenant Lennox be good enough
to wait?
Oh, no, no matter; I will call to-morrow.
To-morrow!
He hurried on.
His thoughts now began to return to him, and to become
more under his control. He looked steadily at his
situation
.
Called abruptly to an instantaneous meeting, which,
from the remarkable circumstances, was deliberately and
mercilessly intended to end in death, the equal chance was
that he was on the point of being shot. He had but a few
more hours to live. He hastened along, again bending his
steps towards the Battery.
Some very nice oranges, sir? said a man.
Come along, my dear! said a mother to a little girl;
it is getting late, and you will be ill to-morrow if you take
cold.
To-morrow!
again.
Will you be good enough, sir, to tell me the hour? said
a boy.
Half past six, said Frank.
How are you, Lennox?
How are you?
Charming weather!
Delightful.
You are going off, then?
Yesto-morrow!
Success to you. Good-by, and God bless you!
Stop! said Frank; I want to speak to you.
I beg your pardon, but I have an appointment, and I
am ten minutes too late. It's with a lady.
Oh! said Frank, a lady! don't let me detain you.
And time was flying, and he had, he scarce knew why,
hastened on to the Battery. And he now found himself in
that delightful promenade, a sky all radiant with the glory
of a golden sunset bending over him; the heavy verdure of
the trees and grass around, full of fragrance and freshness;
the birds singing as if gratefully enjoying the delicious
coolness
of the hour, and the limpid floods, which stretch so
magnificently around the town, sleeping in lucid and
waveless
splendour, all painted with the reflected hues of the
glowing heavens. Several sloops lay off here and there,
becalmed, their snowy sails hanging useless against the
mast. Various vessels of a larger description were at
anchor
,
all bright in the peaceful flush of golden fireall
steeped
in the spirit of deep repose. Among them, and not far
from the shore, was a magnificent ship-of-war getting ready
to weigh anchor, from whose decks came faintly and
musically
the voices of the seamen as they cheered their labour
with a sailor's song. The star of evening hung on the air,
and, making around the northern point of the Battery, a
superb
barge, filled with young men, the members of a
boat-club
,
with all of whom Frank knew he must be acquainted,
floated onward, rowed with a slow and equal stroke, the
chorus of a well-known song floating, softened by the
distance
,
and keeping time to the regular plash of the oars.
The sunhis huge orb of unquenchable fire, now almost
supportable to the eyered and magnified, lay on the edge
of the horizon, as if to enable him to gaze on it for the last
time, then slowly, majestically, solemnly sinking behind the
dark, blue shore, disappeared.
A thrilling ense of life sunk into his soul, and he felt
that he was not called upon to plunge into a bloody grave,
and thus to break the hearts of his family and friends.
I will decline this meeting, said he, firmly, calmly
decline it.
And as he came to this conclusion, a mountain of
insupportable
anguish rolled away from his soul.
My character for courage I have already established. I
will have the magnanimity to refuse this challenge.
Perhaps
Glendenning in his heart will thank me for doing so.
Perhaps some heartless villain, with whom he has
quarrelled
,
has stung him to this by some insolent remark. In a
desperate moment, urged by brutal advisers, he has adopted
this course, from which he cannot now retract. I am not
stung. I will refuse. I will go back to the hotel, and
demand
to see him.
He turned and retraced his steps towards the hotel.
Suddenly he felt a hand upon his shoulder. It was
Emmerson
,
who, in his usual silent and stealthy manner, had
approached him before he knew he was near.
What are you doing here, my dear Frank? said he,
affectionately
.
I have watched you for several minutes.
You have looked at your watch four times.
Did I? I really was not aware of it.
You go off in the morning?
Yesthat isI hope so.
Is it not certain? your father told methat
Yeshe thinksI presumewhere are you going?
And he looked again at the watch.
I am going to the theatre.
Shall you see my father?
Why, no. You are to spend the evening with him
are you not?
Yesno. The fact is, something has occurred. Should
you see my father
He stopped in inexpressible agitation.
But what is the matter? You don't seem to know what
you are going to do.
During this colloquy Frank was, in fact, paying little
attention
to what he was saying. He was running over in
his mind the propriety of disclosing his situation to
Emmerson
.
But that keen gentleman had already surmised, by
his hesitation and emotion, his contradictory answers, and
his looking so frequently at his watch, that something
serious
was on the tapis. Almost any other man would have,
under such circumstances, endeavoured to ascertain the
cause of his distress, and striven to prevent any catastrophe.
To do him justice, that was Emmerson's first natural
impulse
;
but it was checked by various characteristic
considerations
.
He was himself alarmed. He opposed
himself
habitually to all impulses of nature, distrusted
everything
and everybody, thought twice before he acted once,
and had a dislike to trouble, odium, or meddling in the
business of others without a motive of self-interest.
After
all, he thought, it is his affair. And the prudent
friend, therefore, pretended not to remark farther anything
extraordinary in Frank's demeanour, and took his leave
abruptly
.
As he receded from Frank, who, irresolute, suffered him
to depart without farther resistance, he looked back.
He's certainly in some new scrape, said Emmerson to
himself. That a child may see. Poor fellow! It may
be a duel. I've a great mind to go after him. But he's too
far. I could overtake him. But, after all, why should I
put myself to trouble for him or any one else? I don't wish
to mingle myself with such matters. Besides, I've to see
Green about that new purchase at sevenand it only wants
ten minutes. He did not ask my advice! He's old enough
to take care of himself It's his affair! Every man for
himself in this world!
And so he turned his steps, not towards the theatre, where
he had no idea of going, but to Mr. Green's, to consult on
a promising speculation.
Frank had nearly reached the City Hotel, when he met
his very manColonel Randolph.
I'm delighted to see you! cried Frank. You're not
engaged this evening?
Not in the least, nor to-morrownor the next day after,
if I can be of the least service to you.
Thank Heaven! said Frank, putting his arm in that of
his friend, and, in hasty words, he related his present
position
.
The devil! was Colonel Randolph's only remark, when
he had heard the narration to an end.
Now I'll tell you at once what my views are, said
Frank; but, of course, I put myself unconditionally in your
hands. I propose
to decline this invitation
. I love
Glendenning
.
I have no sympathy, or passion, or interest here,
except on the side of reconciliation. I fear nothing for my
reputation. If any one attacks it with a whisper, I am here,
and ready to make him answer even a look. But a
meeting
with Glendenning, so cold-blooded, so deadly, so
causeless
,
so absurd: I confess I recoil from it with horror and
disgust. You are an officer, known in such affairs. Your
advice will always protect me from a shadow of blame.
Lennox, I must think this over a moment, said
Randolph
,
gravely.
Frank's bright, warm heart grew black and cold at the
tone of his voice.
They walked on in silence.
Lennox, resumed Randolph, after two or three minutes'
reflection, there is no doubt of it. You must meet this
fellow.
I'm in your hands, said Frank, in a low, but firm voice.
There can be no question of it. It's a peculiar and
most unrefusable challenge, and, don't you see? it's
obviously
getting to be invested with the character of a national
affair. He's been back to Montreal, and the feeling there
among his brother officers has obliged him to return and
renew the thing, The honour of the American army is in
your hands. It's the most extraordinary thing I ever heard
in my life. Accept it.
If you think so?
Certainly! and that at once. Read this
communication
over again. Why, here's a threat.
It is, evidently.
When a man
threatens
by Gd! there's an end of
it. Where are these gentlemen?
Here, in the hotel.
The clock struck seven.
Go in, then, said Frank; I'm in your hands.
And I'll tell you whatcan you handle a rifle?
Can I? said Frank. William Tell wasn't more used
to his bow and arrow. I never miss.
So! meet him? good God! that you shall, and kill him
too. What! are we to be browbeaten in this way by an
insolent
English officer? why, we should be the
laughingstock
of both countries. We'll not only meet him, but in
such a way as to show him and those who send him what
stuff the Yankees are made of. Meet him! meet him with
rifles at the earliest momentto-morrow morning. This is
no child's play. If they want a
meeting
, by , they
shall have one! Step down on the Battery; I'll be after
you in a quarter of an hour.
And they parted.
Stunned by the suddenness and seriousness of all this,
Frank continued his walk towards the appointed place.
Strange, oppressive thoughts flew through his mindloved
images, sweet voices, bright thingsbut he could not well
pursue any regular train of reflection. He could not yet
quite realize it; he seemed lost in a terrible, ghastly dream.
One determination, however, possessed his mind.
Whatever happen to me, I will not, in this way, murder
my friend. I will die. I am gone. Oh God, forgive and
receive me! Oh nature, light, life, farewell!
He was aroused by a touch on the shoulder.
All right, said Colonel Randolph, in a gay,
business-like
voice. To-morrow at daybreak, at Hoboken; but
since we've chosen rifles, they've insisted on the shortest
distance, eighty paces, and the parties to fire together, at a
given signal.
Good! said Frank. I really thank you very much.
Pooh, pooh! it's nothing. We cross at half past three
in separate boats; I am to bring a surgeon. What are you
to do with yourself in the mean time?
Why, really, said Frank, I scarcely know. Hadn't
I better write some letters, and
Pooh! no; leave all that. Don't go at anything to
make you brood or think. These things must be gone
through with at a dash. Do nothing to soften your heart
with unmanly impressions; it'll make your hand unsteady,
when you require the most perfect coolness.
Oh, as to that, said Frank, it is an unimportant
consideration
,
for I'm determined not to fire at my friend.
The devil you are! Then where's the use of going
out?
Why should I kill a man I love? He is obviously forced
into this. He knows nothing of the rifle; I once heard
him say so. If I fire at him, he
dies
, just as sure as fate.
I could never forgive myself for his blood; I had rather be
shot myself.
Why, if you don't kill him, he'll kill you, for let me tell
you they are in earnest. Let us suppose a case: you fire
one round; he finds you have wasted your shot; he can't
then very well proceed. Won't he, won't his friends, won't
his whole regiment say you showed the white feather and
backed out? Why, you might as well refuse to meet him
at all, as meet him in this way.
Then you advise me to take his life if I can?
Most indubitablymost unquestionably. It is not only
your right, but your duty. Any other course would be feeble
and unmanly. You have dutiesduties to society, duties
to the profession to which you belong, duties to yourself,
to me, and to your country. You have no
right
to throw
away your life. Consider your family. Indeed, I am
responsible
for it. Good God! self-defence is the instinct of
the meanest brute. Shall it be denied to a gentleman and
an officer?
But blood! said Frank, as a feeling of sickness came
over him. Murder, and of my friend! I know so well he
is unacquainted with the use of the rifleI am such a
perfect
master of itto slaughter in this way a human being
whom really I love, I confess
Fiddlesticks! said Colonel Randolph; you're young,
that's all. When you shall have been a few more years in
the worldha! ha! ha!you'll learn to view things
differently
.
I'm devilish glad, though, you're such a shot. Ha!
ha! ha! the poor dupe! to come so far to bully an
American
officer, and then to be met in this wayha! ha! ha!
It's capital.
It
is
a piece of bullying, and a most cold-hearted one,
said Frank, catching by degrees the tone of his companion,
and I don't know why I should hesitate.
Certainly; and if you are going to be such a Don
Quixote
as to throw your life into the hands which are so
fiercely
and resolutely grasping at it, why, really, I must
decline
going any farther in the business. Hesitate? why it's
ridiculous! it's imbecile! Didn't the fellow insult
you
first?
Wasn't it one of the most gratuitous insults ever
offered to a gentleman and a soldier? A rose from the
bosom of a young girl under your protection! and then,
when you magnanimously forgave himwhen you received
him into your familyinto your friendshipafter he has had
a full opportunity to see what sort of person you are, and what
misery your death would cause your parents and friends, to
come back here, on some dd, cold-blooded, insolent
caprice
(he's a
dead shot himself
, rememberwith the pistol),
to call you out with the undisguised determination to
slaughter
you, like an ox in the shambles? When you choose
rifles, don't you see they take a short distance, and
you
hesitate!
My dear fellow! if you saw a snake in your
pathin the act of springing upon you, wouldn't you put
your foot upon him? Hesitate? no, indeed. Be
bullied
by
no one; take the best weapon you can find, and
use
it in
the
best way
. Shoot the fellow through the
heart
, and
there is not a man breathing who won't say you served him
right!
His blood be on his own head, then, said Frank.
Certainly! We must go through this affair to the end.
But you needn't make arrangements for any accident to
yourself. We shall have to go off somewhere; that's to
be thought of. Have you cash handy?
Yes; I was to set out in the morning for
Prairie du
Chien
.
Admirable.
But, in the mean time, they are waiting for me at
home.
Well, go there. Pretend fatigue and retire early. Come,
then, down to me, say at twelve. We'll have a supper at
the B House, which is near to the river. I'll order
everything, and then look in at the theatre; at one we'll
sup. You wouldn't sleep if you went to bed. At three
we'll go over, and at ten, my boy, you shall be on your
way to
Prairie du Chien
.
Good-night! said Frank, thoughtfully.
Good-night, my boy! Remembertwelve! and mind,
don't let your old woman suspect anything.
CHAPTER VII.
On
reaching home, Frank found company therea few
chance visiters. He had resolved to act on Randolph's
advice
,
and he called up all his force of character to go
through with it. Some dark thoughts would flash through
his mind ever and anon; but he felt it useless to resist or
Vol. II.E
to think, and he abandoned himself to the stream. He had
a stern task to perform, but a necessary one. He had not
sought it. It had been thrust upon him, and when he did,
at intervals, turn the affair over in his mind, he could not but
feel a buoyant pride, a stern triumph in the thought that such
a deadly attempt upon him had been met so promptly and
manfully. The words of Randolph rang in his ears: If
they want a
meeting
, they shall
have one
. Sometimes he
shuddered at the possibility that he himself might be killed.
But his reason told him that, under the circumstances, his
fate, scarcely preferable, was fixed, as the slaughterer of
his poor friend, the infatuated, reckless, doomed
Glendenning
.
He will have it. It's his own doing! His blood be
on his own head! and with these thoughts he applied
himself
to the gayeties of the company with more than his usual
lively and cheerful calmness.
Come, said Miss Elton, blushing as she did so, a
last duet, Frank.
A last, indeed, said he.
It was a peculiarity in the present evening that, as he
was to set off on a long separation from his family in the
morning, all the incidents and remarks had reference to a
parting. Mrs. Lennox's eyes were more than once full of
tears. Mary ceased to torment, and Miss Elton to be on
her guard with him. All hearts were saddened and
softened
visibly enough through the cheerfulness which
nevertheless
reigned over it all. On Frank these continued
allusions
had a singular effect. It was almost as if everybody
knew he was to meet a dangerous foe in the deadliest strife
in the morning. Everything breathed of absence,
separation
,
and a long farewell.
His romantic and tender nature made him delight to yield
himself to this illusion. He felt, indeed, that, although the
catastrophe of the morning would probably be Glendenning's
death, it would, in fact, break the spell which rendered him
the happy, bright blessing of his father's family circle, and
that by a dark destiny he was there now for the last time
as a sunshiny, innocent boy. He was about being
transformed
into a man of bloodto stain his peace of mind with
murder, and thus to surround himself with associations
which must make even his own mother regard him with
fear and horror. But the worldcustomthe fashion!
must be satisfied.
Must!
He sang several duets and trios with Miss Elton and
Mary. His noble form and handsome features were the
object of everybody's gaze, for, somehow or other, he
appeared
inspired with more than his usual beauty and
manliness
.
The clock struck eleven, and the visiters took their leave.
And so, my dearest Frank, said his mother, putting back
(a favourite habit of hers) the thick hair from his forehead,
we are to lose you.
Yes, mother.
And your boyhood is over, said Mary.
I fear.
And what shall I do for you in your absence? said
Fanny, her heart reproaching her for the unavoidable
coldness
she had been obliged to put on towards him.
Think of me sometimes, said Frank. Remember
my virtues (if I have any!), not my follies or my faults.
Of the latter you have none, said Mrs. Elton.
And what will become of your music? said Fanny.
Oh, I'm prepared to bid abieu to that and many other
pleasures.
How wonderfully romantic, exclaimed his father.
I'll have this lock, said his mother; now don't start
away.
Why should I? said Frank. As much as you like.
Half playfully, half in earnest, she took up a pair of
scissors
and cut off a lock, while the laughing circle closed
around to witness the ceremony.
Now the other side, said Fanny, to make it even.
Quite right, replied his mother; we mustn't destroy
his equilibrium on the eve of such an important event.
Why, one would think he was getting shorn for
execution
,
cried Mary, with one of her bright smiles.
There! said Mrs. Lennox, holding up two curls.
`Beg a hair of him for memory,
And, dying, mention it within your wills,
Bequeathing it as a rich legacy
Unto your issue.'
This quotation was received with general laughter by all
but Frank himself, who, despite his utmost exertions, could
not prevent the unexpected thrill with which he had
submitted
to the operation from being visible in his manner
and countenance.
What a fool you make of him! said his father.
And his own eyes wet! said Mrs. Elton, pointing to
Mr. Lennox.
Ridiculous! said Mr. Lennox. The boy's setting
out on a delightful journey; seven years will soon pass
away. Why sadden him with all this sentimental
nonsense
?
Nonsense? No nonsense at all! exclaimed Fanny,
laughing. You mustn't think
we're all
such hard-hearted,
prosaic old bodies as you. What could make us
sentimental
,
I should like to know, if not this? a young soldier
setting out for the field from the haunts of his youth, and
all that sort of thing! Why, it's poetry itself.
To be sure, said Mary.
`Upon the hill he turned
To take a last fond look
Of the valley, and the village church,
And the cottage by the brook.
He listened to the sounds,
So familiar to his ear,
And the soldier leaned upon his sword,
And wiped away a tear.'
Mary began this in jest, but she appeared almost in
earnest
as she closed, for she observed with surprise the
agitation
of Frank. His lip quivered, though the smile still
lingered
,
and suddenly he placed his hand over his eyes, and
turned away his head.
Dear, dear Frank! said his mother.
And where is the wonder? demanded his father, angrily.
Wouldn't any one fancy he was going to be hanged, by
the fuss you make about it?
I'm tired, said Frank. I'm a very poor hand at
leave-taking. I think I'll go to bed, as we have a fatiguing
day's travel to-morrow.
Mrs. Elton, rising to go, came forward, bade him
good-by
,
and, with the privilege of age, kissed him on the
forehead
.
And Fanny came to say good-by.
Terrified lest some burst of feeling should betray him, he
took her hand, almost coldly, pressed it a moment to his
lips, and, turning away, she departed.
Now, Frank, said Mary, you foolish fellow! I
thought you had more sense.
Let him be! said Mr. Lennox. Go along to bed,
sir! I hope you'll return with a little more of the `bold
dragoon' about you. What, a roystering blade like you, with
`the' beard of Hercules and frowning Mars
A night's rest is all I want, said Frank, gayly.
Well, go along! repeated his father. No more
embracing
while you're all in this ridiculous mood.
Oh, don't mind me, cried Frank. Good-night, my
dear father.
Good-night, my boy: off with you.
One embracegood-night!
Mary!
Well, thengood-nightyou're a foolish creature.
My mother!
My son!
They embraced.
He took up a candle, and went slowly out of the room.
In a few moments the family were all in bed. But no
one slept. A nervous, broken slumber fell upon Mrs.
Lennox
,
from which, every ten minutes, she started into
wakefulness
.
My dear Catharine, at length exclaimed Mr. Lennox,
you are a perfect galvanic battery! I had as leave sleep
with an electric fish.
I'm glad you're awake, said she. I'm very anxious
about Frank!
Pooh, pooh! go to sleep.
Won't you get up and see how he is?
My good, dear Catharine! will you have the kindness
to hold your tongue?
I'm perfectly sure he's going to have a fit of illness,
said Mrs. Lennox, in about ten minutes.
Well, my love, if you won't sleep, will you get up and
read, or go out and take a walk, or dance a jig on the
tight-rope, or something of that sort. Be quiet, be quiet.
What absurd nonsense have you got in your head?
Don't laugh at me, said Mrs. Lennox, a quarter of an
hour afterward, but I'm sure something is the matter with
Frank.
I'm sure of it
.
Why? Why do you think so? Because a sensitive,
affectionate boy is touched on the eve of leaving his home
for several yearsperhaps foreverwith a parcel of women
clipping his locks off, and repeating poetry, and fingering
and fiddling about him like the last scene in an opera? Do
go to sleep.
No, that's not it. Something extraordinary is the
matter
with him. He acted very strangely. His persisting in
the desire to embrace us alland how
did
he embrace us?
White lips, cold hands, face turned away, or buried in my
bosom. My dear husband, get up. Some horrible
catastrophe
is hanging over us.
My heavens! Catharine, how can you be so weak? If
you think anything's the matter with him, go and see him,
and get quizzed to death for it in all his letters for the next
six months. The idea of waking a man up at two o'clock
in the night to ask him how he does!
With trembling hands and pale face, the affrighted mother
hastily rose, threw over her a loose
robe de chambre
, and
ascended
the stairs to Frank's room. A singular feeling
induced
the father to follow her. She knocked.
Frank! rap, rap, rap.
Frank! my son! It's Iyour mother.
Rap, rap, rap. Frank! Frank!
There was no answer.
Lennox heard her rapidly open the door, and thena
shriek of wild horror. He rushed up. The room was
empty. Frank was not there. His bed had not been
slept in.
The letter yesterday! his conduct last night! my son!
gasped Mrs. Lennox, clasping her hands.
It's another
duel!
CHAPTER VIII.
Night
! silence! solitude! not a whisper! not a sound!
He softly threw up the window and looked into the street.
Not the shuffle of a step, not the murmur of a distant
wheel. The great city lay hushed as in death, a noiseless
phantom. He looked up. The sky, like the earth, was
voiceless. There was no moon. Perhaps he would never
see it again. He thought a moment of that bright silver
disk, as a corpse in its grave would remember it, had the
mouldering relic of what had been a man the power of
reflection
.
The stars lay scattered along the unbreathing
void, some crowded in far-off clusters, points scarcely
perceptible
to the straining eye; some, individually too far for
sight, fused together by millions into a soft flush of light;
some, low and near, burned with a liquid, flickering flame,
bright and large. Across the heavens, the irregular and
undefined outline of the milky-way, that mysterious road
through eternal space, here vaguely lost to the unconscious
gaze, there deepening into luminous
nebul
, where worlds
clung to each other like a cloud of bees.
Oh God! murmured the young man, overwhelmed with
the stupendous thoughts which rose and rolled through his
mind.
But the clock struck twelve, and called his
contemplations
back to earth. He started like the convict whose
hour has comewhose hair is to be shornwhose arms
are to be pinionedand who is to be led, hemmed in on all
sides by tramping troops, to the scaffold. He shuddered.
The idea of killing his enemy now lost its hold on his
mind. He felt he was himself to die. A preternatural
instinct
seemed to tell him his life was terminated.
Whatever
he was looking on around him, he was looking on for
the last time. He was parting from it forever. From all
that he loved most deeplymost thrillingly, he had already
parted. His father, his motherah, now the big tears
gushed to his eyesMary, Harry, Fanny Eltonhis friends,
the haunts of his youth, the hopes of his manhoodall
were to him things of the pastshapes of a vanished dream.
Oh God! whither were the turbid waves of chance
bearing
him? Was he indeed never more to behold the sun,
the crowded streets, the woods, the hills and valleys of the
beautiful earth? Was the voice of human beings no more
to sound in his ears? Was he no more to look in the faces
he loved? A few hours, and the brain that throbbed, the
heart that heaved, the hand which he lifted before his eyes,
the eye itself, were to be hurled into the black and icy
cavern
of death! Was he, then, to cease to exist, to sink from
nature like a nameless insect, an unnoted grain of sand
to be forever destroyed and forever forgotten? Dreadful
thought! and as impossible as dreadful. Was there, then,
no power which watched him? no hand to sustain him? He
knelt unconsciously! But to what? Who heard him? No
one? Was he, then, utterly alone with night and death?
At this moment his mother's exhortations rose to his
memory
.
Her faith in God and the Bible! her humble
adoration
of Jesus! Ah! what new conceptions broke over his
mind.
Could
the dreams of his religious mother be
true?
Was Christianity the voice of that God who had hung those
mighty heavens with beaming worlds?
Suddenly he asked himself why he should perpetrate this
act. He recoiled from death; he felt he was not fit to die.
Still more he recoiled from murder. He had felt like the
convict; but how different was his situation? His arms
were not pinioned; no stern troops were around him; no
officers of justice bore him forward; no executioner had
power over him if he choose not to mount the scaffold. He
was free.
Bitterly did he now lament his application to Randolph.
Oh, had he but sought at once some enlightened Christian
friendElton, Emmersonbut now it was too late. The
challenge, so fiercely given, had been promptly accepted, in
a manner haughty and stern, as the case demanded. Could
he now retreat? could he show the white feather? could
he, after all this swaggering bravado, back out, fly, and throw
away the reputation which he had won for a chivalric
defender
of woman, of his country's honour, and his own?
Could he meet public opinion? Could he bear the glance
of the great and distinguished men who sanctioned by their
approbation, and
their example
, the custom of duelling?
And, after all,
was
it wrong? If it were wrong, would those
great and good men adopt it, advocate it, and take the lead
in it?
He ran over in his mind those who had fought. The
array
of splendid names staggered his reason, for he was but
a boyinexperienced, and susceptible to public opinion.
Had he been able to remember one,
only one
, distinguished
man, one public orator, one judge, one experienced
statesman
who had declined a challenge, under strong
circumstances
,
publicly and unequivocally, on the ground that it
was immoral and unchristian to accept it, he would have
had force of character to follow the bright and godlike
example
.
But he could not remember
one
. All for the world
not one for
God
.
Up, then, and away! he murmured. This is no time
to discuss moral questions. My fate calls me; I cannot
consider consequences; I'm in the world, and of it. The
die is cast; shame on my weakness! I will hesitate no
more!
The clock struck one. The heavy stroke quivered over
the hushed, sleeping city, and startled him from his dreams
of right and wrong.
One moment he knelt, and implored his Creator to forgive
him. Thus much to early associations and inner instincts.
One moment he looked around upon the peaceful chamber,
where he had spent so many happy hours, where he had
woven so many bright dreams. One moment he bade
farewell
to the beloved beings from whom he was thus
separating
himself on his dark and desperate adventure, and then,
stealing carefully down stairs, and wafting a kiss to his
mother's door, he sallied forth into the street, and hastened
with flying steps over the solitary, echoing pavement,
towards
the hotel designated by Colonel Randolph.
CHAPTER IX.
As
he reached the Park, a figure started out from the deep
shadow of St. Paul's Church, and stood directly before him.
It was with a singular emotion that he recognised
Glendenning
.
The two young men, who had thus strangely met,
were quite alone. They stood face to face in the dim
starlight
.
This is a strange meeting, Captain Glendenning, said
Frank.
Glendenning made no answer.
If it is accident, stop my way no more.
It is not accident, replied Glendenning, in a hollow and
tremulous voice. I stole from White with a vague hope
of meeting you.
If not accidental, said Frank, haughtily, it is yet
stranger.
Frank, said Glendenning, I throw myself on your
generosity. By what humiliation, by what bitter taunts I
have been driven to this crisis I need not explain. I have
risked my character, and the mortal enmity of White, by
seeking you here, and therefore our meeting must be a
secret
.
Give me your hand, and hear what I have to say.
I will not take your hand, replied Frank, sternly; I
can have no secret with you.
Pity me and forgive me, said Glendenning. I am
only a victim.
I scorn you, Glendenning, said Frank, scorn and
despise
you. The struggle I have undergone you can never
know. Your conduct has been as unworthy of a friend as
of a man. If I kill you, I shall not mourn you. If I fall, I
shall not forgive you. You might have spared me the pain
of speaking with you. Let me pass.
Lennox, said Glendenning, your anger I can bear,
because you are ignorant of my position and my feelings.
Spare me your confidence, said Frank, coldly. I
shall not sympathize with a weakness which has led you to
this new outrage. No friend, not beneath contempt, could
have advised you. You have mistaken the taunts of a
coterie
for those of the world. Tell your advisers what I say,
and should you meet the fate you justly merit from a hand
that will not shrink from bestowing it, I will triumph in
having
been your chastiser, and shall be ready to become theirs.
Let me pass, sir, or I shall think you a
coward
as well as
a
Frank, said Glendenning, I make allowances for
your irritation. I am patient beneath your insults, for I
deserve
them; at least, all except the last. Despicable, false,
and fickle I have been; may God forgive me! As for
avoiding this meeting, I wish to do so, because, if we meet,
one or both of us must fall. I did intend to waste my fire.
My life is without the least value to me. It would be
grateful
to me to fall beneath your hand, but not only my honour
forbids, but the honour and life of at least one of my friends.
Suffering and thought have made me cool: be so yourself,
and hear me. I have weighed the matter in every way,
looked at it from every point. Without any hatred to each
other, we are involved in a dark destiny, from which only a
chance of escape is left us. I do not mean escape from
death; I mean escape from the horror of destroying each
other. My own happiness, Frank, I would resign rather
than proceed; but my
honour!
Besides, I am not my own
master. Were I to apologize to youwere I to refuse to
call you out
Pray go on, said Frank.
Two or three officers of my regiment are resolved to do
so. The step which has sunk me so low in your
estimation
does not add to your danger. We are both surrounded
by determined enemies, watching to consummate our ruin.
It is not my fault; it is necessity.
The tyrant's plea and the coward's excuse, said Frank,
his high temper mounting at the narration of the danger in
which he stood.
But that I loved you, Frank, loved you and yoursoh,
more than my tongue has power to saylet your reason
tell you I am incapable of the dishonour of seeking this
interview
.
But I remember the mad act by which I first
brought this on myself, and I hope I may partly expiate the
outrage by this shame.
If you have anything to say, say it, said Frank.
You must make a step to stop this affair.
I?
You! not for my sake; I ask nothing at your hands.
If I fall, I forgive you. Neither for your sake, but for
your
mother's!
I
make a move? and what move have you the coolness
to ask from me?
Write me the most guarded apology, the faintest regret
for the blow you gave mesay but one word, and I will
withdraw my messageeven nowin spite of
I? I bear the shame of your outrage? I apologize? I
humiliate myself before you, who first forced upon me a
quarrel, who, when punished less than he merited, now, to
conciliate heartless worldlings, throws reason, humanity,
decency
,
friendship, to the winds, and with a threatening note
and a bullying friend calls me out? Do you ask me to soil
my
name, to bend
my
knee, to become a by-word and a
mark of scorn? No, sir. I do not regret the blow; I only
regret that, misled by my own feelings, I ever touched in
friendship the hand that, even in a moment of intoxication,
could offer an insult to a lady.
Go, then, Mr. Lennox, said Glendenning. It must be
confessed, if my crime has been great, my punishment is not
trifling. But your passion is too just to move in me other
feelings than pain. You will remember hereafter that I
sought your forgiveness in vain. Remember, also, to the
end of your life, that I have given you mine unasked. Tell
your mother I pray for her happiness. Good-evening to you.
He turned and walked slowly away.
CHAPTER X.
Frank
found Randolph and a surgeon waiting
impatiently
.
Dn it, Lennox, we began to think you had backed
out, said his friend, heartily shaking him by the hand.
Do you know its two, and the man is to call for us at three
with the boat, and the supper is cooked to death.
I'm as hungry as a shark, said Frank, who, in the
presence
of Randolph, resolutely turned from all reflection.
A very nice supper, at all events, said Doctor Wilson.
Nothing is wanting but time to eat it, said Frank.
What's this?
Chateau la rose
, replied Randolph, and devilish good,
too; but mine host says the Champagne is something
particular
.
Come along, cried Frank, laughing; let's get at it at
once. How's the tongue?
Pretty good! replied Wilson.
Egad! remarked Randolph, there's nothing like a
first-rate supper on these occasions; only, my good fellow,
a little moderation with the
wine
, if you please;
eat
as much
as you like, but
wine
we must stint you in.
Nonsense, said Frank, who had already filled several
times; don't fear for me.
A clear eye and a steady hand, my boy, and many
more such bumpers as this, cried Randolph, emptying his
glass.
Wilson, said Frank, you don't drink?
Thank you, replied the young man: in the night
I'm obliged to be a little careful.
What's the matter with you? Dyspepsy?
A touch or so.
This bird is delicious, said Frank, feeling a strange
life and spirit under the influence of the excitement, and of
the wine.
How goes the enemy? said Randolph.
Ten minutes to three.
Notwentyyou're too fast.
Noten, said Wilson, and rather five than ten. My
watch is very accurate.
Then sharp's the word! said Frank; just cut that
other cork, will you?
No, by Gd! no, Lennox, said Randolph; no more.
You must wait: at breakfast as much as you like, but
Oh, onedamn it, do you take me for a boarding-school
girl?
Well, then,
only one
.
Success to us! exclaimed Frank; I've eaten like a
boa-constrictor. Positively not another go at the
Champagne
?
Not another drop.
Well, there's no harm in
singing
, I suppose? said
Frank.
Did you ever see such a madcap? asked Randolph,
smiling approvingly to Wilson. That's the stuff we
Yankees
are made of. This is the way we meet threats and
bullying. We'll make Pistol eat his leaks. Ah! ha! ha!
Ah! ha! ha! said Frank; but won't you sing? Don't
you sing, Wilson?
No, no, said Wilson, who did not seem so completely
at his ease as his two companions, and who had the air of
being a guest rather from professional duty than taste.
Will you sing, Randolph?
Noexcuse me; my voice is rather in the bullfrog line.
Anything wanted
in
the way of a
trombone
, I'm your man!
Well,
I
can sing, said Frank.
`A bumper of Burgundy fill, fill for me,
Give those who prefer it Champagne '
and he sang very sweetly and gayly a verse of that popular
melody.
As he was commencing the second, they were interrupted
by a knock at the door.
Hallo! pull up! said Randolph.
It's three, sir, said the man, who had entered, taking
off his hat. The boat is ready.
Come along, then, said Randolph. Push ahead,
Wilson
!
don't forget your box.
Scarcely, said Wilson, with a grave air.
And where's the little person that says such sharp
things? asked Randolph, facetiously.
The rifle's in yonder corner, said Wilson.
Vol. II.F
Ah, ha! exclaimed Randolph, and, handling with an air
of familiarity the formidable instrument, he led the way
out through the deserted street and to the wharf.
Now, then, governor, where's your boat?
Here she is, sir, replied the man, with a knowing grin.
Bring her round, Sam.
Are you good oarsmen?
No mistake.
In with you, then; in with you, Wilson. Hallo! old
fellow, don't fall overboard. Hand the box; take care of
the rifle! Now, then, governor.
All aboard?
All aboard!
You'll hold us harmless, gentlemen? inquired the
boatman
.
Why, damn it! certainly, said Frank. Who's going
to hurt
you?
Very well! But pay in advance is our motto: pay
to-day
and trust to-morrow. I'm a poor man, with a wife and
twelve children, and
How many at the breast? asked Frank, laughing.
Two, sir.
Well, there's ten dollars! nearly a dollar apiece for
your brats.
Thank'ee, sir. Now shove her off, Sam!
Let her went, said Randolph; keep dark, and row,
you villains, as if the devil were after you.
Perhaps he
is
after some on us.
Just mind your oar, will you, my honest friend! cried
Randolph, in a low voice; when we wish your jokes, we'll
ask for them.
Ay, ay, sir, said the man, and, stripping off coat and
waistcoat, and equipping his jaws with an ample quid, he
applied
himself to his labour, and the small and heavily-laden
boat darted out from the shadow of the wharf, glided
noiselessly
forth among the dark, silent ships which lay around,
and at length gained the broad open bay, when the two
athletic fellows put themselves yet more seriously to their
toil, with a strength which made them fairly fly through the
quiet water.
That's right, my men; pull hard, said Randolph; a
long pull, a strong pull, and a pull all together.
Ay, ay, sir.
What a beautiful, still night! remarked Frank.
How perfectly glassy the bay is! added Wilson.
Famous weather for a lark! said Randolph.
They soon receded from the black, long, level town, with
nothing around them but the broad, sleeping flood, through
which the boat cut with a gurgling rush, breaking its mirror
surface into large flakes of phosphoric fire, and over them
the sky and stars, paling before a pearly light, which began
to grow visible in the East. In the spot thus indicated, as
that where the sun was to rise, a few fixed clouds, lying
long, and low, and in singularly level lines, began to be just
tipped with silvery whiteness, which changed, as they
proceeded
,
to a deeper, brighter hue.
The day is breaking, said Wilson. Beautiful nature,
how
But he stopped suddenly, as if recollecting himself, and
Randolph quietly gave him a wink.
How far is it across here, squire? asked Randolph.
About two thousand seven hundred and forty-six yards,
sir, said the man.
And that point?
Jersey City, said Frank.
And Governor's Island, which is that? inquired
Randolph
.
Here, don't you see? said Frank, away off to the left,
behind us.
Yonder is Weehawk, said Wilson, and yonder lies
the 74 gun-ship.
And that pretty point ahead?
Hoboken, replied the man.
There was something in these details which struck Frank
strongly. The soft, fresh air, the gentle, soothing motion,
the sight of nature in its calmness, purity, and beauty, going
on with its radiant and sweet changes, as usual, the
broadening
daylight, the now stirring clouds, the sight of the
distant
,
steepled, bristling city, exercised a certain influence,
not only over the young man himself, but over all the little
party bent on their dreadful purpose. It contrasted as much
with their object, as with the flippant jests and smiles with
which that object was pursued. Upon Frank's mind it was
peculiarly impressive. The fumes of the supper and wine
had passed away, and his passion had cooled. All personal
fear, too, had completely disappeared, and the awful image
in his mind was the body of his murdered friend
weltering
in its gore. He was going to do the deed with his
eyes open, with his heart softened. He shuddered, but
shook off the relenting weakness with a sort of savage
coarseness and gayety, most foreign to his real nature, and
which he had several times assumed in the company, the
contagious company of Randolph. Darkly and brutally,
therefore, turning from all thought and feeling, all reflection
of a religious nature, all communion with his Creator, he
resolved, since he was in it, to go through with the matter
like a man
.
They were now close on the land. The boat drew near
to a somewhat elevated and beautiful shore, thickly wooded,
even to the edges of the naked rocks, which here and there
projected into the stream. The next moment the keel ran
grazing upon a little sandy beach.
Land ho! cried Randolph.
Take care of the oar, sir, said the boatman.
Now, then, my son-a-wax, said Randolph, run her
right in hereso, so. Wilson, the rifle. Take care of
your box. By Gd! there they are!
The party got out. In the actual presence of danger, the
wavering emotions of Frank ceased. The cool courage of
his character gave a manly dignity to his person and a
quiet pride to his step. He felt no longer sure of killing,
or of being killed, but only that he was about engaging in a
serious contest, in which he must bear himself with perfect
composure, and the consequences of which he was
prepared
to abide by. He never appeared more at ease in his
life, while Wilson was pale with the deepening interest
of the scene, and even Randolph, although a thoughtless
and flippant duellist, lost a portion of his colour and some
of his natural coolness. The brave man may step forward
to be shot at himself, but the bravest may falter while
standing
passively by, to behold the instrument of death directed
against his friend.
You had better remain here, my good fellows, said
Frank to the boatmen. Lie quiet. Some of us will want
you in half an hour.
Ay, ay, sir.
But these men were rather too much interested in the
progress of the little drama to obey. Hastily mooring their
boat, therefore, to a large stone, with eager feet they stole
noiselessly up after the rest of the party, who were too
much occupied with other thoughts to pay them any
attention
,
and planted themselves close to the scene of action,
where they could, with an undisturbed luxury, be
spectators
of thisin the nineteenth centuryfashionable,
honourable
,
oft-repeated, oft-yet-to-be-repeated scene. We may
all have an opportunity of testing, like them, the excitement
which used to give Commodus and Nero an appetite for
breakfast.
Now, Lennox, said Randolph, in a low voice, his
flippant
manner entirely changed, I understand you to assure
me of your intention to fire to the best of your skill?
Certainly, said Frank. I have not come here to
play.
The parties now approached each other, and calm and
courteous greetings were interchanged. The rifles were
immediately loaded, and the distance measured with
deliberate
and careful precision. A few words were exchanged
between White and Randolph. The principals were
ordered
to their places, and the pieces handed to them.
Anything more, my boy? whispered Randolph.
Nothing, replied Frank, with a bright smile.
When I say
three
, gentlemen! said the business-like
voice of Randolph, as all receded and left the opponents
planted upon the green, level lawn, erect, silent, and alone.
There was one moment's pause.
Randolph advanced a step to give the signal.
Onetwothree!
Each piece was discharged as he spoke. Frank sprang
into the air and fell heavily to the ground, like an eagle
which a skilful huntsman has brought from the clouds,
while the blue smoke rolled slowly off, curling away upon
the dim morning light, and up through the green branches.
All present rushed to the spot. The unfortunate young
man lay extended at full length, writhing in great pain and
absolutely weltering in gore, which gushed from his breast
and mouth. His eyes were turned inward in the
convulsion
of nature's last appalling struggle.
Glendenning, from whose face horror had drained every
trace of colour, staggered forward, and threw himself upon
his knees with clasped hands, gasping for breath.
Frank! Frank! he rather shrieked than said, in a
hoarse voice.
F 2
But, on catching a full view of the face, he stopped,
petrified
and dumb. It was
death
he was looking at. The
countenance
was undergoing a frightful change. A stream of
blood, apparently exhaustless, continued to flow from the
wound. Wilson cut away the clothing in awful silence.
Drops of sweat had burst out on the forehead of the dying
man, who, with lustreless and broken eyes, sunken cheeks,
the nose sharpened with the strain of the great agony, was
obviously undergoing a last crisis.
Frank! Frank! gasped Glendenning, his hair rising
with terror, speak to me!
I, I, for but he could not proceed.
Doctor! save him! it's nothing, said Glendenning.
He's fainting. See! see! Doctor, quick! why don't
you save him?
The lung! said Wilson, in a low voiceit has
perforated
the lung.
Mymother gasped Frank. Tell herthat
He fell back.
But
do
something, doctor, said Glendenning. Your
instrumentsyour arthe's fainting, doctor. Gd dn it!
why don't you
do
something?
My dear sir, said the surgeon, dropping the heavy
hand with a singular smile, it's perfectly absurd. He's
quite
dead.
Dead?
Dead!
And the word went round from one blanched face to
another.
Now, then, cried White, I hope Colonel Nicholson
will be satisfied.
Poor devil! muttered the boatman,
his
jig's up.
Farewell, noble heart! cried Randolph, dashing the
quick-coming tears from his eyes.
Poor young fellow, said White, looking at his watch.
Now, Glendenning, we must be off.
Dead! echoed Glendenning, aghast, dripping with
cold sweat, and staring at the outstretched, stiffening body
and rigid countenance, which had already assumed a
marble
fixedness. Frank! Frank!
There was no answer, there was no motion; and he
stood gazing on the face of his dead friend.
It will pass in a moment, said White, quietly, to the
surgeon. Be a
man:
come! there is no time to lose.
Glendenning, with a bewildered stare, suffered himself to
be led off. Once he looked back. Once he looked up and
around, as a fiend just out of hell might gaze upon the upper
world of light, and joy, and peace, and beauty. Once he
murmured, Oh God, his mother! then dashing his
clinched
fist against his forehead, he pursued his flight to the boat
in silence.
CHAPTER XI.
By
the time they reached the city, Glendenning had
collected
his senses. The steamboat to start at six for Albany
was lying at the wharf. No persuasion could induce him
to land. He went instantly on board, and retired into the
cabin. His friend hastened to the hotel, and returned at
the hour of starting, and once more the gay and animated
scene of a setting forth up the Hudson went on around
them. Hours stop for nothing; the day advanced; the
beautiful shores of the river flew by, bathed in the tender
morning light and dew, and printing their graceful outlines
against the sky, as the successful duellist hastened on,
leaving
behind the great city, already beginning to ring with the
incident in which he had played such a bloody part. It was
long before the exquisite nature through which he was
passing
,
the rapid motion, and the crowds around began to make
upon his mind the impression of reality, or to divest him of
the feeling that he was in a horrible dream. White was
grave and silent; his purpose was accomplished; his duty
as a man of honour and a gentleman had been strictly
performed
,
and he left his companion to the course of his own
reflections, which gradually fell back into a more slow and
collected motion. He would gladly have avoided
reflecting
on the past or on the future, or, indeed, reflecting at all;
but the power of banishing thought he had lost; the spectre
of his murdered friend presented itself to him everywhere;
he saw it upon each green sward; it glared at him even
when he closed his eyes; it seemed like a curse; it was
religion. They believe because they
wish
to believe. If
Christianity be not true, I don't wish to believe it. Do you
suppose the great characters of antiquity believed in their
gods, and miracles, and all that? certainly not. Give me
truth! I
set up for a man of sense, and I don't care who
knows it. I also set up for a man of courage, moral as well
as physical. I wish to see things as they
are
, whether the
discovery be pleasing or not. I seek truth even before
happiness
;
truth, if it mean death or annihilation after death.
Certainly, said Frank, who, during this harangue, had
been leaning his face back and away as much as possible,
but who was followed up close by the youthful philosopher,
and greatly annoyed at finding himself entrapped into a
metaphysical dispute with a person whom travelling and
his own self-sufficient mind had rendered rather disgusting,
certainly, truth is the object of life, but one cannot be too
guarded against illusion.
Oh yes, but I am
sure I
have
found
truth.
You're a lucky fellow.
Yes, I am, and it is
travel
which has opened my mind.
Before I went abroad I don't think there was a greater fool
to be found anywhere than I. Perhaps you remember me?
No! I do not.
I was badly dressed, bad-mannered, and backward,
without
any confidence in myself, and blushing like a red
cabbage
when any oneparticularly a ladyspoke to me.
Now, egad! I have seen the worldbut I am wrong. It is
not travel
alone
which has opened my mind.
And what else is it?
Love!
Love? said Frank, almost with a start.
Love, repeated Earnest. You've no idea how you
get on in that way abroad. I was in love with three
married
women. You know no one falls in love with any one
but married women on the Continent.
No, I did not know that. I fear I am as backward as
you were before you left America.
One was a countess at Vienna, one a baroness at Paris,
and the third the wife of a generala very good creature
in Milan.
And did all these ladies return your passion? asked
Frank.
Why, that is scarcely for me to say, replied Earnest,
ed the thunderbolt. The agony, the despair, the
broken-hearted
mother, shrieking, fainting, raving in delirious
despair
,
perhaps; the crowds of sympathizing friends, the stark
cold, noble body, thus struck ruthlessly down in its young
hopes, its radiant life.
Oh God! have mercy on my soul! he strove to pray,
but, with a sickening effort, he succeeded in turning from
these images.
As night came on his fellow-passengers retired to their
berths. He alone paced the solitary deck, watched the soft,
glittering stars, and strove in vain to escape from the bloody
apparition, which, wherever he looked, lay convulsed,
trembling
,
gasping before him, trying without success to utter a
worda parting wordof forgiveness and love, and the red
stream of life gushing from those sunshiny lips, so full of
smiles and sweetness, from which no breath of dishonour
had ever fallen, and yet warm with the fond mother's deep
kiss.
Southard's form then rose before him, and his wife, and
the dead child, and the Bible he had blasphemously hurled
away, and the vow he had taken, and the curse he had
called
on himself if he ever gave up the mild and pure precepts
of the Son of man to worship the dark world and follow
his own wild passions.
Wine! wine! he muttered, sick with horror; and,
going below, he roused the steward, and ordered upon deck
a couple of bottles of Madeira and cigars.
Ah! ha! the immortal stream rolled warmly through his
icy veins. He quaffed deep and often, and rose superior
to his puny fears. New, brighter, more manly views came
to him. He was the victim of a stern destiny. He had not
shrunkwould not shrink. Duty and honour before all
things. Now, then, he could face the scoffing, sneering,
laughing, insolent Breckenbridge. Now he could stand
before
the malignant eye of the dog, Nicholson. Did they
think they could blast him thus with impunity? No! no!
The ruin he had wrought must be avenged
somewhere
. First
he would call to a stern account the arch-fiend who had
made him what he was: ay, though he had to grasp his
throat at the head of his regiment; ay, though he had to
stab him as he slept. Diedie in peace, horrible spectre!
Close those hideous, starting eyes. If there be another
world, where I am one day to join you, I will have a tale
to tell dark as your early grave.
The daybreak found him still staggering to and fro in
the drunken triumph of his bloody anticipations.
On reaching Montreal, he separated from White, whose
cold indifference disgusted him.
Ah, my friend! said Southard, pale and agitated,
where have you been? What is it I have heard?
You would not take my hand, Southard, said
Glendenning
.
It is red with the heart's blood of the only friend
I ever had, wet with the tears of the only family who ever
took the least interest in me.
You have notyou cannot have
Allthe worstopen the windowyour room is
suffocating
and
leave me
Oh, Glendenning! what have you done?
Glendenning covered his face with his hands.
Southard left him in horror.
As soon as he found himself alone, he rushed out of the
house, and directed his steps towards the lodgings of
Breckenbridge
.
It was late in the afternoon. The front door
was open. Several persons were passing slowly in and out.
As no one questioned him, he questioned nobody. He felt
that he was sent on a stern mission of vengeance. He was
going to seek his insolent enemy, and to dash upon his
forehead
a blow of hate and insult. He mounted the stairs.
Clinton was at the door, but made no salutation. In the
room was a silent group of brother officers: they stood
around a bed. His fierce eye passed rapidly in among them
in search of his victim. The last one his glance fell on was
Nicholson. They were all gazing tranquilly upon a form
extended on the bed. It was a corpse, arrayed in the
vestments
of the grave, stretched peacefully, stiffly, at full length,
the waxen hands crossed on the breast, the chin bound
tightly in snowy linen, the features white, sunken, changed.
At first he could not recognise them, till, still gazing, a
dim ideaa faint resemblanceit was
Breckenbridge!
When he lifted his eyes, at length, he found his
companions
had disappeared. They had left him in disgust. He
was alone. His hot hate turned to icy horror.
One moment he laid his hand on the forehead, which sent
a sensation of cold to his heart.
He went back calmly to his rooms, where he strove to
pray, but he could not.
CHAPTER XII.
In
the evening a stranger was announced. It proved to
be a Mr. Beckford, an old and venerable friend of his
father
,
but one who, in his difficulties with his family, had
always
been of the opinion that his father was in the wrong.
This gentleman had known and loved him from his earliest
infancy. He had dandled him on his knees a thousand times.
Beckford approached in the kindest manner and embraced
him.
What is all this I hear, my dear young friend? said
he, with deep and tender commiseration. You are
looking
ill, and are, I learn, in trouble. I have but this
morning
arrived. Let me be your confidant and counsellor.
Glendenning frankly related his misery to him, and felt
strangely relieved by it.
Dreadful! most frightful! and what do you mean to do?
Oh, leave the army, of course, forever.
Right! quite right! But what! man! don't despair;
you are not the first who has been in a painful dilemma.
Cheer up! don't be too much alone, and dine with me
tomorrow
at four.
I will.
I am going to call on your lieutenant-colonel this
evening
.
What, Nicholson?
Yes.
He does not dine with you, I hope?
I intended to ask him before I saw you, but will not
now, of course.
They conversed long together. Oh, how sweet is the
voice of friendship to the heart bruised and broken with
treachery, unkindness, and despair!
At length Beckford took his leave.
Early the next morning a note came for Glendenning.
It was from Beckford. He opened it and read:
August
, 18-.
Dear Sir
,
Circumstances have obliged me to put off the dinner
to-day; I shall not, therefore, have the pleasure of seeing
you.
Truly yours,
Horace Beckford
.
Captain Glendenning
, etc., etc., etc.
The next day and the next passed, but no farther visit or
invitation from Beckford. Had he, too, abandoned him?
In the mean time, Glendenning had resumed his military
duties, dined at the mess-table, and attended drills and a
parade; but the coolness of all his brother officers, with
two or three exceptions, was more marked than ever. The
news of his fatal duel had spread like wildfire. The papers
were full of it, although he never looked into them. White
he met often, but they had together no confidential
conversations
,
and he began to conceive for him a loathing which
he found it impossible altogether to conceal. The deed he
had perpetrated did not seem to have produced the desired
effect. A meeting with
rifles
startled and shocked the
public
mind. It was pronounced bloody, savage, horrible. True,
the choice of weapons had not rested with Glendenning;
but no matter; he was in the affair; he was covered with
odium; he was received everywhere with such stiffness,
that he saw, too late, the blind, stupid, dreadful error he had
committed. He had risked all, lost all, and gained nothing.
He was not long in discovering evidence enough, that even
Beckford had dropped him. That gentleman was a great
deal with Nicholson; they dined together. Their
intimacy
was a sufficient explanation of Beckford's coldness to
him.
Nicholson again! muttered the young man.
At this period his mind, unsupported by any strength but
its own, appeared to give way and break down. It was
crushed by the great events around him. He lost his
power
of self-command, and vacillated even in his purpose of
revenge against Nicholson. He was seen more than once
intoxicated in the streets. At length, maddened with grief,
shame, indignation, and despair, he wrote Colonel
Nicholson
a letter, pouring forth upon him every opprobrious name,
and demanding to meet him in the field. In reply, he was
placed under arrest. The principal charge was disrespect
to his colonel. But the whole affair with Lennox came
under review, and every dark stain upon his character was
brought out in its blackest light. He was tried by a Court
Martial. From the beginning to the end of it, the
investigation
was against him. He was sentenced to be
cashiered
.
From that time nothing more was seen of him at
Montreal
.
Colonel Nicholson's triumph was complete, and he
enjoyed
it without any compunctious visitings of pity. In his
defence, Glendenning had made an attempt to fasten upon
him the odium of having caused the second duel; but it had
failed completely. White soon after sold his commission
in disgust. He was a man of fortune, and fond of pleasure,
to which he resolved to devote the remainder of his life.
He expressed freely his opinion of the part Nicholson had
borne in the affair, hoping to be brought into contact with
him, but that gentleman, from whatever motive, did not
condescend
to be aware of the fact. White soon after passed
down through New-York, and sailed for England.
CHAPTER XIII.
We
must leave the reader to imagine the scene at Mr.
Lennox's when the news of Frank's death was abruptly
brought by a messenger, and presently afterward, covered
with a military cloak, and borne by hired hands, the corpse,
drenched in gore. We shall not attempt to paint the guilty
horror, the conscience-stricken anguish of the father, as he
gazed on the result of his own lessons, the despair and sobs
of Mary and Fanny, and the wild shrieks of the mother,
who, tearing herself from the hands which would have
withheld
her, rushed into the hall, met the body, and, after a
series of convulsions, fell at last into a swoon. She caught
but that one terrible look of the face of her son, who was
buried before she recovered from the delirium which
succeeded
to her state of insensibility. In a week her life was
declared to be in danger, and her family waited to behold
her also sacrificed to the brutal error of the age. She
continued
a long time in this dying state, her mental anguish
only rendered supportable, perhaps, by excessive bodily
suffering. At length the crisis passed, and she recovered,
Vol. II.G
but so changed that even they who had previously been but
slightly acquainted could not behold her without surprise
and compassion. Her deep mourning struck their attention
less forcibly than the emaciated form, the pale countenance,
the ever-moistened eyes, the thin, quivering lips, and the
deep sighs which continually and unconsciously burst from
her bosom.
At length, thoughts less painful took possession of her.
She had herself wished, at a former period, that her son
might rather be brought back dead than a murderer.
Perhaps
the great penalty of so young and noble a life might
be received as an expiation. Who shall put limits to the
mercy of God? Who attempt to fathom his judgments?
As week after week stole away, her excessive grief
changed
more and more to profound melancholy, tempered by
pious resignation. She possessed the support of religion,
the inestimable consolation of prayer. In the train of these,
the merciful hand of Providence has scattered the silent but
heavenly blessings of fortitude, hope, submission, and
tranquillity
.
Even while sorrow ravaged her cheek, He who
watches over his own shed upon her heart a soothing
repose
,
and, after long imploring the power to do so, she was
at length enabled to say with sincerity, Not my will, but
thine be done.
Poor Mr. Lennox had no such consolation, and he began
to feel that he had not. The death of his son was by far
the heaviest shock he had ever suffered, and it taught him
at once the precarious nature of human felicity. He did
not know how to endure it, and he envied, while he could
not share, the holy peace of his wife. Grief had not only
shaken his health, but destroyed his spirits. That
inexhaustible
flow of cheerfulnessit was at last at an end.
He never jested and rarely smiled. He became careless
in his dress and irregular and negligent in his habits. He
seldom dined out, or asked company to his own table;
partook
of no pleasures or amusements of any kind, and
showed
a particular disinclination to anything like business. He
was now fifty, and, even previous to the catastrophe which
had thus broken him down, from his general habits and
opinions, as well as his fortune, he had entertained ideas
of leisure and repose, natural enough to a person of his age
and character, after a life of confinement and occupation.
But the death of his son, with the attending circumstances,
rendered him still less disposed to the toils and
responsibilities
of the office, which he now rarely entered,
committing
the whole business to the care of Emmerson.
Mary and Fanny were young, and youth recovers from
the stroke of sorrow in proportion to the keenness of its first
pangs. These two lovely girls, thus startled by an event
as shocking to their imaginations as to their affections,
exhausted
their anguish in tears, and, while both had been too
faithfully attached ever to forget the loved lost one, the
thoughts of the present and the future naturally diverted
them, with time, from that gloomy and unalterable brooding
over the pastthe destined doom of the bereaved parents.
The affair made a great noise in the city for a while;
indeed, it threw the whole country into an excitement.
Frank's sad fate was deplored publicly and privately. The
press honoured his memory with a burst of mournful
admiration
,
with very few comments on the immorality of the
manner in which he had met his fate. Several short poems
appeared in the journals, tendering sympathy to the afflicted
family, and then new events, new deaths, new actors and
opera, new dancers, new duels, and other nine days' wonders,
drove the incident from the public mind. Poor Frank, if
thought of at all, was remembered only as the young
officer
shot in a duel.
Whatever might have been the opinion of that small
portion
of men who really believe and endeavour to act up to
the principles of Christianity, the editors, the magistrates,
the public men, and leading characters of all classes, by no
means excluding women, gave few tokens of disapprobation
or of horror except at the accidental issue. It is
fashionable
to point at the drunkard the finger of scorn, but the
murderer
and the duellist, only by chance prevented from
becoming
one, hears the murmur of interest, of admiration, and
applause
.
Emmerson watched the course of affairs with interest.
By some magical influence, his secret wishes seemed
already
almost realized. Frank, Harry, and Seth were out
of his way. He had become the master spirit of the office,
and Mr. Lennox had already abandoned to him the
general
control of his professional affairs. The fortune which had
been intended for Frank might now descend to Harry.
Miss Elton, with her large fortune, might be persuaded to
listen to him, now that Harry was not only away, but had
left her with unconcealed indifference. So entirely had
Mr. Lennox been unfitted for business by the late misfortune,
that Mr. Emmerson was obliged to appear, not only as an
attorney, but in the new character (and one peculiarly his
ambition to assume) of counsellor and advocate, and he had
several times, in cases of interest, addressed the jury.
Although
never great, he was always, on these occasions,
respectable
,
and it happened that various paragraphs appeared
in the newspapers, calling public attention to these cases, and
particularly mentioning the able and eloquent speeches of
Mr. Emmerson. These eulogies were sometimes
accompanied
by intimations respecting the good fortune of Mr.
Lennox in having a partner so capable of supplying his
place, now that his health and mind were so seriously
injured
by the late affecting family affliction. Who it was
that took such peculiar pains to acquaint the world with the
merits of Emmerson, must be left to the imagination of the
reader. It is not likely we should be able to get much proof
of it without spending more time than we are at present able
to spare, and probably not even then. It is, however,
within
our power to state that, on several occasions, when
Mr. Lennox sent down stairs for the newspaper, it was
found to have been unaccountably mislaid, and that, by an
odd coincidence, each one of the said mislaid papers
contained
a paragraph of this kind. Some of them, however,
Mr. Lennox could not but see. Far from being offended,
however, he was pleased at the compliments to his friend,
and took pains to advance him on all possible occasions.
He spoke of him enthusiastically to his clients, as a man
superior to himself in coolness and business habits. He
congratulated and complimented him on his essays as an
orator, delicately forced him forward, and loudly praised his
efforts. With feigned modesty and reluctance, but secret
triumph, Emmerson received these generous attentions.
Yes, my dear fellow! said Lennox to him one day,
I am donemy heart is broken; I shall never be worth
anything again. You must, in some measure, supply my
place till Harry, poor boy, gets back. Let us have all ready
for him; you and he must take care of matters. There is
enough for both of you, and I want him to distinguish
himself
as a lawyer, and, at the same time, keep him near us the
rest of our lives. Poor boy! poor boy! poor boy! he
continued
,
his eyes filling with tears.
Has anything happened to him? inquired Emmerson.
No; we have not yet had a line from him, and it's two
months since he sailed. But I was thinking of
He rose and left the room.
CHAPTER XIV.
We
must hurry over this part of our story. The
Lennox
family, from the most happy had become the most
miserable
in existence. If anything could have added to their
anguish, it was the particulars of the affair, and of
Glendenning's
part in it, which they learned in due time. Mr.
Lennox
even went to Montreal, and ascertained sufficiently the
state of the case to comprehend, however, that the
unfortunate
young man was less to blame than his colonel. Even
his father's grief began to turn into indignation as he
received
from Southard, to whom, as Glendenning's landlord,
he had applied, the description of the manner in which he,
whom he had regarded as the murderer of his son, had been
drawn into his present position. He learned that he was
ruined, degraded, and desperate, and that he had
disappeared
,
no one knew whither. He conceived at one time the
resolution to insult, and thus meet Colonel Nicholson, but
here, in lieu of religious principles, his excellent heart and
his sincere attachment to his poor wife saved him. He
would not, in her present state of health and spirits, subject
her to another shock. He would have no more dead bodies
brought into the home once so happy and gay, and he so
well knew that the event of his returning to her, his hand
stained with lifeblood, would utterly destroy her, that he
found himself once or twice in society with Nicholson, his
arm yearning to dash upon that haughty forehead a blow, fit
herald of the death of one or the other, and yet, great as was
the effort, he restrained the swelling emotions of his heart.
He had seen that side of the duelling question which the
world do not always see. He had caught a fearful glance
behind the scenes. He had beheld the mother's anguish,
he had felt the father's heart.
No! no! he said. Poor Katy is not so wrong, after
G 2
all. No matter
what
the provocation, a man has
no right
to
fight a duel.
On his way down to New-York from Albany he had Mr.
Lawrence as a companion. This gentleman heard with
surprise that he had been to Montreal, and, with still more
obvious marks of astonishment, listened to the recital of
what he had learned there, and what he had
refrained
from
doing.
What! said he. Your wife has allowed you to go
alone
to Montreal to make inquiries on this subject?
Alone? repeated Lennox; and why not alone?
And you found the blame lay with this Colonel
Nicholson
,
and you met him in society, and from prudence, and
considerations for your family,
refrained
from calling him to
account?
Certainly. Do you not approve what I have done?
Approve? my old, faithful friend! cried Lawrence.
It is the noblest action you ever did in your life. He
who governs himself is the greatest of men. But you're
very wellyou're mind is tranquilyou don't seem to
to
He paused.
My heart is broken! said Lennox.
Yes, but resumed Lawrence, without showing the
sympathy his friend had expected, your
heart
is broken,
certainly! That's very well! that's all right! that's as it
should be! but
What do you mean? demanded Mr. Lennox, surprised.
I'll tell you what I meanI'll tell you frankly and fully.
It is my duty to you as my old friend, and, moreoverit is
utterly impossible.
You!
a man capable of such
self-government
as that.
I really don't understand you.
The long and the short of it, then, is this, replied
Lawrence
.
It is generally reported and believed in
New-York
that you arethatthat
That what? demanded Lennox.
That you're
reason
has been affected; that you're, in
fact, not in your right mind.
I? said Lennox, thunderstruck.
You! I've heard a hundred people speak of it as a thing
certain
. Grief, they say, has affected you in this way.
Now I see so plainly it is an absurd mistake, that I don't
hesitate a moment to make you acquainted with the report,
in order that you may take what measures you please to set
the matter right.
But whom did you hear say so?
It's a general topic of conversation.
There are few more disagreeable things than this. Such
a report, whether true or false, is so sure to be contradicted,
that contradiction can scarcely be said to mean anything,
and the annoyance is heightened by the difficulty of
disproving
it.
Mr. Lennox procured from Mr. Lawrence the names of
several persons who were under the impression he was not
in his right mind. On his return to town he made some
effort to trace the rumour, but could not do so. His
abandonment
of business had given probability to it, and
some one
had fairly and distinctly made the assertion. Who this
some one
was, he found it impossible to discover. Once or
twice he came so near him as to hear, in so many words,
that the statement had been made on the best of authority,
but it had been communicated in a confidence too strict to
be betrayed.
I can tell you who it is, whispered Emmerson one day,
but I would not make an enemy of the man for the world.
Don't be afraid; I will never name
you
as my informant.
On that condition, then, said Emmerson. It is the
young doctor you recently called in, in the absence from
town of Doctor. N.
What, young Doctor B?
The same. He
hinted
something of the sort to me, but
I did not rightly understand what he meant. Now, I see,
he must have had some absurd idea of this sort in his mind.
He shall never cross my threshold again, said Lennox.
He's a weak, ignorant young mana poor devil. I
wouldn't notice him; he isn't worth it. The report will
die away of itselflet it go. Any
noise
about it, you know,
will only spread it wider.
True, quite true.
Such an infamous slander must fall to the ground of
itself
,
replied Emmerson, with one of his confidential,
friendly
smiles.
CHAPTER XV.
The
excitement of getting out to sea for the first time, to
a young fellow like Harry, is very great. It is one of those
immense changes which make life look most like a passing
drama. In one hour he is in the midst of a gay, crowded,
roaring city, surrounded by the scenes of his youth and
boyhood
,
and beholding only the horizon, which has, till now,
bounded his existence within a narrow circle; the next
he is abroad on the eternal ocean. All the objects of his
love, all the shapes familiar to him, have passed away, and
who can say whether he will ever see them again?
As the last point of land, a dim shape of blue, melted into
the air under Harry's thoughtful gaze, he was assailed by
various serious and some tender reflections. How long
should he be absent? What changes might take place
before
his return? Might he not leave his bones in a foreign
land, perhaps in the ocean? Might not death strike some
of those beloved objects, and might he not come back, after
years' wandering, to find seats empty in the home circle?
If fate had decreed it so, which one was it he was destined
never to see again? The last look, the pale face, the
anguish
,
and trembling agitation of Fanny Elton at the
moment
of parting, he felt could never, never fade from his
memory; and he felt, also, that, but for the
certainty
he had
acquired from her own rejection of him, and from
Emmerson's
statement, he was a monster to part from her so
coldly. All the hopes once cherished respecting her, her
beautiful and noble form and face, her easy and graceful
manners, the numerous tokens of love he had received from
her at various times, all came thronging together upon his
memory, and affected him again with the inexpressible,
sweet, and yet painful idea that her alienation was the
result
of an error. It is no imputation on his manhood to say
that, as he stood on the stern of the now fast-advancing
ship, and saw the last point of blue cloud which marked
the spot of all his love, and where so many hearts beat
with love for him, an irrepressible tendency to moisture
obliged him to keep his eyes for some time longer than he
should otherwise have done, away from the observation of
his fellow-passengers.
These tender emotions were, however, soon lost in those
with which father Neptune delights to agitate inexperienced
intruders into his watery domain. It was not till after the
expiration of several days that his health and appetite
returned
;
when they did, he felt that, if the horrors of
suffering
had been great, they were more than compensated by
the pleasures of convalescence. His spirits were never
lighter or his thoughts clearer. To the natural elasticity
of youth were added the anticipations and excitement
consequent
upon his voyage. For some time these occupied
his mind almost exclusively, in a manner of which a
European
can form but a faint idea.
The abrupt and total transition from the New World to the
Old, to one quitting the former for the first time, is, perhaps,
the nearest approach to enchantment ever granted to a
mortal
.
Let the European be indulgent when he remarks the
amazement, bewilderment, and enthusiasm of the
newly-arrived
American. The poor fellow is in a dream, looking
on what have always been to him mere ideal forms, now
suddenly conjured up around him in shapes of still only
half-credited reality. London and Paris have hitherto
been mere sublime visions of his imagination side by side
with ancient Rome, Babylon, Thebes, or Jerusalem. The
town of Louis Philippe or Queen Victoria is as astounding
a spectre to him as that of Pilate or Pharaoh, and when he
first gazes on Peel, or Moore, or Wordsworth, or Wellington,
the delightful novelty would scarcely seem greater were
he to discover among these celebrated personages
Shakspeare
,
Csar, Pericles, or old Homer.
For some time these reflections formed the subject of our
young traveller's reveries, but by-and-by his mind reverted
to his home, to the bright scenes of his native city, to his
happy family circle, the well-known rooms, the loved voices,
the familiar forms already beginning to be hallowed by time
and distance. Among them his fancy distinguished Miss
Elton with new and strange emotions. Despite all the
proofs he had of her frivolous and capricious character,
there were certain words and looks which remained
printed
on his memory. Her image no more came to him as a
coquette, but arrayed in all the charms of tender fidelity and
patient sadness. He was beginning to count over, with the
solitary delight of a miser, each look and word of hers,
when, recollecting he had proof positive from Emmerson
that she was but a trifler, he refused to follow the subject
farther, and resolved (not for the first time!) to think of her
no more.
At last he recollected the promise he had given his
mother to read the other volumes with which her
affectionate
piety had supplied him.
What time so proper as the present? thought he, with
a yawn and a smile. To be sure, I had rather study
something
a little more profitable and interesting, and more
immediately
in connexion with the countries I'm going to see;
but, once ashore, I shall have no more time or inclination
to wade through the Bible. Here, at least, we have plenty
of time.
So he went down, and, taking out the volume in which
were inscribed the words, To Henry Lennox, from his
affectionate
mother`Be not wise in your own conceit,'
he commenced it with a sturdy determination to devote a
large portion of every day until he should complete it. He
accordingly set himself seriously to the performance of this
resolution. He felt a certain consciousness of
embarrassment
and shame when any of his fellow-passengers
walking
near him discovered what he was reading.
They'll take me for a Methodist parson, I suppose,
said he to himself; but no matter! I don't mind their
opinions, and I quite agree with my mother, that, as a mere
matter of curiosityas an accomplishment eventhe book
ought to be read by every gentleman.
For some days he read steadily on. The weather
happened
to be calm and pleasant, and he pursued his task
with unremitting assiduity. He was habitually a rapid
reader, and, once fairly engaged, he made great progress. In
a week he had finished the Old Testament, and got far into
the second evangelist.
You pursue your studies with great diligence, said a
voice to him, one afternoon, as he was absorbed in his
labour
.
The person who addressed him was a gentleman of about
fifty, of a pleasing and dignified exterior, whom Harry had
previously remarked accompanied by a young lady of a more
than prepossessing appearance.
Oh, I amI was going to say, performing a wager. I
mean, I am fulfilling an injunction in giving the Bible the
benefit of a continuous perusal.
You do not read from the attractions you yourself find
there?
I did not at first, but I find some parts of it more
interesting
than I could have supposed.
Really, rejoined the stranger, with a smile, you must
think that very odd.
Oh, no, I don't, replied Harry. In the first place, any
resolute employment is a protection against
ennui
, which,
with sea-sickness, is the fashionable malady on board a ship,
you know.
May I ask, without boldness, who has enjoined this
task upon you?
My mother.
She is a believer then?
Oh, yes; she believes it all.
And you do not?
Harry paused and looked his interrogator in the face,
uncertain
whether to be pleased or offended at his freedom.
There was something, however, in his countenance and
manner so benevolent and intelligent that he replied with
frankness.
I don't think any man of sense can believe it literally; it
is rather too heavy a task upon credulity.
Has it interested you as a literary production?
Yes; some scenes are dramatic and some descriptions
poetic. It is a curiousa very curious book. Did you ever
take the trouble to read it through continuously?
Yes, I have read it quite through; but I fear I
interrupt
you.
Harry returned his polite salutation, and resumed his
reading. In two weeks he finished it, and closed the
volume
with a sigh of fatigue.
Well, it's done at last, thought he; I really had no
idea I could get through with it in so short a time; I had
always a fancy, somehow or other, that reading the Bible
was a work of years, and, consequently, postponed it to
some indefinite period of sickness, confinement, or old age.
Now it's done, and, thank Heaven, it's off my mind. I hope
my poor, dear mother will be satisfied.
Thus was one of the works disposed of, but without one
beam of light which his poor mother hoped such a
perusal
would send into his mind. He had read a curious
historical
monument of ancient credulity, palmed upon mankind
when there was no press, and descended to the present
time in some odd way, which he remembered Gibbon had
admirably explained, though he did not recall exactly how.
So far from having become any more inclined to believe,
he was ten times more confirmed in his incredulity. He
had forgotten much of the Bible. Some of it he never had
read, and was entirely unacquainted with, and, truth to say,
he could conceive nothing less probable, less believable,
than the principal parts of both the Old and New Testaments.
The supernatural events were so glaringly fabulous, and the
historical ones so infinitely removed from inspirationso
darkened with blood, crime, ignorance, and superstition,
that the only reflection it raised in his mind was
wonder
how it could all be received, in the present enlightened age,
as the faith of civilized Europe and America; how churches
and chapels could be forever rising to it, and how it came
that those sensible, brave fellows who had honestly written
against it should rest under an odium.
In this mood of mind he took up Newton on the
Prophecies
,
and fell fairly asleep a dozen times before he reached
the welcome
finis
. Here was another mysterya real
unsolvable problem. Did Newton believe in what he has
displayed so much learning at attempting to prove? If yes,
by what extraordinary hallucination of intellectby what
unimaginable train of reasoning had he formed his opinion?
If no, why had he lent himself with such apparent
earnestness
to a frauda pious one, perhaps, but still a palpable
fraud? There was something despicable, he found, in such
an enterprise. He must have been, then, either a
block-head
or a charlatan.
From Newton on the Prophecies he went to Butler's
Analogy. But he was now tired of following an ungrateful
subject, and could not accompany this author through his
deep reasonings. They demanded an attention too
unremitting
and severe. Besides, he was already
convinced
that
Butler was attempting to establish the truth of an
impossibility
.
He might certainly do this with more or less
acuteness
and logic. A skilful lawyer may throw a wonderful
plausibility around a bad cause, particularly if he believe it
to be a just one, and an enthusiastic mind may be led by
sophistry to believe anything. He therefore read on with
his eyes, but not with his reason. His mind, too, began to
be crowded again with briliant images of Europe, or with
soft recollections of home, or of Miss Elton. He would
readthat he had promised to dopage after page, but he
aroused himself at the end of each chapter to a weary
conviction
,
that, instead of accompanying the author through
his abstruse, complicated arguments, he had been, in
imagination
,
leading Miss Elton down the road from Rose Hill to
the landing-place, or bidding her good-by with affected
indifference
,
while his heart thrilled with the expression of
her face and those flattering words, Harry, good-by! God
bless you!
In short, he laid by the volumes of which thus, according
to his promise, he had read every word, with a renewed
conviction that Christianity was a mere Eastern fable. He
had not even seen any beauty in it; he had not felt any
moral power. The mysterious person to whom all tends,
and from whom all flows, was no more, in his eyes, than a
historical character, extraordinary only from the notice
subsequently
taken of him. If before he had disbelieved from
instinct, he now conceived himself entitled to reject upon
more rational grounds. He
had
examined, and remained
unconvinced. He acknowledged himself a Deist, and, true
to his impatient and decisive character, from Deism he
stepped to Atheism. If there were no God, of course there
was no hereafter. Thus, in the mind of youthful
philosophers
,
are disposed of these grave questions.
CHAPTER XVI.
Harry
had scarcely made any observations on his
fellow-passengers
,
so much had he been engaged in his reveries
and studies. He exchanged with them the ordinary
courtesies
of the day, but had experienced no desire to cultivate
the acquaintance of any, with the exception of the familiar
and kind stranger, Mr. Rivington and his daughter.
Several
casual occurrences brought them more together, and,
on a nearer view and better acquaintance, he perceived
that they were particularly agreeable, and that the young
Vol. II.H
lady was a very charming girl in mind and manners. She
had not appeared to him, at first, beautiful, but, while
conversing
,
he perceived a certain loveliness dwelt in her
countenance, which, as if a quality of her soul as well as of
her features, seemed to increase in proportion as the
conversation
grew animated and interesting. There was in
her a mixture of frankness and modesty, of self-possession,
and yet of reserve, which at first attracted his attention, and
then captivated his taste. On seeing yet more of her, he
found that nature had not been less bountiful in the solid
qualities of sense and virtue, than in that external grace
which made her so engaging.
One day a death occurred on board, the little son of a
poor Englishman, who, with his wife and three children,
had emigrated several years before to America, been
unsuccessful
,
and was now returning in the steerage to his
native country. The small body was the next morning
sewed up in a piece of sail and shoved off into the sea.
The burial service was read by Mr. Rivington. The
mother
stood by without a word, and heard the plunge of her
child into the waves. It was painful to conjecture, by the
deadly paleness of her face and the expression of her
features
,
what emotions filled her soul.
The circumstance drew the attention of Harry to the
family. Fearing, from their appearance, that they were but
ill provided with the necessaries of life, he offered to
supply
their wants, but found Mr. Rivington and his daughter
had already anticipated him.
It was by and by discovered that another child was ill,
and with a dangerous and contagious malady. There was
among the passengers a physician, who called himself Dr.
Mason. Mr. Rivington politely informed him of the illness
of the second child and the distress of the family.
Pray, doctor, see her at once.
Not I, was the answer.
No?
Certainly not, and, taking out a fire-box, he lighted a
cigar. I don't consider myself on duty at present, and a
contagious disorder. I don't deem it necessary to expose
myself, and the other cabin passengers too.
I will cheerfully compensate you, remarked Mr.
Rivington
,
mildly, after a pause.
Oh, dn it! that's not it.
But it seems to me, my good sir, resumed Mr.
Rivington
,
more gravely, if duty did not urge you, humanity
Of that, replied the doctor, coolly, I must be the best
judge.
My daughter has been at the bedside of the little girl,
said Mr. Rivington.
But Dr. Mason is not your daughter, interrupted Mr.
Barnett, a tall, ugly-looking young gentleman of one or
two-and-twenty
,
and a great ally of the doctor in smoking,
drinking, and backgammon.
A few days after, despite the assiduous attentions of Mr.
and Miss Rivington, and Harry, the little sufferer also died.
The same funeral ceremony was gone through with. The
mother heard the same plunge, with the same pale, silent
face, while the father, in a distant part of the ship, sat alone,
leaning his head on his hands.
Harry's soul was struck with deep compassion. He had
watched the little drama with interest, and, ardent in his
feelings, he at once formed a strong and tender attachment
for Rivington and his daughter, and at the same time
conceived
a lively indignation, mingled with a disgust which he
scarcely made any effort to conceal, against Dr. Mason.
At length the poor mother became illtoo much so to leave
her berth; and, to fill the cup of her misery to overflowing,
the third and last child, a very pretty boy three years old,
was attacked with the same disorder which had carried off
his brother and sister. Miss Rivington determined to
descend
into the dark and filthy hole where the poor sufferers
lay, but she was met by Harry, who gently but firmly
refused
her admittance.
I have been below, he said. The child must die.
I don't think the poor mother will. For her sake, one might
almost wish she might. Her only ailment is grief, and that
does its work slowly. I will see that the little creature has
all the attention possible.
Is the father below?
Poor fellow! yes, but completely prostrated with
despair
.
I think, Mr. Lennox, I had better go down.
No; I positively interpose force. I will not permit
your daughter, sir, to expose herself to any more danger.
I have been below. The child must die, probably to-day,
but, while he exists, suffer me to be his nurse. The
exposure
of one person is necessary, of two would be useless
and imprudent. You and your daughter attended the last:
now it is my turn.
Mr. Rivington shook him warmly by the hand.
In the evening, as he had predicted, the boy died. This
time the mother was too weak to witness the third
ceremony
,
which left her childless. The father retired, as before,
to a distant part of the deck, and covered his ears with his
hands, as if to shut out the sound of the fatal plunge.
In pity to the bereaved mother, Harry spent some time
below with her. She spoke with him freely, and even
cheerfully.
You do not seem, my good woman, remarked he one
day, when they had been speaking of her bereaved state
you do not seem to be as much prostrated by your loss as
I feared you would be.
Her lips quivered, and she wept a moment in silence.
I feel, but I do not yield to my feelings generally.
Whom He loveth, He chasteneth. I am in his hands. My
children are removed, I doubt not wisely, from a cruel
world, where I had little power to protect or make them
happy. They are in heaven, where I hope to meet them
soon. Their sufferings are over. The Lord giveth and the
Lord taketh away: blessed be the name of the Lord.
Harry felt as if he could have shrugged his shoulders,
but he contented himself with the reflection that her trust in
the Lord had been but poorly answered.
I would not be ungrateful for the blessings left me,
added the woman.
Blessings? echoed Harry, looking around upon the
wretched den, which he could not remain in a moment
without a sensation of disgust, and then upon the emaciated
form and face, the ragged clothes of the poor woman.
Blessings? what blessings?
Here
, replied she, laying her hand upon her bosom,
and
here
.
She produced from under her pillow a small Bible.
Harry
took it and turned over the leaves. They appeared
worn and almost ready to fall to pieces by the constant use
of years, but it was obviously in a state of the most perfect
cleanliness and preservation possible.
You love to read your Bible, then?
I hope so: I should be very ungrateful if I did not; for
it has consoled and supported me through many a long year
of suffering. My story is rather a sad one, but the more sad
the life, the more clear appears the divine power of that
book. I have often thought it is like the stars, which, the
blacker the night is, look more bright.
You have not always been in your present impoverished
state? inquired Harry, becoming interested. Your
language
and thoughts imply education and reflection.
Oh yes, sir, I have always been poor and wretched,
but people are apt to think those in our class have not
thoughts and feelings like them; and when they find we
have, and when they hear us utter them, they are as
surprised
as if a dumb man should speak.
There is a good deal of sad truth in that. But where
did you learn to express yourself so well?
If I express myself better than others of my condition,
it is because I have been more diligent in studying my
Bible
.
It has been education as well as happiness to me.
It has, moreover, taught me how to live, and, I hope, how to
die. The loss of my sweet children, in one sense, makes
me happy, and I bend to the judgment of God with more
patience than others might. Those children were so dear
to methey were all of them so sweet, so prettyso
Here she stopped and wept again.
My mind was always disturbed with apprehensions
about them. I could neither live nor die in peace, for they
bound my soul to earth. Now I never can suffer anything
more this side the grave which will disturb my peace. A
few more years, perhaps days, and I shall join them. All
our troubles will then be at an end. I look upon my own
death as a desirable and even happy change. How can I,
then, yield to grief for them?
The Bible, thought Harry, is certainly useful in such
a case as this. What would this sick, childless, friendless
woman be without some such consolation?
True or false
,
earthly or divine, the Bible has its use. It is not, as I once
thought, a mere collection of absurdities. It has a task in
the world, as much as air or medicine. It performs an
appointed
duty. It is like the sunshine, which warms the
unclothed
and houseless, which shines with its blessed light
into the cottage as into the palace.
Thus a certain respect for the volume he had hitherto
neglected with such indifference rose in his heart. He
H 2
regarded it as he would have beheld some notorious quack
doctor actually perform a remarkable cure. True, it might
be by acting on the imagination of the patient, but he who
can cure the ills of life in
any
way, cannot justly be passed
over with contempt.
He related the conversation to Mr. and Miss Rivington,
with whom he had now become much better acquainted,
and who appeared to return his obvious friendship with one
as sincere. He expressed his astonishment and admiration
at the philosophy of the woman.
I can conceive that, as the keenest anguish of life may
arise from the severing of affections, the mother's grief for
the loss of her child must approach nearest to the
inconsolable
;
but three children, one after the other, torn from her
in that way: it is enough to crush the heart of Socrates or
Zeno, and yet she seems actually happier than she was
before
.
This is not philosophy; it is religion, remarked Mr.
Rivington.
That is, philosophy embellished by fancy and
strengthened
by superstition! answered Harry.
I perceived some time ago, observed Mr. Rivington,
that, while Providence has blessed you with a heart
capable
of feeling all the necessity of religion, you have not yet
become aware of its truth.
Harry looked at Miss Rivington with a certain
embarrassment
.
Oh, you need not mind Helen. She has made the
subject a study, and will not be any more frightened at
your open acknowledgment of infidelity than a good
physician
at the confessions of a sick patient.
I could hope Miss Rivington might pardon me, said
Harry, for acknowledging my own deficiency.
You mean by that, boasting of your own superiority,
said Miss Rivington, smiling.
I should not pardon myself, continued he, were I to
expose her to the contagion of bad example.
If it were not, said Mr. Rivington, that I never
approach
lightly a sacred subject, I would let you try the
effect
of your example on her. The contagion could not
take. You have not an argument or an impression which
she could not confute to her and your own satisfaction.
Pray confess what you like. It will, perhaps, prove the
first step to reformation.
Well, then, said Harry, frankly, I confess at once,
that the only mystery in religion to me is, that any one of
education and sense can be found to believe it.
You have not examined the subject?
Oh yes, I have, carefully, and believed less after the
examination than I did before.
You did not come to the task with the proper spirit,
observed Miss Rivington.
Ah, that is the way the advocates of Christianity
defend
their cause. First it is, you have never examined
it; then, you did not examine in the proper spirit. And
pray define to me what sort of spirit a man of sense
must
have before he can be made to believe black is white.
My father can perhaps explain, said Miss Rivington.
No, said her father; it would be like explaining
what light is to a blind man.
Life
will explain it as it
rolls on over your head. Death will explain it when the
spectre appears to you. Sorrow and sickness, should you
suffer them (and you can scarcely go through the world
without doing so), will shed upon you that spirit.
Mysticism, transcendentalism, and all the
isms
, said
Harry, laughing, can't have any more
incomprehensibleism
than this. What can a fit of the gout have to do with
an opinion on the subject? You place a sum in arithmetic
before me, and tell me twice two make five. I don't
believe
it. You accuse me of not examining. Well, I do
examine, and find two and two make four. Then my spirit
is not yet prepared. I must wait till I lose my papa and
my mamma, till I get very ill (and imbecile, perhaps); then
you come to me with your arithmetic, and I tell you,
perhaps
,
two and two make five, or twenty, if you will, and
believe
it, perhaps, simply because my feelings predominate
over my reason: and yet, after all, two and two
do
make
four.
I never debate on religion, said Rivington, gravely,
because a debate is a struggle for victory, not a search
after truth. Only do not deceive yourself with the idea
that you have
examined
the evidences of Christianity. If
Heaven spare your life, you will one day feel the want of
religion. With the want will come the spirit, and then you
will understand me.
Harry was silent before the mild dogmatism of the
amiable
enthusiasts. He shrugged his shoulders while alone
he paced the deck late that evening to enjoy his cigar.
Thus it is, he thought, that education makes of men
what it will: `just as the twig is bent the tree's inclined.'
Had this amiable person been educated to believe theft and
murder justifiable, he would still retain the opinion. Had
he been taught that Mohammed was the true God, he would
tremble and bow at the name of Mohammed. Hence,
through the wonder-working power of education, a Galilean
peasant, executed for disturbing the public peace, becomes
a divine being, and receives the worship of the same
intelligent
mind which would think adoration paid to Mars or
Minerva utterly ridiculous.
And what do
I
believe? he added, gloomily, after a
long pause. That this world has ever been what it is,
will ever remain what it is. If God may be eternal and
from eternity, why may not the world? If God made
himself
,
why may not Nature have done the same? What, then,
is
man?
an insect! an accident! Where have gone those
dead children? Into the deep, to the fishes. They are
matter
, nothing more, and the poor duped mother, who
thinks she will meet them again beside summer streams
and amid perennial grovesshe is a fool! and there is
no real difference between Rivington and Barnett, between
Miss Rivington and Dr. Mason. One is as good as the
other. Yes, this lovely being, so fair, so gentle, so
self-sacrificing
,
has no real, only an abstract, temporary
superiority
over this selfish, cowardly Mason. I ought to respect
one as much as the other. Certainly, to the eye of
philosophy
,
they are the same. A rose is sweeter, but not more
innocent, than a thistle. God, that is, Nature, made them
both, and hereafter they will go together to the dust. The
difference between them will not exist after death. The
admiration I feel for the one, the disgust towards the other,
is a weakness. Strange world! But as it is, it is!
And with a cold and barren heart, the young infidel
paced
the deck, quenched in his bosom all holy impulses, and
strove to turn from truth and nature into paradoxes and
follies
,
which he called reason and philosophy: strove, and
for the time succeeded, for to his youthful fancy life
seemed
endless, and he was surrounded by all that could make
it gay and happy. Memory brought him scarcely a care,
and hope pointed to joys which filled him with delight.
He was rich, handsome, young, gifted, absorbed by this
world, its proud plans and graceful pleasures and virtues.
He was satisfied with infidelity, because he felt no need of
God or religion. He had resources enough without them.
His happiness was his misery; his hopes were his despair.
He was like some traveller carrying a torch, whose smoky
and lurid light prevents his beholding the moon and the
stars, the order and harmony of the universe, and the hand
that created and sustains it.
CHAPTER XVII.
In
the mean time the great ship had ploughed her way,
rushing and thundering on, sometimes half ingulfed in the
black and smoky waves, sometimes groaning, shrieking, and
trembling beneath a tempest; now advancing regularly and
majestically over the blue deep, now becalmed and
abandoned
to the heaving, glaring flood, in a very disagreeable
state of inactivity.
For the want of other excitement, Dr. Mason and Mr.
Barnett had undertaken to amuse themselves lately by
quizzing
Mr. Seers, a young, modest, and rather
shabbily-dressed
man, who had been sea-sick nearly the whole time till
within a few days, who scarcely ever opened his mouth,
and never without blushing, and who turned out to be a
Methodist clergyman travelling to regain his health. A
slight attempt had been made to pursue the same course
towards
Harry, but they were speedily satisfied that, however
gay he might naturally be, he was not exactly the man to
stand much quizzing from
them
. Their facetious humour,
therefore, sought a less dangerous object.
On the health of Mr. Seers being sufficiently
re-established
for the purpose, it was proposed by some one, the day
being Sunday, and destined, probably, to be the last
Sabbath
of the voyage, that he should perform a religious
service
.
Every one acquiesced, and the company were
assembled
accordingly.
The service commenced with a prayer, which, though
not long, was fervid and eloquent, without in the least
offending
against the coolest Episcopalian taste. The
bashful
hesitation of the speaker disappeared as he proceeded,
and Harry listened to his strong devotional language with an
interest for which he could not account. Becoming
accustomed
,
as he grew older, to analyze his feelings, he asked
himself whence came his emotion. He did not believe the
young preacher was right in his creed, or that the Creator,
if, indeed, there were one, of the infinite system of things,
cared or knew what was said or done in the globe itself,
which, compared with the whole universe, is so
inconceivably
insignificant, far less what a few individuals were
doing
in an obscure spot of the globe; yet, what was it which,
during the earnest prayer, and more particularly during the
succeeding sermon, enchained his attention, calmed his
thoughts, elevated and broadened his mind, and thrilled his
soul? He ascribed it partly to a reawakening in him of
early religious associations, dim, sweet, tender visions of
those years when he also had folded his little hands, and
on his bended knees offered up thanks and prayers to the
Creator at his mother's knee. Partly, too, he perceived in
the picture before him something strikingly poetic and
sublime
.
There was no God; there was, at least, no
revelation
from him except through the ordinary course of nature,
but it raised in his mind the reflection of what a different
scene the earth would be, what a different thing life
would be, if there
were
a God made manifest; if the
mysterious and celebrated being who rose from the lowly
condition of a Galilean peasant, an untravelled, uneducated
Jew, a Roman slave, were really an incarnation of the
Divinity
,
descended to walk with man as an example, a guide,
and a star, such as that which led the fabled shepherds to
the holy child. He was not a believer, but he was beginning
to be a
thinker
. The grand fabric of Christianity rose
before
him at a distance, and he was beginning to
look
at it,
and the form of Jesus began to appear to him, amid the
crowd of historical characters, as a remarkable one;
remarkable
from the purpose he had adopted, from the effects
he had produced. Various questions concerning him began
to rise in his mind, to arouse and awaken his curiosity.
Had he
really lived?
Was there such a person as Jesus at
all? If not, the wonder was not less striking, that such a
character should have formed itself in the human
imagination
,
and glided into the credulity of so many ages and
countries; or had the sublime structure of Christianity been
raised upon the life of a real personage, only
altered
by the
Oriental mind at a superstitious period? Still, the wonder
continued, for how came the cold science of modern times
to receive it? A fable it seemed upon the face of it, but
what
a fable! and by how many millions received as the
most sacred of truths!
Beside him sat the bereaved mother. He could not
without
emotion behold her, as she listened to the glorious
visions
of the speaker, who represented this world, and its
cares and pleasures, as so insignificant compared with the
mansions of bliss prepared for mortals in another and better
one. The unfortunate woman listened with eager devotion,
and although tears were on her cheeks, they were
obviously
tears of joy. She was drinking in from the lips of her
spiritual teacher, not only consolation, but triumph.
Although
her hopes might be but illusions, yet, in her case,
the grave
was
deprived of its victory and death of his sting.
At this picture, Harry felt with singular force what a
sublime, what a magnificent thing life would be if religion
were true! if there
were
a God to superinted, to guide,
to reward; if death, the remorseless, resistless tyrant,
might
be overcome; if this mortal scene
were
but a state
of probation and preparation.
For the first time in his life, the meaning of his mother's
exalted enthusiasm respecting Christianity began to break
upon his comprehension. He believed, not that it was or
could be true, but he saw, if it
were
true, how glorious it
would be. Thus, for his mind was pure and his heart good,
his humanity towards and his sympathy for this poor
woman
awoke in him the first conception of spiritual light.
In the midst of the sermon and of Harry's reflections,
Doctor Mason and Barnett fell into a fit of laughing. For
some moments they appeared willing to suppress it, but, at
length, finding it not easily done, they leaned forward their
faces on their hands, and continued to indulge in a mirth so
noisy as not only to greatly disturb the little congregation,
but at length to render the speaker's continuing impossible.
The young clergyman stopped, waited a few moments,
resumed
,
stopped again, unable to go on, and then mildly
remarked
upon the indecency as well as the impiety of the
interruption. This only made the offenders laugh louder,
upon which the clergyman, with dignity and firmness,
requested
that they would leave the cabin, or he should not
proceed with the service.
I shall certainly not leave the cabin, said Barnett. I
have paid my passage; I have as much right here as
another
.
My consent was not requested to have the service
here, and no man has a right to convert my house into a
church, any more than I have a right to turn a church into
a theatre.
I shall send for the captain, said Mr. Seers.
The captain's business is with his ship, not with me,
replied Barnett.
Then I must desist, said the clergyman, mildly.
My good friends, remarked Mr. Rivington, the
occasion
seems to warrant the interference of your
fellow-passengers
.
Indeed!
At least of the captain (who was on the deck at that
time).
If the captain or any one else, cried Mason, attempts
to prohibit a man's laughing at what amuses him in the
cabin
of a packet ship, where he has paid his passage, he
will find himself in the wrong box.
I quite agree with you, replied Rivington, with perfect
forbearance; and, rather than promote any difference, we
are so near the land, I think, sir (to the clergyman), you
had better desist.
This circumstance rendered the doctor and his friend
extremely
ashamed and indignant, but, at the same time, more
bold. They now took pains to annoy the rest on all
possible
occasions, playing whist and backgammon with loud
oaths, and in as noisy and reckless a way as possible. The
captain was vexed, but, being a mild man, and the voyage
nearly concluded, he begged the company to bear it as well
as they could.
One day Mr. Seers was walking the deck, when Barnett
commenced also walking in a way to meet him. Mason
stood by with a curious expression on his face. It was
after
dinner, where, as no deduction was made in passage
money for those who did not take wine, these two
gentlemen
had at command the whole stock of the ship, into which
they appeared regularly every day desirous of making as
great an inroad as possible. Harry was standing by, and
watched the manuvre with considerable interest. It struck
him, from the manner of the young bully, that he had the
intention
to offer an insult, although he could scarcely have
expected to pick a quarrel with the most inoffensive and
amiable of human beings. The proceeding continued with
a more and more definite approach to a crisis. At each
turn Barnett gave less way, till, at length, Mr. Seers, who
did not seem to understand the spirit of the thing, and who
had kept yielding more and more place as he was pressed
upon more rudely, not supposing it necessary to go entirely
out of his path, received such a violent push with the
shoulder
of Barnett as to throw him aside with some violence.
Mr. Barnett! exclaimed he, with mild amazement.
Get out of the way, then, can't you? cried Barnett,
coarsely. You don't expect people to give you up the
cabin and the deck too, do you?
I expect nothing from you, sir, said Mr. Seers, with a
flush of indignation, which a gentleman would require or
a gentleman bestow.
What do you mean by that? demanded Barnett, coming
close up to him with a clinched fist held threateningly just
behind him.
I can have but one meaning, replied Seers, folding his
arms.
You wouldn't dare to brave me so, cried Barnett, with
a contemptuous laugh, if you did not feel safe in your
insignificance
and helplessness.
If I am insignificant and helpless, rejoined Mr. Seers,
why does Mr. Barnett select me as the object of his
insults
?
That's good!
interrupted Mr. Rivington, emphatically,
and you deserve it, young man.
Pray keep your opinions to yourself, sir, retorted
Barnett
,
in an under voice, for there was something in Mr.
Rivington's figure and countenance which inspired respect
as well as fear.
Oh, my lad, said Rivington, with a quiet smile, you
have the power to prevent religious worship in the cabin,
but not to prohibit conversation on deck, I believe.
Who wants to prevent conversation? demanded
Barnett
,
fiercely; dn me, sir, who are you? and whom do
you take me for?
I am a gentleman, very much disgusted with your
bearing
during this passage, and I take you to be an ill-educated
Vol. II.I
boy, with a very weak understanding, and I should judge
not a good heart, who knows what is due neither to
himself
nor to others.
I'll be dd, sir, if you sha'n't unsay that! exclaimed
Barnett.
Then you'll be dd without a doubt, for I shall not
unsay
it.
If you are a gentleman, sir
Oh,
if
, retorted Rivington, laughing. You are very
polite to apply that celebrated little word to me.
And why not, sir, pray? demanded Dr. Mason, coming
to the support of his friend, with a swagger.
Because
if
supposes a
doubt
, rejoined Mr. Rivington.
Respecting the claim of yourself and friend to the
character
of gentlemen, I hope you will agree with me there can
be none.
Certainly not, sir, certainly not, cried Mason, not
exactly
knowing what it was he was agreeing to.
Another laugh from various by-standers, who had
collected
in a circle, now made Mason almost as enraged as his
comrade.
Are you presuming to
quiz
us, sir? demanded Barnett,
in a manner intended to intimidate.
Yes, I am, replied Rivington.
Why, damme, sir! that's an
insult!
said Barnett.
I meant it as one, replied Rivington.
You dare not refuse to give me the satisfaction of a
gentleman!
Oh, yes, I dare; I dare refuse to give you anything that
can't possibly belong to you!
Do I understand you to say, sir, interrupted Dr.
Mason
,
with a swagger, that you
decline meeting
Mr.
Barnett
?
Of course I do, if possible, either as a friend or an
enemy.
Then, sir, cried Barnett, with a swagger of importance
and triumph, I shall post you for a coward.
Thank you; it will save me the trouble of posting you
for a fool! rejoined Rivington, laughing heartily and
good-naturedly
,
and without at all altering his usual manner.
A general laugh announced that the scene, so threatening
in its commencement, had now changed into one of mere
merriment, and appeared to overcome the young men with
rage and shame. They sneaked away to plot some other
better method of revenge than seemed procurable by their
conversational abilities.
It was very soon observed, however, that the several
outrages
they had committed with impunity, and particularly
their discovery that the gentlemen on board would not fight
them, added to their impudence and audacity. They
strutted
about the deck all day, making whispered remarks to
each other, and then laughing aloud, smoking, drinking, and
swearing, and intentionally annoying their
fellow-passengers
.
They had now attacked both Mr. Seers and
Rivington
without any particular danger or inconvenience, for they
were not persons to feel to their full extent the whips and
scorns of superior wit. Harry had an idea he himself
might be their next object. He had been delighted with
the admirable manner in which Mr. Rivington had met their
vulgar attacks. There was something in that gentleman's
age, appearance, and manners which rendered such a mode
of self-defence proper. He was too old and dignified a man
to be engaged in brawls and duels, at least with such
characters
.
But Harry was young and hot, and he inwardly
vowed to pursue a different course, should the least occasion
present itself.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The
voyage was now nearly completed. It had been,
luckily, free from storms, and, generally speaking, favoured
with pleasant weather, although long delayed by head
winds, and sometimes by no wind at all. Harry grew more
and more happy. When he thought of home and Fanny
Elton, his mind shaded over sometimes with sadness, but
he found it every day more easy to shake off this
amiable
weakness, and to forget Miss Elton he resolved to
make the first purpose of his life. What, with the various
incidents of the ship, the anticipations of soon seeing
England
,
and the attachment, each day more strong and familiar,
which had mutually arisen between him and the Rivingtons,
he had scarcely found time to think of
ennui
. As to the
two persons last mentioned, he fairly loved them; they
appeared
to love him also, and to enjoy a certain benevolent
amusement in hearing his opinions, anticipations, and
raptures
about Europe. The approaching end of the voyage,
and disembarcation at Portsmouth, and their return to the
great, mighty, gigantic London, appeared to interest them
less for themselves than for their pleasure in beholding the
effect on him, as an old theatre-goer enjoys the amazement
and delight of an intelligent child for the first time
introduced
into that magical scene, much more than he does the
scene itself.
The captain's daily reckoning was now listened to with
intense anxiety, and his announcement that they would
make land that same day was received with a profound
satisfaction
,
of which mere land-lubbers can have but a very
feeble idea. The breakfast to-day was ominously fine, and
the dinner appeared to have no object on earth except to
throw the breakfast into the shade. Champage was added
to the usual fare, and carried to a yet higher point the
good-humour
of the passengers, which even before seemed to
admit
of no augmentation.
After dinner Mr. Rivington, having chatted as a man
might with his son (for there is nothing which creates so
close an intimacy as a sea-voyage, between people of a
kindred
nature), had taken a seat and a book. Harry offered
Miss Rivington his arm, and they began talking and pacing
the deck.
I think you said that you had been but little in the
United
States, remarked Harry, for he had long ago
discovered
his friends to be English.
My father has an estate in the West Indies. It required
the presence of a confidential agent. My father was not
very well. My health, also, was rather delicate, so he was
advised by the physicians to give both himself and me the
benefit of the voyage. It was our intention to have seen
much of the United States, but he was called to London by
business, and we were obliged to leave at once. We saw
your sweet Hudson and magnificent Niagara, however.
Of what profession is your father? asked Harry, with
all the frankness of a sea-friend in the last days of the
voyage.
What should you think? asked she, smiling.
Well, let me see, said Harry, thoughtfully, measuring
with his eyes the quiet, noble form of the plainly-dressed
but gentlemanly-looking person, who sat reading at a little
distance. A physician? the army? an author? a lawyer?
a merchant?
These guesses were replied to by a smiling negative on
the part of Miss Rivington, who was greatly amused by
them, and who at length said:
You must not think too badly of him when I confess that
he is not anything.
Is London your residence?
Sometimes.
And sometimes the country. How delightful! Do you
know I look upon you with extreme curiosity, Miss
Rivington
,
as one who has seen and knows London and England.
And I look on you with equal interest, as one who has
never seen London. It seems to me impossible a person
can have lived a whole lifetime, and occupied himself and
been happy, and never seen London. I hope you will let
us see you when we get home.
If you will allow me to renew my acquaintance.
Oh, say to continue, not renew, said Miss Rivington,
laughing; for it is not going to be broken off, I hope.
What is a good hotel in London? inquired Harry.
Really, replied Miss Rivington, there are so many;
there are some rather expensive, but you have no wife, and
don't wish to dazzle. I should recommend L's hotel,
in Bond-street.
It is in a good neighbourhood, at all events!
Bond-street
is a term in the language for splendour and fashion.
Oh dear, Bond-street is not splendid; it is a very
plain-looking street. You mustn't have too high
expectations
.
All London is plain, indeed: a dark, black,
dull-looking
place. You must not expect the bright architecture
and hanging gardens of Athens or Babylon.
What I am most interested in seeing, said Harry, is
your distinguished persons. We have heard all our lives
of these great names, and we naturally wish to behold
them. What should you say, now, if I possessed the ability
to raise up before you any personage of history? whom
would you most like to see?
Napoleon, Dante, Shakspeare, and your own
Washington
.
But I hope, if you really have such miraculous
power
,
she added, laughing, you would not confine me to so
few.
I 2
Well, I feel, on entering London, as if I had acquired
such a power; and I shall be as much thrilled with
curiosity
and delight in first beholding Moore, Peel, Lyndhurst,
Rogers, etc., as you would be on having raised up before
you, on the deck of this ship, Pontius Pilate or Pliny.
You Americans are the most enthusiastic beings on
earth, I believe, observed she.
Did you ever seen Moore?
I know him very well, replied Miss Rivington.
I should have asked you if you knew him at once, but
the simplicity of us Americans in coming abroad is to be
borne in mind. The expression `do you know Moore?' has
in it something as extraordinary to me as `do you know
Nebuchadnezzar?' or `have you seen Anacreon lately?'
At this moment, just from their after-dinner wine, Dr.
Mason and Mr. Barnett came on deck, and began pacing to
and fro so as to meet Harry and his companion at every turn.
Those interesting gentlemen!' said Miss Rivington: I
am really afraid of them since they got what the captain
calls such a `regular sitting down' from my father.
If I dare ask so much confidence in me, I beg you will
not gratify them by going away.
And they continued their walk. Closer and closer came
Mr. Barnett each time they passed, till at length, although
the young lady shrank perceptibly away from the contact,
she received a by no means equivocal push with his
shoulder
.
Harry's quick blood mounted. He disengaged her
from his arm, turned upon the offender, and knocked him
down. He rose with a frightful oath, and rushed upon
Harry, who coolly knocked him down again. A second
time he rose, and, with desperate rage, leaped again on his
foe, but stopped short on beholding his cool, stern attitude
and flashing eyes.
Mason, come down stairs here, he cried, and, pulling
his friend violently along, they descended into the cabin, to
do, no one could conjecture what.
A general exclamation of the passengers applauded the
course of Harry, who did not seem at all
flustered
by the
circumstance.
Mr. Rivington smiled, and, shaking him by the hand, said,
You're a true John Bull, Mr. Lennox, and I'm very much
obliged to you. I'm quite sure you may now pace the deck
all day with my daughter, and they will not be impertinent
again. But where's the enemy?
I'll tell you, said Harry; they're gone down stairs,
probably, for pistols.
Miss Rivington turned pale.
Don't be alarmed, Miss Rivington, either at their
measures
or mine. That they are bullies is plain enough, and
as despicable cowards as ever breathed. Did you see him
stop when he came up to me the second time, and quail
when I looked at him? He has gone down for pistols. I
am a shot, however, such as is rarely seen. I venture to
boast, because I can give you proofs of my skill. These
men will never dare to proceed to extremities. They count
on our contempt, on the interference of the captain, or the
police when we land, etc., etc., etc. Let us be repaid for
all the annoyance they have been to us, by amusing
ourselves
with them, and, should they really not back out
before
the matter goes so far, I shall exhibit to them evidence
of my skill which will bring down their courage.
All agreed. The captain said he would not have any
serious
affair occur on board his ship, but he was so convinced
they were a pair of cowardly poltroons, that he promised not
to interfere.
Now, sir, cried Mason, coming up with a note, I have
to request your perusal of this document, which requires
you to name a friend. There, sir, put that in your pipe and
smoke it.
Harry read the challenge, and immediately referred the
bearer to Mr. Rivington.
You will be so good, said Harry to the latter, as to
bring this affair to an immediate conclusion.
I see no occasion for consultation, remarked Mr.
Rivington
,
gravely; your weapons, I suppose, are pistols?
Certainly; and I have them ready below with powder
and balls.
Ten paces, said Rivington, and fire when I say three;
and the time of meeting?
The daybreak of the morning after our arrival at
Portsmouth
,
replied Mason; the very,
very
first morning, sir.
Barnett, who stood by and heard this colloquy, turned pale.
No, I cannot then attend to it, said Rivington. I have
an affair of the same kind in my hand on that day.
Well, as soon as you possibly can, said Barnett, unable
to repress his relief.
You had better arrange this little matter here?
What, on board the ship?
Certainly; now, this moment.
Agreed! said Mason, firmly; I have no objections.
Agreed! echoed Barnett, in a somewhat fainter voice.
Here are no policemen, said Rivington, no
magistrates
,
and those impertinent meddlers. Here we can do it
perfectly at our ease.
But the
captain
, stammered Barnett, in vain
endeavouring
to keep up his swagger.
Oh, pray don't mind me, remarked the captain.
Well, gentlemen, said Rivington, it is arranged, then.
You have pistols, I think you said, Mr. Barnett?
Y-y-yesthat isno. My pistols are not ready for
immediate
use. They want cleaning and some repairs.
Oh, I have pistols, remarked Harry; I never travel
without them, or part with them even when at home. My
greatest pleasure is practising with them, which I have not
failed in these ten years scarcely a day. I'll go down and
get them.
He went down, and presently reappeared with a box,
which, on opening, presented, sure enough, a fine
glittering
pair of rather large duelling pistols, with the necessary
appurtenances of powder and ball.
Captain, said Harry, put a board up there, will you?
Not having used them since I left shore, my hand may be a
little
out
. I can see a sensible difference in my aim if I
neglect one day's practice; besides, they must be reloaded.
The captain ordered a plank, chalked a circle on it about
as large as a man's head, to which it bore a ludicrous
resemblance
from the provisional eyes, nose, and mouth, and a
large quantity of outstanding hair with which it was
adorned
,
and ordered a sailor to set it up in such a way as to
permit
its being fired at.
For Heaven's sake! exclaimed Miss Rivington,
turning
a little pale, and putting her hands over her ears.
What, you ain't afraid of
pistols
, ma'am, are you?
asked
Barnett, with a hysterical attempt at a composed laugh,
which died away, however, utterly from his lengthened,
ugly countenance, when Harry, at a good, long distance, and
apparently without any effort, sent the ball directly through
the unhappy chalked head, for which Barnett exhibited more
sympathy than he had probably ever before felt for anything
in his life.
Ah, ha! exclaimed Harry, in a business-like tone;
let us try the other.
He discharged it accordingly, and again the ball struck
the unfortunate head, while a murmur of real admiration
became
audible among the delighted spectators, too happy in
having the monotony of a sea-voyage relieved by such a
scene.
To say that Barnett was pale as a
sheet
would be to pay
most laundresses a compliment.
Load them, Rivington, will you? said Harry.
Damnation! cried Barnett. Do you think to
frighten
me in this way? But this is no time or place: the
captain
will not, I fear, permit us to proceed; for I shall make
this a damn bloody thing, I can tell youdamn me!
Oh! said the captain,
I
have no more right to keep
a man who has paid his passage on board a packet ship
from fighting a duel, if it amuses him, than I have to
prevent
his walking the deck or laughing in church; I should
be afraid of getting in the wrong box. A captain's business
is with his ship, you know.
But before
ladies!
stammered Barnett.
Oh, don't mind us, said Miss Rivington.
Measure the ground, Rivington, exclaimed Harry,
impatiently
.
His friend took ten short paces, and marked the positions
with a piece of chalk.
Time flies! said Harry, taking his pistol and his place.
Perhaps the ladies
had
better go down stairs, said
Rivington
,
with profound gravity.
No, we'll retire into the round-house, said Miss
Rivington
.
I
will
go so far as to say that it was merely
accident
that made me push against Miss Rivington, exclaimed
Barnett
.
It was the rolling of the ship.
Don't make any apology, said Mason, fiercely.
My friend Mr. Lennox requests me to say that, if he
survives this affair, he shall give Dr. Mason the pleasure of
a shot with him; if not, that honour will fall to me, said
Rivington, with a stern look.
I beg your pardon, Mr. Lennox, cried Barnett, walking
close up to him. I cannot massacre you in this way,
when I feel myself to have been the aggressor, and he
suddenly
discharged his pistol in the air.
I can't accept an apology, sir, said Harry, firmly.
You must load again!
At this moment the man at the mast cried out, Land
ahead! which the captain said was the Scilly Islands.
Never! cried Barnett. At such a moment as this I
can no longer entertain feelings of revenge or anger. You
may fire at me if you will: I am not afraid of you, but I
will not be
frightened
into anythingdamn me!
Your magnanimity, exclaimed Harry, is no more than
I expected, and equals your courage. I have always found
that the most brave are the most generous. For sparing
my life in this chivalric manner, your own feelings must be
a sufficient reward; if not, you must find the honour you
will gain by this circumstance an ample compensation.
Don't mention it, I beg, said Barnett, with a
mock-heroic
air, which infinitely amused the spectators.
The scene, indeed, had been exquisite, and in its full
breadth of caricature was so far beyond what could have
been thought possible, that, while it reduced the two heroes
to a most inimitable tone of quiet politeness, it carried the
good humour of the rest of the company to its highest point.
Harry gained golden opinions from all sorts of people.
Captain, mates, crew, and passengers were enthusiastic in
their admiration; and as Master Barnett had not only
received
such lessons in his attempts at colloquial display,
but had been so severely punished in another way, and
as everybody saw in the exposed bully only an object of
contempt and ridicule, it appeared to be universally
understood
,
by tacit consent, that the tone of mock admiration
assumed
by Harry should be followed up. The poor devils,
therefore, found themselves, during the rest of the period of
their stay on board, quite amazed and bewildered by
general
tokens of exaggerated respeet, which they knew not
whether to consider real or ironical. Every one took off
his hat to them with a sweeping, profound salutation.
Everybody
turned widely and ostentatiously out of their way.
The ladies made them timid courtesies: the captain asked
if everything on board the ship was to their liking. Never
was a pair of braggarts honoured with such gratifying
attention
,
and never did braggarts receive attentions with
blushes more like those of modest merit, accidentally
discovered
and brought to light. At dinner everybody drank
wine. The steward was ordered to serve them first. Their
opinion was asked by everybody on all possible occasions,
and all regretted such a rich hoax had not been put in
operation
at an earlier period.
CHAPTER XIX.
But
now this happy voyage was over; for happy it was
to all but the sad mother and father, who, however, had
found such substantial friends in Rivington and Lennox as
were likely to guard them from future want. Harry was in
a state of exquisite excitement, more like an enchanting
dream than sober reality, and opened as his heart was by
these novel and delicious sensations, he gave vent to his
feelings in all the eloquence of his nature, to the constant
admiration and amusement of his more quiet friends the
Rivingtons. These amiable people took extreme delight in
his freshness of character, his intelligence and nobleness of
disposition, which could never appear to more advantage.
With a sort of incredulous rapture, he beheld at last that
little
bit of blue, the first dim herald of the mighty old
Europe
.
A fine breeze carried them swiftly along up the
Channel, over water now smooth as a summer lake. The
passengers appeared in new clothes and with shaved faces.
The sky was bright, the air balmy. Everybody was
animated
.
The very turkeys, and hens, and sheep, had a
contented
look; the very cock began to reassume his
magisterial
bearing (which, at one or two windy points of the
passage
,
had been rather laid aside!).
Ah, what is there on this earth so delightful as the
American's
first approach to England, his venerable and beloved
mother? If it may be said without irreverence, it more
resembles
the sensations of a blessed spirit which has just
passed the dark valley of the shadow of death, and rises
into the enchantment of a new and brighter existence. The
limpid, idle water has lost all its terrors, and the
threatening
wind sinks from a sublime and despotic fiend into the
softest and sweetest of playful angels, and weeds and
branches are seen floating around, lately washed from the
near shore, and Mother Carey's chickens have long since
disappeared
with the flying froth of the tumbling billows, and
land birds come singing in gay flocks from the yet unseen
European groves, and English and French porpoises are
tumbling together in amity, and a delicious, sunshiny
atmosphere
of hope and happiness wafts onward the good ship,
after all her dangers, over the surface of the beautiful and
lucid sea. Now do you behold all sorts of vessels passing
you outward bound, and fishing-smacks lie scattered around,
and give a supply of fresh fish to add to breakfasts and
suppers
which already seem perfect, and the pilot, a silent,
weather-beaten English face, comes on board with
newspapers
,
and your bewildered and half-incredulous
fellow-passengers
,
on learning that the breeze is fair for landing
that very afternoon, appear newly clad in still more fine
clothes, so that you scarcely know them. Everything
speaks the end of the mighty traverse. The poor captain
looks like an ex-monarch. He who was regarded at sea
with such profound veneration, the oracle of that mysterious
and awful world, now stands with his hands in his
pantaloon's
pockets, unquestioned, uncared for, an actor off the
stage.
Harry was giddy with delight as he beheld, at last, the
soft, sweet shore close at his side, and heard the new (and
yet so old!) names of Dorset, Cornwall, Devonshire, Cowes,
and Leamington, for they were gliding up to Portsmouth.
Scenes, bright as if just from the easel, met his eyes. Old
castles covered with ivy, antique towns, orchards and roads,
gardens and hills, vales and creeks, peaceful cot and
opulent
palace, foliage and flowers, rock and hill, steeped in
shadow and sunshine, all soft as a vision, all harmonious as
music, all beautiful and pure as Heaven itself; and the land
odours were upon the air, and the land sounds came
floating
to his ear, the barking of a dog, the lowing of a cow, and
the ringing of a bell.
Oh! exclaimed he, as Miss Rivington stood on one
side of him and her father on the other, answering his
questions, but not interrupting his enchantment by unbidden
information, for they felt he was enjoying a rare sensation,
perhaps granted only once or twice in a lifetime.
Oh, cried he, while his handsome face was all lighted
with soul, this
is
ecstasy. This it is to travel; and I have
crossed the Atlantic; I am looking on England! England!
beautiful, merry, brave, time-worn, warlike, intellectual,
immortal
England!
Yes, there she is, said Miss Rivington, and her own
eyes, if not wet, were not
quite
dry; there's my country.
I protest, said Harry, that the spirits of the past seem
hovering around me in the air and welcoming me to these
renowned and hallowed shores. King and queen, fierce
noble and unshrinking commoner, poet and statesman,
orator
and author, Shakspeare and Scott, Charles and
Cromwell
,
Burke and Chatham, Elizabeth and Mary, the past and
the present, all crowding together in my mind. Hail! great
parent! Hail! England!
If these rhapsodies read rather wild on shore, they had
no such appearance in the high-wrought excitement which
reigned around him, nor did the Rivingtons see in them
other
than the manifestations of a clever, ingenuous, and very
warm-hearted young man under circumstances
well-calculated
to awaken lively emotions.
The ship at length came to anchor off the town of
Portsmouth
.
The usual visit of the government officer was made,
a pretty, yacht-like boat was sent by the packet agent to
bring the passengers ashore, and Harry, with a thrill, at
length placed his foot on
English ground
.
His pleasure was a little dampened by the necessary
separation
from the Rivingtons, who said they had friends in
Portsmouth, where they should first repair; that they might
possibly go up to London without delay. Rivington, on
parting with him on the quay, shook him warmly by the
hand. His daughter, who, without the least idea of love on
either side, had learned to entertain for him a sincere
friendship
,
did the same.
You will find me at No.  Grosvenor-street, said
Rivington; come and see me when you get in town.
And so they parted.
The doctor and his friend were not visible after landing.
The unfortunate parents were not forgotten by Harry in his
whirl of delightful sensations. He inquired particularly
where they were going to put up, what their prospects were,
and what they were going to do. He found he had been,
however, anticipated by Rivington, who, besides a rather
ample donation of glittering English gold, had given them his
address in London, with a promise to do something for them.
Vol. II.K
On their way up from the ship he requested them to stop
with him into a book-store, where, remembering the scene
in the steerage cabin, he bought a plain, well-printed Bible
and prayer-book, and presented them to his unfortunate
protege
.
With tears in their eyes, the poor people made him their
parting salutations.
This Rivington is really a fine fellow, and a true
Englishman
,
said Harry to himself, as he took possession of
his room at the Ship Hotel. I wonder who he is?
If anything on earth
can
be more delightful than the deck
of a ship on approaching the end of a voyage, it is the
well-furnished
,
neat, and comfortable apartments of an English
hotel: the different sort of meals you get from those on
ship-board, the admirable attendance; in short, everything
you see, hear, taste, and feel. Harry had brought Mr. Seers
up with him. That excellent young man, although he
regarded
him as a mere enthusiast, was so pure, sincere, and
intelligent, that he could not have wished a more agreeable
companion. They spent a day together at Portsmouth;
went to see Netley Abbey, and wandered round the town;
breakfasted, dined, and suppedat least, so it appeared to
themas if each had been the autocrat of all the Russias:
the fine, fresh fruit, the very sweet butter, the
uncommonly
nice soles with shrimp sauce (did the reader ever eat
sole with shrimp sauce?), the first-rate tea, milk, and
beefsteaks
.
The fact is, so perfectly happy were they, that
Harry spouted with Othello,
If it were now to die,
'Twere now to be most happy; for I fear
My soul hath her content so absolute,
That not another comfort like to this
Succeeds in unknown fate;
while Seers, who, when brought out, was full of sensibility
and humour, proposed, with half-sincere gravity, to proceed
no farther in their travels, but spend the rest of their lives
happily at the
Ship Hotel
. Right heartily did they laugh
over their voyage, and the glorious denouement of the little
tragedy in which the two turkey-cocks, Mason and Barnett,
had played such distinguished parts; while sometimes
their sunshine was shaded by the remembrance of the sad
events which had deprived the poor emigrants of their
family. At length it was agreed that they should start the
next day for London on the outside of a stage-coach, with
which both were well acquainted (as who is not?) through
the pen of the immortal Irving (whose health they drank
with a right hearty blessing on his chaste and tender genius).
Harry retired to his room, to sleep for the first time in a
foreign country; but he could not sleep. The transcendent
loveliness of the night, the cloudless sky, burning and
glittering
all over with stars, the only familiar objects which
reminded him of home, the broad, full moon just opposite
his window, slowly ascending up the hushed and
magnificent
heavens, and the soft air wafting into his apartment
the land odours of which he had been so long deprived,
disposed his mind for tender revery. He sat by the
window
,
he knew not how long, lost in silent, sweet thought,
fond dreams of the past and images of home mingling with
vague, high aspirations of future bliss. Only the idea of
Fanny Elton awakened a discord in the general harmony,
which seemed to wrap earth, the heavens, and his own
soul in one tranquil emotion of tender delight.
Ah, Fanny! he thought, if to all this I could be
convinced
you were not unworthy! if I had not heard those
scornful words, and if Emmerson himself had not told me
what he did, at this delicious moment I would dismiss all
doubt from my mind, and my happiness would be complete,
full, perfect. Perhaps she now sits also in solitary thought;
perhaps she gazes on those flashing stars, that spotted moon.
And he gazed and gazed, lover-like, lost in a tide of soft
associations.
It is nonsense, at length he said: it is but a boyish
weakness. Yearstravel will overcome it. In the mean
time, let me enjoy myself. Her ungrateful and capricious
conduct shall not prevent it. The world is bright before
me. Who says it is not a happy one? Whining moralists
and lying priests. It is at least happy enough for me. I
ask no better, want no other. I have health, wealth, an
affectionate
,
merry home: I have before me the most brilliant
tour possible. After a few dazzling years abroad, I will
return
,
and forget in the sober duties and mature pleasures of
a man, boyhood's once sweet and tender dream of love.
As he spoke he perceived the sky had changed its
appearance
.
The yellow moon had assumed a silver cast;
a new, pearly lustre had overspread the heavens, and the
smaller of the but now glittering stars had disappeared,
while the few large ones had paled their yellow beams. It
was morning, which, in the far northern latitude of England,
and at this period of mid-summer, is visible in the east
almost
before the radiance of the dying yesterday has faded
from the western horizon.
Another day and another night! Do they flow so
quickly, and am I so far and to be so long separated from
the still lovely, still beloved?
CHAPTER XX.
Notwithstanding
his romantic night reveries, Harry
was up, refreshed, and in scarcely repressible spirits, in
time to partake with Seers of as good a breakfast as the
most respectful of landlords could provide for the most
hungry
of guests, and which in no way impaired the agreeable
state of his sensations. The day was again one of those
preternaturally bright ones with which Nature blesses the
foggy, sea-girt isle at this season, as if in compensation
for her indifferent generosity during the rest of the year.
The sky and atmosphere of Naples seemed transferred to
the particular road over which the coach took its way with
our hero, feeling more like a healthy, young Neman lion
than a mere man; and such a road, and such enthusiastic
admiration as it inspired our two travellers with, and such
questions as they asked the coachman, and such
astonishment
as the latter evinced to be asked such questions by
Englishmen, and such still farther amazement as he was
thrown into on discovering they were Americans, and such
unaffected and highly gratifying compliments as he paid
them on the wery excellent manner in vich they spoke
the English
langvedge
, and such questions as he asked
about
Jerusalem
when he found they were from the United
States! and such a famous lunch as they took, and such a
fluttering at the heart as Harry experienced as they
approached
London, and such an immense, endless, black,
crowded, busy, stupendous sort of place as it seemed to be,
and such glances as he cast around him to see any one
who might be Moore, or Wellington, or the king; and, in
short, if the reader have any sort of experience in the
composition
of this sort of historical narrative, he must see at
once that to describe it all is impossible. Besides, we are
not quite certain we ought to tell the simple feelings which
roll through the mind of a susceptible young Yankee on
coming abroad for the first time. This, however, Harry
himself was afterward heard to confess, that he was as
much astonished on seeing Piccadilly and Hyde Park
Corner
,
as the boy in the story was on being shown, for the
first time, the useful and celebrated letter
A!
A hackney-coach brought the two wanderers safe and
sound to L's Hotel in Bond-street. Harry first
indulged
himself in a short walk, in which, somewhat to his
disappointment, though he knew all the while how
ridiculous
it was, he did not see St. Paul's, Drury Lane,
Westminster
Abbey, Windsor Palace, the Parliament House, the
Tower, and the Monument all standing together in a row to
be looked at, and in which, although he met many people,
he did not see O'Connell, or Lord Byron, or Shakspeare, or
Scott, or Lord Chatham, or Falstaff, or Richard the Third,
didn't have his pockets picked, and didn't, in short, meet
with any astounding adventures whatever. He then
returned
to the hotel to as nice a dinner as could possibly be
prepared, and ate it, in company with Seers, with as nice an
appetite as a reasonable man might wish to have.
It would give us infinite pleasure to go on in this way,
and describe each one of his sensations as the wonderful
metropolis broke gradually upon him, what absurd American
ideas were now and then corrected, what surprises and
delights
he experienced, and so forth. But the fact is, he got
through with several days in such a confused, exquisite sort
of way that it would be difficult to render any coherent
account
.
At the end of that time, however, he began to
subside
a little. He had graduated himself to the dimensions
and peculiarities of the place he was in, and began to have
a dim recollection that he lived in the nineteenth century,
and that there were various personages mentioned in
English
history and literature who possibly might have other
occupations than walking about the streets of London to be
stared at by very green young Yankee travellers.
Seers was to start for the Continent in a day or two, and
before he went they both bethought them of their promise
to their old, good-natured sea comrade, Rivington. Having
hunted up his address, which Harry had taken in his
pocketbook
,
and inquired the proper calling hour, they repaired to
Grosvenor-street.
K 2
The house was rather a stately one, and both the visiters
fancied they had made some mistake as they rang the bell.
A dignified-looking man, in a plain livery, with powdered
hair, opened the door, and to their query, if Mr. Rivington
lived there, replied with an air of some surprise, but very
respectfully,
The Earl of Rivington lives here. His lordship is at
home. Shall I take your names?
The
Earl
of Rivington! echoed Harry.
His lordship! said Seers, stepping back. Oh no,
certainly not; we have mistaken the house.
The servant waited with deference their ultimate
conclusion
.
Seers was for going back at once, but Harry had
a different idea.
Pray, has his lordship lately been absent from
England
?
he inquired.
His lordship returned a few days ago fromah!
perhaps
,
continued the man, still more respectfully, you are
the two American gentlemen who came with his lordship
from America?
Yes, yes, replied Harry, not quite concealing his
astonishment
.
Let us go back! whispered the modest Seers,
blushing
very much. An earl! bless me! I have no desire
to
No, let us go in, said Harry.
You were expected, said the servant, some days
ago.
The man led them to the broad stairs, where they were
received by another, who conducted them through several
lofty and richly-furnished rooms, into one which belonged
to a side apartment. Here they were left a few moments
alone, struck with the elegance and opulence of all they
saw, and the beauty of various marble statues, and large and
splendid paintings which adorned the walls. Seers, who
had probably pursued a path of humble obscurity and
simple
poverty, scarcely dared sit on the deep fauteuils, but,
after attempting one, rose with a new blush, and took a
place on the edge of a large damask chair. Harry had seen
luxury before, but he was rather curious to see how the
distinguished
nobleman, whom he had been so very free and
easy with for the last few weeks, would receive his humble
travelling companions in their own character.
Why, Mr. Lennox, whispered Seers, isn't this an
extraordinary
adventure?
Yes, but a pleasant one.
I don't know, really; I certainly had rather be well out
of it. What if there be
ladies
with him!
Well, you're not afraid of ladies, I hope!
But will he come in his own dress, just as usual, do
you think? or have earls any particular costume?
What! cap and ostritch-feathers, and velvet robes, do
you think, said Harry, laughing, like a stage nobleman?
At least, said Seers, it's very embarrassing to feel
such an immense difference between one man and another,
to stand before a fellow-creature as if he were aa
Pooh! nonsense!
And to have people looking down upon you with their
high greatness, and asking you to kneel like Mordecai the
Jew at the king's gate. When he was
incog.
he was, of
course, very civil; but now, I don't believe he can be
pleased
to see such an humble man as I in his royal halls: I
think I'll go back.
No, no, said Harry, laughing, and holding him by the
arm. You shan't stir a step. The Earl of Rivington is
a gentleman, as you are, and a
gentleman
is the same in all
countries and all ranks. He
asked
you to his house, and
hush, some one comes.
The door was opened, and the object of their fears
entered
with a rapid step and a delighted smile, and, taking the
hand of each in succession, but first of Seers, in both of his,
said:
I beg a thousand pardons for detaining you. I had a
person with me. How do you do?
I'm very well, your lordship, very well indeed, said
Seers, with the most unlimited blush he had ever been seen
to produce. I am, in short, your lordship
perfectly
well.
You have deceived us, said Harry. I was quite
ignorant
we were honoured with the acquaintance of the Earl
of Rivington.
I shall consider that title a misfortune if it make the
least alteration in our friendship, replied the earl. But
you are standing. Now, then, what have you been doing
with yourself? Where have you been? Have you seen
anything of London?
A part of it, said Harry.
A part of it, my lord, echoed Seers.
And how do you get on, Mr. Seers? You look so well,
if you left home in search of health, I hope you will not be
obliged to go farther.
Oh yes, my lord; I am going to the Continent in a day
or two.
But you must not go without seeing something more of
our famous little island. I have been expecting you
several
days.
May I inquire afterafter
My daughter? Oh, she is getting on famously, and
raves about her voyage. She'll be delighted to see you,
and will be here in a moment. She will not forget in a
hurry
the noble reply you made, Mr. Seers, to that sad fellow,
Mr. Barnett.
Seers bowed and blushed, and got himself more at ease
on the chair, which before he had scarcely touched.
Ah, there she is. Here are our friends at last, my dear.
Are you not ashamed of yourselves, both of you? she
said, giving her hand, with pleasure beaming from her face
too plainly to be affected; we thought you had forgotten us.
You have given us such a pretty romantic adventure,
said Harry, that forgetfulness for the future is quite out of
the question.
Where are you staying? Ah, at L's; well, I must
insist upon Mr. Seers putting off his departure for a few
days. We must not let him go away without doing the
honours of our Old England for him. You must come into
the country for a week, and we must show you a little more
of the town than mere passing strangers seeand
My lord, said a servant, opening the door, the Duke
of G.
Seers started and blushed again.
Two American friends, Mr. Lennox, Mr. Seers, said
the earl.
You're just from America, I suppose? inquired the duke.
Yes, said Harry; and I believe I have the honour
of bringing you a letter of introduction.
Delighted to meet you, said the Duke of G.
And a light, laughing, lively conversation of several
minutes
ensued, in which both Harry and Seers were
unconsciously
made to bear a part, and in which they already felt
as much at their ease as when chatting on the deck of their
old packet-ship. Harry, however, though fascinated, rose
to go, and the earl said:
What! you have already learned to be so careful of
your time? Well, off with you, then, if you are so wild;
but you must come dine with me next Saturday at sixboth
of you.
With the greatest pleasure, said Harry, while Seers
blushed and bowed in speechless astonishment and delight
at his previous fears of English aristocratic society.
And before I let you go, added the earl, I must have
your promise to spend at least a week with me in the
country
,
and to let me put you in the way of seeing something
of the town.
The servant conducted them to the door, which was
opened by another one with a bow, and the two young
Americans, a few days after their arrival in London, found
themselves at once in the very highest circle of that
celebrated
society, for which so many millionaires sigh and
strive in vain, and under the friendly and familiar protection
of one who, without farther inquiries, they had no difficulty
in perceiving, was one of the wealthiest and most
distinguished
noblemen of England, as, on inquiry, they learned
he was.
Seers was astounded.
Why, they're
delightful, superb
people, said he. I
never felt more at ease in the company of my most intimate
friends. I'm sure I never expected to be so sociable with
a duke and an earl!
CHAPTER XXI.
On
returning to the hotel Seers found a letter for him.
He became pale as he saw it, for it was sealed with black.
While reading it he trembled violently, sank into a chair,
and burst into tears.
Harry had learned to love this young man for his purity
and gentleness, his warm heart and intelligent mind, which,
though he was totally unacquainted with the world, was
richly stored with the knowledge to be derived from books.
Harry approached him with feeling, while Seers wept in
silence.
What is it, my dear friend?
My wife! murmured he. We were all in all to each
other. She gave up a little income of her own in order to
enable me to come abroad. She refused to accompany me
from motives of economy. I left her in perfect health, and
now she's
deaddeaddead!
and he repeated the word,
as if he had forgotten all other things in that tremendous
idea. An interesting scene followed, in which Harry
manifested
the deepest sympathy and attempted to offer
consolation
.
At length the poor fellow took his hand and said,
I thank you for your sympathy, Mr. Lennox; but, for
the present, leave me.
For a moment Harry hesitated, almost apprehensive lest
the sudden and violent shock might lead to some act of
desperation; but, on looking at the face of his unfortunate
friend, his streaming and upraised eyes, and the tranquil
resignation which even acute anguish did not deprive him
of, he felt ashamed of his suspicion, and still more ashamed
of the manner in which he himself had met the first (and,
compared with the present affliction of Seers, how
insignificant
!)
shock he had received from the displeasure of Miss
Elton, when he for a moment proposed to terminate his
existence
.
He went out, therefore, and, his heart swelling
with compassion, left him alone.
The whole of that day and the next Seers kept his
chamber, refusing to receive even his friend. In the
afternoon
of the third day, however, he sent for Harry, and met
him with a calm and even cheerful smile. A Bible lay
open before him.
Well, my dear Mr. Lennox, it is over, said he; and,
though his eyes were continually wet, he did not weep.
You would not believe me if I were to describe to you
how calm, cheerful, and happy I am; how this loss has
purified and elevated me; how much more spiritual and
intellectual
it has made me. I now possess two
inexhaustible
sources of delight, which, although they existed before,
were not visible to me in their true value. One is the
recollection
of her, the spotless purity of her mind, the
inexhaustible
tenderness of her nature, and the angelic
sweetness
of her temper. From this, when it renders me too
sad, I turn to the second. I paint the wished-for, happy
moment when death shall relieve me from the cares and
griefs of life, and I shall meet her once more, a radiant
angel
,
never to be separated again.
Harry saw it relieved him to speak, and he, therefore,
suffered him to go on without interruption. As he now
raised his face, beaming with hope and pleasure, he
addressed
him with feeling and sincerity on the subject of his
loss.
But, after all, continued he, notwithstanding your
grief, how happy you are! I have never lost a friend. I
don't know what death is; I cannot fancy what effect it
would have on me. Should I ever suffer such a calamity,
I shall think of you; I shall do moreI shall
envy you
.
Here, said Seers, laying his hand on the Bible, I
find consolation for all grief, solution to all mystery, advice
for every situation. You are an unbeliever; but you will
come to it one of these days.
Harry shook his head.
Indeed, I wish I could.
Ah, my young friend, I once, like you, doubted, derided
it all. Youth sees only the objections, of which there are
some, apparently, unanswerable, I freely allow; but the
united arguments in its favour are infinitely more so. A
subject so vasta scheme which commenced with the
globe, runs through all human history, and, embracing the
creation, the universe, and man, passes over death, and
comprehends
the ultimate destiny of the soul beyond the grave,
and the final termination of sublunary things. So vast a
subject may be supposed to contain some discrepancies, or,
at least, what may appear so to us.
Harry listened with respectful attention and interest.
What do you mean, inquired he, for I am very
ignorant
on this subject, by the scheme of Christianity
extending
from the beginning of the world? Christianity is
only eighteen hundred years old, is it not?
Have you ever examined the prophecies?
I have looked them over.
Well! you are but a young pupil! but I'll tell you
what, he added, cheerfully, you shall go through a course
of religious reading with me; it will not, believe me, be
either a dull or a sad task. We will look into the evidences
of Christianity together. It will relieve me (and his eyes
were full of tears while he spoke) from a weak indulgence
of grief, and I venture to hope you will either make me an
infidel, or I shall convert you into a Christian.
Yes, but, said Harry, I have already examined; I
have read the Bible continuously through; I have read
Newton, Butler, and all that sort of thing.
All that sort of thing! echoed Seers. But an
examination
,
by a mind in such a state as yours, unaided by one
more experienced, is sometimes likely to do more harm
than good. Let us do it together. Let us leave London
together
:
accompany me on to Italy, for I have now less cause
to return to America than I had before. We will read and
study the whole subject together; I will point out the way.
It is the most important thing for you, for of what avail is it
if a man gain the whole world and lose his own soul? Oh,
you will find more happiness in this than in any other thing.
One day in his courts is better than a thousand. You had
better be a doorkeeper in the house of your God than to dwell
in the tents of wickedness. You will then be able to say,
when misfortune overtakes you, as it has now overtaken
meand it
will
overtake youyou cannot expect to walk
through this vale of tears unscathedyou will be able to
say, as I do, `Yea, the sparrow hath found her a house, and
the swallow a nest for herself, where she may lay her
young, even thine altars, O Lord of hosts, my King and my
God.'
From whatever secret association, there was nothing
which repelled Harry more than phrases quoted in
conversation
from the Scriptures. Strong in yet undisappointed
hope and buoyant happiness, he felt a disagreeable
impression
from the sight of his friend's sorrow, nor was he
pleased
with the prediction of evil to himself. He therefore only
replied:
My good friend, you know I have come abroad to see
Europenot to study what I might better have studied at
home. Besides, I am engaged to-day to dine with the Earl
of Rivington, to go into the country with him, to pay a visit
to the Duke of G, to do a thousand things. You, also,
are engaged to the earl, you know.
He will require no better apology for my absence from
his table and from London, than the sad event which has
struck me, and which you will please to tell him. I shall
start for the Continent to-morrow. I was wrong to press you
too far, perhaps. Your time will doubtless come. In the
mean while, we must bid good-by now. You are now going
to dine with the earl, and will be late out. I shall go early
in the morning, and we shall not see each other again.
Good-by, my friend. We shall meet, doubtless, once
more, when, I trust, time will have softened your anguish.
Time! said he: I trust myself to Him who made
time.
And so they parted, poor Seers to his sad thoughts and
spiritual consolations; Harry to a scene of brilliant gayety
and novel delight, which might well have dazzled an older
person, and over his anticipations of which the light
shadow
caused by the grief and the prediction of Seers passed
immediately away.
Time and space will not allow our relating at full the
experience of our hero as a man of pleasure and fashion:
how he found himself at dinner after he left Seers, in the
midst of the most distinguished society that one of his own
fancies would have conjured up; how every individual he
sat by, when he heard him named, almost made him start;
how Moore sat opposite him, and Lord Brougham near,
and Sir Robert Peel on one side, and Mr. Bulwer on the
other; and how the delightful young lady he had known as
Miss Rivington smiled and whispered to him something
about Pontius Pilate and Nebuchadnezzar, and how the earl
was exactly like a father to him, and how much at ease and
perfectly delighted he found himself in five minutes, and
what a charming person Lady Rivington was, and what
plans were made for his future sight-seeing, and how he
had another invitation to pass a week or two at the
enchanting
seat of Lord H, and how he went home from this
dinner, and stopped in at the king's theatre to hear the most
magnificent music in the world, and had the inexpressible
pleasure of seeing Taglioni floating about the stage like a
sylph, and how he did go out to the seat of his
distinguished
friend, though not before he had seen London pretty well
and made some agreeable acquaintance, and how many
letters
he wrote to his father and Frank, describing all these
fine things in the style of the Arabian Tales, and how
anxious
he was to have letters from home, and how he never
had been, since his first birthday, one ten thousandth time
so enchanted with life and this bright world. A poor time
for the sad and spiritual Seers to ask him to leave London
and all these fine things, and bury himself in studies of so
grave a nature as religion.
Vol. II.L
Two weeks thus passed away, as time would naturally
pass to such a young man, with such friends and under such
circumstances.
In the very midst of it all, when his sky was the most
cloudless and his prospect the brightest, the news of the
bloody and inexplicable duelof Frank's deathof his
mother's
almost fatal illness, and of the grief and despair of the
family, burst upon him like a thunderbolt. It was
communicated
in a letter from his father, but in a style so different
from his usual gayety, that the manner shocked Harry
almost
as much as the matter. The letter was not long, but,
after simply detailing the event, their horror and wonder,
concluded by requesting him to remain abroad, as it was the
advice of the physician and the intention of Mr. Lennox to
bring his wife and Mary to Europe in the course of the
autumn
.
Emmerson also strongly advised it, and offered, with
a disinterestedness characteristic of him, to bear the whole
burden of the office till they should all return.
But for this injunction, Harry, in his anguish, would have
sailed for New-York in the next ship. The blow was
almost
too much for him. He staggered into his room on
finishing the letter, blind with tears, stunned, and in an
agony
of horror and despair. He could not believe it. The
last letter of Frank was lying on his table, fresh from his
hand; he could only exclaim, amid his bursting sobs, Oh
Frank, my brother! my beloved brother! shall I never see
you more!
Never was brother more tenderly beloved. In a moment
all the splendid gayeties around him lost their charm. The
sun seemed extinguished, Nature a dead blank, and the idea
of future happiness utterly impossible.
CHAPTER XXII.
Colonel Nicholson
saw the ruin he had caused with
a vindictive delight. It soothed his wounded vanity and
gratified his revenge. Glendenning, who had presumed to
mate himself with him, had fallen into insignificance.
White, whom he feared as much as he detested, had been
obliged to act as the humble instrument of his friend's
destruction and his own disgrace. Let not the reader
suppose
the character too darkly drawn. Life affords
examples
enough, although the unthinking world does not always
become fully acquainted with them. When selfishness and
ambition take possession of a character not blessed with
the Divine light of religion, that character will go as far in
the way of evil as its own interest will let it. The death
of Frank, the desperate folly of Glendenning, who ran
directly
into the snare laid for him, his degradation from his
rank, the resignation and departure of White, were all so
many triumphs to Nicholson, while it rendered him more
arrogant
and inflated his ideas of his own importance to a yet
higher degree. His ambition had been unusual before, now
it was overweening. His parasites and flatterers, and they
were not few, played upon his weakness and exaggerated
it almost into a maladya monomania. His demeanour to
all whom he did not consider his equals became intolerable,
and to insult every one near him (and who had not the
means of resenting) from a vicious amusement became at
length an unconscious habit. His exorbitant pomposity
appeared
to be pampered by the course of events, and, as if
Providence were willing to punish such a character by
displaying
it fully in the broad sunshine, a circumstance
occurred
calculated to infect him with new arrogance, and to
cause him to conceal his peculiarities with less caution.
This circumstance, by which, it seemed, the worse he
grew, the more favoured he was with worldly success, was
the sudden death of his elder brother, which was
immediately
followed by that of his father. By these events a
princely estate and the title of Lord Middleton fell very
unexpectedly
to him, and he returned to England.
On reaching London, that love of display, which was one
of his strongest passions, led him to an immediate
assumption
of a style dazzling even amid the splendours of this
most dazzling of all metropolises. The once admired
soir
es
at Canada of the comparatively humble
Lieutenant-colonel
Nicholson were cast into the shade by the costly
elegance and hospitality of Lord Middleton. Few gave
more or better dinners. But however his love of show was
gratified by this munificence, that was not his principal
object
.
It had been always one of his strongest desires to
receive a diplomatic appointment, and both his late father
and brother had long been engaged in negotiations to this
effect. If these negotiations had not been carried on with
any particular prospect of success, they had kept the
subject
alive in the minds of certain distinguished persons in
England, and they had kept alive the pleasing flame in the
bosom of the great man himself, engaged in the arrogant
and haughty duties of his distant post; and if they had been
broken off by the death of the two noble applicants, it was
only that they might be renewed with much more energy
by the party principally concerned.
Among those who, unacquainted with the real character
of the present Lord Middleton, had yielded to his
solicitations
and given him their influence, was the Earl of
Rivington
,
and his influence was of a kind not likely to be
exercised
without effect. At the moment to which we now call
the attention of the reader, he had exerted himself with so
much sincerity that success appeared about to crown the
most determined, the most brilliant desire which had ever
swelled Lord Middleton's cold and pompous heart with the
sweets of selfish triumph.
The Earl of Rivington had a seat about thirty miles from
London, to which he was in the habit of resorting when
business did not permit a more distant excursion, and where
he constantly gave
rendezvous
to his noble friends. Here
he lived with the freedom and simplicity of a farmer, though,
it must be confessed, a farmer pretty well surrounded by the
comforts and luxuries of life. Here he was staying at the
opening of our present chapter.
Harry had become a familiar and very favourite guest in
the family of his benevolent and distinguished old
travelling
companion, before the affecting intelligence of his
brother's death had reached him. The high polish and
thorough acquaintance with the world of the English
nobleman
,
combined with his cultivated mind, open, warm heart,
and easy manners, had presented to Harry something so
fascinating, that he not only admired, but learned to love
him almost as a father, and the freshness, intelligence, and
ingenuousness of the young American, his warmth of heart,
strength of mind, and straightforward sincerity and honesty
of character, combined with (for so young a man) very
considerable
attainments and particularly pleasing manners and
person, charmed the earl into an intimacy which became
gradually a friendship. Long before the dreadful blow had
fallen upon him, Harry had unbosomed himself to his
illustrious
host, who knew all about him, his unlucky affair with
Miss Elton, his affectionate family relations, his generous,
warm-hearted father, Frank's prompt and spirited character,
and even little Seth's difficulties in finding a commodious
resting-place for his hands and feet. He had brought to
Europe with him, also, such letters of introduction as, when
produced, did not at all check the earl's predisposition in
his favour.
When in some degree recovered from the first effects of
the appalling calamity which had fallen upon his family, and
in pursuance of the advice and request of his father to wait
in Europe, Harry resolved to spend a year or two in
seeing
England, Scotland, Ireland, and Wales, and carried the
plan into effect thoroughly, with great benefit to his mind,
but not without a perceptible change in his health and
happiness
.
He had found it impossible to bear, with anything
like the philosophy of which he had been somewhat
previously
in the habit of boasting, the loss of Frank in such a
way. Time seemed rather to strengthen than diminish its
effects on his imagination.
No philosophy but one can afford consolation to grief for
the dead without hardening the heart and narrowing the
mind, and Harry was far too sensible and affectionate to
seek relief in flippant forgetfulness or selfish pleasure.
In these two years his character had altered as much as
his appearance. He had grown thin and pale. Death, the
most tremendous of thoughts, had entered his mind; he had
several times since his departure seen its effects upon
others
,
but now it presented itself to him in a new aspect. He
loved his brother so, he had been so much with him, all his
plans and thoughts of life were so interwoven with him, that
Frank formed a part of the world, of nature, in his
imagination
.
This part of nature was now annihilated; one black,
terrifice, and ominous blot had been dashed upon the picture,
before all happiness and sunshine. He could hereafter do
nothing without thinking of Frank; he could enjoy no
pleasure
,
cherish no hope, overcome no difficulty, achieve no
honour, accomplish no enterprise without being haunted by
the shadow of Frank. Over his visit to Europe a frightful
cloud had comea cloud which could never be dissipated;
and on his return home, among all the images which
awaited
him there, stood prominent and horrible, shrouded in
unnatural
L 2
gloom, the grave, the early, unhonoured,
blood-stained
grave of him who, until now, had been his brightest hope
and surest reliance. By nature he was of a thoughtful and
brooding disposition. There are men who can thus behold
a beloved object struck suddenly down and mysteriously
hurled from the arena, and yet forget, in their selfish
interests
,
the solemn lesson. Harry was not one of those. He
felt he could never forget, never recover from the shock.
He could never be to others what he was; the world could
never be what it had been to him.
But it was not grief alone from which he suffered; it was
not only his heart which had been struck A new idea, and
the most mighty and startling of all ideas to those who are
not wholly possessed by mere vulgar, visible things, had
entered
his mind. Death, like some sublime discord, had made
itself heard through the deep, universal harmony of nature.
His meditations thus aroused, he saw, with horror, could
never
again be laid at rest. Death had been revealed to him;
the scales had fallen from his eyes; the universe had
become
a new universe to him; the real had been
transformed
into the unreal. All the pomp and promise of the world
had shrunk to a theatric spectacle; those he loved, to
empty
visions, destined to vanish at any moment; himself to an
insect without any just value or rational object.
This state of mind prevented all the expected enjoyment
of his year's travel, and counteracted, in a great degree, the
desire of self-cultivation. Without faith in revelation, the
idea of a future existence appeared ridiculous. Even grief
for the loss he had sustained seemed a weakness, for why
weep for or continue to love that which does not, which
never
can exist?
Exhausted by these reflections, he at length found a
certain
relief in the languor by which they were succeeded,
though this languor itself soon became almost insupportable.
In his desire to escape it he consulted a physician.
Of all men, physicians possess the best opportunities of
doing good; none have such influence over a vast variety
of individuals; none are the depositories of so many family
secrets, behold the human mind in a state more favourable
to the reception of true knowledge. But how few of these
gentlemen are religious men? how few, while they give
their senna and rhubarb, think of looking into the mind
diseased? In the pursuit of worldly learning, how
frequently
do they forget to seek, and so administer spiritual light?
Doctor Jackson was a fat, florid-faced, sleek little man,
with a very round stomach, who had his guinea a visit,
rolled
about town in a luxurious carriage, loved the pleasures of
the table, and never thought of looking beyond the world to
remedy the world's evil.
You want pleasuresocietyexcitement, said Doctor
Jackson. Take your bottle of winePort or old Sherry!
Ride, go to the opera, and dash into the world a little. You
want excitement.
Harry sighed. At the moment a note was brought in
from the Earl of Rivington, begging him to come down to
his seat.
There! there's your man, said the doctor. Go to
him; dine, sup, play, laugh, fall in love. Tut, man! in a
month there'll be no holding you back.
So Harry accepted the earl's invitation, and resolved to
seek excitement. He had been too much with his own
thoughts. The affair of the duel had absorbed him. He
had not yet learned the details, and he could not imagine
them. He seemed to be the sport, indeed, of a destiny
equally cruel and capricious. First Miss Elton, whom he
loved, and who, on mature reflection, he could not but believe
loved him, had chosen to cast him off with unconcealed
scorn. Then Frank's bosom friend, the amiable and
beloved
guest of his family, had left them in apparent friendship,
and returned to murder him. The cause was a mystery to
him, which he had yearned to fathom; but he dreaded to
probe his yet unhealed wound by the discovery of new
details
.
The grief he experienced was scarcely more strong
than the deep disgust and indignation with which he
regarded
Glendenning, who appeared to him a hollow and
unprincipled man of the world, whom he felt he could not
meet without losing his self-command. This thought by
degrees became habitual to him. It was the only one
which afforded him any relief, or, as Dr. Jackson would
call it, excitement. He would not
seek
Glendenning.
He had no reason to suppose his brother had not fallen in
a fair duel, such as must and ought to take place between
gentlemen; but, in the present one, the circumstances
appeared
so peculiar, that the anticipation of one day meeting
Glendenning afforded him a dark delight. He would not
own floors, were silenced by the general approbation
bestowed
upon Frank. Had a British officer been permitted
to leave the United States unpunished after such an act
to have worn, perhaps, on his own bosom the rose thus
snatched from that of an American lady, with an American
officer at her side, what would England, what would the
whole world have said? There was so much force in this
argument that they who had nothing to oppose but the Word
of God were but slightly listened to; so difficult is it for
pure Christian principle to contend successfully against the
passions and illusions of life.
On the present occasion it was soon perceptible that
Frank was the lion of the day. When it was whispered
about who he was, he could not have been insensible to the
eyes which were fastened on him (and some of them, as
Mr. Mantelini says,
demned
handsome ones too!). He
had entitled himself to the applause of his native city. The
newspapers had been full of compliments; judges, lawyers,
statesmen, and public magistrates shook him heartily by the
hand; and among the ladies, a young hero who had just
saved
his country in some brilliant battle could scarcely have
been more openly admired. Mary and Lennox enjoyed all
this, and Mrs. Elton, who, from her whole time being
occupied
in talking, did not
think
much one way or the other,
shared in the triumphs of her favourite young friend. But
Mrs. Lennox looked on with regret and apprehension, lest a
serious injury might be thus inflicted on her son's character.
Glendenning, too, against whom, at first, the general
indignation
had run high, began to be regarded, not as a
libertine
who spent
His rich opinion
For the name of a night-brawler,
but as a mere frolicksome young madcap, who had firmly and
magnanimously atoned in his sober senses for a boyish
spree. White, too, who, it was understood, had done all in
his power to prevent the occurrence at all, was praised for
the officer-like firmness with which he had pressed it
through to just the point where his thoughtless friend
might withdraw in a chivalric way from an affair of which
he had become justly ashamed.
In the mean while everybody was introduced to
everybody
,
and everybody talked to everybody about all sorts of
things, and each individual of our party would have thought
of these Harry had listened with apparent attention, though
in silence, without taking any share in them. At length,
gliding carelessly from subject to subject, they fell into a
debate upon pistol-firing; and one person, who had
spoken
a great deal, and with the authoritative air of one
accustomed
rather to decide than to debate questions, asserted
that he had acquired a perfection of aim not surpassable.
I tell you what, my lord, said the earl, still anxious
to bring forward his young friend, I believe you are a
practised hand, but I will not allow that you are either
infallible
or unsurpassable; and I'll undertake to find a shot
at least your equal, if not your superior.
You have not seen me fire, I presume, replied the
person
to whom this was addressed, rather grandly. I should
not feel honest in allowing you to engage in such a hopeless
enterprise.
Well, said the earl, rather misquoting Byron,
`Most men, till by experience rendered sager,
Are willing to back their opinions (or whatever the line is)
with a wager.'
What will you bet?
If you seek throughout England for my equal, a hundred
guineas, said Lord Middleton.
If I go no farther than this table, and threaten you a
superior
?
rejoined the earl, laughing.
Five hundred guineas to one hundred, replied Lord
Middleton, casting his eyes slowly around the company, as
if to assure himself that no celebrated shot was, unknown
to him, seated by his side.
I take the bet, replied the earl; and as it's quite light
enough, we'll decide it this moment.
Agreed! exclaimed Middleton; but who's your man?
My young friend Lennox, there, said the earl,
delighted
,
at last, to have hit upon a method of breaking his
reveries
.
Lord Middleton started, and fixed his eyes on the young
man thus abruptly introduced to him. After ordering
pistols
,
and the necessary preparations to be made upon the
lawn before the door, the earl related the incident which
had occurred between Harry and Barnett on their voyage
across the Atlantic.
The story was admirably told, and brought Harry at once
into the foreground. In the mean while, by the mild light
of the late setting sun, although it was nearly nine o'clock,
a mark had been set up, pistols loaded, and the whole
company
repaired to the spot.
The target was a board, upon which was painted the
form of a man of not above the usual dimensions. Upon
the breast had been ordered a star, but the person acting as
the painter, entering poetically into the spirit of the thing,
instead of a star, had drawn, in about its natural size, a
human
heart.
The scene and the occasion gave rise to a great many
lively remarks, and it was in the midst of a peal of merry
laughter that Lord Middleton marched forward, with his
commanding military figure, and, after some moments'
careful
aim, launched his ball into the little finger of his painted
victim. His previous conversation had rather produced the
impression that he was a brag; and although the earl would
certainly not have bet had he not believed he possessed
much of the skill of which he boasted, yet there were
others
who were rather surprised that he hit the mark at all.
Harry stepped forward, and fired without any pause. His
ball lodged in the breast, within two inches of the heart.
The second fire, Middleton struck the arm; and with a
very important and rather proud face, gave way to his
opponent
,
who, in a manner equally careless with that of his
previous attempt, sent his ball again through the body one
inch below the object of his aim.
Now to decide! said the earl; for they were to fire
three times; though I rather think, my lord, you are a
loser.
We shall be able to tell that better after the contest is
concluded, said Middleton, with a certain grandeur, as he
fired, carefully, slowly, and skilfully. He did not strike
the heart, but his ball went rather nearer to it than the
nearest of his opponent's.
This was the best shot yet, and the noble marksman
received
the compliments of all, and even offered his
condolence
to Rivington for the loss of his wager. But while he
was playing off in advance the modest airs of a conqueror,
Harry stepped forward with somewhat more care, and
aimed
with a steadier eye. A general exclamation announced
the result. The ball had sunk directly into the centre of
the heart. We should have observed that the distance had
been lengthened much beyond that usually prescribed in
real affairs.
cient and formidable foe. In short, Seth, somehow or other,
found himself strangely happy. Of all men on earth, he
most disliked and feared Emmerson; now he had escaped
from the dark face of that gentleman for a time. He saw
his representations had not injured him in the opinion of his
benefactors, and, with the facility of youth, regardless of the
future, he gave himself up to the pleasing impressions of
the moment, watched the easy and elegant manners of the
three gentlemen, and delighted to bestow such attentions as he
knew how upon the ladies, each one of whom he loved with
all the unbounded fervour of boyish gratitude and admiration.
Strange and sweet impressions, too, began to descend upon
his mind, from the varying and resplendent scenes of nature
which were so rapidly flying behind him. He listened, too,
with mute wonder to the conversation of the rest, of other
shores and other rivers, of the scenes of Europe (that
great dim vision of imagination to him), and to the thousand
interesting remarks upon life which he heard now for the
first time. The scenery, which struck every one else, and
brought forth various exclamations of noisy rapture, sank
into his soul silently, but not with a less deep effect, and
this little, stupid country boy, thus introduced, almost by
accident
,
into a sphere of life so much above his own, began
to feel within him the development of new thoughts and the
stirrings of new emotions. The beautiful countenance of
Mary Lennox (who seemed to consider herself quite a
woman and him only a little boy of no account whatever;
and if she thought so, of course it must be so, for very far
from him was the boldness to have an opinion of his own)
had a sort of unaccountable attraction in his eyes. He
could have sat gazing on it for hours, and so he did quite
uninterrupted, for no one looked at him. If the young girl
herself sometimes caught his eyes with her own in these
encounters, she only smiled so kindly and good-naturedly,
that, as we before observed, somehow or other, this passage
up to Rose Hill was the most enchanting delicious day he
had ever known.
Fanny Elton, who appeared only recovering from her
late indisposition, required no other explanation for a
certain
reserve which seemed lately to have shed itself over
her mind. She presented with Mary the rare spectacle of
a young lady decidedly prettier than her friend, yet without
believing so herself; while Mary, equal in character, if not
I hope I am not bloodthirsty, answered Harry, nor
will I, under any circumstances, go one step out of my way
to meet the man who killed my brother. But, should chance
throw me in his way, any statement from you would direct
me how far the circumstance requires an investigation. I
should be able to make up my mind how to act. Where
was your regiment stationed, my lord?
In Montreal.
Why, you were Glendenning's commanding officer!
I was!
This short conversation excited extreme interest. Lord
Middleton was a coward, although, from vanity and the
associations
and habits of a military life, he could, when
occasion
required, meet death, at least, with apparent
composure
.
His very love of display made him bold, but at this
moment, of all moments, he did not wish to leave the world,
which was just becoming brighter to him than ever.
Neither
did he desire to kill Mr. Lennox, the friend of his noble
host, and after the part he had played in the duel which
had ended in the death of his brother. He was not
inclined
seriously to be cruel, except when urged by some
selfish
passion, and in the present case every consideration
united to make a conflict disagreeable, as one in which he
could gain nothing, and might lose much. It would be
ignorance
,
too, of human nature, to suppose that, with other
thoughts, the very particular precision with which young
Lennox's ball had hovered around the centre of the target,
and at last plunged directly into it, had not some influence
over him. He perceived, however, that, although on the
brink of a precipice, he had only to walk calmly forward
to avoid the chasm. White and Glendenning were not
there to betray him, and no one present actually knew any
of the details of the matter. Harry had declared he never
would, under any circumstances, step out of his way to seek
him who had caused his brother's death, but that only in
case of being accidentally thrown into his society would he
act (and
action
, under such circumstances, was rather a
serious business!). He had, then, but to quietly disengage
himself from so dangerous a companion, and he inwardly
resolved to leave B Hall on some occasion, real or
feigned, with as little delay as possible.
These various considerations, which have occupied us
so long to write, passed through Lord Middleton's mind in
the instant's pause which followed the last question and
reply.
At last, then, may I hope for an authentic statement?
demanded Lennox.
It would be useless, replied Middleton; Captain
Glendenning is not a person with whom a gentleman can
associate. To notice himto meet him would be
impossible
.
He
was
an officer of my regiment, but he is so no
longer. Of his reckless character, you yourself had a
specimen
in the original insult offered to your brother. He is
a hot-headed
rou
and an unprincipled blackguard. This
is the person after whom you inquire. Shall I go on?
Go on, said Harry, gravely.
On his return from his first duel with your brotherI
fear I pain you, Mr. Lennox.
Pray go on, my lord.
He became engaged in a brawl in a billiard-room with
a young officer, who was challenged by him, and who
refused
to fight. The prematurely arranged duel with your
brother was stated as the cause. Anxious to save the
young man, I proposed to call a Court of Inquiry, but
before
it could assemble, he was off. The rest you know.
And where is Glendenning?
As his commanding officer, let me assure you he is
unworthy
your attention, and entirely beneath it. For this
and other gross misconduct, he has been already punished.
He was first cut by all his brother officers, and then tried
by a Court Martial. His misconduct was as undeniable as
it was unpardonable. He was cashiered, and left the place,
degraded and ruined forever. Where he is now, I know not.
What
he is, I have told you. The subject is a painful one
to me, for I know the unfortunate, weak-minded young
man's father, and had wished to save him.
I thank your lordship, replied Lennox, after a pause.
The earl smiled. Middleton breathed more freely, and
taking Harry by the hand, said,
I need not add, my young friend, how sincerely I
sympathize
with you; how sincerely, indeed, I have
sympathized
with you long before I knew you.
The next morning, Middleton announced to his host his
intention of returning to London, a departure rather sudden,
but which occasioned more surprise than disappointment.
A few days subsequently Harry received letters from
Vol. II.M
home. His father, mother, and Mary had also written.
He could not refrain from tears as he reflected with what
perfect happiness he would have had the precious treasures
completed by one from Frank. The nervous agitation
into which letters from home throw the wanderer in a
foreign
land can only be fully understood by him who has
experienced
it. His mother's health did not yet permit her
coming abroad. His father was attempting to engage
himself
in his professional occupations to divert his mind.
Mary was become the most tender of nurses, and continued
the most devoted of daughters. Not a word of the late
calamity! not a word of Fanny. Harry was requested to
continue his travels, to visit the Continent, to see what was
to be seen, preparatory to a final return and a serious
business
career. He was, indeed, rather struck with the
earnestness
of his father's letter on this subject.
I wish you, thus it read, to bear continually in mind
that you are to acquaint yourself with the foundation of your
profession philosophically and historically, for which
purpose
you must by no means abandon your intention of
hearing
Savigny, and any other distinguished professor of
jurisprudence
.
While you need not deny yourself any
necessary
expense, I wish you to form a habit of sober economy,
and remember what I have always told you, your way
through the world is to be achieved by your own industry
and talents. Do not fall into the idea that you are to start
a man of fortune. I shall leave you a business which
cannot
fail to be a source of independence. I desire you to
be studious, and not to come home without availing yourself
of the advantages which Europe affords in order to render
you a superior lawyer. We shall be with you by-and-by.
His mother's letter was short, and written as with the
tremulous hand of an invalid. The sight of it affected him
strangely; it was full of an affection, which he felt had
concentrated
upon him with more force since his brother's death,
and it closed with an earnest appeal that, amid his other
studies, he would not neglect the most important study of all.
Take no thought to yourselves, saying, what shall we
eat and what shall we drink, or wherewithal shall we be
clothed? for after all these things do the Gentiles seek, and
your Heavenly Father knoweth you have need of all these
things. But seek ye first the kingdom of God and his
righteousness
,
and all these things shall be added unto you.
Ay, my dearest mother! he murmured, how happy
are you in such a soothing, such a holy illusion. How I
envy you the power of belief; perhaps one day I shall share
it. I have made, at least, one step towards it; I have
learned
to overcome myself; I have learned to forgive.
Glendenning
,
the murderer of my brother,
lives
.
For two years he had been subdued by grief for the dead,
a gloomy, hopeless, helpless grief. He often thought it
insupportable
.
Alas! we are all apt to think our present
sufferings
the worst till we experience those which follow.
Some beams of religious light seemed penetrating into
the darkness. He resolved once more to read, not only law,
but, as his mother had recommended, Christianity. His
breast was sad, but calm; his sky was dark, but it almost
seemed as if the morning were going to break. He did not
believe, but he admired; he saw no truth, but he began to
discover
beauty, mystery, and sublimity; he wished for faith.
Frank's death had overshadowed him. He felt how much of
his happiness had depended upon that which an instant had
borne away. The dead, cold breath of the tomb had
chilled
him, and he saw he could never altogether shake its icy
horror from his heart. What guarantee had he that father,
mother, sister, and that Fanny Elton, would not, also, die
before his return? Why might not one, why might not all
be torn from him, and what would be his state of mind then?
Upon these he had built his hope, his happiness: alas! then
he had built his happiness and his hope upon air!
Ah! he murmured, if Christianity were true! if
Frank were
not
gone from me
forever;
if some almighty
power
were
directing and protecting us; if there were a
refuge
from grief, a rewarder of virtue, a punisher of sin, a
conqueror of death, a friend, a father, a God! what a world
this would be!
But, alas! these high and flattering dreams are false!
the visions of poets and madmen! Reality is dark, cold,
and terrible! Destiny crushes without pity or care!
With these opinions, it is not remarkable that his heart
grew sadder and sadder every day; that life appeared a
mockery, and virtue, even while he loved it, an idle dream.
CHAPTER XXIV.
No man enjoyed life more than Middleton; we mean
by life the world. His contracted understanding and
selfish
heart permitted him to drink all the sweets of the
present
without troubling himself with recollections of the past
or speculations concerning the future. His mania for
distinction
had been gratified beyond his most aspiring hopes.
His pomposity had increased with his power, wealth, and
rank, and it would be difficult to find a gentleman more fully
possessed with the idea of his own greatness, and more
desirous
of possessing others with it. These high airs were
set off by his fine person, and he met few who denied to
him all the outward tokens of the immense respect he
required
.
It was now even more than ever his pleasure to
dazzle all around him, to make the vulgar stare, to reveal
himself in striking attitudes, and with that sort of effect
which nine out of ten of those simple people who compose
the
world
innocently suppose real. All the disagreeable
points of his character were ripened by prosperity into more
odious perfection, and he had never been more disposed
than at present to arrogate to himself, to keep people around
him at a distance, and to enjoy the profound awe and
admiration
of valets and hotel-keepers. The reader must not
suppose we are attempting to draw an English gentleman;
nothing can be more unlike. Simplicity of manner and a
perfect indifference to display almost invariably form a part
of their characteristics. The Earl of Rivington was an
English gentleman. Lord Middleton belonged to no class
of any country, but to human nature.
One morning, towards the autumn of the present summer,
the proprietor of the
Htel de Saxe
, at Dresden, was
gratified
with the sight of a very elegant travelling-carriage and
four horses, which dashed across the square and stopped
before his door. If a
milor Anglaise
had not been
written
in every point of the equipage and its appurtenances,
the stately, proud-looking, officer-like person who alighted,
and proceeded immediately to the most expensive apartment
in the house, would have revealed the nationality of that
agreeable vision, and flattered the imagination of mine host
with brilliant promises of a long bill indefinitely augmented
and uninquiringly paid.
The flutter of delighted agitation which such an arrival
sends through the various departments of a hotel on the
Continent was not wanting in the present instance, and
everything
that the humble efforts of mere Continental
politeness
could invent was put in operation to render his
lordship
(for they have adopted the word at last)
comfortable
.
No one approached him without a bow. No one spoke to
him without emphatic exclamations of
milor, monseigneur,
excellence
, or
mon prince
, which last, a very fat, very
handsome
,
exorbitantly well-dressed, particularly
impudent-looking
,
and yet extremely respectful waiter, with whiskers and
mustaches cultivated to the last imaginable point of
perfection
,
bestowed upon him with impunity, having detected
the sort of man he had to deal with the moment he set eyes
on him.
Here, waiter! said his lordship, after having bathed
and completed his toilet.
Mon prince?
Have you many in the house?
Oui, mon prince
.
At what hour is your
table d'hte?
At two o'clock,
mon prince
.
And can one get anything fit to eat there?
Mon prince
, replied the waiter, with one of the
sweetest
smiles,
il faut esperer
, we must hope to satisfy your
excellency.
Well, put some Champagne to cool! I'll dine with
you.
Oui, mon prince
, fell once more from the lips of the
bowing attendant.
At the hour designated, propelled partly by a desire to
display himself before the company, Lord Middleton, with
his person drawn up erect, and all the military commander
and embryo ambassador in his air, entered the room. The
first person he met on his way to the table was Harry
Lennox
.
There were few men he would not rather have seen.
My lord, said Harry, I'm delighted! I didn't even
know you were on the Continent.
And I thought you also in London. Which way are
you going?
M 2
from the rest of the company to pursue, without interruption,
her plan of awakening his attention to the subject of religion,
the whole party returned to the house, where, after a slight
repast, Mrs. Lennox reminded them they might expect her
husband and Harry by the noon boat. It was therefore
proposed to go down to the landing at the proper hour, and
receive the new visiters with all the honours of war.
Accordingly
,
at about one o'clock, the whole party repaired to
the spot, laughing and talking as friends who have spent a
week in the country are very apt to talk, for nothing brings
mind and heart closer together than such an interval of
uninterrupted
intimacy. A few moments after their arrival
they discovered a light cloud of ascending smoke and steam
peering over the summit of a green hill, then the plunging
strokes of the wheels and panting of the engine, and
immediately
the large and stately vessel, more like a floating
palace
than a boat, darted from behind a projecting angle of
black, broken rock, with the well-known barge cleaving the
foamy flood at its side, and containing the three figures of
Mr. Lennox, Harry, and Mr. Emmerson.
Hallo! hurrah, boys! how are you? here we are!
shouted Lennox, waving his hat. Now then, my fine
fellows
,
out with ye. Hand up the valise. That's it; all
right! How d'ye do? How de do?
And then the various embraces and shaking hands
natural
to the occasion. As Lennox and Mrs. Elton did not find
it convenient to stop talking, the exclamations of the rest
were edged in as well as they could; and as nobody waited
for any answers, it was pretty much all the same in the end.
Emmerson's face was all smiles and blandness, though his
gratulations, like everything else he did, were performed in
a quiet way.
But what's the matter with you, Harry? said his
mother
;
you don't look well.
Oh yes, perfectly. Never so well and so gay in my
life, said Harry, rousing himself from a revery.
Where's Fanny? demanded Lennox.
Here she is, at least here she
was
, or I thought she was
here.
Didn't she come down? asked Mary.
No, I don't think she did, said Frank. I observed she
was not with us.
Up the steep, fragrant foot-path they wound, and met
I should not dare to do so, Mr. Lennox, cried
Glendenning
,
growing yet paler; I should have fled from your
presence in shame and horror, had I not learned you were
on friendly terms with
that man
. Had I not just seen you
touch his hand in kindness, and speak to him
him
, of all
human beingswith a smile on your face
I do not know what you mean, said Harry.
He means, cried Middleton, I should presume, from
his language, some new calumny against one whom he
has no other means of revenging himself upon for having
him dismissed the army.
I am not likely to credit the insinuations of one, cried
Harry, who has already, in regard to himself
He stopped, unable to proceed.
But know, sir, he added, after a pause, that while
you so meanly attack Lord Middleton, you
live
only by his
sufferance. His intercession alone has saved you from the
fate you merit.
Lord Middleton, I presume, persuaded you, then, not to
seek me?
He did.
As one unworthy of notice, perhaps?
To what other consideration could you owe your life at
this moment? demanded Harry. What but contempt would
save you from vengeance?
Mr. Lennox, replied Glendenning, you would be too
noble to insult the fallen, and to strike the helpless, if you
knew the
truth
. Leave that to Lord Middleton, who
pretends
to be calm while his heart trembles to its centre lest
I betray his secret.
Landlord! exclaimed Middleton, rising in
ungovernable
rage, the person seated opposite me is not a fit
character
for your table.
I
, Lord Middleton, formally acquaint
you with the fact. If he remain at the table longer,
I
shall
leave it
.
I do not understand,
milor
, replied the landlord, on
what ground I am to decline receiving one gentleman at my
table, merely because he has a difference with another.
Will you do me the favour to dine with me in my room,
Mr. Lennox? said Middleton.
You
dare
not leave me one half hour in company with
Mr. Lennox, cried Glendenning. You
dare not
suffer
him to hear from me that you, the lieutenant-colonel of
my regiment, were the malignant reviver of my first affair
with his brother, and that your cruel interference
obliged
me
to go back, and steep my hands in the heart's blood of my
noble and beloved friend.
Great heavens! cried Harry, turning his flashing eyes
on Middleton.
You will not, I trust, by one instant's attention, give
colour
to a slander so diabolical, said Middleton. He laid his
hand on his bosom with all his accustomed grandeur. The
commander of a regiment can have no connexion with a
cashiered officer, desperate beneath the lash of merited
punishment, and sunk in irreparable degradation.
Glendenning started up. The landlord rose and cried,
But, gentlemen, I beg, I entreat!
Harry folded his arms, pale and agitated, for the
conviction
was now clear to him that there had been some foul
play in the matter, and that he was about to have it laid
open before him. Middleton preserved a calm and
dignified
air; conscious innocence, or conscious power, showed
itself in his tranquil demeanour and quiet smile.
Will you come with me, Lennox? said he. This
thing is really too absurd,
What is too absurd, my lord? interrupted a strange
voice.
He started, he turned, and
White
stood before him.
My dear White, exclaimed Middleton, with an
affectionate
familiarity, and without a trace of the self-important
superiority with which he had dealt with Glendenning.
My dear White, how are you?
Thank you, replied White.
But where did you come from? cried Middleton,
extending
his hand, and how
are
you?
My lord said White, without accepting the proffered
courtesy.
Had we not better conduct this inquiry in private?
remarked
Harry, with a grave mildness, which made
Middleton
turn yet paler.
Pray walk into my drawing-room, said Middleton.
And Mr. Glendenning! suggested Harry.
Would you take into your society a dishonoured man?
And the murderer of your brother? added White, with
a singular smile.
Whether he be so or not, is the question we are to
investigate
,
replied Harry.
I really cannot consent, cried Middleton, imperiously
and grandly.
Pass on, my lord!
interrupted Harry, sternly, with a look
and gesture of command, which made his distinguished
companion
start and knit his brow. But he obeyed. He could
not help it. He had, at length, met
his master
.
A la bonne heure!
said White, in a low voice.
CHAPTER XXV.
We
wish to be alone, said Middleton to his servant.
And these four gentlemen, so strangely connected
together
by the various incidents of the pastthe blood-stained,
heart-broken Glendenning; the sad, grief-worn brother, upon
whom he had caused to fall such a heavy blow; White, who
hated Middleton with all the hatred of his nature, yet who
had, till now, been unable to give vent to his feelings; and
Middleton, whose arrogant and malignant course had so
profoundly changed the destinies of all three, and who, till
now, believed himself far beyond their power.
When they were at length alone, there was a pause.
Harry's heart beat thick with the new train of thought so
suddenly awakened, and he silently drew up his tall form
and folded his arms, to gaze upon each one of those three
dark men, among whom rested the guilt of his brother's
death; for guilt, it was now evident, there had been
somewhere
.
As he stood, like a judge with the power to doom,
the whole subject of Frank's death appeared conjured up
again in his imagination in all its original distinctness, and
the idea of
vengeance
once more, like a demon, took
possession
of him. His agitation was increased by the
demeanour
of Glendenning, who, without any trace of the fiery,
high-tempered youth of eighteen months ago, scarcely
lifted
his eyes, till, at length, as if no longer able to suppress
his emotion, he prostrated himself upon the very floor at
Harry's feet, and wept.
Speak! cried Harry.
I cannot! replied Glendenning. I would ask
forgiveness
mercybut
I cannot, I do not, I
dare not
.
Nobody was prepared for this extremity of agony and
self-abasement. It touched both Harry and White. Down
the cheeks of the former rolled large tears, and even White
grew a shade sterner than he was on first entering.
This is a very extraordinary scene, gentlemen, said
Middleton.
Where is my brother? at length demanded Harry.
Murdered! said Glendenning, springing to his feet.
Slaughtered in his young beauty, savagely, like a lamb,
by the hands of a ruffian and a butcher, but
not
by mine!
Will you allow me to light a cigar, my lord? said
White.
Lord Middleton bowed, and led him apart to a
fire-machine
,
took him by the button, and was beginning to speak,
when White, who had leisurely lighted his cigar, said,
Your lordship won't smoke?
No! not now. In respect to this sad affair, my dear
White
It is a bad, filthy habit, said White; but I beg your
pardon; your lordship was saying something.
Deep to his soul Middleton felt this disrespect, and yet
more when, as he once again commenced to speak, White
again interrupted him with,
I beg your lordship's pardon, but I had rather say
nothing
in this matter, except in the presence and with the
full understanding of my friend Glendenning.
Will you not, at least, be seated?
No, my lord, not beneath roof of yours.
Do you mean to insult me, Captain White?
And if I did? replied White.
You would, of course, not refuse me immediate
satisfaction
.
I
should
refuse you for the present, till I had fully given
my testimony in this, as your lordship just now justly
termed
it, sad affair of Glendenning.
Middleton from pale grew to paler as he detected the
design of White to drive him into a duel, which, but for
him, he might easily avoid: a duel with a man whose
skill with the pistol he had seen so fearfully displayed, and
whose lofty determination of character and fatal cause of
quarrel made him such a formidable, not to say, at once,
fatal foe. Most bitterly did he now regret the insults he
had not hesitated to heap upon White when that gentleman
had come to him a suppliant, and borne with such cool
patience
and self-government those sneers and insinuations
which, at length, brought the matter to such a terrible crisis.
They had now changed places. White had the vantage
ground. He himself (oh, galling thought!) was the
suppliant
.
Glendenning was the witness of his awkward
position
and humble endurance of insults, while Lennox, the
brother of the Yankee lieutenant, whose life he had so
recklessly
sacrificed to his own pomposity and malice, had
thrown himself upon a sofa, and sat with folded arms, pale
face, and a frowning brow, as if determined to wait
patiently
the result of the present interview, and then to act as
circumstances
should require.
My lord, said Captain White, let us be frank. The
meeting down stairs was not accidental. I have been
travelling
with Glendenning for some months. Although the
world has deserted him,
I
have not deserted him, because I
knew he was not to blame in the affair with Lieutenant
Lennox, and only to blame for imprudence in a very
difficult
position, in the matter for which he has been court
martialed. I heard you and Mr. Lennox had arrived at the
same hotel the same day, and I agreed to dine here with
Glendenning, in the hope of meeting you. In accordance
with my hopes, we met you together at the same table, in a
friendly greeting! This is so remarkable, that it imboldens
me to ask you, would you be unwilling to join me in the
task of reconciling these two young men? Don't you think
circumstances have cut them out for bosom friends?
I see you mean to be impertinent, replied Middleton.
They must settle their own concerns. Nor shall I
expose
myself any longer to your insults. I pronounce the
charges of Mr. Glendenning false. If you back them, you
are also guilty of falsehood: so I brand you, and you may
take your course.
That means, my lord, you prefer a meeting with me
rather than one with Mr. Lennox.
You are insolent, sir. If you have business with me,
you had better send a friend, who may know what is due to
the usages of gentlemen.
Not till this question of your agency in causing the
death of Lieutenant Lennox be settled one way or the
other. Mr. Glendenning charges you with being the cause.
I bear my testimony to the truth of the charge.
It is false.
I waive the insult. Dare you answer me three
questions
?
I answer no questions, sir.
Harry rose and walked up to Middleton. Deep was the
suspicion aroused within him. There is something in the
human countenance, too, which speaks more than words, and
while he read on that of Glendenning grief and truth,
Middleton's
was full of guile and shuffling cowardice.
Glendenning
he could have pardoned; for Middleton there was
no excuse.
You will, perhaps, be so obliging, my lord, said he, in
a deep, tranquil voice, as to reply to any question which
I
may put you.
Certainly, my dear Lennox, certainly; but these
gentlemen
are both old enemies of mine, and I confess I
You desired to put three questions, interrupted
Lennox
,
turning to Captain White, with the utmost calmness.
What was the first?
After the return of Glendenning from his first visit to
New-York, did his lordship give a ball?
Did you give a ball, my lord?
I did.
Did you invite Captain Glendenning? said White.
I did not.
And did his lordship never state to any one a reason for
not doing so?
This is a captious question of Captain White's, not your
own, said Middleton to Lennox.
Answer it as if
it were
mine, my lord, replied Lennox,
sternly.
I do not understand you, said Middleton, haughtily.
Mr. Lennox, interrupted Glendenning, stepping up,
hear me speak. If Lord Middleton denies the truth of
what I say, let him put his denial on paper, and I engage
to bring twenty witnesses against him.
Gentlemen, this is intolerable, exclaimed Middleton.
If I were a culprit at the bar of justice, I could scarcely
be expected to stand in a more humiliating position. I hope
you will excuse me for intimating that this apartment is a
private one, and I have not yet dined.
Your lordship refuses to reply to the interrogatories,
then? demanded Harry.
I have nothing to confess, and I no longer condescend
to deny, replied Middleton. You have my warning
against the calumnies of both these gentlemen.
My lord, you will not leave town before I can
communicate
with you?
Your question is insolent.
Captain White, Captain Glendenning, I request your
company in my room, said Harry.
CHAPTER XXVI.
Lord Middleton
, when alone, involuntarily clasped his
hands. He then rose and locked the door, that no chance
intruder or servant might see the paleness of his face; for
he beheld
death
staring in his very path. With an effort,
however, not difficult for men who live much in and for the
world, he recovered his composure, unlocked the door,
ordered dinner in his room, and ate and drank as if nothing
had happened.
In the mean time Harry had heard the
whole story
,
heightened by the cool recollection of White, and the
agitation
and anguish of the forever ruined and heart-broken
Glendenning. He had details not only of the causes of the
second meeting, but the particulars of the meeting itself.
Frank's calm bearing, his bright smile, his dying agonies,
and the broken words of forgiveness he had uttered, as his
young spirit took its fearful flight.
We have seen Harry, from his high-wrought temper, on
the eve of suicide, lashed into insanity by the frown of a
girl. The reader may imagine the extent of his present
emotion. He had no principle, moral or religious; no
doubt of the propriety of duelling; no scruples against
sending such a wretch as this headlong into eternity.
Neither had he the least fear for himself. The idea of his
own fall scarcely entered his thoughts. He wrote no
letters
,
made no preparations, desired no delay. His mind
was made up. He had a stern duty to perform. He had
found, at last, the murderer of his brother: a person who
had perpetrated the most diabolical crime that ever was
committed without the least shadow of excuse.
That per
Vol. II.N
son must die
die by his handdie like a dog, and
at once
.
His soul was aroused to such a state of burning indignation
that he could scarcely wait the necessary formalities of one
of these fashionable combats. He brought forth his pistols;
he had them instantly put in order; he examined them with
care, with delight; he was going to inflict a just
punishment
for a heinous crime; he was going to lay low in the
dust the vindictive, arrogant, remorseless villain who had
brought his brother to an early grave; who had broken his
mother's heart, and cast a shadow over the last days of his
father and his own. Oh, what might not Frank have
become
,
had his career not been cut short! His high-wrought,
sympathizing heart burned at the thoughts even of the pale,
blood-drenched, spiritless Glendenning, crushed, trampled
on, his hopes and good name, nay, his happiness and his
innocence, blasted forever by the reckless pride and
power
of one malignant man; and this man, high in rank, and
opulence, and strength, thought himself
above
retribution.
He looked down on his victims and their avengers; and a
thought added fury to Harry's mind, that he himself, had he
appeared to him as a stranger, had he not been presented
to him by even no less a person than the Earl of Rivington,
he too would have been treated with that contempt with
which the haughty and inflated Middleton chose to regard
all mankind beneath him in rank.
It is left for me, then, thought Harry, as he paced his
room, to teach this proud villain a lesson. Rest, my
brother
,
restrest, pale, bloody shade! I am here to avenge
thee, or to follow thee. Dear Frank, would
you
not have
done as much for me? Oh vengeance, keep steady my
heart, and fortune sit upon my arm, that I may cut short this
monster in his career of triumph and guilt.
Thus, with half-heathen, half-theatrical thoughts, our
young philosopher awaited the result of his message. He
panted for the deadly conflict. He trembled lest, by some
chance, his victim might escape him.
White bore his message. He found Middleton in a
dressing-gown
and slippers, smoking a cigar. Well, sir, said
the latter, I suppose I need not ask to what I am indebted
for the honour of this visit?
Scarcely, my lord, said White, smiling, as he
presented
a note, whose bold, deep characters appeared traced by
a hand impatient for action.
I have already provided for this little contingency, said
Middleton. Colonel Rochelle, at the Hotel de Russie, is
kind enough to charge himself with the matter.
Good-morning
to you.
My lord! said White.
Middleton turned short round upon him with an
expression
of countenance of which the interest, although veiled
under an air of quiet indifference, was not, could not be
concealed
.
His eye glistened with a wavering hope. His lip
(for he
loved
life with a sensualist's, with an infidel's love,
and he knew a meeting with Mr. Lennox was almost
certain
death), his lip, although through a well-bred smile, trembled
perceptibly.
I suppose that's all, White: we are now entirely in your
handsmmy dear fellow.
Of course, my lord! but
There was a moment's pause, which Middleton broke
with an air of careless annoyance, as if the interest in
question
were a mere trifle.
White, you see my position. This hot-headed young
man is rushing on his fate. He is too good a shot to
permit
of much magnanimity on my part. A fine, spirited
young fellow; I would give him his life if I could. I hate
to fire at him. II detest bloodshed.
Well, my lord, said White, listening attentively.
I speak for your friend. He has father, mother, sister
and
No, my lord, no
brother
, interrupted White, so mildly
that it was impossible to say whether there were in his
mind any deeper meaning than that which met the ear.
Middleton paused, looked at him keenly, but then, as if after
having overcome an effort, proceeded.
Before you go to Rochelle, I should make a remark to
you. In representing the part I took in that unhappy
occurrence
,
you have, of course, stated your implicit belief.
But, my dear White, let me refresh your recollection on one
point. I did not advise any second meeting; I did not
want it. I had heard the matter alluded to, and, as much
for the honour of Captain Glendenning as yoursandand
mineI proposed a Court of Inquiry. You may
remember
,
I said to you I did not advise a meeting. I said so
expressly, in so many words. Did I not? I appeal to
you.
You did, my lord.
Well, then! continued Middleton, don't you think it
your duty to
state
this to your friend; it may be the means
of saving him. For myself, of course I can ask nothing,
though I might with perfect propriety implore to be saved
from the cruel necessity of shedding innocent blood. You
see my position. I cannotGod knows I would if I could
but I cannot spare this young fellow. He is too resolute,
too skilful. Yet with what heart shall I pursue the rest of
my life, with the blood of a noble, high-spirited, innocent
young man, who,
au reste
, has never injured me, upon my
hand and upon my conscience.
Upon your
what
, my lord? asked White.
Upon my conscience, replied Middleton, the shade
suddenly returning to his yellow countenance: I hope
you fully understand. I hope you do not misconstrue what
I say, Captain White.
My lord, said White, with a sardonic smile, which
revealed
all his hate and all his triumph, it would afford me
the greatest pleasure to adopt your lordship's view of the
case, and I have listened to you with patience, in hopes of
hearing something which might change my opinion. I am
sorry to say your remarks rather cast a deeper shade over
the affair.
Good God, what have I said?
I deem it a high duty, my lord, and your lordship's noted
sense of duty cannot but sympathize with me, to advise my
friend, Mr. Lennox, to carry the affair through
to the end
.
Your lordship's well-remembered example has taught me
how to be firm, and to place a lofty sense of duty above all
personal feelings. You will pardon my suggesting that, as
to your dislike to budren your
conscience
(I think that was
the word your lordship used) with the blood of an innocent,
noble young man, you should have thought of that before
you meddled with the original affair. When I waited on
you in Montreal, one word, one look, one concession from
you would have saved my friend Glendenning from a
nauseous
deed, which has blasted his life and broken his heart.
That word your lordship's high sense of
duty
did not
permit
you to utter. I bent to you; I implored you; I all but
placed myself upon my knees before you; I threw myself
upon your generosity, your humanity. I told you I was
authorized
by Glendenning to solicit from your
mercy
a
reconsideration
of your views. I need not say how this
humiliation
was received. I need not recall to your lordship's
recollection the cutting sneers, the lofty insults, the
immovable
disregard with which I, a supplicant beneath your
own roof, was coolly, remorselessly, insolently dismissed to
my task of death. I am not accustomed to beg, nor, to be
frank, inclined to forgive. The details of that hour are
written
`Where every day I turn the page to read them.'
You are driving your friend into this matter then, sir,
from mere motives of revenge? said Middleton.
No, my lord, no. I would, if I were in the place of
Lennox, do as I advise him to do. I shall act towards
him as I would, under such circumstances, he might act to
me.
You are
, my lord, and you know it very well, the
deliberate
murderer of his brother. You became so from
motives
of personal malice. You hurled the bolt without
caring
where it fell, nor what ruin it wrought, so long as you
struck the devoted head of a rash, high-tempered young
man, who had thoughtlessly offended you. The blood of
Frank Lennox rises up against you from the earth. You
have dashed to pieces the happiness of a most sweet and
affectionate family. You have put your foot upon the neck,
upon the heart of my friend. He is a wreck: only in the
grave can he ever taste repose. Towards
me
, my lord, you
have but manifested the indifference which I now feel
towards
your lordship. You have asked a favour of me. I
refuse it. Should Lennox fall beneath your arm, you have
his blood as well as that of his brother to reflect upon;
should
you
fall, your lordship will, I trust, know how to
meet yourself the fate you have not hesitated to inflict on
others.
Captain White! said Middleton, rising and ringing
the bell.
A servant came.
Show Captain White to the door!
N 2
CHAPTER XXVII.
When
Middleton was once more alone, he pressed both
his hands upon his bosom, and paced backward and forward
in an uncontrollable agitation. The world does not see the
boasting duellist in his solitary chamber, when, running up
his account with Heaven, he gazes around him for the last
time on the familiar objects of life and nature. There was
a chance for his life, perhaps, but it was very remote, and
even that chance was only the alternative of killing his
antagonist
.
Bad as he was, steeped in worldliness, tainted
with selfish pride and ungodly thoughts, he recoiled from
imbruing his hands in more blood, and from the notoriety of
an affair which began to have the regular denouement of a
drama. But it was far far more probable that the
indignant
arm of his terrible foe would leave him a corpse upon
the field. He was startled, appalled, overwhelmed. His
memory ran over his past years,
Nor left one sunny resting-place;
Nor brought him back one branch of grace.
Ah, life was sweet! His wealth, his rank, his splendid
house, his noble villa, his luxurious carriage, his expected
embassy, all the pomp, pride, and circumstance of the world
he had loved and alone lived far, floated before him like a
glorious visionthings seen in a vanished dreamnever,
never to be met with again. Each shape of opulent pleasure
rose up and passed off like Macbeth's apparition of kings:
Show his eyes and grieve his heart;
Come like shadows, so depart.
By Gd! I'm a lost man! broke from his quivering
lips, as he locked and doubly locked the door, till he could
recover from this fit of agitation.
For an hour he remained alone. It would be difficult to
describe his meditations.
At length his not very agreeable solitude was interrupted
by a knock at the door, and the servant announced Colonel
Rochelle.
Well! hallo! said the smiling second, without a care
upon his brow.
Ah! ha! replied Middleton, greeting his friend with a
bland, clear smile. You're a business man. How are
you again? Scarlet! wine!
All right! said Rochelle, with a look of triumph, as the
servant closed the door. To-morrowdaybreakpistols
ten pacespassports
vise'd
alreadyyours for England!
England? Good! A very necessary idea, that of the
passports. I'll be damned if I should have thought of it!
CHAPTER XXVIII.
Neither
party had much time to think. Every
preparation
was made with a skill, secrecy, and rapidity which
left nothing to be desired. Both White and Rochelle were
in their element when presiding over one of the remarkable
orgies of modern civilizationwhile decking with flowers
and bearing the sacrificial victim to this old surviving image
of Baal and Ashteroth. Middleton strove to write a few
letters, but could not, and remained some hours like
Prometheus
on his rock, the prey of thoughts from which he could
not fly. Harry did not even attempt any letters or other
arrangements
.
He sat by an open window that looked abroad
over the desert square and hushed city, steeped in
moonlight
and peopled only with those vague, blended,
harmonious
sounds, which floatunresting echoes of the day
over the dim night masses of a great city. There was no
fear
in his bosom. Life was not dear to him, and death
was not terrible. The one had been already scathed with
two blows of fortune, than which he thought none could be
more crushing and insupportable: the fading of his
earliest
,
only dream of love, and the loss of a brother for whom
his affection was tender and strong. With Frank in one
hand, and Fanny Elton in the other, ah! what a scene of
bliss would the world have been! Both were gone: one
to the grave, the other he believed unworthy of him.
Should the approaching combat leave him a corpse, neither
he nor any one else, he thought, would be greatly the loser.
Sometimes the image of his pale mother, clothed in black,
floated up to his eyes, but Time, that heals all wounds,
must heal hers, or bear her with him into the black and
empty void. Then Frank's well-known voice rang in his
earhis bright smile, his snowy teeth, his rosy cheek,
his thick, silky hair, his broad, white forehead, his thousand
little endearing ways, and then the image of his stiff, cold
corpse, to be avenged in a few moments.
But all these meditations were vague and mingled,
and he felt oppressed and bewildered by one tremendous
thought of what lay before him
to kill
. Sometimes he
asked himself, was it right? but that was too late.
Besides
,
do not all menall gentlemensanction the duel,
and was ever cause more holy than his? So the silent,
fragrant
,
soft hours fleeted along and bore him on, as with the
swift, black current of a river that lapses to the edge of the
cataract. He would not pause if he could, he could not if
he would. The custom had caught him with its resistless
tide, and thus duty, honour, vengeance, and necessity, all
united to sanction the deed he was about to do. With a stern
resolution, he sat lost in thought, till the wheels of the
carriage
were heard, and White came, and deliberately
determined
to take the life of his opponent or lose his own, he
set off for the appointed ground. As the dark shapes of
the city, the open spaces, shadowy woods, fragrant gardens,
and dim, sweet shores of the Elbe flew by him, he could
not but reflect he was on a dark errand, which contrasted
strangely with the calm and tender beauty of outward
nature
.
There they are! cried White.
They are welcome, said Harry, gravely.
Nothing could have been better managed. Harry himself
had nothing to do but float with the stream. Before he knew
it, he was standing, with a pistol in his hand, on a green lawn
by the road-side, in the silver light of daybreak, ten paces
in front of the pale and silent Middleton.
At the word three; said White, and began to count.
One!two!
three!
They fired. Middleton staggered forward a few paces,
and fell headlong.
Harry stood motionless, looking down on that once
haughty form, now prostrate, and which, after turning twice
over, lay on its back, the face staring wildly upward, at his
very feet. The surgeon knelt, and said, in a hurried voice,
You had better be offquick!quick!
He is not
dead?
cried Harry.
His voice sounded strangelike that of ons who
addresses
an immense, listening multitude.
Deadquite deadthrough his very heart! said the
surgeon.
Come! Lennoxcome! cried White.
With the smoke in his nostrilthe thunder surging in
his earhis hand benumbed with the thrill of so
unaccustomed
a deedhis head reeling and the ground moving
under his feet, Harry stood, still motionless, looking down
on his victim, and only repeated,
Lord Middleton is
not dead!
Dead enough, repeated White. Won't you get into
your carriage?
Yes, said Harry.
Your passport is
vise'd
for Vienna, you know!
Is it?
Mine is for London. What's the matter with you?
rouse yourselfit's getting light!
Frank is avenged, then! said Harry, and I have done
my duty.
His arm dropped without strength to his side. The
carriage
drew up, and he got in, but his eyes, as if by a fatal
fascination, were riveted upon the form which, with stark,
marble face, the blood-drenched clothes torn and cut from
the naked breast, the convulsive hands clutched full of grass
and earth, had already received the eternal seal of death.
The carriage-door was gently closed, and the postillion
mounted. Colonel Rochelle and the surgeon lifted their
hats. Harry returned their salutations calmly, and in a few
moments the spot was left far behind him, and the deed was
written among the irrevocable, ineffaceable records of the
past.
CHAPTER XXIX.
It
was with a singular sensation that our hero felt
himself
in rapid motion, dashing as fast as four swift horses
could carry him, he scarcely knew where. He endeavoured
to enjoy the stern triumph of his just and holy vengeance,
but it was, somehow or other, a very different thing from
what he had expected. The murder of his brother, which
had, till now, filled his mind, had given place to another
thought, viz., the fellow-being he had left stretched in death
upon the road-side, and a stunning and bewildering sense
of responsibility fell upon him which he could not well
analyze
.
His mind had undergone a startling change. His
fiery indignation was quenchedquenched in pity, in
horror
nay,
more, in regret. Lord Middleton, perhaps,
deserved
to die, but rather by the hands of an executioner than
by his. A thousand reasons flashed suddenly upon him
why he had better have left the deed undone; while the
inducements to it now appeared but the dictates of the hot
rage which had overflowed him yesterday. The image of
his mother rose before him. She was already ill from
Frank's death. What effect would this new shock have
upon her? How would she meet her sole surviving son?
But yesterday the sight of him would have been balm to
her wounded soul; but now, with what different emotions
would she press to her bosom the dark, blood-stained
murderer
?
The effect of this morning's work upon himself, through
the rest of his life, also startled him. For good or for evil,
the dreadful distinction of having killed a man was to mark
him wherever he went. True, his victim merited his fate,
but it was an awful thing to have inflicted it. To be a
butcherto be drenched with blood! There was nothing
mean, or selfish, or even vindictive in the act he had just
committed. It was not for himself, but for his beloved
brother he had perpetrated it. He had not even sought his
victim. Chance had thrust him before his face, and it was
with the irrepressible impulse of a noble and sublime
emotion
,
in which all men must sympathize, that he had killed
him. Yet the deed was a mighty and a terrible one. A class
of his fellow-creatures would applaud it, but there were
others
all
the pious, all the calm and wisewho would regard
it as a crime, and him as a
murderer
. He shuddered; his
blood grew cold; he ordered the postillion to drive faster.
On reaching Vienna, he, for the first time, entered a room
to sleep. On undressing himself, he perceived the button
of his waistcoat had been shot off, and a ball had passed
through the lappel of his coat.
Dn him! he exclaimed.
But he stopped. He had forgotten. He was speaking
of the deaddead by his hand. The thought pierced him
like a sword, and his utmost efforts could only bring
himself
to a gloomy and unsmiling tranquility. Indeed, he felt
as if he should never smile again. He felt as if every man's
eyes were on him, and he muttered, as he laid himself,
chilled and shocked, into bed, Shall I never get that
dying
look out of my imagination?
His fatigue and excitement had been great, and he fell
into a deep sleep, and then into a dream.
He thought he was at home, which he had never quitted.
He sat in the midst of the family circle at breakfast.
Frank was at his side, laughing and talking with a strange
living distinctness, and the rest were gayly rallying him
about Fanny Elton.
And I wonder where we shall be five-and-twenty years
hence? said his mother.
Be? replied his father; why hereFrank
commander-in-chief
,
with his eyebrows and whiskers a little more
bushy, if possible; and Harry a senator or secretary of state.
Miss Elton may be a very decent sort of girl, said
Frank, but as forin respect toso far from there being
any danger of
Hold your tongue! said his father.
And then a burst of gay laughter, in which he thought
he joined till the tears filled his eyes.
Then he was at Rose Hill, wandering with Frank through
the scented walks, and gazing on Fanny Elton's graceful
and noble form; and then he was with her alone, walking
down the hill and asking her why she had forgotten him.
I have not forgotten you, cried she, fixing her eyes on
him. I love you beyond all other earthly things. It is a
cruel mistake which has separated us; and, as she spoke,
she came nearer to him, put her arm around his neck, and
kissed him.
And then he knelt at her feet, and she placed her fingers
on his forehead and parted his hair, and looked at him with
her deep, tender eyes; and he led her back to the house
and to his mother, who received her with open arms, and
embraced, first her, then him, and an ineffable happiness
overspread all things: and a clergyman came, and they
stood together at the altar, and the holy man opened the
book and read, and a peace that passeth understanding
entered
his heart; and soft music rose in the distance, and
the odour of flowers was wafted to his senses by the cool
afternoon air, and Fanny Elton was his bride.
Thenlike a stroke of thunder bursting from a cloudless
sky
Middleton
suddenly appeared in the midst of them,
and fired a pistol at Frank, who shrieked and fell back, dead,
and covered with blood. Then his cold, ghastly body lay
extended upon a table; and the whole circle stood around,
and gazed at it with pale faces and quivering lips, in deep
silence
;
when a peal of contemptuous and triumphant laughter
broke the solemn stillness, and
Middleton
again stood
leering
like a fiend, pointing to the sad group and the stark body,
and laughing till the tears ran down his cheeks. Then the
blood of the dreamer began to boil in his veins, and he knelt
down and swore he would pursue and kill this demon; and
his mother, and Mary, and Mrs. Elton, and Fanny,
surrounded
him and implored him to desist, and caught him with
convulsive grasp, and screamed, and prayed; but he shook
them fiercely offnay, in his impatient vengeance, he thrust
Fanny from him with a force that threw her senseless to
the earth, and dashed a reckless blow upon his mother's
forehead, and then he was free, and, with rapid feet, and
burning curses on his lips, he went on and on in the
pursuit
;
and his enemy fled, and he followed; till at length
he no no longer ranhe flewhe rose from the ground
he glided through the airhe ascended to the roofs of
houses, the battlements of old castles, the black, ragged
edges of inaccessible cliffs; at last, in a green plain, he
overtook the fugitive, and shot him through the heart, and
placed his foot upon his breast, and laughed, in his turn, till
he could scarcely stand. When lo, beneath his feet, the
ghastly body, all dripping and red, began to stir; and he
looked down to see, and behold, the corpse arose, with its
dead, sunken, horrible face, and wide, fixed eyes, and caught
at him with convulsive hands, as of a man in a fit, or a
raving
lunatic. He started and fled, but his pursuer was at
his back; and wherever he went, the spectre still followed
over seas, over valleys, over mountains, over moors
through busy cities and laughing crowdsacross
uninhabited
deserts, into black, wet caves, down fathomless
abysses
but
still the spectre, with outstretched hands, chased
him. He strove with agony unutterable, till at length he
found himself in a sepulchre full of dead men's bones, and
dripping with blood, and echoing with the wailings and
moanings of damned spirits, and he thought he was in hell,
and there was no outlet, so that he could no longer elude
his frightful enemy; and he felt an iron and a burning
grasp upon his shoulder, and he saw Frank walking near
in a sunshiny garden, smiling and picking the flowers
carelessly
,
and he knew he could save him if he could but
make him aware of his danger, and he tried to scream, but
could not stircould not utter a soundcould not even
breathe.
In his struggle of agony he awoke, dripping with sweat,
trembling, and overcome with terror.
He started up and looked around; the form of
Middleton
still seemed to stand before him, gazing sadly on him.
Hastily rising, he rang the bell, threw over him a
robe de
chambre
, and when, at length, with some difficulty, he
aroused
a servant, he ordered a light, on the plea of indisposition.
Unable to sleep, he sat lost in reflection till the morning
broke. We shall not attempt to lift the veil from his
meditations
.
It will be easily imagined they were not of
precisely
the same nature as those which had occupied him the
wakeful night previous to the meeting.
CHAPTER XXX.
Several
days passed, and several nights. The former
were employed in vain attempts to divert his mind by
sight-seeing
and other pleasures. He found he was a wiser
and a sadder man than he had been before; he had lost
the power of enjoyment from simple things; he had thrown
away his careless ease; boyhood was gone; even youth
had passed away; he had become suddenly
a man
, and a
stern one; he suffered inexpressibly, as any one with an
element of good in him must, and
ought
to suffer, under
similar circumstances. But it was very different suffering
from that of grief. The loss of his brother had also been
suffering; but, ah! how unlike his present experience!
Grief is softening, elevating, purifying; remorse withers,
consumes, and destroys.
Vol. II.O
His nights were invariably sleepless. There is nothing
more exhausting than the loss of sleepmore wearing on
both mind and bodymore likely to impair health and
happiness
.
Yet he found he had in a great degree, at least
for the present, thrown away that blessing. From his first
slumber he would speedily awake with a start, and then
came those long, weary watches of the night, when the most
cheerful subjects of earthly meditation wear an aspect so
different from that which they present in the day. Here
he could not withdraw himself from the voice of reproach
and accusation. Then the idea that he had shed human
blood in merciless vengeance weighed on his mind and
oppressed
his soul; and Middleton's dying face presented
itself
to his imagination with a horrible distinctness. And
whom had he slain? A weak, pompous fool; a poor
victim
.
And how had he slain him? The world would
consider
that his opponent had had an equal chance; but his
conscience taught him better. He had
not
had an equal
chance; his own perfect skill with the pistol, he was well
aware, far surpassed that of his victim; he felt, when he
fired, he was inflicting
death
. Whatever interpretation,
therefore, the world might put upon the matter, he knew he
was
a murderer. Whatever excuse he might have had, he
had deliberately killed a man who could neither escape, nor
resist, nor resent; he had taken from the laws of society
and from God (if, indeed, there were one), the task of
punishment
;
he had cut off a despicable fool in the midst of
his folly; he had launched a new thunderbolt upon the
heart of his mother, which might destroy her also. Ah!
he repented of the bloody deed! Not that he had a
definite
feeling of guilt, but he was overwhelmed with
sympathy
,
horror, disgust, alarm, doubt, pity for the mother who
watched his course with such interest, and regret that his
own thoughts and feelings should be thus shocked and
overshadowed.
After a week spent in this state of depression, he
resolved
to arouse himself, to shake off the superstitious and
nervous terrors to which he had so weakly yielded, and to
drown, in a rapid and brilliant tour, all his youthful
meditations
.
He concluded to start immediately; but first to
write to his mother a simple account of the circumstance.
He tried to do so. He wrote and rewrote again and again,
and tore up letter after letter, unable to satisfy himself as to
the best mode of making the communication. While
engaged
in this task, his candour obliged him to confess that
the act, so difficult to relate, must be, at least, a doubtful
one. Its nobleness, its stern justice, its terrible
retribution
,
which, before the perpetration, had been so clear to
him, seemed but mockery when he attempted to set them
forth to his mother. Her pale face, her streaming eyes,
her look of despair, her hands uplifted for mercy on him,
seemed to fill the page he was writing on. It was,
however
,
a necessary duty, and he accomplished it; and a cool,
simple statement, announcing the discovery of Middleton's
guilt, proved by White and Glendenning, the instantaneous
meeting, and the fall of the man who had deprived them of
their beloved Frank, was at length completed. He
appealed
,
at the same time, to his mother's forgiveness, and,
before
he was aware of what he had written, volunteered a
sacred promise never, under any circumstances, to engage
in another duel. He would take blows, insults, opprobrious
epithetsanythingeverything rather than repeat an event
which, he candidly acknowledged, rendered him deeply
unhappy
.
He desired, at the same time, to know whether he
was to have the great pleasure of seeing the family in
Europe
,
and when; and stated his intention to take an
extended
Eastern tour, from which due notice of their
intended
embarcation would, however, speedily recall him.
On reading over the letter, he added the following
postscript
:
I perceive, my dearest mother, that I have laid myself
under a
vow
. Do not fear I shall ever break it; I repeat it
here deliberately, and with regreat that I had not made it
before
rather than after this last calamity, for such I
consider
it. I acknowledge your superior wisdom and sense of
right. I wish I had complied with your desire so often
expressed
.
I am convinced no man ever fell in a duel
without
acknowledging to himself, if he had time to do so, that
he had been a fool, and no one killed another without
bitterly
and eternally repenting of it, unless deprived, by
nature
or education, of a warm heart and a clear
understanding
.
This duty performed, Harry set off upon his travels,
whither
we shall not follow him. He extended his tour as far
and with the design of occupying as much time as possible.
The letters he received from home were heart-rending.
Those from his mother affected him profoundly, more from
their subdued, deep melancholy, than from their allusions to
the new calamity which had fallen upon her. With a
characteristic
gentleness, she spared him all reproaches, and she
even assured him that she had borne the blow with a
patience
which could only have come from above. Their visit
to Europe was still deferred, and Harry still lingered in the
East, examining into the state of those interesting countries,
which to the European have almost the awful solemnity of
a previous world.
From Greece, Turkey, Syria, and Egypt, spending a
winter
or a summer first in one town, then in another,
according
to the caprice of the moment or the relief he found in
any particular place, or from any particular person or study,
he went over into Russia, and occupied himself with the
various peculiarities of that vast empire, sometimes
plunging
into the splendid gayeties of the court circles, and
sometimes
loitering in the retreats of the nobles, or watching with
interest the modes of life and mind among the serfs. He
devoted eighteen months to the northern countries of the
Continent, so little visited by travellers, where he found,
with surprise, materials of interest he had never dreamed
of. In their turn, Germany, France, Switzerland, and Italy
occupied his attention. He studied their forms of
government
,
their history, the character of the people, moral,
political
,
and religious, their various resources and
peculiarities
,
and their relations with his own country. Gradually,
as the months and years of this period rolled away, he had
conceived the plan of a systematic course of self-cultivation,
and carried it into effect with severe determination. He
had the custom to stop months, and sometimes a whole
season
,
in order to investigate some particular subject
thoroughly
.
By means of these habits of intense application, and
of the materials thus poured richly into his mind, and
carefully
digested, his intellect became strengthened and
matured
.
His opinions, subjected to a new course of
examination
,
were rejected or remodelled, and became more definite
and just, the result of observation and reflection. His
reasoning
powers were enlarged and sharpened, and, besides
a large stock of general information, he had attained a far
more accurate idea of history, of the present state of
mankind
,
of the literature and achievements of different nations,
and of the powers, characteristics, and limits of the human
mind. He had not neglected either his own country or his
own profession, but, by a careful study of the Roman law,
added to that of the existing codes of various countries, and
particularly those of his own, he was far more competent
to take a high rank at the bar of his native city than he
would have been had he spent the whole of this time in the
routine of daily business.
But (let not the reader start, for he will one day find his
own life has passed even thus unheeded away) all this
travelling
and studying, these winterings in one part of the globe
and
summerings
in another, took
time
, and when Harry, one
winter, settled himself in a comfortable lodging at Florence
to consider what he would do next, he happened to
calculate
how long he had been abroad, and he found, with a very
considerable surprise, which recalled the amazement of his
father on reaching his fiftieth birthday, that he had been
absent from home
ten years
. He started to perceive so
much of his life had vanished, and his conscience smote
him for having remained so long away from his father and
mother, deprived as they were, too, of Frank, and by so
frightful an accident. But he had, from year to year,
expected
them in Europe, and he had really been profoundly
occupied, and the recollection of Middleton's death clung to
him with a never-ceasing horror, and his own infidel
opinions
had made him indifferent, if not selfish, and he
dreaded
going home with his dark, stern, bloody brow, to meet Miss
Elton, and to throw a new shadow over his altered
domestic
circle. He had improved his mind, but he had not
acquired
any moral light. He had enjoyed pleasures, but they
had come and passed away like bright shadows, leaving no
trace behind. He had sought the alleviation of all kinds of
society, from that of the royal hall to that of the student's
closet and the peasant's lowly hut, but from the great and
the gay, like the wise and the gifted, he had gained nothing,
learned nothing to make him happy. Happiness had been
the object of his search, but he had not found it. Through all
his enjoyments, all his studies, and all his occupations there
was one dark, tremendous idea
death!
He had seen it: he
had suffered; he had inflicted it. It was the shadow, the
crowning mystery of his life; he could neither reconcile
himself
to it nor understand it. The two fatal events, the death
of Frank and the fall of Middleton, had deprived him of
youth's greatest charm and greatest danger,
thoughtlessness
.
O 2
He had become a
thinker
, and all things were changed to
him and he was changed to all things. This idea of
death
had gradually awakened in him a deep sense of the
valuelessness
,
the mockery, the mystery of life. His existence
was rolling away; his career would speedily come to an
end, and he was weighed down with astonishment and
agony
at the fleetingness, the worthlessness of everything.
The skies, the air, and the objects of the world were but
visions. The ground seemed passing away from beneath
his feet, and his own insignificant, useless, perishable
nature
to be on the brink of annihilation. All around him was
a cloud, a folly, an insult, a mockery, a lie. Pen may not
paint the indignant and bitter scorn, the sense of wrong and
oppression, the hatred and the despair which fair things
raised in his bosom, his curling lip when he gazed on a
flower, his gloomy scorn when the rising sun threw his glory
over the sky and earth, and, more than all, his infinite
contempt
for the whole human race, with their idle credulity
and dreams of superstition, their inflated hopes of immortal
happiness, their ceremonies of worship paid to the
merciless
,
crushing, unlistening, blind chance which presides over
the universe.
In short, pleasure, society, study, and travel at length
fatigued him; science disappointed, knowledge oppressed
him. He wanted a refuge; he wanted repose. He
continued
to receive frequent letters from all his family, as
well as from Emmerson. Those of his father had recently
grown shorter and more vague, and, at length, announced
that circumstances had obliged him to abandon entirely his
contemplated European tour, and that Harry might turn his
step homeward. The reader must imagine the tenour of
his mother's letters, although it was evident she did not
allow
herself to give way to all her feelings. Emmerson, on
the contrary, wrote at full, and it was on the strength of his
representations that Harry had remained so long abroad.
He assured him that everybody was well, that he had hopes,
notwithstanding the proposed abandonment of the
European
tour, that the next summer would see the whole family
in Paris, and that all was going on as usual.
These frequent epistles from Emmerson, written in an
affectionate and confidential manner, were very grateful to
Harry. They were the accounts of a cool, disinterested
observer on the spot, and effectually calmed the fears and
anxieties so apt to assist the heart of an absentee from
home.
Harry had devoted a great part of his time in Germany to
philosophy, and philosophy led him to religion, or, rather, to
irreligion.
About this period the celebrated Life of Jesus Christ by
Strauss fell into his hands. This work is the most learned,
searching, powerful, and successful attack ever made on
Christianity, and has been justly considered an important
event in ecclesiastical history. The mighty intellectual
efforts of the German mind in philosophy had fully prepared
our student to read, and to yield to this astonishing
production
,
particularly as he saw that the great and learned
people
received it with enthusiasm, and that, with exceptions,
the
savans
of the day did not conceal their opinion that it
would prove a death-blow to the greatest illusion that had
ever occupied the human mind.
Harry read it, and, for a time, the triumph of discovering
so able a champion of his own views threw around the
subject a sort of wonder and delight. It confirmed,
apparently
forever, his entire infidelity. Why was delight among
his feelings on arriving at a certainty that the most
cheering
hope ever conceived by mortals was an illusion?
Because
it relieved him from a secret fear, of which, with all
his philosophy, he had not been able to divest himself, that
when he killed Middleton, he had offended a superior power,
which would hereafter call him to account. He went on
now studying with more zeal than ever all the arguments
against Christianity. He nearly confined his reading to
infidel
authors and historians. His industry was great, and
he possessed himself of the entire ground on which the
skeptic stands, of all the probabilities of infidelity, and all
the improbabilities and impossibilities which can be urged
against religion. He read again with attention certain
portions
of the Bible; but only to confirm his disbelief of it.
While thus employed, he was attacked with a strange
weakness, and heavy, painful headache, the consequence of
too much mental exertion, too little exercise, and too
constant
brooding over his own dark thoughts and his one
terrible
recollection.
One evening he had returned from a gloomy, solitary
ramble, much more unwell than usual, and was undressing
for bed, when, in a chair by the table, he observed the
figure of a man seated. On fixing his eyes on him, he
beheld
,
with a thrill of horror, the face of Middleton, calm,
pale, sad, and noble, the lip and temple spotted with blood.
This same appearance had, at different times during the
previous years, presented itself to him, and, generally,
before
a severe illness. He knew it was the vision of a
heated
imagination, but it always overcame him with unutterable
terror.
He rushed forward, but the apparition disappeared. He
seized the chair and threw it across the room. No one
was there. He staggered back to the bed, literally
overcome
.
Before morning he was in a raging fever. In a week
his life was in danger. In a month it was despaired of,
and, as he retained at times the possession of his senses,
his physician told him frankly to regulate his affairs.
He did not suffer much. At intervals his power of
reflection
appeared rather increased than diminished, and he
lay thus some days.
During this period he was visited by many strange, new,
large thoughts. The incidents of his vanished years passed
before him, and the images of his distant home and friends
were present with him. Sometimes he was delirious, and
again his faculties came clear and distinct to him. We
cannot trace, thought by thought, the process of change
which now went on with him. His feelings were often
thrilling and sublime beyond description. He saw now
what it was to want religion; what a helpless creature the
mortal is by himself. About to step off the precipice, he
looked around for some hand to guide, some voice to
console
him; nor, infidel as he was, could he believe it
possible
that a support so necessary should be denied to man
even by the blind chance which had given the ear to hear
and the eye to see. Was it credible that, all wants else
supplied, this, the greatest, should have been omitted? No,
it was not. A singular consciousness shot into his mind
that he had never given the subject the serious
consideration
it merited. The recollection of the famous work of
Strauss occurred to him, and he thought this author had
fulfilled but a useless and a cruel task if he had really
caused any Christian to abandone his faith. As he lay thus
powerless, weak, and dying, never to see the green earth
again, never to hear the voices of those he loved, neither
here nor hereafter, to all eternity, this want of some aid
above the worldin short, of
supernatural
aid, grew intense.
The thought that a wonderful and mysterious personage had
once lived who professed to
give
this light, struck him with
a very strange effect. This person had been predicted, had
come, and had been received by millions. The wisest and
greatest of men had believed in him. He saw nothing
improbable
in it. He who made the sun, the moon, the stars,
the comets, could make a
prophet
, or could manifest himself
in person, or in any other way could conceal himself or
reveal himself, or do what he pleased; for he was obviously
beyond the conception of man.
Too much reflection heated his brain and brought on
another crisis. He felt his senses wavering. The universe
seemed to reel around him, and the earth to pass away from
beneath him. He felt like a wretch falling off a precipice,
impotent and lost in infinite horror and despair.
When he recovered his senses, his physician informed
him he was out of danger. The strength of his constitution
had mastered the disease. But he must not speak or move.
CHAPTER XXXI.
In
a few days he sat up. He was extremely emaciated
and weak. He was informed that his recovery had been
almost miraculous. On relating the circumstance of the
figure which had appeared the first evening of his illness,
and at the previous periods of the last several years, the
physician referred it at once, of course, to shattered nerves
and a disturbed imagination, and stated that it was not an
uncommon symptom.
When the doctor left him, a feeling of weakness and wo
came over the feeble invalid; he threw himself upon a sofa,
and could not restrain his tears. His heart swelled with
mingled emotions, which all merged in an insupportable
despair. Thoughts of his happy, innocent boyhood, of
Fanny
Elton, the still deeply-beloved, first-chosen object of his
affection, and of Frank, his brother, now mouldering in his
early grave; the horrible image of the dying Middleton,
the conviction that he could never know peace of mind
again, and the idea that he had recovered from death only
to sink back, in the course of a few years, into a state of
annihilationall these thoughts pressing upon him together
were too much for him. He regretted his recovery. Why
had they brought him back to life? Why had he not gone
to ashes and the worm? Why! since he must go to them at
last? He looked forward to the path before him: a world
of phantoms and blind chance, with no reward for virtue, no
protection from vice, no guarantee against death, no hope
for the future, no motive in self-cultivation but what arose
and ended with this transitory scene, no glory in pure things;
no distinction, but passing and conventional ones between
right and wrong, no meeting again with the dead, no future,
no God; all dark, all accidental, all reckless, all cold and
lonely, and all fleeting away into nothing. What was the
world, what was life on such terms? Oh, nothing, worse
than nothing.
His long illness had made him hysterical, and, as these
really sad and withering thoughts rolled through his mind,
like the dark, damp clouds of a stormy sky over the head
of the wave-tossed sailor, who, in his little boat, without
compass or rudder, finds himself abandoned to the pitiless
tempest, the saddest tears a mortal could shed flowed down
his cheeks, and he abandoned himself to utter despair.
Yes! he murmured, my poor mother, and Mr. Elton,
and Seers, were right in one respect. I have tried the
world, and found it wanting. I have gone abroad in life
confident in infidelity, and all around me has become hollow
and miserable. I do want aid and protection from that
Great Being who created me. I am weak and guilty,
blood-stained
and broken-heartedoh God!
And now, from his loneliness and his despair, his soul
turned to his
Maker
at last.
If thou hearest thy creatures, have mercy upon me! If
there be light, let it shine on me! for, of a truth, by
myself
I am a wretch.
There was a knock at the door. He rose hastily,
ashamed
of his tears. The intruder was his servant. He
brought a letter and went out again. Harry left it on the
table a long time untouched. He was afraid to open it; he
felt he had no strength in himself to bear any shock. That
proud self-confidence, that buoyant strength, that daring
readiness to meet events, alas! they had left him. They
had gone with his youth and thoughtlessness, his iron nerves,
his round cheek, his careless forehead, and unshaded heart.
At length he took the mute messenger. It was covered
with addresses and post-marks. It seemed redolent of the
air of home. The flowers of Rose Hill breathed from its
folds. The faces of the loved ones associated with that
spot crowded around him, and he kissed it as he
recognised
the writing of his mother, and saw that it was not
sealed
with black.
No, no! They are yet all there. No new stroke has
bereft me; my father, my mother, Mary, and Fanny are
not yet gone down into the black, unfathomable, eternal
abyss. Oh why am I so long away from them? Why do
I spend my weary, lonely life, distant from this sweet
circle
?
True, Frank is no more there; true, I shall go back
a strange, altered, darkened, gloomy man, with bloody hands
and a broken heart. But I will go back; they will pity
and forgive me.
He tore open the letter. It was from his mother. It was
dated nearly a year ago. It had been following him through
several places, had been in the house since his first illness,
and been withheld till now by order of the doctor. It
contained
another addressed by the hand of his father. He
read his mother's first.
CHAPTER XXXI.
My beloved Son
,
Come home and share our sorrows. Come home and
lessen our unhappiness
He trembled at this ominous commencement, but went on.
Great changes have taken place within the last year.
We have lost all our property
. A succession of the most
unexpected events has ruined hundreds, and involved us in
the same fate. An appalling monetary crisis, as you must
well know, is sweeping over the country. Your father, in
his generous confidence in, and characteristic desire to
assist
other people, has risked everything and lost everything.
He is obliged to begin the world again. Poor Mr. Elton
is no more. He died five months ago. Heavy losses,
sustained
,
in common with so many of his townsmen, occurring
at a time when his health was feeble, proved too much for
him. Mrs. Elton is with us, and Fanny alsothe
tenderest
of nurses and the sweetest of friends. Mr. Emmerson
but the story is not altogether one to commit to paper.
You will hear it on your arrival, which I hope will not be
long delayed. We have a thousand interesting things to
tell you, but will not enter upon such subjects till we meet.
It grieves me to add still farther to your distress and
alarm, but I think it better to prepare you at once for the
state of your dear father. He has been dangerously, and
is still distressingly ill. For some time his disorder went
into his eyes, and he was, during a period, entirely blind.
He is better, but his final recovery of sight is doubtful.
Hoping to retrieve our affairs, we long resolved not to
communicate
them to you till we could accompany the
recital
with better tidings. That hope is now past. It is
decreed
by an All-wise Providence that we shall taste sorrow
in our old age. But He has mingled the cup with one good,
which counterbalances the evil. What this blessing is you
will learn by the enclosed letter from your dear father,
which he insisted upon writing himself, lest you should
think his blindness worse than it is. Indeed, since a few
days, he sees very well, and can read at intervals without
danger. I fear, however, for purposes of business, he will
never be what he was.
I know you will hasten home, my dearest son, the
moment
this reaches you. But do not be too much alarmed,
knowing, as we do, that `whom He loveth He
chasteneth
,'
and that this life and all its vicissitudes are
comparatively
unworthy the grief of a rational being, except those
events of it which relate to spiritual things. Do you know,
can you believe you have been absent
nearly ten years?
When I pass in review what has befallen us in the interim,
the period seems long enough; but when I recall the
morning
we accompanied you to your ship, I can fancy you left
us only yesterday; and so life passes away. Answer me
now, my son, is it not a dream?
Mary is well and happy, and sends her love. There is
a story connected with her, but, with a yet unconquered
love of mischief, she has forbid my even alluding to it.
AndI shall really tell you nothing until you are here.
By the blessing of God, notwithstanding what I have
suffered
,
my health is excellent. My heart yearns to embrace
you, my dear Harry. Oh, may God grant you that light
which will render all things endurable, all things welcome.
I do not doubt there is happiness yet in store for us. Read
the enclosed letter with attention. Surely our misfortunes
are but
His
means to accomplish His wise ends.
God bless, preserve, and enlighten you, my beloved
wanderer, and soon return you to your ever affectionate
mother.
Although Harry's hand literally trembled at this
astounding
intelligence, he hastened to open his father's letter. It
ran thus:
My dear Boy
,
Your beloved mother will have informed you of the fine
doings we have had here, or, at least, of some of them. But
don't mind; we'll manage matters yet, only now I must
depend
a little more on you. As I have no doubt these
agreeable epistles will bring you home double quick time, I
shall not enter into any particulars, especially as my doctor
pretends that I must yet be careful of my eyes. Keep up
your spirits, and let us see you here when you can
conveniently
manage it. We are beginning to feel your absence,
really
.
I would not write at all to-day, were it not my desire,
as well as my duty, to make one remark to you, which will
probably occasion you more surprise than all the rest of
our revolutions. The truth is, I am much altered since you
left. Many circumstances have occurred to change my
character. Poor Frank's death was the first and most
important
.
Your own affair with Lord Middleton came so
close upon it as to furnish me serious food for reflection.
Men have lost their sons before now; they do every day,
and will continue to do so; but the sudden cutting off of poor
Frank in that manner was sufficient to shake and loosen the
world's hold of me. It is an old and trite saying, that `life
is a
dream;
' but I begin to
feel
that it is so. I am sixty
years old, and the longer I live, the more I see the
fleetingness
,
the nothingness of everything around me, taken by
itself
.
This has led me to a train of thought and to a habit
of reading and investigation very different from any I ever
had before, and which eventually caused me to look forward
through the medium of the great truths of
Christianity
to
that other and better world, to which we are all so rapidly
hastening. I had my doubts at first, but they gradually
faded away, and I am of the conviction that, whatever may
be the arguments on the other side of the question, they are
Vol. II.P
nothing against those in its favour. The only reason why
all men are not Christians is, either that they are wilfully
bad and corrupt, or that they are too much engaged with
the cares, pleasures, and pursuits of this world to allow of
their examining the subject attentively and candidly. Vain
speculations in philosophy and empty, visionary views, I
have depended on long enough, and found them entirely
useless. They are not what the Great Creator has given
his creatures to support, guide, and instruct them in their
way through this life. I am no enthusiast, my dear Harry.
I am more gay, more happy, and cheerful than I was before,
nor do I shrink from all the innocent pleasures to which I
have been accustomed, because I am convinced I am under
the immediate government of a merciful God. On the
contrary
,
while I endure sorrow with more resignation, I should
find in prosperity abundant charms. Need I add that, if
anything could increase my happiness in meeting my dear
boy after so long and eventful and absence, it would be the
certainty that he also has
really examined
the question of
Christianity. I say examined, because I am quite satisfied
that no one can candidly and cooly examine, at least, no
sensible and clear understanding, without becoming a
believer
in the Holy Scriptures.
Don't mistake me, my boy: I am not a long-faced bigot,
afraid of looking at the world, and flying from mirth and
pleasure. I
was
a broken-hearted, gloomy being after poor
Frank's accident, but this change in my opinions has
restored
to me my gayety and more than my accustomed
happiness
.
You will find a man can believe in God and our
Redeemer without running into any irrational excess or
practising the familiarities of some believers; nor must you
suppose grief has turned my head or weakened my
understanding
grief
had nothing to do with changing my
opinions
it
only
drove
me into an examination; by taking from
me the props and supports of the outward world, it threw me
upon myself, and taught me the tremendous truth, that there
existed there
nothing
but darkness and chaosnot a place
to rest onnot one subject which I could bear to reflect on
in the long and terrible hours of the wakeful nights.
Everything
in the universe seemed destroyed, or destined to
be so, except
Christianity
, and I grasped at that, because
there was nothing else
to save me from infinite destruction and
infinite despair. Happily, the more I examined, the more I
was convinced. When the great idea had once entered my
mind, everything I observed in nature, history, life, and
myself
,
confirmed it. Each moment grew brighter, as at the
dawn of a day streaming gradually and gloriously into the
windows of a smoky theatre, whose lurid light and false
splendour pale and fade before the broadening glory of
nature.
If you have not made the same experience, my son, we
will make it together. Doubts will arise. but they will
melt away like night-fogs from the solid mountains. If you
have not at once the perfect faith of the centurion, you will,
at least, say, with the father of the possessed child, `
Lord,
I believe; help thou mine unbelief!
'
CHAPTER XXXII.
Harry's
astonishment, on the perusal of these letters,
was too great for expression. He sent instantly for the
doctor again, and earnestly pleaded the necessity of
immediately
starting for New-York. He was met by an
inexorable
negative. He was too weak to move at all, under six
weeks at least, and by no means could he yet venture upon
a sea-voyage. The anxiety of the patient, so far from
persuading
,
only confirmed his merry little tyrant of a doctor
in his decision.
But what is the affair? inquired the doctor. What
has happened? You are nervous and agitated. Ah! I see!
Your
letters:
you have had them too soon. I ought to have
delayed them at least a month longer.
If you knew, doctor, what necessity there is for my
going.
Necessity! Bah! There's no necessity that must not
yield to sickness or death. Man can't alter predestination.
Were you to start in this state, you would probably, in two
days, find yourself on your back in some little dirty
Gasthof
,
full of tobacco-smoke and noise, in a fever ten times more
dangerous than ever. The result would be, you would
leave your bones there, and that would be the end of you.
Your news is bad, I perceive. What's the matter? You've
something on your mind, and, excuse me if I add, your
recovery
has been retarded, I fear, by something on your
mind. It seems your
morale
is affected. This figure, this
apparition,
ma foi! ce sont des btises, maisenfin
there
must be some cause, some
secret
.
There is a secret, certainly.
Well, so I thought, and, eh? don't you think your
doctor
ought to know? How do you expect me to cure you,
if I treat you for bodily disease while you are all the while
wearing away under mental sufferings?
My story is sad, said Harry, and, perhaps, you ought
to know it.
I
believe my malady
is
more of the mind than
body.
Well, there! put this pillow beneath your shoulders;
don't exert yourself to sit up. Tell me, now, what is the
peculiar
trouble. You are marriedhey? and live unhappily
with your wife, eh? or, rather, don't live with her at all?
I am not a married man! said Harry. My
unhappiness
has a deeper, more unalterable cause.
A deeper and more unalternable cause than a bad wife?
Ma foi!
cried the doctor, smiling in that very easy manner
in which most men (physicians in particular) listen to the
misfortunes of others. I should like to know what sort of
a trouble that could be.
I will tell you, said Harry, in the fewest possible
words. I left a happy, affluent home between nine and ten
years ago.
And? said the doctor.
My first blow was the death of a young brother, of whom
I was rather fond, in a duel, and under very peculiar
circumstances
.
So? Well, that's bad,
maisma foi!que voulez vous?
In this world men must die, in one way or other, and others
must survive them.
I should have premised that my mind had been
prepared
for unhappiness byby theyou won't think me a fool,
doctor, but the fact is, I had an
attachment
to a young girl,
whose character, loveliness, superior mind, and gentle
heart
Put all your descriptions in one single word,
interrupted
Doctor B, smiling again, and say she was your
mistress
.
Of course, there never was, and there never can be,
another equal to her in all thethecharms and virtues,
et cetera, et cetera, et cetera
, of mind, manners, person, heart,
face, head, feet,
et cetera, et cetera, et cetera!
Harr looked rather grave, and raised his eyes to the
countenance of the fat, gay, frisky little man who presumed
to jest at the confidence he had required in his professional
character, but the doctor looked so equally indifferent to his
wrath or his sadness, and so excessively cool and knowing,
that his frown changed into a smile, although rather a
melancholy
one.
There, that's right! said the doctor. You were
going
to be angry; that's a good symptomsign you're not
dead yet. Then your smile is an indication that your
senses
are returninggood again: go on with your story. If
I jest and take a cheerful view of it, my good friend, believe
me it is only to counteract the very gloomy one you have
long been accustomed to take of it. Perhaps mine is too
light; probably yours too dark. Truth may lie in the
medium
;
but be assured I regard the matter as the generality
of men will. We should mourn less over our afflictions
could we but see them with the eyes of other people. Now
what became of this wonderful, enchantingI beg your
pardon
!
you are looking serious againwhat became of this
young lady?
Sheshe did not return my attachment.
Ah! said the doctor, feeling under his chin with the
handle of his gold-headed stick. So, after all, your
dulcinea
turned out
un peu coquette
. But men don't
die
nowadays
from these things.
I left home and country in order to forget her.
A little romance! said the doctor.
In Dresden, some years ago, continued Harry, who
felt a certain relief in unbosoming himself, I met the
person
who had caused the slaughter of my brother. I called
him out and killed him.
Allons done!
exclaimed the doctor, more seriously.
He fell beneath my first fire, and died instantly. This
circumstance has, I confess, occasionally given me
considerable
uneasiness. To say the truth, I have never been
happy since, never shall, never can be happy again.
Death
has been ever since almost the only subject of my
contemplation
.
I have travelled far and wide; I have sought the
attractions of society and study. But the world is an
altered
place to me. Life is a burden; a secret voice whispers
me continually, all is vanity, all a dream, all I love are
phantoms
.
I am myself a phantom. I shall soon die, and sink
P 2
into annihilation without having enjoyed one pleasure or
accomplished one should purpose worth living for.
Ah! ejaculated the doctor, arranging his cravat in the
mirror as he listened. I see, I see!
The thought of the person whom I have killed seems
to grow more distinct with time, instead of fading away, as
I hoped it would. The spectre which I have described to
you made its appearance first some years since, and has
always either come during an illness or has proved the
immediate
herald of one. In the course of the terrible
malady
,
from which your skill
The doctor slightly bowed.
Has just rescued me, I saw it several times. I know
it's an illusion, but confess it's not a pleasant one, and I
presume I shall be haunted with it as long as I live.
Well, said the doctor, looking at his watch, these
are
,
certainly, rather serious events; but I don't see how they
make your immediate departure necessary.
These lettersI will be quite frank, doctorbring very
bad news; in short, the total ruin of my family. You know
our country is undergoing a commercial crisis. My father,
who has never known what it was to want money, has lost
his fortune, and I am, I will not say a beggar, for I am
master
of a profession, but I am a poor man. In staying abroad,
I am spending money to which, perhaps, I have no right,
and neglecting pressing interests and duties.
That's bad, said the doctor.
And yet the greatest of my misfortunes I have not told.
And what may that be, pray?
It is a certain state of melancholy, of misery into which
I have fallen. It is not grief, but it is the result of
reflection
caused by grief. I have lost my sense of reality in life.
I see corruption and decay in all things. I have no respect
for anything and no interest in anything, not even in myself.
I don't see what I was made for nor the use of living. If,
from habit or forgetfulness, I enjoy anything, I suddenly start,
remember what a wretched, worthless insect I am, and
despise
myself for being duped into content in an existence
where only a
fool
can be contented. The natural desire I
feel to improve and cultivate myself, or to love others, is
constantly checked by this idea. Why cultivate myself?
why not rather brutify myself as much as possible, since
intelligence
and virtue only show more clearly the frightful
difference between what man might have been and what he
is? And why love even my relations? Why love even
mother, or father, or sister? since the
appearances
which we
choose to call by those names are, after all, but illusions, as
completely as the figures in a magic lantern. I had a
brother
once: where is he now? an idea! a recollection! Why
pour out upon these visions, which vanish at each instant
why pour out on them the rich treasures of affection, which
seem worthy to be poured forth only upon angles? Were I
to marry, I could never love wife or child, except with a
cold, dark, and trembling love. I should behold in them
but charming shadows. I should see beneath the tender
blush of my wife only the dead skeleton. I should imagine
the worm had already begun to take up his abode in the
eyes of my child, now full only of light, that seems to merit
such a different fate. I am going home: but what shall I
do there? With what heart shall I commence my toiling
careera career which means nothing, ends in nothing,
subject
to the merest and most cruel chances, where all that
seems holiest and noblest is but a mockery, and where
scoundrels and hypocrites carry on their manuvies with
perfect impunity, and are as good as other men?
In short, doctor, I am wretched. I see that the world,
left to itself, is a hell, yet I cannot see but that it
is
left to
itself. I don't believe there is a God; I can't believe it.
He would never have created so much evil, so much
misery
,
so much guilt. I don't understand how the world could
have made itself, but, if there be a God, neither can I
comprehend
how
He
made
himself
. Men talk of the
order
of
the universe: certainly, there is order in some things,
though not in all. But if order be an evidence of a
preexisting
intelligence, whence came that
pre-existing
intelligence
?
I have not been able to satisfy myself that there is
one. Of course, if the existence of a God be doubtful, our
own existence hereafter is more so. I don't believe in a
future: I don't believe we're immortal beings. We are but
beasts, doctor, but mere beasts, more elevated, but also more
unhappy. We have reason, but we have also guilt. We
know, but, oh God, we suffer!
These thoughts, doctor, prey upon me; they oppress,
they pursue, they torment me. In the night I sleep badly,
I am quite wretched. I lie on my back, cold and
trembling
,
weak, impotent, cowardly, despicable, contemptible.
I hate, I despise myself. Oh how I envy the brown-faced,
rough, thoughtless, ignorant peasant. Nay, I envy the
beast, the dog, the very calf that goes to the shambles. He
does not hope. He does not fear. He does not
think
. He
does not know what a horrible thing death is. He does not
look forward and speculate on annihilation. His heart does
not bleed when the butcher slaughters his brother.
To conclude my story, I am seriously afraid I shall one
day commit
suicide
. I have a longing for it. I yearn to
take the leap at once, and be at rest. I scorn to stand so
long shrinking on the brink, since I know so well
I must
go at last. This feeling at times nearly masters me. It
accompanies me always. The greatest pleasure I have is
studying the most easy kind of death. Sometimes I he
awake in the night and form visions of self-murder. Now
in fancy I go to Russia, to Siberia, and freeze myself to
death. The cold overcomes me; sleep steals over me, and
I delight to picture myself sinking into a slumber from
which I am never to awake, and thus escaping intolerable
life. Again I go into a hot bath and open a vein. Life
flows rapidly forth: I fall painlessly into insensibility and
death. Now I blow my brains out, and am destroyed in an
instant; and now I leap, in imagination, from some immense
height, and dash myself to pieces.
Were I even prosperous in this world, I could never be
happy with these opinions. There are no elements for
happiness in this world. All is hollow, all is false. But I
am far from being prosperous; I am sure it would be my
wisest step to end my gloom and horror with one bold stroke.
I cannot express what I suffer from the recollection of my
victim. That dying look haunts me always; when I am
nervous, ill, and alone, it is fearfully distinct, till at times it
passes the line of the ideal, and assumes the perfect bodily
form and colour of reality. This horrible spectre takes part,
too, in nearly all my dreams. I am quite aware it is a mere
shape of the imagination; still it is an almost unendurable
misery.
In this state of mind, all those qualities which men call
virtues
are only in my way, and become disadvantages, if
not follies, while the scoundrel is, in some respects, the
wise man. Self-sacrifices and self-denials are ridiculous.
Selfishness
is the true wisdom, and he who plunges into the
stream of worldly pleasures, drowns all thought and feeling
in dissipation, and lives and dies without a thought or a
care,
he
is your true philosopher. The good and the wise
are fools to him.
I am lost in mystery. I shall one day, I believe, go
mad with vain struggles to conceive the meaning, the origin,
and the object of life. The deep black which envelops me
on all sides, that mighty curtain of midnight shadow which
veils the future, against which the human mind has directed
all its efforts, from age to age, so vainly, so foolishly, it is
that which has so fixed my attention that I cannot think of
anything else.
Now, doctor, you have my story, I want you to
answer
me a question. How is it
you
are so fat, and smooth,
and happy? Have
you
no disappointment? Do
you
never
reflect upon the shortness of life? What do
you
believe
respecting death and our fate hereafter?
My young friend, said the doctor, who discovered a
certain irrepressible disposition to smile, although he
endeavoured
not to do so, you have done very right to
confide to me exactly your state of mind. Now I know
how to treat you. I'll tell you frankly and at once what's
the matter with you; you are
hypped
. Some of your
troubles
are
serious. The principal one is the loss of your
fortune
;
the rest are mostly imaginary. You ask if I have
never suffered disappointments. To be sure I have, plenty
of them.
Mais, ma foi! que voulez vous?
The way I`bear
them is, I don't think of them; and I keep my
stomach
in
order. That's the great secret of human happiness. No
man whose
digestion
was good ever bothered himself about
what would become of him after death. We are here. We
are made. We live and we die. That we know; the rest
we don't know. It's all very well for those who can
believe
the fine things they tell us. There are people who
pretend to knowso much the better for them.
Mais pour
nous autres, ma foi! que voulez vous!
we must take the
world as it is. I have no doubt the supreme principle will
manage matters for us after death, as before. It not,
ma
foi! que voulez vous?
Let me, however, as your physician, tell you one thing.
Such thoughts as you have disclosed to me, this hankering
after things futurethings veiled from us, is a mere
symptom
of malady. You must not bore yourself with such
subjects
.
You shall take a course of the Carlsbad waters.
Until then, you shall remain here, quietly amusing yourself
as well as you can; and afterward you can go home. I
don't doubt you will find things better than you suppose.
You will learn to enjoy life; to seize the present without
worrying yourself about the past or the future. I find in you
an extreme delicacy and susceptibility of the nervous
system
,
and an excessive weakness of the organs of digestion.
The nerves act on the stomach, and, through the stomach,
injure the mind. These dreams, and phantoms, and gloomy
notions of religion are physical. Why grieve over the past,
which is gone? why fret about the future, which is not
here? You have killed a man. You did quite right, if you
will only think so. Don't yield to youthful nursery
superstitions
.
I'll take care of your
phantom!
Ha! ha! ha!
Leave him to me! All the reasoning in the world could
not lay him, but he won't stand one of my pills! Ha! ha! ha!
Don't think, don't study. Don't go to plunging into dark,
gloomy subjects. Take a glass or two of Champagne
every day, follow a generous diet, ride on horseback when
you get strong enough, and you shall be well and happy
again, although you can't penetrate into all the mysteries of
nature.
If I could really think, said Harry, that my
melancholy
was physical, and removable by physical remedies!
Bah! Be assured it is by me, your doctor
ma foi!
I know. I have had a hundred such cases. This
melancholy
,
which renders people incapable of enjoying the
pleasures of life, is a degree of insanity. Sometimes it
terminates in absolute madness. It proceeds from intense
thinking, especially upon one subject; violent passions,
love, fear, grief, revenge, solitude
ma foi!
half my patients
are afflicted in the same way. I see it in your eyes. Your
body is inflated, your complexion pale, your pulse slow and
weak. The whole functions of your mind are perverted.
You are
hypped
. You think yourself miserable, and
therefore
you are so. I have had patients who fancied
themselves
tea-pots
. Do you like honey?
Yes.
Take plenty of that; plenty of
compote
. Don't
fast
long
at a time, and let your food be solid and nourshing. Rub
yourself well in the morning with a brush or coarse cloth.
I have given you a prescription, an excellent preparation of
iron and the Peruvian bark, to strengthen the alimentary
canal and promote the secretions. You have been, I
perceive
,
for years undergoing a complicated series of nervous
symptoms, which have reduced you to an unusual relaxation
and debility. Good-by, good-by. My horses, I see, are
getting impatient. Stay where you are till June, and I'll
send you home a
well man
, although you may not know
how the world was formed, or what's going to become of
it. You want nothing but a course of
Carlsbad
.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
Just
risen from what he had considered a death-bed,
Harry was not in a mood to be particularly impressed with
the easy philosophy of the little doctor. He was too
serious
to see in it anything but shallow worldliness; fit to
content a common mind in the ordinary emergencies of
life, but not to be of much use to the really unhappy, far less
to the dying. The
mais, ma foi! que voulez vous?
of his
not very sympathizing friend, would have seemed profound
wisdom to him ten years before; but now, his yearning for
sacred and necessary knowledge required more solid
aliment
.
He passed several days, coolly and seriously reviewing
his past life, and reflecting, as he had never done before, on
the future, The present, too, which the doctor found so
enjoyable, furnished some subjects of meditation. At one
time he resolved to start immediately for New-York, and he
even went so far as privately to consult another physician.
He was told, however, that the plan would prove not only
dangerous, but impossible, and that a course of Carlsbad
would be of the utmost importance to his future health.
On reflecting, he found that, with a slight difference of
expense
,
he could prolong his stay the necessary time; and
he concluded it would be, perhaps, for the best to reject no
means within his reach to carry home with him
good health
,
that he might commence in earnest the serious duties of
life. He was aided, too, in forming a conclusion, by a
letter
,
although of an old date, received a day or two after from
Emmerson. It was written in his usual friendly,
confidential
,
and quiet manner, and alluded to the general confusion
of monetary affairs; but stated that, although his father had
been indisposed, and at one time threatened with a
disagreeable
weakness of the eyes, he was now doing very
well, and he had not given up the hope (although Mr.
Lennox
himself appeared at one time to have done so) of seeing
Mr. and Mrs. Lennox resume their plan of European travel,
which would greatly benefit their health. He added, that
they had had a fright respecting money affairs; but he was
persuaded Mr. Lennox would come out of it much better
off than he had at first apprehended. Miss Elton (he
stated
in a careless way) was about, at last, to abandon the
maiden independence she had prized so highly, in favour
of a wealthy gentleman of Charleston, who had long been
received as her devoted admirer. She was in fine health
and spirits, and continued to be the life of every society,
etc., etc., etc.
This letter determined Harry to remain, and he wrote his
father, accordingly, that a slight indisposition would detain
him some months longer in Europe, but that in the summer
he should at length turn his steps homeward.
The next six weeks he spent alone, reading the History
of Christianity, and the other volumes which his mother
had given him. A strange, deep, absorbing curiosity,
mingled
with a hope inexpressibly cheerful and sublime, urged
him on in this new study. He entered upon it with very
different
emotions from those with which he had undertaken
it on board the packet ship, when, with only one faint cloud
over his life, he had looked forward to a brilliant tour and
perfect happiness. Then he was young, healthy, rich,
self-confident
,
in the highest possible spirits; now he was in
a far different situation and in a far different mood of mind.
Ten years of experience and reflection had caused him to
regard life and the world as a bubble. Grief had gone into
his soul. He had shed blood; he had felt guilt; he had
seen the strength depart from his limbs and the brightness
from his heart; he had seen, he had felt, he had inflicted
death; he had himself stood on the awful brink, and he
now asked of man, of earth, of heaven, and of his own deep
soul, what came after, or what resources the Creator had
granted mortals to pass through the last dread scene. The
belief of an all-wise, all-powerful, benevolent, paternal God
had gradually risen up in his mind, even as the morning
follows the night; and it was an immovable foundation on
which to erect his new system of philosophy. The
extraordinary
letter of his father, confessing his change of
opinion
,
he had brooded over with the most inexpressible interest,
partly owing to the intrinsic remarkableness of the incident,
and partly to the peculiar state of mind in which the
intelligence
of it found him. He was at that moment at last
conscious
that he groped in darkness, that there was on the
earth no single beam of light, and the simple fact, that a
mind like his father's, so clear, bold, and independent, so
far above vulgar terror or superstition, had discovered in
Christianity a sublime truth, not only startled and
bewildered
him, but raised in him a very exciting curiosity.
Of all volumes which have ever been written in
illustration
and confirmation of Christianity, the work of Bishop
Butler, called the Analogy of Religion, is perhaps the
most extraordinary. He commenced this book, not as he
had before done, with a mere desire to get through with it
as a tedious task, but with an intense thirst for truth, now
the deepest want of his nature. He had not gone through
twenty pages before he perceived he was in the hands of
an intellectual giant, whose strength of reasoning he was
as unable to resist as he was to oppose the decrees of
fate. Not only did he find, at the outset, all those
arguments
upon which his unbelief had rested, demonstrated as
fallacies, but other arguments in favour of infidelity, which
he had never heard of, also advanced, and also reduced to
nothing. No poor man examining a deed conveying to him
a magnificent estate, ever drank in each sentence and word
with more profound interest. As he read, his late sad
news, his past anxietieslife, death, the world, and all it
contained, faded into comparative insignificance beside the
stupendous discovery he was making, that Christianity,
with all its absurdities, with all its impossibilities,
might
be
truetrue according to the strictest rules of evidence, true
according to the severest principles of philosophy, true
beyond
the contradiction of the most wilful skeptic, true to
reason, true even to Nature, true to the plainest dictates of
common sense.
In the midst of these studies the period arrived when the
doctor gave him leave to visit Carlsbad.
Vol. II.Q
CHAPTER XXXIV.
It
was in the early part of June that, in a
diligence
, for
he had laid aside the expensive luxury of a travelling
carriage
,
he reached the superb broad road which leads down
the steep mountain, at whose base, hidden in one of the
loveliest valleys of Bohemia, lies the town of Carlsbad.
The striking scenery of the spot would alone render it
remarkable, but it is known to invalids as the monarch of
German watering-places, to which, in the fine season,
resort
pilgrims from distant parts of the globe.
The scene which presents itself to the eye of the
stranger
as, with locked wheel, he winds slowly and carefully
down, is exquisite beyond description. The peculiar
character
of the
chausse
reveals the various features of the picture
with a pomp of display resembling the studied artifice of a
theatric exhibition, if, indeed, a theatric exhibition could be
so bright and imposing. At first, from the high mountain
brow, the stranger beholds nothing but a sea of solitary
verdure
,
waving upon the sides and tops of apparently
inaccessible
eminences; but, as he descends towards the
valley
,
by short and acute angles, turning suddenly along a
series of platforms, each one immediately beneath the
other, at every abrupt bend some new portion of the
enchanting
panorama bursts upon him, till he who has,
perhaps
,
come thousands of miles, in hopes of leaving here
some distressing or dangerous malady, feasts his eyes at
last on the welcome scene, the green, tender lawns, the
pretty river, the broad, leaning hill-sides, the winding
walks, the various bridges, the long avenues of trees, and
the ancient town, with its crowded, irregularly built,
antique-looking
houses and picturesque old cathedrala sort
of Jerusalem in the visions of the invalid.
As Harry followed the course of this zigzag road, he
looked from the window upon the ever fresh and beautiful
face of nature, and hailed the resplendent scene with an
emotion as new as it was delicious and indescribable. He
felt as if he were just born. He began, at least, to have an
idea what it was to be
born again
. For years he had
ceased
to admire nature, or to regard it as other than a false and
lying cheat, a sweet accident, a fair and cruel illusion. But
now it raised far other thoughts and feelings. It was a
portion of the works of an Almighty God, and a benevolent,
superintending, affectionate father, given to man for his
benefit and his delight. It was spread thus splendidly
before
his eyes as an emblem of virtue and of truth. It was
the magnificent path over which he was to travel in his
pilgrimage
of immortal life. He was
not
an insect, by chance
crawling on its surface, and destined to pass away,
unmourned
and forgotten, from its bright fields and solemn rocks.
He was its lord, its master, treading with celestial feet its
beauteous fields, and destined to quit it only for scenes
more bright and eternal.
It is not our intention to follow the mind of our young
hero through its various changes during the six weeks spent
at this delightful spot. The subject may be considered by
some too serious for this species of history, though we can
see nothing more interesting or more worthy to be
described
,
in a proper spirit, on all occasions, than the swaying
round of an intelligent young mind from youthful skepticism
to religious faith.
He had, however, already become a Christian. He had
not by any means examined the whole subject; there were
often in his mind doubts which he could not explain, and
which appeared totally inconsistent with belief. But he
had caught a ray of that celestial
faith
which the sublime
Being who appeared on earth to enlighten, purify, and
console
poor, guilty, weary, and struggling man, demanded of
his followers as a sign of sincerity. For the first time in
his life, our doubting skeptic saw and felt what it was to
have
faith
. He believed he should become a Christian, and
therefore
he
was
one. He could not always disperse every
dark cloud of doubt, but he believed they would one day be
dispersed. He felt he had been for years plunged into an
agony of gloom and ignorance, which, by a single idea, once
fairly admitted, was ended forever. The Essay of Butler
had clearly convinced him that Christianity was not only
not impossible, according to the dictates of the coldest
reason
,
but was as clearly and unanswerably proved as any
fact in science, history, or nature. This was an astounding
discoverythe most tremendous and sublime event of his
life; it thrilled him with unutterable emotionunutterable
hopeunutterable love; it gave new action, new vitality to
every faculty and attribute of his being that was noble and
high, while it checked at once and forever all the puny fears,
all the dark doubts, all the grovelling desires and trembling
misgivings which had, till now, counteracted the best
purposes
and chilled the holiest impulses of life. Yes, he was
a Christian. The moment he was persuaded Christianity
was not impossible, he believed it to be
true
. It was
convincing
like the solution of an enigma, which, once
spoken
,
is self-evident. Regarded from this point of view,
the world assumed a differenta more importanta more
reala brighterwarmernobler appearance. He looked
abroad upon the infinite universe, and far down into his own
deep heart, and all that was dark grew bright, and all that
was confused and mysterious became intelligible. A flood
of rapture rolled in upon him. Immortality! It was a thought
too dazzling, too stupendous. It rescued not only himself
from insignificance, destruction, and despair, but it restored
to him all those he loved. So long had he been
accustomed
to regard himself as a worm, to contemplate the grave
as his last, only resting-place, to look upon all things around
as matters in which he could have no concern, and the
skies above him, and the immeasurable future, as secrets
locked forever from him as one too contemptible and fleeting
ever to know, or have part in them, that this new change
in his destiny had in it something overwhelming, and he
saw it would require his whole life to rearrange his thoughts
and plans on this mighty scale.
These were the emotions with which, just released from
a death-bed and a long confinement to a sick-room, our
young traveller saw burst upon him the broad, distant
champaign
,
and the deep, rich valley which greet the stranger
on arriving at Carlsbad.
CHAPTER XXXV.
It
happened, at this time, that Dr. K, one of the
greatest physicians of Europe, was himself taking the
waters
.
Harry at once placed himself under his care. The
second morning after his arrival, Dr. K paid him his
first professional visit.
Tell me your symptoms.
Harry explained his bodily sensations.
Let me look at youcome to the window.
He obeyed. A stream of light fell upon his face as the
eyes of his examiner were fixed upon him. There was
something in the appearance of this celebrated man which
denoted a remarkable person. His countenance beamed
with mind and benevolence. His eyes were large, black,
and piercing. His manner full of thought and experience.
There was that in him which instantly made you feel he
was an uncommon man.
Harry almost blushed as he stood the long, deliberate,
searching scrutiny of those eyes, which, piercing into each
line and feature, at length seemed to gaze through his own,
and to read the secret thoughts of his soul.
Your original disease is in your
mind
, said the doctor,
after several minutes' pause. Your
morale
has been
over-cultivated
and consumed. You have long had something
preying on your spirits?
I have.
I will not ask farther, but is it removable?
That, doctor, said Harry, you can tell better than I.
And he proceeded with frankness, as he had done to
Doctor
B, to relate his feelings and opinions, with the
various
circumstances of the last ten years which had led to
them, and particularly the state of mind into which he had
fallen respecting religion.
The doctor smiled, but in a very different way from the
merry, little, fat Doctor B.
By disclosing your complaint, you prove that the
remedy
is at hand, and your manner of relating your extremely
interesting history induces me to hope you are about to find
it. But it is not
physical
, and cannot be
cured
by physical
remedies. In order to ensure in you a more zealous search
of it, let me make one remark: I am sixty years old. I
have practised my profession forty years. My duties have
brought me in contact with all kinds and classes of men,
and I have given particular attention to this subject. When
I was two-and-twenty I was, also, an infidel. The grave
events of life, also, made me re-examine. Upon doing so
with more mature mind and greater care, I became
convinced
that there is nothing more shallow, pert, ignorant, and
unreasonable than infidelity, and nothing more rational, wise,
tranquillizing, and durable than a full, entire faith in the
Bible
and in Christianity. Without it, although thoughtless
or bad men, engaged in the absorbing pursuits of life, may
fancy themselves for a time contented, no man can be
permanently
and truly happy. Go on! you cannot fail to arrive
at perfect faith. You never can be happy without it, nor can
you ever be perfectly happy with it. The Carlsbad waters
will benefit you, but a holy and solemn study of Christianity
will
cure
you. Religion is the proper air, light, and
nutriment
of the human soul, and it came, believe me, from the
hand of Godhis last, best gift to mortality.
Harry felt an ineffable delight at hearing these words.
Young skeptics often find their greatest difficulty a certain
shame of being supposed
duped
by an absurd superstition, and
their confidence in the sublime and mysterious truth requires,
at first, the support of example, on the part of the enlightened.
The infidel example of Harry's father had produced a
powerful
influence in his younger years. He had
unconsciously
stood upon that in his skepticism. Now that it was
removed
,
and his father himself had acknowledged his error,
the contrary effect became instantly visible in his new
desire
to examine.
A certain intimacy speedily took place between the doctor
and his young patient. There was a sympathy which,
notwithstanding
the difference in their age, could scarcely fail to
lead to friendship, especially in a place like Carlsbad, where
people are continually together in the open air, and very much
thrown upon each other for modes of passing away the time.
The doctor was as learned as he was sincerely pious, and
was pleased to see an intelligent young mind caring less
for the sensual, visible things immediately around it, than
for those mighty, invisible truths which most men trouble
themselves so little about, and which, nevertheless, at some
period or other of all our lives, get to have such a
tremendous
importance. Harry was charmed to find one so much
older and wiser than himself, one stamped by the voice of
fame as a man, not only of sense and knowledge, but of
genius
,
regarding his blind gropings after truths, which no one
else cared about, with lively sympathy and a friendly desire
to assist.
In the mean time, Harry went on studying industriously.
He read, for the first time, in connexion with the prophecies,
a History of the Jews, which filled him, as well it might,
with awful amazement. The doctor marked a Bible for-him
and designated some German volumes illustrative of it, the
perusal of which added to his wonderat the perfect
clearness
of the subject, and his own complete previous
ignorance
.
In truth, he had before no conception of it
whatever
.
When he came to a difficulty, as he frequently did, the
doctor was at hand to solve it, and he was surprised to see
how many difficulties apparently inexplicable were made
clear as the simplest fact by a new idea or a little closer
study. Under such wise direction, this young mind was led
along a path of reading, reflection, and observation, very
different
from the wild and idle wanderings of its earlier days.
He passed in regular review the direct and fundamental
proofs, and that long series of things reaching from the
beginning
of the world to the present time, and making up, in
the whole, one argument, which, viewed together, has been
said to resemble the effect of
architecture
.
In the course of his examination he found one
remarkable
peculiarity. The more closely he examined the more
he believed. Each step was a discovery, and always
pointing
one way. If he ever doubted, it was just in proportion
as he receded from the subject.
Harry was thus,
at last
, engaged in a very important
investigation
,
under extremely favourable circumstances. His
mind was enlarged by travel, reflection, and study. His
heart was purified by grief and softened by self-reproach.
He had, for the time, leisure and exemption from those
pressing cares which keep most men's minds for years in
one daily routine, and he had at his side a very remarkable
man, belonging to a profession not easily led away by
enthusiasm
,
a man of talent, celebrity, calmness, and learning,
fully believing in Christianity, and also at leisure and ready
to reply to his inquiries. Dr. Kunderstood the
subject
like a theologian, but explained it with the coolness of
a man of the world. Few men in these utilitarian days
think of
examining
Christianity; and those who do, rarely
give it the time and attention bestowed by our hero. For
several months it had exclusively occupied his mind. He
had pursued it with a zealous industry and determination,
which men often exhibit in their projects of avarice, revenge,
love, or ambition, but (and
is
it not strange that it should be
so?) rarely in things not connected with the little, transitory
hour of human existence. Men see themselves more fleeting
than the pebbles they walk on and the houses they build.
They fall, with every breath, like autumn leaves. Their
very hats and coats outlast them, and yet, one in ten
thousand
,
like Harry, and he only when startled into it by an
extraordinary chain of events, thinks of really examining,
with any degree of interest, into the life, deeds, and claims
of the sublime Being who receives the worship of modern
civilization; at whose name so many adoring nations bend the
knee; whose coming was heralded so many thousand years
by the voice of prophecy and the murmur of human
expectation
;
at whose appearance the most stupendous fabrics of
mortal strength dissolved into air, and not only temples and
towers, but thrones and systems vanished like vapours
before
the rising sun; whose calm words have penetrated to
the remotest parts of the earth, and will penetrate to the
most distant period of time; to whom so many millions and
millions of dying eyes have been turned when all things
else were shrouded in night; and who has left in men's
possession
proofs of his existence, of his power, of his works,
of his origin, of his design, as unanswerable as those of
any inscrutable truth of science, the sun's light or the
comet's
speed.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
The
waters of Carlsbad, under such propitious
circumstances
,
rapidly and completely re-established Harry's health.
His happiness, with the exception of some painful thoughts,
was in a still more remarkable manner restored by the
elevating
moral influence of his new opinions. With each
delightful
day he brought to the doctor some new, or, rather,
some old, objection against the Bible, and he continued to
be amazed at the satisfactory manner in which all these
were explained. The striking and apparently fabulous
events of the Scriptures, the crimes of God's chosen
people
and his favourite individuals, the cruelties ordered by
the Creator, the miracles of the Old and New Testaments,
the thousand arguments so naturally urged by an intelligent
unbeliever against the whole system, one after the other of
these were so satisfactorily replied to, that he could not help
wondering he had so long been the passive dupe of fallacies
so apparent.
One or two plausible arguments against religion still
remained
.
There are
other
religions to which some of the
arguments
used in support of Christianity would equally apply.
Once allow miracles, and all the rest is easy. One of
Volney's
most powerful passages is where he represents the
followers of Jesus as wrangling with those of the Arabian
prophet, and lost in a crowd of other groups who claim the
palm of divine honours for Zoroaster, Vishnu, or Brahma.
The doctor replied to this with a smile.
Here is wherein Volney is either deceived or
dishonest
.
Bring before
you
, for instance, all the evidence in
favour
of all the other religions; do you suppose your opinion
could be made to waver an instant respecting the absurdity
of pretending a divine origin to a single one of them? Do
you believe it could be proved, even sufficiently to raise a
single doubt, that Mohammed was other than a man, or that
Mars or Neptune were gods, or that fire is the proper
object
of worship? Go study these religions, and you will
soon be aware that Christianity is as much better founded
on reason and nature, as much more incontrovertible when
examined by the highest intelligence, and according to the
received rules of evidence, as modern astronomy and
chymistry
are better founded than astrology and alchymy. God
has given to navigation the
compass
, to moral philosophy the
Bible
. If any doubt the mysterious wonders of either, let
them examine, and they will be convinced. Your great
Butler searched into the foundations of Christianity. Do
you suppose his `Analogy' could have been written upon
any other religion?
But confess, rejoined Harry, that if Christianity has
its Newtons and its Butlers, infidelity has its Humes,
Gibbons
,
Paines, Volneys, and Strausses.
Truth
, replied the doctor, cannot take its place in the
world without opposition; it is that which tries, tests, and
establishes it. In science and philosophy, has it not always
been attacked and persecuted? Can you show that these
attacks have destroyed it? That Christianity would be
opposed
is one of its own doctrines. Did not Christ predict
it? and was he not crucified?
But the small number of really sincere Christians?
Another of its predictions. It is said repeatedly, `not
every one shall understand,' and `narrow is the gate, and few
there be that find it.' But is not virtue truth, and yet how
few are virtuous?
But at so late an age, a good man, and a most
intelligent
one, like Strauss, produces such a book as his `Life of
Jesus,' and finds for it so many supporters! I confess that
sometimes startles me.
Germany, said the doctor, is an instrument in the
hands of Providence. She is the type of modern, earthly
philosophy, and is destined to bring to the unbelieving side
all the light of science and all the force of intellect. The
nation is going through a process. At present she doubts.
She will one day recover from her doubt. She is now in a
transition state. From Luther to Strauss is a period in her
history. Have you not read the work of Neander on the
same subject?
No!
I must tell you, then, an anecdote. When Strauss's
work was published, it was proposed to his majesty, the
King of Prussia, to prohibit it in his dominions. He
referred
the matter to Neander, who advised against prohibiting
it, with the assurance that it would eventually make more
apparent the divine origin of the religion it so powerfully
attacks. But this book seems to have made an impression
on you?
A deep one; and on you?
At first, yes; but the more I examined it, the more I
perceived it was but an ingenious concentration of all that
could be said against what is, nevertheless, the
truth
. The
arguments and evidence on the other side still preponderate.
But there is something convincing, rejoined Harry,
there is something staggering in the clear, practical,
searching, and sensible views of Strauss. The reason
and the heart sometimes respond to his appeals.
This proves, said the doctor, that he is a clever man
and sincere in what he advocates, but it does not prove that
what he advocates is not an error. I know Strauss very
well. He's an amiable, worthy, honest man; but he's made
a mistake. He has the wrong side, and it has been very
distinctly proved that he has. He begs the question.
In what way?
He says, for instance, whenever there's a
miracle
, we
may presume a
myth
. The sophistry of this, when the
possibility of miracles is the
subject
of the debate, is clear.
He does not admit the early existence of the Gospels. His
whole system is founded on an
impossibility
as contrary to
nature and experience as the very miracles which he
dogmatically
assumes to be myths. In short, however forcible
his reasoning, it falls to the ground the moment we discover
his premises are false. There are enthusiasts in infidelity
as well as in superstition. This worthy Dr. Strauss is
one.
Yet, resumed Harry, after a pause, I confess a doubt
occasionally comes over me, when I see whole nations,
like Germany and France, reject Christianity, and when I
see that, after it has been in the world more than eighteen
hundred years, such men as Strauss, Hume, Gibbon, and
that school, openly ridicule it.
And, granting it to be really true, do you suppose it
could be otherwise? Do you know there is an astronomer
now living who denies the truth of the Copernican system?
and yet this is susceptible of mathematical demonstration.
Take any question that arises, in England, for example, any
look, any personage, any system of philosophy, there will
be an attack and a defence. That Christianity would be
attacked, rejected, persecuted, ridiculed, and would,
nevertheless
,
survive, is a remarkable part of Christian prophecy
is, in fact, a strong evidence of its Divine origin. But
Germany and France, as nations, do
not
reject it. The
ablest refutation of Strauss's book is from the French
press, and, while it leaves untouched the superstructure,
has demolished the foundation. Christianity is
inextinguishable
.
It is a part of nature, like air and light. It is
a
creation
, not an invention. It has become a necessary
aliment of the human soul. The rich, the great, the
learned
,
the philosopher, and yet more particularly the young,
the bad, the selfish, and the thoughtless, may fancy they
can do without it. Mankind, as a race, think otherwise.
Doubt may come over nations as over individuals, but,
nevertheless, it will last till the end of all things. The
very fact that, at this age, it requires to be
attacked
by
science and philosophy, and that it is attacked vainly, is an
evidence of its indestructibility and truth. We don't believe
any more in Neptune or the nymph of Egeria. No other
religion would bear the scrutiny it has received. What
said its sublime founder? `The heavens and the earth
shall pass away; but my words shall not pass away.' Be
assured, the ultimate effect of Strauss's book will be to
display
the uselessness of attacking Christianity.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
Our
limits, and the plan of this work, do not permit us
to follow the various conversations of the learned believer
and the young tyro, whose habits of skepticism still
sometimes
clung to him, who guarded himself as far as possible
from every impulse of enthusiasm, and who yielded each
lingering doubt only when reason showed it was without
foundation. Nor, even could we relate them, did these
conversations
embrace half the arguments in confirmation of
that
truth
which had dawned upon Harry's mind the
moment
he commenced an examination in the right spirit.
The attempt to compress all the proofs within a few
conversations
would be like endeavouring to unfold, in the
same space, history, science, and Nature.
In the midst of his researches his estimable friend was
suddenly
struck with a dangerous illness, which in a few days
was declared incurable. For a time the physician refused
Harry, as well as crowds of other friends, admission to the
sick-chamber, but at length, when the immediate and fatal
termination of the disorder became apparent, they no longer
opposed an interview. Harry was, accordingly, admitted to
the presence of the person who, but a day or two before,
had been striding with him up those bright mountain walks
in all the vigour of life. He was altered shockingly, so
much so, indeed, as to be scarcely recognisable. His
attenuated
features, pallid complexion, large, sunken, terrible eyes,
were enough to frighten a stouter heart.
Harry, for a few moments, felt as if he should be unable
to support the approaching awful spectacle. The invalid
made one or two attempts to say something, but had not the
strength. His desire, however, to make some remark or
request was so apparent, that the nurse suggested various
observations, to each of which he replied by a scarce
perceptible
shake of the head.
Do you wish anything?
No.
Would you like to see anybody?
No.
Do you suffer?
No.
Do you wish to say something?
An affirmative look.
Shall I leave you, my friend? inquired Harry, with
tearful eyes.
No.
Shall I remain with you?
Ah! yes, yes.
That is what you wished to say?
Yes, yes.
And the smile with which he saw that, at length, he was
understood, seemed full of peace and happiness. Even while
it lingered on his lips he fell asleep.
He will wake in a short time, said the physician, but
only to pass away.
In an hour he awoke.
Read to me, he said, in a stronger voice.
What book? inquired Harry.
There is but one.
Harry read a part of the Gospel of St. John.
The dying man looked up to him gratefully when he had
finished.
I am going, he said, I am passing away. Study your
Bible. It's the only thing that can help you when you lie
here.
[1]
[1]
These were also the dying words of Sir Walter Scott.
Vide
Lockhart.
He fell back with a smile. The physician closed his
eyes. His spirit had passed away, calmly and happily.
And this, thought Harry, is
Death
. This is what I
have so much feared, so much misunderstood. This has
been the bugbear of my youth, the spectre, the tyrant.
Noble
friend! I thank you for obliging me to behold this, the
last and the sublimest of all your lessons.
Vol. II.R
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
The
last day he was to spend at Carlsbad was a bland,
still, and most delicious one. All nature appeared bright
and promising, full of deep meaning, and ineffable, almost
intolerable beauty. Harry was strong and in calm spirits
again. His nerves were tranquillized, his head clear, his
heart light, his hopes high. Periods of great depression he
had suffered while reflecting on the dark deed he had
committed
,
but he found in the volume to which he had now
been taught to look for consolation and guidance, so many
promises of pardon to those who asked it in the proper
spirit, that his whole soul floated in an element of pure
happiness
.
For the last time, he wandered about the exquisite
promenades
of this delightful spot. He mounted the steep hills;
he folded his arms, and gazed in mute rapture on the
enchanting
views. He entered the solitary, sombre woods,
and looked down on the broad tract of splendid scenery
which, dotted with towns and villages, lay unrolled beneath
his feet like a map. He breathed the fragrant air of the
mountains; he heard the voices of the falling brooks and
the warbling birds; he beheld the streams of sunshine
pouring
richly into the dark glades and tranquil valleys, the
silky clouds scattered in soft groups about in the air, and it
seemed to him that his immortal soul, long lost in a blind
sleep and a dark and terrible dream, had been just returned
to him. All his oppressive gloom had passed away. He
looked around him with the calm grandeur of an immortal
being just setting out in its career of ages, scarcely
treading
with mortal feet the rolling earth; destined to soar
above death itself, and to continue, in spite of the clouds of
earth, its cares or its disappointments, a course of happiness
without end.
The whole day he remained upon the mountains. He
watched the setting sun descend, and the silver moon rise
broad and silent from the opposite hills. He beheld the
stars one after the other become visible, and he listened to
the strains of a band of music which rose softened from
below
,
mingled with the voices of children playing in the fields.
We stop. We drop the veil over the mind and heart of
him who, through ignorance, error, solitude, and sickness,
through grief for the dead, crime, unhappiness, despair, and
profound thought, had receded a step from the world and
approached the throne of his Creator. We shall not
attempt
to penetrate farther the sacred mystery of the process
which God grants here and there to a pure heart, by which
the things seen as in a glass, darkly, become less
confused
and obscure, and the soul appears to be partly freed
from earth before the body is. It has been said that the
most interesting of histories would be that of a human heart,
but we are not disposed to approach with a too profane
familiarity
the inner workings of the spirit. We have
ventured
to trace the exterior events which fixed our hero's
attention to his own nature and destiny, and which, at
length, gave to his blind soul the power of vision. There
can be, in all the range of human sensations, none so
sublime
as that of a man who, long accustomed to regard
himself
as a miserable, passing worm, feels the first
foreshadowings
of immortality, and sees through the gates of death
into the perennial groves beyond.
The sublime effect of religion, says Zimmermann, is
tranquillity;
and, at length, this unaccustomed blessing
descended
upon our wanderer, with that deep stillness which
the Divine Master has promised to his followers under the
name of
rest
. Far be it from us to attempt to depict his
emotions. Ever so well described, they could not be
comprehended
,
except by those who have experienced them, and
such need no description. He felt himself undergoing a
change, and beholding the most stupendous and infinite
changes going on around him; not carried away by that
enthusiasm which attends great earthly discoveries and
triumphs
,
but with that silent and sublime attention with which
an astronomer, through his glass, gazes on the motions and
habits of the heavenly bodies, beholds rings, and moons,
and comets, and suns appear and disappear at the
command
of God. He scarcely felt
wonder
, for nothing was
more wonderful than other things. The Son of man came
to bear witness to the truth. Pilate (and, through his lips,
all the unbelieving part of mankind) asks,
What is truth?
The Galilean peasant replied not to the worldly Roman
magistrate, but to those who seek it, he replies at length
by the spiritual light which is shed upon their souls.
Harry's prospects on earth were but sad. He could not
be certain that sorrow did not await him at home. He had
reason to fear events had stripped him of all his earthly
fortune
.
The object of his affection was, he did not doubt,
already united to another. His father was ill. He knew
not what painful discoveries awaited him on reaching
America
,
and yet he was calm. His love for each object of
affection
was increased, but at the same time he had become
more brave and more trusting; he no longer relied on
himself
.
He was no longer tossed by the waves of his own
ungovernable passions. He no longer felt himself the sport
of chance: a new confidence, a new dignity had entered
his soul. Who shall tell the change which had already
taken place in his character?
CHAPTER XXXIX.
Home
home again. Harry was on the sea. Europe
had sunk behind him with its mighty forms and lessons.
He had been away ten years. They did seem
strangely
fleeting when looked back upon. It appeared but
yesterday that his mother had made such a remark at
breakfast.
As the voyage drew near its close, various emotions
filled his mind. Since his departure he had learned
two grave lessons. First, that he could never be
happy
without religion; second, a life spent abroad must
be, at least to him, a melancholy one. He felt the want
of a thousand nameless influences which exist only at
home. There is a breath in the native air which the
soul requires. The foot longs to tread the haunts of
boyhood; and alpine cliffs and foreign shores become
far less lovely to the eye than the simple fields where
the mind caught the first rays of light, and where the
heart first opened itself. Let no one who is wise and
good choose to live absent from his country: it either
spoils the character or overshadows the happiness.
There are yearnings, and pains, and sadnesses, and dis
appointments, which they who mourn at the necessi
ty of remaining at home have no idea of. To come
abroad, and gaze a while on the brilliant and thrilling
things unveiled to the traveller, is a rational and great
pleasure: but go home before your home is changed
before you are changed. Return before friends grow
cold and suspicious; before the place you filled in their
hearts is given to others. Live with those who saw
your youth, who have watched your course, who know
and who love you. He who has passed his life abroad,
however warm and true his heart (and sometimes it
becomes warmer and truer in absence), returns not the
same in person, and, of course, somewhat different in
habit and mind. He finds all changed. Children are
men and women; the old have become sensibly older
some are fallen, some dead, some have entered into
entirely new relations. All those vicissitudes which
are supportable when they take place with slow
transitions
,
strike him at a glance, and many a friend he
only meets to discover he has parted from him forever.
These thoughts passed through Harry's mind as he
stood gazing upon the heaving waste of ocean over
which he was ploughing his way towards the scenes so
cherished in his memorytowards persons now
beloved
more than ever.
Let not the reader think he was altogether happy.
Dark clouds were sometimes on his mind. Frank's
death. He was hastening back to the grave of his
affectionate brother, and there are times when the
weak mortal body, in spite of all the cheering promises
of faith, cannot resist grief for the dead, and, most of
all, for those dead in such a manner. The recollection
of Middleton's fate still more appalled him. Oh, why
had he not listened to his mother? why had he not
properly examined before? Here he bore in his bosom
a subject of eternal regret.
What was he going to see on landing? Was his
father
well or ill? Would any more be absent from the
domestic circle? He had received no letters within
dates later than a year. They had expected him, and
had probably, therefore, not written. To what extent
had the changes in his father's pecuniary affairs taken
place? What was the story his mother had referred
to concerning Mary? What had she to say about
Emmerson
?
Miss Elton, too, was now either married or
R 2
poor, and living with his family. In the latter case, he
was going to inhabit the same roof with her. He
compelled
himself to repress his strange emotion at this
thought. He was surprised to find how he still clung
to the image of one who had so clearly manifested her
indifference to him; but she was, doubtless, married,
as Emmerson had mentioned her intentions in his last
letter. He resolved to admit no thought of her among
the tender anticipations and associations of home which
now crowded upon him; but the pang with which he
forced himself to hope that she was married and
settled
with her (at length) chosen husband in Charleston,
might have taught him what would be the difficulty of
keeping this resolution. Despite his sternest efforts,
her image would rise before him. A thousand tender
inquiries connected with her pressed themselves upon
him. What sort of a person was her husband? Would
she be happy? Did shecould she love him? Had she
married him for his fortune? It looked like it. He
blushed at his ungenerous suspicion, but facts stared him
in the face. Had she not encouraged Emmerson? Had
he not himself confessed it? and yet to reject him for yet
another! Strange character! cold, fickle, selfish, and
yet under a form so attractive, so fair, so noble.
Nothing
could have convinced him of her complete
unworthiness
,
had not Emmerson himself borne his
accidental
and unwilling testimony against her.
The recollection of Emmerson raised a new train of
reflections. He thought he could comprehend his
mother's
mysterious hint about him; his imagination dwelt
on the subject, and constructed a little romance out of
it. His father had taken Emmerson from a state of
destitution, had brought him out, and placed him in a
career of prosperity. Now that these changes had
come over the spirit of their dream, Emmerson had,
doubtless, stepped forward, and devoted his talents and
his whole life to repay the obligation. Emmerson, in
the absence of his benefactor's sons, had been himself
a sonhad conducted the affairs of the officehad
relieved
him in the period of his illness from all anxiety.
He felt almost jealous of so much goodness; he nearly
envied him the pure delight of thus expressing his
gratitude.
CHAPTER XL.
Land
ahead!
Whither away?
Over the lee bow!
Ah, the thrilling sound! Thrilling and sweet to him
who has been but a few months away from his native
shores, but, to such a wanderer as Harry, an
enchantment
beyond expression, but full of fearful interest,
only calmed by the effort of a great mindgreat,
because
God had breathed upon it a portion of his
strength and spirit.
It was the brightest day that ever shoneat least it
seemed so to Harryas the sun began to decline from
his noonday glory, and to mingle with his white beams
the soft, yellow, Claude-like light of the afternoon. The
blue speck grew more definite, and large, and near.
Other ships, great and small, were around them, coming
and going; and he was struck by a magnificent
steamer
on her way to England.
No one who has not seen it can conceive how
beautiful
the sea is at times, or how exquisitely,
unutterably
beautiful the land is to one approaching it after a
long voyage. Men do not know that ivory, and gold,
and pearl, and silver are not more resplendent than the
simple rocks and common ground, the beach, the shore,
the lawn, the field; and that all the operas of Mozart
or Rossini cannot compare with the first land sounds
with the first words of the pilot, who jumps upon deck
with his hands full of newspapers, and his quiet, cool,
professional, unagitated look upon the beings who are
approaching the land he has just left, with emotions
which it never entered his imagination to comprehend.
Harry took up a newspaper, but laid it down again;
he could not read it. His eyes were fastened to the
advancing shores. Was it possible that long, low point
was
behind
him? that these leaning meadows were his
native land? that, after looking on Jerusalem and Egypt,
he was, at last, close to Staten Island and Long Island?
that the little boat which was cutting the waves so
swiftly was not a Spanish felucca, but a newsboat of
one of the New-York papers?
He placed himself in the bow. It was a strange and
ravishing dream. He felt he was enjoying a moment
rarely given to a mortal. Ah, the radiant shore, close
on his side! the grass, the trees, the stones, the
ploughed
field, the old wagon and wheelbarrow, the cottage,
the ships, motionless and at anchor! His breath came
thickhis heart beat violentlyhe was suffering
pain
.
He could no longer distinguish, through his
thick-coming
tears, the bright-coloured, familiar scenes gliding
so tranquilly behind, and rising so silently around him.
On and on went the tall, stately shipon and on over
the level, silvery flood, her broad white sails all set and
filled with a steady, gentle breezesoft as the tide of
emotion which swelled his own bosom, while land
thoughts pressed on his heart and land odours blew
against his face.
At length, as the ship went still on and on, a point
was turned, and lo! the citythe distant, soft,
glittering
,
bristling city, lying there ever on the limpid tide,
over it the thin cloud sent up by the dust, and smoke,
and breath of its hundreds of thousands of busy
inhabitants
,
teeming with human thoughts and human
passions
,
with joy and wo, and hate and fear, and love, and
vice, and virtue. And there was the forest of crowded
masts, and there, buried in verdant foliage and steeped
in mellow sunshine, lay
Hoboken
, that darkdark spot,
drenched with the heart's blood of his poor brother
of so many brothers, sons, and husbands.
And here, for a time, the bright tide of his thoughts
grew black; and bitter were the recollections of his
past life, and his counsels, and infidel opinions freely
expressed, and his brother's early grave, and the
mouldering
bones of Middleton, cut off by his stern hand in
the midst of his follies and his sins.
Planted upon the bow, alone, and with his face
turned
from all who could behold it, the young man long
strove in vain with his tears; but nearer and nearer he
came, and calmer and brighter associations relieved
him. The city, which he had so often and often seen
in his dreams, from which he had been separated such
a weary interval, and which raised in his heart so many
memories, and hopes, and fears, grew more distinct
with all the pride, pomp, and circumstances of a great
metropolis. He could scarcely persuade himself it was
no vision; but it came nearer and nearer, more real
more trueno, it is impossible to paint his feelings.
Would any of the passengers like to go ashore
tonight
?
inquired the captain, in a cool, business-like
voice. We shall be up to the dock in the morning.
In the
morning?
cried Harry. I shall spring into
the water if you don't send me ashore this moment. In
the morning? My dear captain! don't come near me!
I shall commit some assault on you.
Boat, sir? cried a man, a
New-York
face, who had
just clambered up into the ship and jumped down upon
the deck.
To be sure!
Come this way, sir, if you please, sir.
Good-by, good-byGod bless you, cried a dozen
voices. I put up at the Astorsee you to-morrow
good-byGod bless you!
But Harry was already seated in the stern of the
little
boat, his heart going like a high-pressure
steam-engine
.
Take care of the oar, sir, said the man, as he
shoved her off.
Harry looked back once at the ship. You must have
been to
sea
, good reader, to know how a ship really
looks on the outside after you've come a voyage in
her. But we've no time just here to describe the long,
slender, wave-worn, beautiful thing. He was already
near the Whitehall wharf, where, ten years ago, he
had embarked. The boatman lifts the dripping oars,
lays them along the benches, and pulls in with a
boat-hook
.
Stop! Two shillings! You haven't paid, sir.
This duty speedily accomplished, the wanderer, with
years on his forehead and in his heart, returned from
his far flights, both bodily and mental, stood at length
upon his native land, alone, like one in a dream,
strongly
tempted to burst into tears, but restraining himself
with a
man's
strength of character.
He walked on, staring around him, and drinking in,
with intense curiosity, every object, every sight, every
sound. He reaches the Battery. A sense of change,
of years, of the lapsing away of life, fills his soul. The
Battery is diminished in size from the immense tract
of land which had been the scene of his boyish sports.
But the trees are larger. Is that State-street? Is that
Broadway? It is very small. It is strangely
foreign-looking
,
and yet
But he could scarcely speakscarcely think. This
is a wild, painful, sweet, oppressive moment.
Scarcely feeling the pavement beneath his feet,
making
his course up Broadway among the crowd, with a
prodigious effort to look quiet and unconcerned, yet
inexpressibly
struck each instant by some new sight,
some newly-recognised point, some newly-awakened
recollection, he reached, at length, his own house, and
rang the bell.
An old negro servant, who had been in the family as
long as he could remember, opened the door.
Mr. Lennox? said Harry.
Yes, sar. He's in, sar. Who shall I have de
honour
to say, sar?
What! old Simon! you don't know me?
Oh! my patience! Oh! dear life! Oh Lor!
Massa
Harry come home! Massa Harry come back!
And the faithful fellow ran up stairs, and then down
stairs, screaming Massa Harry come back! and then
returning, stopped his way by stooping down to the
floor to clasp his legs and kiss his feet, trembling all
over with joy and attachment.
Whatwho? said a well-known voice, as a lady
hastily descended the stairs.
Oh! years were in her face.
My mother!
My son!
Doors were now opened and closed, and the bustle
seemed to be general.
A beautiful woman, whom Harry for one instant
positively
did not know, threw herself next into his arms,
with
My dearest, beloved brother!
What!not
Mary?
Is it possible!
Where is he? where is he? Where's the young
dog? Let me see him. Hurrah! hurrah! Harry, my
boy! my son!
His father appeared much alteredmuch,
much
older.
My father!
And Harry! My mother! My son! My
father
!
Mary! and Thank God, at last he's here!
were words which seemed bursting, in a very agitated
way, from various lips.
Amid kisses, and clasping of hands, and deep,
heart-felt
embraces, and broken exclamations of rapture, this
trembling family group ascended the stairs, they
scarcely
knew how, and entered the drawing-room.
Harry gave one look around, sank on the sofa, and
covered his face with his hands, completely overcome.
There was a minute's deep silence. No one moved,
only the tears streamed down every face, till Mrs.
Lennox's
gentle voice said,
Open the window, my love. He's fainting.
No! said Harry, starting up. No; it's over.
And then they all fell to embracing again asin
short, just as any other kind, affectionate-hearted people
would do under the same circumstances.
Harry! cried his mother, at length, parting the
locks from his forehead (as she used to do poor Frank's),
before you say another word, have you remembered
your parting promise? Are you a
Christian?
Mother,
I am!
Mrs. Lennox clasped her hands, and, raising her eyes
to Heaven, said, in a low voice,
My God, I thank thee!
CHAPTER XLI.
But
come here! come here, sir! by the window, and
let me look at you! cried Mr. Lennox. What!
Harry
!
It is not possible. I have a son left, then! But
you're
very
much altered.
I told you you would come back
a man
, said his
mother, gazing at him.
Ah, my dear mother! I did not know what it was
to be
a man
then.
And, upon my word, you're a pretty one, said
Mary.
But
how
you're
altered!
repeated Mr. Lennox.
And now, how is it with you all? demanded
Harry
,
in a low voice. You had many things to tell me.
Are they good or bad?
Good, my boy, replied his father. I'm well, in
the first place, and we've had changes a plenty; but all
has come right at last, and
And we've sold our house and Rose Hill, cried
Mary, with a very mischievous look.
But bought them again, added Mrs. Lennox.
And how are all friends?
All friends
are well, said Mary. I presume by
`
all friends
' you mean
Miss Elton!
Mary! said her mother, reprovingly. The same
girl, you see!
And we've had a wedding since you left, sir,
added
Mary.
Mrs. Elton, exclaimed Simon, throwing open the
door, and Mrs. Elton flew into Harry's arms and kissed
his forehead with the tenderest affection, her eyes full
of tears, and talking all the while exactly as if she
hadn't left off since he went away (and probably she
hadn't!). Behind her, very pale, with her eyes cast
down, stood Fanny, changed from a lovely girl into a
still lovelier woman, and preceded by a maid, carrying
one of the prettiest little babies that ever was seen.
The pang which this sight gave Harry taught him what
a tender and profound love he had continued to cherish
for her, and the hopes, false as air, which, despite all
he had heard and seen, had still kept possession of his
bosom. For a moment anguish and indignation
contended
within him, for he was suffering one of the
keenest pangs he had ever experienced. He recovered
himself, however, immediately, and advanced to meet
her with very much the same manner as that in which
he had bade her farewell.
I am happy to see you, said he, scarcely touching
the hand tremblingly extended to him.
He was interrupted by the sudden awakening of the
baby, who began to cryof course! But, what by no
means appeared so natural a consequence, he perceived,
with new astonishment, that tears had suddenly gushed
into the eyes of its mother, which, after vainly
endeavouring
to repress, she was striving to hide with her
hands, and by turning away her face, upon which, to
say the truth, he had scarcely dared to look. The
incident
occurred while everybody else was talking, and
perhaps was not generally observed.
In the midst of this little mystery a new comer
presented
himselfa tall, very handsome, very
well-dressed
,
very graceful young man, with a pair of whiskers,
becomingly trimmed within the modesty of natureand,
stretching forth his hand, he grasped Harry's with a
warmth which astonished the latter, although it did not
appear to have that effect upon anybody else.
Confess at once, said the stranger, you don't
you
know
you don't know me.
Frankly, replied Harry, in a respectful manner;
but for these witnesses, I should say I had never
stop! he added, as if seized with a faint recollection,
but noand yetit is not possible!I'm
not
speaking
to
little Seth?
The same, cried Seth; and, what is more, this
saucy one has dared, without your leave or knowledge,
to
Harry's surprise was not diminished by what
followed
,
for Seth, seizing the hand of Mary, raised it
passionately
to his lips, and implanted upon the same a
first-rate, full-sized, unequivocal kiss.
And the great traveller is grown too proud to take
the least notice of his little nephew, cried Mary.
What! exclaimed Harry, starting up. The baby,
then, isn't
Isn't
what?
demanded Mr. Lennox. What do
you mean,
sir?
A sudden peal of laughter announced their discovery
of his mistake, which was made more perceptible by
the joyful enthusiasm with which he instantly
hastened
to the side of Miss Elton, and, extending his hand,
said,
Fanny, tell me the truth! Are we
friends
or
enemies
?
As you please, said Fanny, with a very bad
attempt
at perfect indifference.
Well, I please to be friends; butyou are not
married
?
I!married!
echoed Miss Elton, with an
astonishment
too obvious to leave much doubt on that delicate
point.
Nor going to be?
Vol. II.S
You good-for-nothing young dog! cried Mr.
Lennox
,
the girl has refused a dozen of the best matches
in town for you!
Is
that true, Fanny? demanded Harry, in an
agitation
he did not even try to repress.
She was silent, and once more turned away her head;
but her distress, her blushes, her tears, revealed in a
moment the interesting fact.
And
Emmerson
, then? cried Harry, bewildered.
Is a
rascal!
said Lennox, sternly.
Emmerson! exclaimed Harry.
I knewI was sure it was that Mr. Emmerson's
doings
,
said Mary.
Fanny, said Harry, with more calmness, in the
presence of all these beloved ones, hear me declare that,
from the first moment I knew you,
I loved you
. I have
never ceased to love you. What error has been
between
us I cannot say; but I have been given to
understand
He stopped.
And I, said Fanny, was informed
And
she
stopped.
And I suppose you were both laid under a promise
of secrecy when the sly calumniator whispered his
poison, said Mary.
Didn't I always tell you he was a deceitful, selfish
fellow? said Seth. You were going to
horsewhip
me, you know, sir, for saying so, once upon a time.
And I'll horsewhip you now if you say the
contrary
!
exclaimed Mr. Lennox.
CHAPTER XLII.
It
would take a very thick volume to tell all the
conversation
,
the confidences, the discoveries, etc., which
gave wings to that night, before the very late (or,
rather
,
very early) hour at which the circle separated.
Poor Frank was first brought on the tapis, and all that
was known respecting his fate. The letter of White,
which had been handed him at the dinner table, and
which had been found in his pocket when the body was
brought home, was produced, and with it two curls of
hair, cut from his forehead by the mother, in sportive
affection, the evening before his death, and looking as
bright and shining as if his careless forehead and
flashing
eyes were still beaming beneath. The family
picture
of the dinner-party by Brigham was also taken
down. These sad but precious
mementoes
were gazed at
with mournful tears and hearts deeply impressed and
awed.
But ten years had glided away since the catastrophe,
and time softens the keenest sorrow. When all the
circumstances which could be remembered were
communicated
,
both respecting him, and Middleton and
Glendenning, there was a pause of solemn and deep
recollection, which was suddenly interrupted by a
scream. (Mary started, but the reader need not do so,
for we have done with horrors for the present.) The
said scream announced the awaking of Master Copely.
Forgetting the past in the present, the mother, with a
look of intense alarm, clasped her hands and darted out
of the room, and was immediately followed by Seth,
also in some apparent trepidationtrue fatherfashion!
Let them go, said Mr. Lennox. If Master Frank
Copely do but sneeze, one would think the world had
come to an end at least! I wonder grandmamma hasn't
rushed up also to the rescue!
Don't believe him, my son, said Mrs. Lennox; he
is by far the worst of us all, and does nothing but spoil
the baby the whole day long. But I must seize the
occasion
of Seth's absence to tell you a little into his
mystery
.
You must know he is already a celebrated man.
One of the most promising lawyers at the
New-York
bar, said Fanny.
His eloquenceyou've no idea! you can't
conceive
!
cried Mrs. Elton; it is the talk of the whole
town. When he is to speak, the court-room is
invariably
crowded. He is destined to a most brilliant
career
.
A more severe student has not been seen. He
has been begged to go to Congress, but he refuses,
and
He has already brought back nearly all my business,
and is worth five thousand dollars a year, said Mr.
Lennox. He is making fame and fortune as fast as
he can.
A sweet, noble nature, remarked Mrs. Lennox.
I always told you, resumed Mrs. Elton, that Seth
was a dear little fellow, and would do you all honour
one of these days. The first time he spokeoh, there
is a history well worth tellinga real romanceyou
see one day
But what do you mean by his bringing back your
business? inquired Harry. Had you
lost
your
business
?
You must know, said Mrs Elton, and she went on
with the story, but with such enthusiasm as to be rather
incoherent.
I will tell you, said his father. Emmerson, whom
I took out of jail, whom I brought forward, who owes
everything to me, and whom I trusted as if he had been
an angel out of heaven, has shown himself nothing but
a deceitful, sly, selfish hypocrite.
What! Emmerson?
Full of tricks so mean, that their very meanness is
in some degree his protection, for people won't believe
them.
I can scarcely credit what I hear, exclaimed Harry.
When I met with my losses, continued his father
(for you must know, my dear boy, I am not by one
half so rich as I was when you left), this man, in
proportion
as I grew unfortunate, began to manifest his
real character, but in a way so wily and cunning that
no one would believe he was doing anything wrong.
Perhaps you
have
suspected him unjustly, said
Harry.
Oh, we know him now; but he has managed so
skilfully, that it is very difficult to expose him to any
one else as he merits.
Nor do we wish to do so, said Mrs. Lennox. We
are out of his reach, I hopeso let him go.
First, continued Mr. Lennox, I lost Frank; then
the news of your affair with Lord Middleton reached
here, and was much commented upon; some severe
strictures on all of us appeared in the papers. You and
Frank were stigmatized as mere brawlers and
rous
.
It was mentioned that you were an intemperate man,
and had been seen quite intoxicated in the street, and
that
I
was, at times,
deranged
, in consequence of grief
and shame. By a fortunate accident, which
Emmerson
little suspects, I have traced these infamous
slanders
to him.
You amaze me.
At length I suffered a series of pecuniary losses,
which at one time threatened to ruin me completely;
and, as misfortunes never come singly, I fell
dangerously
ill. During this time Emmerson had speculated and
made his fortune, and, do you believe? I never knew a
word of it, so sly was he. It was at this period that,
after having (as I have ascertained to my satisfaction)
secretly done all in his power to calumniate and injure
meit was at this time that, instead of stepping
forward
to save me and my family from ruin, he chose to
suddenly withdraw from a connexion with me. How
he managed I can scarcely say, but he
did
manage to
carry with him the greatest part of my business. He
stands high. By turning, and winding, and watching,
and creeping forward, aided by a keen, sharp, and
indefatigable
mind, he
has
acquired, and perhaps he
deserves
,
the reputation of a successful lawyer. There
I was, sick, blind, slandered, wretched, threatened with
utter destitution, scarcely any business in my office,
and no one to do that whom I could trust, while he, all
the while pretending the deepest interest in me,
visited
my family, continually offered advice, and kept
up such a bland and affectionate demeanour, that your
mother and the girls for a long time would not and
could not believe he had ever intended to do us the
least wrong.
And I really cannot believe said Harry.
Stop, said his father, till you hear the end. One
day I was led into court, to attend a trial which had
excited an intense interest throughout the whole state.
I was ill and weaknearly blind, too; but I went and
took my place at the table with the rest. The counsel
for the defence was a young man who had never been
heard of before. He rose to speak. The room was
crowded to overflowing. The cause of his client was
almost a hopeless one. But he had not addressed the
jury half an hour before the audience, excited by
eloquence
the most remarkable that had been ever heard
at this bar, in spite of rules and prohibitions, greeted
him with a burst of clamorous, irrepressible applause.
As he proceeded in the conduct of his case, in the
examination
S 2
and cross-examination of the witnesses, in
the logical clearness and irresistible reasoning of his
closing speech, and the admirable eloquence with which
he at length committed his cause to the jury, he
displayed
a master-mind cultivated in a very high degree.
I had never in my life been more moved; and when the
jury brought in a verdict for his client without leaving
the box, I heard nothing around me but bursts of
delight
and admiration, and predictions that the young
advocate, if such talents could be retained in so narrow
a circle, would assume at once the first place at the
New-York bar. Everybody sought to compliment him,
to be presented to him, and I among the rest.
`You ask to be presented to me,' he said, with
surprise
,
`while I have been longing for years to approach
you, but dare not.'
`You!approach me!dare not!' cried I.
`Is it possible you do not recognise me?'
`Recognise you! Why, who are you, sir?'
`What! you have forgotten little Seth!'
Oh! I thought I should have hugged the young dog
in my arms. I had at that time just found out
Emmerson
,
too.
`I have no way of repairing my injustice,' said I.
`Yes, you have.'
`And how?'
`I learn you are at last abandoned by that generous
and frank gentleman whose name I won't mention, but
of whom my opinion remains unchanged.'
`Yes, yes, he has left me.'
`Let
me
supply his place.'
`You?'
`I. If study, diligence, perseverance,
determination
,
affection, gratitude, and'
`Stop, sir. Do I understand you to offer to conduct
my business?'
`Yes, yes; it has long been my wish.'
`Seth, my boy, my noble, fine fellow!'
`We are rather public here, sir,' replied he, gently;
`let me call on you and talk it over.'
Well, he did so. The first thing I knew, he was
installed in my office, and had brought many of my
clients back to me. He soon afterward, by a singular
accident, procured incontrovertible proof that
Emmerson
.
Well, well! let him go, said Mrs. Lennox. You
know, my dear husband, you can never speak on this
subject without getting too much excited, and you have
promised me not to speak of it at all. It is enough that
we have suspicions, not hastily conceived, that Mr.
Emmerson is a sly and selfish person, and that in
secret
he has never been our friend, even when we were
heaping him with favours, and when he was professing
for us the utmost friendship. To put
your
doubts to
rest, my dear Harry, let me ask you whether he has
never communicated to you anything respecting
Fanny
,
which caused you to wish to separate yourself from
her?
He has; but I am not at liberty to say what.
I, also, said Fanny, have been deceived by him
in regard to you, though I, too, am bound not to say
how.
Leave him, then. Shakspeare has already told us
`it is not a year or so that shows us a man,'  said Mrs.
Lennox.
But to return to Seth, continued Mr. Lennox.
Each day made his talents more evident and his
brilliant
success more certain. There was only one thing
which displeased me. I could never fix him to any
arrangement
as to his rights and his portion of the income
of the office. One day I called him to account for this,
and told him he must not carry generosity to Quixotism.
`You mistake me,' said he. `I am not fearful you
will allow me too much, but that you will not grant
what I require.'
I was amazed.
`What
do
you require?' demanded I.
`Your daughter, sir.'
`What Mary?'
`Even so.'
`And she?'
`Has done me the honour to refer me to you.'
In a week they were married. The business of the
office increased. Some of my former friends and
clients
continue cold and estranged, and put all their
business
into the hands of Emmerson; but we have,
notwithstanding
that, more than we can attend to. I
recovered
a part of the property I had supposed
irretrievably
gone, just in time to save this house and Rose Hill,
and I am once more on safe ground again. Now, sir,
if you choose to launch yourself in your profession,
never young man had a better career before him. You
can look about at your leisure, and find some one to
take care of you. In case you don't succeed, why
there's a
forlorn damsel
in this house who does not seem
to have any
owner!
I can tell a little
historiette
, also, on
this subject
. Since you left we have, somehow or other,
discovered
Harry's eyes here sought those of Fanny, who, with
a deep blush and an expression of conscious guilt (
although
surely guilt never before looked so interesting),
rose, stole softly round to Mr. Lennox's chair, and
placed her hand over his mouth. The delighted old
gentleman seized it and drew her towards him. Instead,
however, of his usual somewhat boisterous mirth, he
kissed her affectionately on the forehead, and said,
Fanny, you have heard what this prodigal son of
mine has said. He loves you. Be sincere, my girl,
and let me reward his constancy by telling him that
you have twice had men of fame and fortune at your
feet, and rejected them becausebecausein short,
because
She would never bestow her hand without her
heart, interrupted Mrs. Lennox.
I think you may go as far as that, said Fanny,
laughing in the most charming confusion imaginable.
And when the little heart is already gonehey!
shall not the hand follow?
There was a moment's pause.
Fanny, said Harry, in a low voice, ten years ago,
in this room, on this spot, I told you I loved you.
Despite
all my efforts (and
some
of yours)despite years,
and travel, and grief, and experience, I
love you still!
Time has deprived me of many a hope, many an
opinion
has
cast upon me many shadows, many changes;
but, as regards yourself, I am not changed. One word
from your lips will convince me that all I have heard,
all I have been led to believe, all I have seen, is
reconcilable
with that pure and steady affection I once hoped
from you. Tell me, then, do you love me? Will you
be my wife?
Fanny turned away her head, but gave him her hand.
Heydey! heydey! cried Mr. Lennox. That's no
way to make love: assert your rights.
Unable longer to restrain her emotion, poor Fanny
fairly burst into tears, upon which Harry, with gentle
but deep tenderness, caught her to his bosom, and, for
the first time, dared to print on her lips the kiss of
faithful love, with not more resistance than the
established
etiquette on such occasions, and the presence
of the three spectators, rendered absolutely necessary.
That's better, cried his father.
My own Fanny, my sweet wife, cried Harry,
taking the small liberty to repeat the operation.
Hallo, hallo, that's enough! cried Mr. Lennox.
Every one in his turn. I think
I've
a small account
to settle with this young lady.
And said account was balanced forthwith.
Have I allowed myself to be misled by a scoundrel?
exclaimed Harry. Have I dared to trifle with your
feelings? to remain those long, dark years away from
you? to part from you so coldly while my very heart
was breaking?
You
might
have left out your order about the
portmanteau
!
said Fanny, looking at him reproachfully.
But confess! cried Harry;
you did
set the
example
.
You remember that morning when
I was but a girl, said she.
Tut! tut! so you are now, cried Mr. Lennox.
It is not necessary to note in detail all the
interesting
congratulations interchanged between Mr. and Mrs.
Lennox and Mrs. Elton during this little
denouement
,
or their manner towards Fanny when her future
position was thus summarily settled; suffice it to say,
that embraces, exclamations of delight, diversified
occasionally
by a few tears of happiness, were the order
of the day.
The agreeable scene was interrupted by the
re-entrance
of the parents of Master Copely.
My baby's asleep, said Mrs. Copely, in a
whisper
.
And mine have just waked up! echoed Mr.
Lennox
,
in the same tone.
The supper's ready, ladies and
gempleman!
said
Simon, entering with his shining ebon countenance,
from which beamed forth a prodigious display of white
teeth.
But, bless my soul! cried Lennox, it's three
o'clock. Pretty supper-time, indeed!
Supper been ready two hours agocalled massa
fourteen times! Nobody listen! cried Simon,
respectfully
.
Harry took the loved hand which had so
unexpectedly
become his own, and led Fanny into the
dining-room
.
Dark, sad changes had taken place since last
he had seated himself at that table. But, despite the
solemn and terrible things of the past (for thus is
constituted
the human heart), all were happy. Gloomy
recollections were banished, or caused to be shed only
tears that rose and fell at moments, and came like
shadows over the summer hills.
Perhaps the supper wasn't the most tempting that
ever was seen, and perhaps the oldest and best wine
was not produced, and perhaps there was no popping
off of Champagne corks, and perhaps the inflowing
upon Harry of this new happiness didn't throw around
him a manly grace and dignity which had never been
seen in him before, and perhaps Fanny's eyes did not
venture at last, unchecked by fear, to rest upon his
face with pride and love, and perhaps he did not think,
as he gazed on her countenance and perfect form, that,
if it had not been the Christian's duty to forgive, he
could never pardon Emmerson for having cast one
instant's
sorrow over that ingenuous and affectionate
heartfor having once brought tears into those eyes
though he couldn't but say the moisture occasionally
visible there gave them a very curious, and, in fact,
rather extraordinary power over his feelings.
CONCLUSION.
After all, the story isn't half told. There is Randolph,
a very good fellow, as the world goes, but who has a
fearful account to render one day. Totally destitute
of religious feeling, he yet lives, ready to shoot any
man who looks at hima dashing, gay fellow, much
courted in society, and particularly by the women. He
never speaks of Frank. What his reflections are, and
what they will be as age creeps over him, and the
world beings to slip away from him, he will doubtless
learn too soon. He has once or twice, by chance, met
Mrs. Lennox. But there is something in
her
glance
which checks his gayety and chills his heart.
White may be seen any day at the Traveller's Club
in London, or in one of the stalls of the Queen's
Theatre
,
or driving an extremely handsome horse and cab
through the crowds of Hyde Park. He has grown
stouter than he was. His countenance is larger and
somewhat bloated. Pleasure, the great object of his
life, has been found and enjoyed. He has many
acquaintances
,
but no friends. He lives for himself, in
a continual round of luxuries, plays a good deal, drinks
deeper than he did, and has recently discovered that
he has the gout. He is considered a
rou
, an egotist,
and a man of the worlda person particularly
dangerous
to insult, but a very pleasant fellow to dine with.
Holford, whom the reader may remember as the
rival orator of Harry at a public meeting in the earlier
part of the story, contrary to Mr. Lennox's prediction,
has turned out a great man, and been elected
governor
of one of the Western States. He has found his
emptiness and impudence rather advantageous than
otherwise, and has often taken the shine off of better
men by a bold display of puff, pomposity, and
pretension
.
Whether he will ever be actually president, is
more than we can say. He is himself understood not
to discountenance the idea.
Mr. and Mrs. Henderson, we are sorry to be obliged
to state, behaved very improperly to the Lennoxes at
the time when they believed themselves ruined. Mr.
Henderson had become rich by land speculation, and
had the sagacity (although he was not a talking man)
to get out of the scrape and place his large gains in a
safe investment just before the crisis. He coldly
declined
rendering the least assistance to his generous
patron when it would have been of great benefit to
him, and Mrs. Henderson was very open in expressing
her indignation that, under the circumstances, they
should have asked it. She had always foreseen and
predicted the downfall of the Lennox familysuch
extravagance
,
pride, folly, etc., etc., etc., really merited a
lesson. She acknowledged that she of
all
persons
ought not to speak against them, but she found it
proper
to overcome her personal habits and inclinations,
from that sense of imperative duty which often obliges
such people to traduce their friends and benefactors
particularly in their misfortunes.
Emmerson continues to advance in his profession,
and has already laid the foundation of a large fortune.
He was among the foremost to congratulate Harry on
his safe return, and came very often to take tea with
the family in the most friendly way possible. In fact
(when certain it would not be required), he earnestly
requested that any assistance he could render might
be asked for without hesitation, and expressed himself
too grateful for past favours to permit of his neglecting
any opportunity to repay them. He (almost) persuaded
both Harry and his wife (the reader will not require
to be more particularly informed, we hope,
who
Mrs.
Harry Lennox had been before her marriage!) that they
must have been mistaken in him, and there are not
wanting people a plenty to this day who believe him
to be as honest, kind hearted, and amiable a man as he
is a sharp and diligent lawyer. To be sure, Seth,
although
,
in the fulness of his happiness, he has scarcely
time to cherish uncharitable feelings, is rather distant
and reserved to his extremely bland and polite old
master, yet, when the latter takes the baby on his knee
and lets him play with his watch-chain, the good-hearted
papa acts as if he did not know the sort of man he has
to deal with, and makes a courteous apology for the
absence of his father-in-law, who, by some inexplicable
chance, always happens to step out of the room as
Emmerson is announced, and remains absent till he
takes his leave, when Fanny runs into the study, and
brings him back with the cabalistic words,
He's gone
at last, sir!
Glendenning, poor fellow, has recently died
somewhere
in the East. A letter from him was subsequently
received by Mrs. Lennox, which agitated and touched
her extremely. But the contents have never
transpired
out of the family.
And Harry himselfwe scarcely dare begin to speak
again of himof the changes around him and within
him. He never had been gay. The high spirits of his
father had in him always been tempered with
reflection
.
Now, perhaps, although happy beyond his
wildest
expectation, he was still graver. Deep thoughts
and high feelings possessed him. He never forgot the
great lesson he had learned abroad, and they who knew
him best, saw well that, if adversity would not have
subdued, prosperity could not elate him. He applied
himself to his profession with so much zeal that his
friends speedily became aware of his splendid talents
for the noble career he had chosen, and perhaps the
world will hear more of him hereafter. We can answer
for him, however, that, whatever befall him, he will be
found an
honest man
, sincere and just in his dealings
with all his fellow-creatures, far too wise and good to
forget, in the temptations and struggles of his present
position, that this world, with all its bliss and all its wo,
is but the short path to another, to become worthy of
which is his predominant thought.
It is said that a very uncommonly pretty little girl,
who answers to the name of Fanny, has recently
been added to the domestic circle. She is a great
favourite
with Emmerson, and is just learning to call
Mrs. Elton
grandmamma
, which excellent lady, at the
last advices, was engaged talking very earnestly on the
subject.
If, in the preceding pages, the writer has altered the
names of persons and places, he has not the less
endeavoured
to give, with an accuracy not greatly
deviating
from the truth, one of the cloud of dark and bloody
associations which, to the shame of a Christian city,
hangs over
Hoboken
.
THE END.New-York
,
August
1
st
, 18.
My dear Captain Glendenning
:
Your last, most gratifying favour reached us in due
course of mail. Need I say how the spirit which inspired it
delighted me, and how much we are all charmed with the
friendship which has risen from such a strange cause? We
have left Rose Hill at last. Harry has gone to Europe, and
Mr. Lennox's business requires his presence in New-York.
We all thought and talked of you yesterday, and drank
health and happiness to you, at Mr. Lennox's suggestion, in
Champagne. I added water to mine, but it did not
diminish
the ardour of my wishes for your continued prosperity,
or of my prayers that you will receive strength from above
to follow to the end the noble path of reformation you have
adopted. You will have long since learned that all the
reasonings
and inferences which seem to militate against the
truth of religion are erroneous, and, though they may tend
to excite doubts, are not sufficient to create unbelief.
Frank expects every day to be ordered to his post at
Prairie du Chien
, whence, he says, he means to keep up a
brisk correspondence with you. My daughter is well, and
begs to be remembered. Your favourite saddle-horse, `
Fancy
,'
ran away the other day with Frank, and threw him into
a ditch, but without any serious consequences, which has
furnished Mary a new means of tormenting him, by
comparing
his riding with yours. The Eltons are well, and
often speak of you. Frank's departure affects me strangely.
Vol. II.D
But all my gay family laugh at me and my
foolish mother's
heart
. We hope to see you one day again; perhaps in
England. How deeply happy I am in the thought that I
have been the humble instrument of aiding in the change in
your opinions. There is no security or happiness in the
world like that of having every doubt of Christianity
removed
.
You are brought out of the land of Egypt. Do not
forsake the Lord, and serve Baal and Ashtaroth. Faith is
now yours. It will protect you from danger as well as from
sorrow. But you must cling to it, for the bad world will be
always striving to wrest it from you. `The Lord
will prove
Israel!
' When once you have examined, you will never
surrender it. `Search the Scriptures:' `prove all things,
and hold fast that which is good.' There is no knowledge
like that knowledge: it is, indeed, like unto a treasure which
a man found hid in a field, and sold all that he had and
bought it.
But I shall tire you with my preaching.
Truly your friend,
Catharine Lennox
.City Hotel
,
August
, 18.
Sir
!
Circumstances not necessary to be explained render me
apprehensive that the affair which took place between you
and myself has not been quite properly arranged. The
meeting must be renewed. When acquainted with my
opinion, I feel certain you will require no other inducement
to afford me the satisfaction I have not yet received, and to
name a friend who will immediately make the necessary
arrangements
.
Yours, etc.,
Charles Glendenning
.August
, 18-.
Dear Sir
,
Circumstances have obliged me to put off the dinner
to-day; I shall not, therefore, have the pleasure of seeing
you.
Truly yours,
Horace Beckford
.My beloved Son
,
Come home and share our sorrows. Come home and
lessen our unhappiness
He trembled at this ominous commencement, but went on.
Great changes have taken place within the last year.
We have lost all our property
. A succession of the most
unexpected events has ruined hundreds, and involved us in
the same fate. An appalling monetary crisis, as you must
well know, is sweeping over the country. Your father, in
his generous confidence in, and characteristic desire to
assist
other people, has risked everything and lost everything.
He is obliged to begin the world again. Poor Mr. Elton
is no more. He died five months ago. Heavy losses,
sustained
,
in common with so many of his townsmen, occurring
at a time when his health was feeble, proved too much for
him. Mrs. Elton is with us, and Fanny alsothe
tenderest
of nurses and the sweetest of friends. Mr. Emmerson
but the story is not altogether one to commit to paper.
You will hear it on your arrival, which I hope will not be
long delayed. We have a thousand interesting things to
tell you, but will not enter upon such subjects till we meet.
It grieves me to add still farther to your distress and
alarm, but I think it better to prepare you at once for the
state of your dear father. He has been dangerously, and
is still distressingly ill. For some time his disorder went
into his eyes, and he was, during a period, entirely blind.
He is better, but his final recovery of sight is doubtful.
Hoping to retrieve our affairs, we long resolved not to
communicate
them to you till we could accompany the
recital
with better tidings. That hope is now past. It is
decreed
by an All-wise Providence that we shall taste sorrow
in our old age. But He has mingled the cup with one good,
which counterbalances the evil. What this blessing is you
will learn by the enclosed letter from your dear father,
which he insisted upon writing himself, lest you should
think his blindness worse than it is. Indeed, since a few
days, he sees very well, and can read at intervals without
danger. I fear, however, for purposes of business, he will
never be what he was.
I know you will hasten home, my dearest son, the
moment
this reaches you. But do not be too much alarmed,
knowing, as we do, that `whom He loveth He
chasteneth
,'
and that this life and all its vicissitudes are
comparatively
unworthy the grief of a rational being, except those
events of it which relate to spiritual things. Do you know,
can you believe you have been absent
nearly ten years?
When I pass in review what has befallen us in the interim,
the period seems long enough; but when I recall the
morning
we accompanied you to your ship, I can fancy you left
us only yesterday; and so life passes away. Answer me
now, my son, is it not a dream?
Mary is well and happy, and sends her love. There is
a story connected with her, but, with a yet unconquered
love of mischief, she has forbid my even alluding to it.
AndI shall really tell you nothing until you are here.
By the blessing of God, notwithstanding what I have
suffered
,
my health is excellent. My heart yearns to embrace
you, my dear Harry. Oh, may God grant you that light
which will render all things endurable, all things welcome.
I do not doubt there is happiness yet in store for us. Read
the enclosed letter with attention. Surely our misfortunes
are but
His
means to accomplish His wise ends.
God bless, preserve, and enlighten you, my beloved
wanderer, and soon return you to your ever affectionate
mother.My dear Boy
,
Your beloved mother will have informed you of the fine
doings we have had here, or, at least, of some of them. But
don't mind; we'll manage matters yet, only now I must
depend
a little more on you. As I have no doubt these
agreeable epistles will bring you home double quick time, I
shall not enter into any particulars, especially as my doctor
pretends that I must yet be careful of my eyes. Keep up
your spirits, and let us see you here when you can
conveniently
manage it. We are beginning to feel your absence,
really
.
I would not write at all to-day, were it not my desire,
as well as my duty, to make one remark to you, which will
probably occasion you more surprise than all the rest of
our revolutions. The truth is, I am much altered since you
left. Many circumstances have occurred to change my
character. Poor Frank's death was the first and most
important
.
Your own affair with Lord Middleton came so
close upon it as to furnish me serious food for reflection.
Men have lost their sons before now; they do every day,
and will continue to do so; but the sudden cutting off of poor
Frank in that manner was sufficient to shake and loosen the
world's hold of me. It is an old and trite saying, that `life
is a
dream;
' but I begin to
feel
that it is so. I am sixty
years old, and the longer I live, the more I see the
fleetingness
,
the nothingness of everything around me, taken by
itself
.
This has led me to a train of thought and to a habit
of reading and investigation very different from any I ever
had before, and which eventually caused me to look forward
through the medium of the great truths of
Christianity
to
that other and better world, to which we are all so rapidly
hastening. I had my doubts at first, but they gradually
faded away, and I am of the conviction that, whatever may
be the arguments on the other side of the question, they are
Vol. II.P
nothing against those in its favour. The only reason why
all men are not Christians is, either that they are wilfully
bad and corrupt, or that they are too much engaged with
the cares, pleasures, and pursuits of this world to allow of
their examining the subject attentively and candidly. Vain
speculations in philosophy and empty, visionary views, I
have depended on long enough, and found them entirely
useless. They are not what the Great Creator has given
his creatures to support, guide, and instruct them in their
way through this life. I am no enthusiast, my dear Harry.
I am more gay, more happy, and cheerful than I was before,
nor do I shrink from all the innocent pleasures to which I
have been accustomed, because I am convinced I am under
the immediate government of a merciful God. On the
contrary
,
while I endure sorrow with more resignation, I should
find in prosperity abundant charms. Need I add that, if
anything could increase my happiness in meeting my dear
boy after so long and eventful and absence, it would be the
certainty that he also has
really examined
the question of
Christianity. I say examined, because I am quite satisfied
that no one can candidly and cooly examine, at least, no
sensible and clear understanding, without becoming a
believer
in the Holy Scriptures.
Don't mistake me, my boy: I am not a long-faced bigot,
afraid of looking at the world, and flying from mirth and
pleasure. I
was
a broken-hearted, gloomy being after poor
Frank's accident, but this change in my opinions has
restored
to me my gayety and more than my accustomed
happiness
.
You will find a man can believe in God and our
Redeemer without running into any irrational excess or
practising the familiarities of some believers; nor must you
suppose grief has turned my head or weakened my
understanding
grief
had nothing to do with changing my
opinions
it
only
drove
me into an examination; by taking from
me the props and supports of the outward world, it threw me
upon myself, and taught me the tremendous truth, that there
existed there
nothing
but darkness and chaosnot a place
to rest onnot one subject which I could bear to reflect on
in the long and terrible hours of the wakeful nights.
Everything
in the universe seemed destroyed, or destined to
be so, except
Christianity
, and I grasped at that, because
there was nothing else
to save me from infinite destruction and
infinite despair. Happily, the more I examined, the more I
was convinced. When the great idea had once entered my
mind, everything I observed in nature, history, life, and
myself
,
confirmed it. Each moment grew brighter, as at the
dawn of a day streaming gradually and gloriously into the
windows of a smoky theatre, whose lurid light and false
splendour pale and fade before the broadening glory of
nature.
If you have not made the same experience, my son, we
will make it together. Doubts will arise. but they will
melt away like night-fogs from the solid mountains. If you
have not at once the perfect faith of the centurion, you will,
at least, say, with the father of the possessed child, `
Lord,
I believe; help thou mine unbelief!
'